product,brand,core_score,expert_score,reviews,retail_price,sale_price,terrain,arch_support,weight_men,weight_women,heel_to_toe_men,heel_to_toe_women,release_date,width,update,summary
Adidas Ultraboost 19, Adidas,95.0,85.0,5956.0,$180,$108 (save 40%), Road, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Feb 2019," Normal | Narrow, Normal",,"6 reasons to buy
Many testers believed that the cushioning system that’s present in the Adidas Ultraboost 19 is more responsive than the ones in the previous iterations.
The Primeknit upper felt comfortable and non-irritating to the skin, some people commented.
Several consumers claimed that the underfoot platform was reactive enough to handle long-distance running events and speed training sessions.
The general durability of this running shoe was lauded as it didn’t break down on people, even after multiple runs.
Runners observed the noticeably spacious toe box that permitted natural toe-splay and averted skin chafing.
The versatility of this product was appreciated because people were able to use it for exercising and urban adventures.
2 reasons not to buy
More than a few consumers didn’t like the color schemes of the Ultraboost 19, stating that they were awkward and bland.
A couple of runners claimed that the sidewalls of the shoe didn’t hug the foot properly, thus resulting in some in-shoe wobbling.
Bottom line
The Adidas Ultraboost 19 is considered to be a successful reinvigoration of the famed series of neutral running shoes. Those who have tried it were happy with the reactive midsole design, the form-fitting upper and the durable configurations of the components. Moreover, the people were glad because this road companion was versatile enough to be used for activities other than running. On the other hand, some individuals were unhappy with the color schemes while others were disappointed with the apparently not-so-secure in-shoe coverage."
Brooks Ghost 12, Brooks,96.0,88.0,1779.0,$130,$110 (save 98%)," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 9.3oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm, Jul 2019," Narrow, Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Narrow, Normal, Wide",,"6 reasons to buy
Several consumers welcome the snug yet secure fit of the Ghost 12, stating that the upper reliably hugs the foot.
The heel-to-toe transitions feel smooth and well-rounded, according to those who have tested this Brooks running shoe.
Wearing this product and taking it for a run is a sure way to get energized and powerful performances, based on a handful of reviews.
The upper unit has received praise for being breathable and able to disperse heat.
A couple of runners have emphasized that the traction capacity of the outsole is dependable and precise.
The shoelaces are able to preserve the intended fit preference because they don’t unravel quickly, according to some purchasers.
3 reasons not to buy
Several consumers have expressed their disappointment with the Brooks Ghost 12’s visuals, stating that the colors are bland and uninspired.
A few testers claim that the toe box is not roomy enough for natural toe-splay.
The midfoot part of the platform is criticized by some for having a noticeable bump that caused discomfort.
Bottom line
The overall feedback for the Brooks Ghost 12 has been overwhelmingly positive. Most runners welcome this running shoe because it has a comfortable and form-accommodating build. The highlights include the breathable yet secure upper unit, the traction-ready outsole, and the highly responsive midsole foam. On the other hand, the sizing scheme is criticized for being a bit small compared to the typical shoe-wrap.
Fans of neutral running shoes that are for the roads are the ones who are likely to have fun with the Brooks Ghost 12."
Asics Gel Kayano 26, Asics,93.0,86.0,658.0,$160,$96 (save 40%), Road, Stability, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 11.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Jun 2019," Narrow, Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Normal, Wide", Asics Gel Kayano 27,"8 reasons to buy
Most testers commend the cushioning capability of the Asics Gel Kayano 26’s midsole unit, stating that it was reactive and comfortable.
The stability mechanisms of the platform have been praised for being supportive of the foot and for steadying the foot’s anatomical shape.
The upper unit offers continuous breathability and security, according to a lot of runners.
Although expensive, many buyers agree that the superb features of the Gel Kayano 26 make it worth every penny.
Several users have observed the durability of the shoe, citing that it is properly constructed and that it holds up well.
A number of runners believe the shoe helps relieve discomfort that is caused by flat-footedness.
The Gel Kayano 26 feels comfortable from the first use and does not need a break-in period, many reviewers said.
The midsole features of the Kayano 26 offer a springy and responsive ride, according to numerous wearers.
5 reasons not to buy
Several people have complained about the too-tight construction of the Asics Gel Kayano 26’s toe box.
The shoelaces of this model have received criticism from a few testers for quickly unraveling.
A handful of people note that the midsole was a bit thin to handle extended running sessions.
Some runners consider the available colorways to be unappealing to the eyes.
The sizing scheme has gained a bad rep for being a bit bigger than the usual fare.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Kayano 26 proves to be a successful update of a solid running shoe series. Most of the positive feedback is focused on the midsole’s cushioning quality and stability mechanisms, as well as the shoe’s durability and responsiveness. The criticisms tackle the too-tight toe box, the contrasting looseness of the overall fit, the apparently dull color schemes, and the easy-to-unravel shoelaces.
The shoe appears to be a worthy purchase for many despite its high price tag. Thus, overpronators and those who enjoy running on the roads would likely appreciate the Asics Gel Kayano 26."
Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 36, Nike,92.0,88.0,318.0,$120,$75 (save 38%)," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Jun 2019," Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Normal, Wide", Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 37,"6 reasons to buy
Some people claimed that the underfoot cushioning system was comfortable and responsive to movements.
The upper unit was praised for hugging the foot securely without limiting movement.
The fabrics of the façade were lauded for being smooth and free of irritants like unnecessary seams.
Several runners complimented the lightweight structure of the Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 36, stating that the whole product didn’t drag their feet down.
According to a tester, the lacing system and the heel collar were able to hold the foot in place and prevent in-shoe quivering.
The gripping ability of the outsole was praised by those who have worn this shoe.
1 reasons not to buy
A couple of purchasers claimed that the width profile of this shoe was narrower than their usual fare.
Bottom line
The Air Zoom Pegasus 36 was generally able to garner positive feedback from those who have tested it. This Nike running shoe was apparently comfortable and reactive to the natural motion of the foot. The fabrics that embody the façade are also considered to be elements that agree with the outline of the foot. On the other hand, there were a few reports of a too-tight interior chamber.
The 36th iteration of the Pegasus line is a neutral running shoe that’s made for the roads. Aside from normal pronation, the cushioning system can support the supinated structure of underpronators’ arches."
Mizuno Wave Rider 23, Mizuno,95.0,88.0,366.0,$120,$72 (save 90%), Road, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm, Aug 2019," Normal, Wide | Normal, Wide",,"7 reasons to buy
The redesigned upper of the Mizuno Wave Rider 23 is well-appreciated by many, which they described as both comfortable and breathable.
A lot of users agree that the Wave Rider 23 is lightweight.
The sole unit of the shoe provides ample cushioning and support, says one reviewer. Another claimed that it offers just the right level of firmness to keep the shoe from feeling mushy.
Several wearers report that the Wave Rider 23 gives a secure and accurate fit, which meets their expectations.
Some testers report that the shoe promotes natural movements and allows a comfortable experience in both running and walking activities.
The midsole “feels like a cloud,” according to a couple of reviewers.
The tongue stays in place despite being a separate detail that is not connected to a cleatie structure, a user claims.
1 reasons not to buy
A couple of reviewers think that the updates in the Wave Rider 23 are not significant enough for buyers to upgrade.
Bottom line
For its 23rd version, the Mizuno Wave Rider remains consistent and reliable in providing a running companion that can withstand many miles on the road. Users were especially impressed with the improvements in the shoe’s structural elements, as well as the performance it delivers. Comfort, support, and fit were some of the winning points of the shoe. Fans of the previous edition of the shoe will love the Wave Rider 23, but maybe not if they expect a highly remarkable change."
Hoka One One Clifton 6, Hoka One One,92.0,88.0,109.0,$130,$104 (save 35%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm, Jun 2019," Narrow, Normal, Wide | Normal, Wide, X-Wide",,"6 reasons to buy
The forefoot section of the Hoka One One Clifton 6 was wide enough to welcome the natural splaying capacity of the toes, some consumers noted.
According to several testers, the midsole unit was reactive enough to accommodate speedy transitions through the gait cycle.
The lightweight structure of this running shoe was lauded by many consumers.
Most people considered the sizing scheme to be adherent to their expectations.
The upper unit offered breathability and a non-irritating wrap, testers noted.
Based on a handful of reviews, the color schemes were plenty and eye-catching.
1 reasons not to buy
A couple of consumers claimed that they needed a break-in period because the façade was initially too tight.
Bottom line
The overall reaction towards the Clifton 6 was positive. People embraced this Hoka One One running shoe as a worthy successor to the products in the Clifton family. The aesthetics were deemed as appealing while the fabrics of the upper were considered as non-irritating. The reactive midsole, correct sizing scheme, and the lightweight structure were also highlighted as elements that turned this product into a powerhouse in comfort.
Neutral runners who like to take to the roads are the ones who are most likely to enjoy the Hoka One One Clifton 6."
Nike Epic React Flyknit 2, Nike,90.0,89.0,547.0,$150,$69 (save 54%)," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 8.4oz , Women: 6.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Feb 2019," Normal | Normal, Wide",,"5 reasons to buy
Several satisfied users lauded the good-looking design of the Nike Epic React Flyknit 2.
Some buyers admired the lightweight construction of the shoe.
According to some comments, the Epic React Flyknit 2 is a very comfortable running shoe.
Those who have tried the first Epic React Flyknit admired the performance of the 2nd version; they said that it works impressively well on both long-distance and uptempo runs.
A few runners noted the perforations in the upper of the shoe which gives the foot unmatched breathability.
5 reasons not to buy
The shoe is expensive compared to other road running shoes.
A couple of users mentioned that the shoe runs small.
A few medium-footed buyers noticed that the forefoot feels too narrow for them.
Most of those who purchase the shoe online were unhappy because the colors are inaccurate and misleading.
One runner reported that the exposed React foam starts wearing off after using the shoe a few times.
Bottom line
Following the phrase `If it’s not broken, do not fix it`, Nike releases the 2nd version of the Nike Epic React Flyknit with minor upgrades. True enough, many users are still impressed by the performance of the Epic React Flyknit 2. People love its lightweight design, comfortable cushioning and breathable coverage. Though there are some buyers who have expressed disappointments toward the shoe’s sizing and colors, the Epic React Flyknit 2 has still proven to be a successful release."
Saucony Ride ISO 2, Saucony,95.0,89.0,51.0,$120,$65 (save 96%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Apr 2019," Normal, Wide | Normal, Wide",,"5 reasons to buy
Consumers claimed that the Ride ISO 2 was as comfortable, if not more, than the previous iteration in the series.
Those who have tested this Saucony running shoe stated that the aesthetics were visually striking.
Most purchasers were happy that the sizing scheme followed their usual expectations.
The cushioning system was considered to be highly supportive; several people who have lower extremity concerns noted that the midsole kept them from discomfort.
The lightweight build of this product was well-received.
1 reasons not to buy
The material that’s used for the heel collar wore off quickly and rubbed uncomfortably against the skin of the Achilles tendon, a few testers claimed.
Bottom line
Saucony’s premier Ride ISO 2 was able to rake in the positive feedback of many running shoe enthusiasts. This product was regarded as a worthy update to the relatively recent series of neutral running shoes from the reputable brand. The cushioning system, sizing scheme, and lightweight construction were elements that gained praise. On the other hand, the fabric on the heel collar was detested for quickly tearing and causing irritation to the skin.
The Saucony Ride ISO 2 is a road companion that’s designed for neutral pronators and those who like to tackle long miles."
Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 36 Trail, Nike,89.0,88.0,201.0,$130,$78 (save 44%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Jun 2019, Normal | Normal,,"8 reasons to buy
The Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 26 Trail works excellently in packed dirt, rocky pavements, as well as mountain trails, as experienced by a number of runners.
A reviewer finds the shoe to be “surprisingly durable.”
Some users agree that the shoe is easy to clean, including the mud stains.
The Flywire cables of the shoe effectively allows flexibility in the midfoot area, according to a wearer.
A couple of runners have praised the heel cup’s adequate support, especially in the Achilles area.
Many buyers think the Air Zoom Pegasus 36 Trail is considerably lightweight for a trail shoe.
Several users rave about the Air Zoom’s exceptional cushioning.
The mesh upper of the shoe is comfortable and breathable, claimed numerous wearers.
2 reasons not to buy
Some wearers observe the forefoot area of the shoe to be too tight.
One reviewer experienced poor grip of the shoe on slippery trail surfaces.
Bottom line
The Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 36 Trail displays a strong and successful comeback as majority of its users expressed their satisfaction with the shoe. Positive comments include comfort, durability, functionality, and even support and flexibility. The shoe also showed lightness and breathability as its outstanding qualities. There were only very few negative feedback regarding fit and traction, but, overall, the Zoom Pegasus 36 Trail is a well-received trail shoe because of its reliable features."
Nike Air Zoom Structure 22, Nike,88.0,81.0,96.0,$120,$77 (save 36%), Road, Stability, Men: 11.5oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,," Narrow, Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Normal, Wide",,"5 reasons to buy
Those who have tested the Nike Air Zoom Structure 22 felt that the stability features offered proper protection against moderate overpronation.
The aesthetics of this running shoe were welcomed by consumers.
Some runners noted that the engineered mesh upper was able to provide comfort throughout the running session.
The midsole didn’t sag or wear off quickly, a tester stated.
A consumer commended the traction capacity of the outsole unit.
1 reasons not to buy
The padding on the heel collar didn’t secure the foot properly, according to a reviewer; he experienced some annoying accidental shoe removals.
Bottom line
The Nike Air Zoom Structure 22 was able to capture the attention of people, especially those who wanted to have a façade that it cool-looking and comfortable at the same time. The breathable and non-irritating upper was welcomed, in fact. But a person complained about the heel collar being flimsy and unable to hold the foot in place."
Salomon Speedcross 5, Salomon,96.0,93.0,447.0,$130,$91 (save 30%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.6oz , Women: 9.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Feb 2019," Normal, Wide | Normal, Wide",,"6 reasons to buy
People who have tried the Salomon Speedcross 5 felt that the midsole unit dutifully offered underfoot comfort.
Some consumers felt that the external pad of this trail companion was able to provide reliable traction.
Snow and mud didn’t stand a chance against this running shoe, according to some testers; they didn’t experience any slippage on those kinds of surfaces.
The in-shoe hug of the upper unit was considered by runners to be comfortable and secure.
A couple of reviewers noted that the collar of the Salomon Speedcross 5 was able to hold the foot and keep it in place.
Purchasers liked the general durability of this running shoe; they felt that it could handle what the trails could give them.
1 reasons not to buy
A few reviewers noted that the upper unit of this running shoe was not as breathable as hoped.
Bottom line
The response for the Salomon Speedcross 5 was positive. Purchasers who have tested it were suitably happy with what they were able to get from this trail running shoe. The outsole unit was highlighted by consumers because it was apparently efficient at adhering to the ground, giving surface control at all times. They reported that it was versatile and able to handle both rough and soft terrains. The secure upper configuration and responsive midsole were also dutifully praised. On the other hand, some people felt that the upper was not as ventilated as they expected."
Brooks Adrenaline GTS 19, Brooks,96.0,89.0,1856.0,$130,$100 (save 47%)," Road, Treadmill", Motion control, Men: 11oz , Women: 9.6oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm, Nov 2018," Narrow, Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Narrow, Normal, Wide, X-Wide", Brooks Adrenaline GTS 20,"7 reasons to buy
Many people claimed that the in-shoe experience was comfortable right out of the box.
The façade didn’t have a bulky look, and a lot of testers liked that aspect.
The upper unit gained favor for being breathable and flexible.
Some runners felt that the pronation support given by the Brooks Adrenaline GTS 19’s midsole was more substantial than the ones in the previous iterations.
The general quality of the components wasn’t overshadowed by the price, some runners noted; they felt that this shoe had an affordable starting price.
Purchasers liked the fact that, for a stability shoe, the Adrenaline GTS 19 didn’t have a heavy build.
The upper offered smooth and non-irritating coverage, many runners stated.
1 reasons not to buy
The durability of the Brooks Adrenaline GTS 19 was criticized by several reviewers as they experienced the sole coming apart or the stitches unraveling.
Bottom line
The Brooks Adrenaline GTS 19, similar to another Brooks stability shoe, the Transcend 6, was able to capture its target audience, runners who needed support to combat overpronation. People felt that it was comfortable, secure and non-irritating as it wrapped the foot. The quality of the components was also praised. Meanwhile, a consistent complaint among users is the poor construction of the shoe, which has resulted to a lack of durability."
New Balance FuelCell Propel, New Balance,96.0,88.0,124.0,$110,$69 (save 37%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 7.1oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm, Jun 2019," Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Normal, Wide",,"5 reasons to buy
Most consumers state that the sizing scheme of the New Balance FuelCell Propel follows their usual expectations.
A lot of runners have welcomed the cushioning system of this running shoe; they claim that the overall feel is soft and responsive.
The price is lauded for being affordable.
This road running shoe has a quality that some testers believe as superb; the components apparently didn’t look or feel cheap.
Many purchasers note that the lightweight construction of this product has allowed them to run for extended periods.
2 reasons not to buy
According to a few people, the overlay that’s placed on the toe box has started to irritate the toes, causing discomfort.
Some runners report that the New Balance FuelCell Propel requires a break-in period because it’s initially a bit stiff.
Bottom line
The general response towards the FuelCell Propel has been mostly positive. Those who have tested this New Balance running shoe feel that it employs a capacity for quality performance and long-lasting enjoyment. The responsive cushioning system, the wallet-friendly price, and the lightness of the build have been highlighted as the elements that elevated this product. On the other hand, the complaints center on the irritating overlay on the toe box, as well as a break-in period that is needed before achieving full comfort.
Fans of neutral running shoes meant for the roads are the target market of the FuelCell Propel."
Salomon Sense Ride 3, Salomon,99.0,93.0,62.0,$120,$80 (save 33%)," Mud, Trail", Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Feb 2020, Normal | Normal,,"8 reasons to buy
The Salomon Sense Ride 3 provides excellent traction, according to some users.
Based on reviews, the running shoe is supportive.
The majority of the testers agreed that the shoe feels smooth when running.
According to those who have tested it, the running footwear is well-cushioned.
A good number of consumers commented that the shoe is comfortable.
It is stylish, based on reviews.
The shoe is sturdy, as noted by a few buyers.
Many purchasers loved its roomy toe box.
3 reasons not to buy
One of the users commented that the Salomon Sense Ride 3 does not flex easily.
A buyer said that the toe box height of the shoe is low, making it problematic during long hours of running.
The shoe is heavier and beefier, observed by a tester.
Bottom line
Neutral pronators and trail running supporters and fans are the main consumers targeted by the Salomon Sense Ride 3. The neutral running shoe undeniably received positive comments from Salomon running shoe enthusiasts. With the technologies employed into the running shoe, the traction, support, response, and cushioning system are highlighted as the elements that improved the runner's performances."
Adidas Adizero Boston 8, Adidas,96.0,89.0,105.0,$120,$60 (save 99%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Jun 2019," Normal, Wide | Normal", Adidas Adizero Boston 9,"7 reasons to buy
The lightweight construction of the Adidas Adizero Boston 8 is welcomed by most consumers.
‘Comfortable’ is a word that many have used to describe their time wearing this product.
The Boost™ cushioning unit is welcomed as a responsive underfoot piece for all-day activities.
A handful of testers have noted that the forefoot section has a roomy construction that accommodates natural toe-splay.
Push-off power is appreciated because the midsole apparently balances firmness and flexibility.
The upper unit of this running shoe is considered secure and breathable.
The traction provided by the outsole unit is welcomed as it is deemed precise and well-balanced.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people have stated that the Adidas Adizero Boston 8 has a stiffness that calls for a few break-in periods.
A couple of purchasers have reported some discomfort caused by the padding and shape of the heel collar.
Bottom line
The overall reaction towards the Adidas Adizero Boston 8 has been mostly positive. People consider this running shoe an approachable update for their daily activities. The lightweight structure, comfortable build, spacious toe-box, and traction-ready outsole are highlighted as the best parts of the design. On the other hand, the irritating heel part of the upper and the need for a break-in period make up the negative points.
Fans of road running shoes are the market of the Adidas Adizero Boston 8."
Brooks Glycerin 17, Brooks,95.0,87.0,1014.0,$150,$105 (save 88%), Road, Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Mar 2019," Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Narrow, Normal, Wide", Brooks Glycerin 18,"6 reasons to buy
The underfoot cushioning system of the Brooks Glycerin 17 was considered to be efficient at providing comfort throughout the running session.
The inclusion of an OrthoLite® sockliner was welcomed by most testers; they believed that it enhanced the plush and pleasant platform of this neutral running shoe.
Some testers stated that the in-shoe fit followed their expectations; the width profiles and the shape of the shoe accommodated the foot with ease.
A couple of purchasers observed that the inner sleeve didn’t cause any irritation or discomfort to the skin.
The foot-shaped platform and the well-adjusted build of this shoe helped it making it versatile; people have commented that they were able to use this shoe for activities other than running.
Most of the running enthusiasts who have tried the Glycerin 17 praised the outsole unit’s capacity to grip the ground. They claimed that the ground control and steadiness were easily achieved because the rubber pad was reliably traction-ready.
1 reasons not to buy
Some purchasers didn’t like the color schemes of this road shoe, stating that the hues looked different from the more appealing online pictures.
Bottom line
Overwhelmingly positive feedback was given to the Brooks Glycerin 17. Those who have tried it were happy with its individual components and the overall quality of its entire existence. The luxurious underfoot experience, the agreeable in-shoe coverage, and the versatile construction were highlighted as the things that made this neutral shoe a great go-to runner.
The Glycerin 17 is designed for neutral pronators and those who desire versatile footwear for speed training, asphalt adventures and gym exercises."
Skechers GOrun Razor 3 Hyper, Skechers,94.0,94.0,57.0,$135,$80 (save 41%), Road, Neutral, Men: 6.4oz , Women: 6.4oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm, Nov 2018," Normal, Wide | Normal, Wide",,"7 reasons to buy
Many runners praised the responsiveness and energy return of the Skechers GOrun Razor 3 Hyper.
The shoe contributed to an improved speed, according to numerous users. Others attested that it was perfect for running in marathons.
The shoe was comfortable enough to be worn daily, several reviewers said.
A lot of purchasers found the GOrun Razor 3 Hyper to be affordable.
The minimal weight of the shoe was appreciated by most of the users.
The durability of the shoe was apparent to many wearers.
Some reviewers claimed the Skechers GOrun Razor 3 Hyper was a versatile shoe, as it performed well in both fast and slow runs.
3 reasons not to buy
Some buyers were disappointed by the limited color options of the shoe. Meanwhile, others thought that the “Speed” print was tacky.
A few wearers have found the GOrun Razor 3 Hyper to be too narrow.
A couple of reviewers disliked that the shoe needed a break-in period, as they developed blisters during their early runs.
Bottom line
The Skechers GOrun Razor 3 Hyper has evidently presented an above-average performance, based on the numerous positive feedback from users. A lot of runners liked that shoe was adaptable to different conditions, while some were happy with the comfort and convenience it provided. Overall, the GOrun Razor 3 Hyper is worth the purchase; despite some criticisms on its construction, the majority are satisfied and proud that the shoe exceeded their expectations."
Nike Air Zoom Vomero 14, Nike,89.0,88.0,147.0,$140,$84 (save 40%)," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 8.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Nov 2018," Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Normal, Wide",,"6 reasons to buy
Some runners commented that the Nike Air Zoom Vomero 14 is comfortable.
The shoe is perfect for jogging and long-running activities, according to those who have tried it.
A lot of users appreciated the shoe’s excellent cushioning.
Based on a review, the shoe is versatile; it can be worn during road and trail running activities.
A few mentioned that the shoe feels light and fast.
The Vomero 14 fits true to size.
1 reasons not to buy
One of the users said that the Zoom unit was poking through the shoe's sole. As a result, he felt a little pain while running.
The shoe is expensive.
Bottom line
The Nike Air Zoom Vomero made some of the purchasers pleased and satisfied because of its excellent cushioning. They appreciated the shoe's performance in different outdoor activities. Although one of them has a problem with the Zoom tech that was poking through the sole, others still recommend the running shoe because of the comfort it provides. In general, the Nike Zoom Vomero gained a positive response from a lot of wearers."
Brooks Launch 6, Brooks,93.0,89.0,3643.0,$100,$70 (save 85%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Dec 2018," Narrow, Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Narrow, Normal, Wide", Brooks Launch 7,"8 reasons to buy
Majority of the runners like the fact that the Brooks Launch 6 is now more breathable thanks to its updated one-piece engineered mesh upper.
Noted by some users is how significantly lightweight the Brooks Launch 6 is.
Often mentioned by most users is the new one-piece upper that gives Brooks Launch 6 a nice snug fit.
In some user reviews, they like that there are four color options for both Brooks Launch 6 men and Brooks Launch 6 women.
Most runners find that the BioMoGo DNA midsole cushioning gel did not disappoint in being responsive when they run at a quicker pace, providing a great midfoot transition.
According to several buyers, Brooks Launch 6 has a true to size fit and is also true to width, making it very comfortable to users.
Also mentioned by a couple of runners is that they like the new layout of the Midfoot Transition Zone.  The users have noticed the quick transition from heel to toe with this new design in the midfoot area.
A few runners like the fact that Brooks brought back the strobel in the Brooks Launch 6 which had been left out in the Brooks Launch 5 in favor of a simple mesh.
2 reasons not to buy
Few purchasers have mentioned that even if Brooks claims that the Brooks Launch 6 is lighter than its forerunner, the Brooks Launch 5, the production models found in stores are a tad bit heavier than the Launch 5.
Noted by a couple of runners is that even if the new one-piece upper provides a little more volume, it also makes the overall platform of the shoe a bit narrower.
Bottom line
The Brooks Launch 6 according to most users have lived up to the usual high quality and performance of its predecessors.  The shoe is good neutral running shoe when it comes to fit, comfort, responsiveness, weight, and flexibility.  Despite a few buyers having mentioned that the shoe is a bit heavier and slightly narrower than its predecessor, the negative comments does not overshadow the overall positive response that most runners have. In conclusion, Brooks Launch 6 is a shoe that is suitable for neutral runners looking for speed, cushion, and durability."
Brooks Levitate 2, Brooks,91.0,84.0,1015.0,$150,$84 (save 44%), Road, Neutral, Men: 11.2oz , Women: 9.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,," Narrow, Normal | Normal, Wide", Brooks Levitate 3,"11 reasons to buy
The Brooks Levitate 2 had a fantastic fit, according to some
The shoe was very comfortable right out of the box, a reviewer claimed.
A few buyers enjoyed the design of the Levitate 2.
Some runners approved the addition of the Achilles protector in the Levitate 2.
The midsole was responsive, and it provided great cushioning, a wearer noted.
The padded tongue was well appreciated by various consumers.
Many users were pleased that the shoe ran true to size.
The upper gave a sock-like fit, according to a pleased buyer.
The Levitate 2 was surprisingly nimble and flexible, said an impressed runner.
Most of the users of the Levitate 2 claimed the shoe had a roomy toe box.
The shoe helped keep the foot in proper alignment, a reviewer reported.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners thought the Levitate 2 was a bit heavy.
The foot felt quite hot inside the shoe, a user observed. Another person complained that it felt like wearing a sweater in the summer.
The shoe took a long time to dry out whenever it got wet or soaked with sweat, a buyer noticed.
Bottom line
Many users of the Brooks Levitate 2 were impressed with the shoe – numerous praises were made regarding the noticeable improvements, while the fit and performance of the shoe were consistently well-regarded. Although there were some criticisms about the Levitate 2’s weight and in-shoe environment, the majority still concluded that this neutral running shoe was a worthy purchase."
Brooks Revel 3, Brooks,94.0,90.0,262.0,$100,$80 (save 91%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
The midsole unit of the Brooks Revel 3 is lauded for allowing the foot to move through the stride with relative ease.
Several testers have noted that the quality of the cushioning system is robust and accommodating for all-day support.
The weight of this shoe has been deemed by many testers to be suitably light for their daily runs.
Some consumers claim that the fit profile of the Brooks Revel 3 is accurate.
A couple of runners notice the forefoot being wide enough to accommodate the natural splaying of the toes.
The upper unit has gained some fans for offering a wrap that is secure yet flexible.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people note that the fabrics of the upper have worn down after only a few uses.
Based on a handful of reviews, the in-shoe experience is a bit restrictive.
Bottom line
The Revel 3 has been received quite well. Those who have tested this Brooks running shoe are generally happy with what it has to offer. The underfoot cushioning system is touted to be comfortable and responsive while the weight is deemed light enough for daily use. The shoe’s adequately plush platform gives suitability for mid-distance runs.
Fans of road running shoes are the ones who are likely to enjoy what the Brooks Revel 3 has to offer."
New Balance Fresh Foam More, New Balance,88.0,85.0,124.0,$160,$80 (save 50%), Road, Neutral, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm, Apr 2019," Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Normal, Wide, X-Wide", New Balance Fresh Foam More v2,"5 reasons to buy
The New Balance Fresh Foam More gave a relaxed fit, some reviewers said.
A few users agreed that the shoe promoted fast paces.
Many wearers noted the comfort provided by the Fresh Foam midsole. Some mentioned that it felt nice on the foot even when worn for long periods of time, while others described it as “walking on clouds.”
Several customers liked that the Fresh Foam More was lightweight.
Some runners noted the shoe was more flexible compared to other New Balance models.
3 reasons not to buy
The mesh quickly frayed within just one week of use, according to a couple of customers.
Some users noted that the outsole had worn out easily. One, in particular, said their shoe showed signs of wear after just 150 miles.
The heel cup rubbed against the skin, which felt uncomfortable, a number of wearers reported.
Bottom line
For a new model, the New Balance Fresh Foam More proved to be a fantastic running shoe, as many users were pleased with its performance. Runners were quick to praise the shoe’s comfort level brought about by exceptional materials and lightweight structure. However, some customers were not convinced of its durability. The overall reception for the Fresh Foam More is at the average, with the majority of consumers satisfied with their purchase."
New Balance 880 v9, New Balance,90.0,88.0,76.0,$125,$65 (save 48%), Road, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 8.9oz,,, Mar 2019," Narrow, Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Narrow, Normal, Wide, X-Wide", New Balance 880 v7,"5 reasons to buy
Several people stated that the New Balance 880 v9 was comfortable from the start; they didn’t need a break-in period.
Some consumers noted that the cushioning system was enough to support the foot during extended running sessions.
A consumer claimed that her plantar fasciitis was alleviated because of this running shoe’s midsole unit.
A couple of reviewers felt that the 880 v9 was versatile enough to be used for activities other than running.
The aesthetics were welcomed because they apparently made the shoe visually appealing.
2 reasons not to buy
The materials of the shoe looked too flimsy and delicate, according to some wearers.
A tester complained that the fit was a bit narrow, but sizing up made it too wide.
Bottom line
The New Balance 880 v9 was able to receive positive reviews from those who have tried it. Most consumers were welcoming of its midsole unit, which was supposedly very comfortable underneath the foot. Also, the color schemes and the versatile construction were highlighted as selling points. The complaints mostly revolved around the materials, as well as an inconsistent fit profile.
Neutral pronators who like to have a comfortable speed training session or extended running activity may get their fix with the New Balance 880 v9 because it’s touted as a reliable companion for the roads."
Altra Torin 4 Plush, Altra,93.0,84.0,105.0,$140,$89 (save 36%)," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,," Normal | Normal, X-Wide",,"6 reasons to buy
Some say that the extra 2-millimeter heel height of the Altra Torin 4 Plush allows the foot to enjoy more comfort compared to the regular Torin 4 model.
The responsiveness of the midsole unit is praised because people like a platform that energizes their steps.
Several consumers report that the back part of the silhouette is able to hold the heel in place and keep it from wobbling.
Though a bit heavier than the base iteration of the 4th version, this Altra running shoe is still regarded as lightweight.
There are reviews that vouch for the capacity of this road running shoe to handle groomed trails.
Most users note that the outsole unit has a traction capacity that is reliable and efficient.
3 reasons not to buy
Some testers have described the logo overlay of the shoe as stiff and prone to causing the inner fabrics to rub uncomfortably against the skin.
The toe box didn’t allow the toes to splay naturally, according to a bevy of runners.
A couple of users report that the fabrics and the midsole retain moisture (or water when cleaned) when subjected to it.
Bottom line
The overall feedback for the Altra Torin 4 Plush has been mostly positive. The well-received elements include the noticeably well-cushioned midsole unit, the secure heel construction, and the versatile and dependable outsole unit. On the other hand, the negative feedback emphasizes the surprisingly unaccommodating toe box, the moisture-retaining fabrics/midsole foam, and the irritating overlay system.
People who like neutral running shoes that evoke natural movement and congruence with the flat surfaces of the roads are the target market of the Torin 4 Plush."
Nike Revolution 5, Nike,92.0,81.0,569.0,$65,$49 (save 87%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 9oz,,,," Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Normal, Wide",,"8 reasons to buy
Nike Revolution 5 is a perfect jogging and walking companion, according to many wearers. 
People like the lightweight construction of this road running shoe. 
The shoe is stylish and comfortable based on some reviews. 
A lot of runners welcome the light and breathable upper of the Nike Revolution 5.
Many purchasers commented that the shoe offers excellent cushioning. 
This running shoe has ample room in the forefoot section that allows for natural foot movements, several consumers noted. 
Nike Revolution 5 offers additional support in the heel area, said a few reviewers. 
Consumers are happy that the price of this running shoe is affordable. 
2 reasons not to buy
The durability of the upper unit is questionable to some buyers.
One reviewer mentioned that the shoe insole is not removable.
Bottom line
Runners have appreciated the cushioning quality of the Nike Revolution 5. This road running shoe utilizes a soft midsole foam that offers a bouncy and responsive running experience. Although some consumers complained about the shoe’s durability, others still recommended this neutral running shoe for its breathability and lightweight construction. "
Hoka One One Speedgoat 3, Hoka One One,95.0,88.0,79.0,$140,$115 (save 18%)," Mud, Trail", Neutral, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 9.1oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm, Jan 2019," Narrow, Normal | Normal", Hoka One One Speedgoat 4,"5 reasons to buy
According to most users, the Hoka One One Speedgoat 3 is very comfortable even when worn for long hours.
Several runners admired the impressive traction of the shoe even on uneven surfaces.
The shoe offers reliable cushioning, as noted in some user reviews.
The Speedgoat 3 runs true to size.
The low-drop design is admired by most users.
2 reasons not to buy
The Speedgoat 3 is expensive.
A few users mentioned that the toe box is not roomy enough.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Speedgoat 3 is a reliable trail running shoe for neutral runners. Positive comments were geared toward the shoe’s traction, sizing, and low-drop design. Though it also received negative comments, overall, the shoe is still a successful update to the Speedgoat model."
Adidas SL20, Adidas,84.0,86.0,7.0,$120,$50 (save 58%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8.1oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
Runners appreciated the lightweight structure of the Adidas SL20. 
The upper construction helps offer a secure ride, according to a lot of reviewers. 
Many users commented that the shoe is comfortable to wear. 
Some buyers said that it delivers excellent grip on both wet and dry surfaces.
Several purchasers claimed that the Adidas SL20 is responsive.
The shoe is breathable, a couple of commenters claimed. 
One reviewer testified that the new midsole is as responsive as the Boost midsole. 
3 reasons not to buy
A few wearers noted that the Adidas SL20 is firmer compared to other Adidas running shoes. 
The shoelaces are too thick and long, said some testers.
This running shoe is not supportive, several runners observed. 
Bottom line
Featuring a lightweight construction, the Adidas SL20 is an ideal running partner for runners of all abilities. It is a neutral running shoe that offers a fast and efficient ride. This running companion is crafted with high-quality materials, aiming to deliver a balance of comfort, flexibility, and durability. It is also perfect for casual walks."
New Balance FuelCell Echo, New Balance,96.0,93.0,68.0,$100,$60 (save 45%)," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm, Jun 2019," Narrow, Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Normal, Wide, X-Wide",,"5 reasons to buy
Many claim that the New Balance FuelCell Echo improves speed. 
A lot state that it is very comfortable. 
It has a lightweight composition, remarked several athletes. 
Some laud its flexibility. 
Several hail the responsive ride the shoe delivers. 
2 reasons not to buy
Some of the wearers say that the shoe caused some blisters on the foot. 
A few customers have raised some concerns about the fit of the shoe. 
Bottom line
The New Balance FuelCell Echo is a road running shoe that’s built for neutral runners. Composed of durable and reliable materials, it delivers an ultra-responsive cushioning and superb traction. Achieve a good balance of fashion and functionality with the FuelCell Echo."
Adidas Ultraboost, Adidas,89.0,82.0,4644.0,$180,$110 (save 39%), Road, Neutral, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Feb 2015," Normal | Normal, Wide",,"6 reasons to buy
Several testers noted that the Adidas Ultraboost had a fashionable design; they stated that it worked well as both an athletic shoe and a choice for casual walks.
The midsole unit felt lightweight, according to many runners.
A lot of consumers were happy about this shoe because it kept them comfortable as they tackled their running sessions.
The energy-returning boost™ technology was deemed highly efficient.
Several users noted that the external heel counter kept the back of the foot in place, preventing in-shoe wobbling or accidental shoe removals.
The overall durability of this model was appreciated by those who have tried it. Many people agreed that the robustness of this model was on-point.
3 reasons not to buy
The price for a pair of the Adidas Ultraboost was considered by many to be expensive.
Some testers noticed that the raised traction nodes of the outsole wore off quickly, causing the shoe to lose its traction over the asphalt.
A few runners felt that the fit profile was a bit narrower than they expected.
Bottom line
The Adidas Ultraboost received a lot of praise for its appealing look, its durable components and the responsiveness of its mid-sole. Many runners were able to stay comfortable throughout their running activities. A lot agreed that the price was costly, but they also commented that it was worth the investment because of its overall quality. This road shoe became highly recommended by neutral runners."
Altra Paradigm 4.5, Altra,90.0,78.0,153.0,$150,$80 (save 72%), Road, Stability, Men: 11.2oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm, Jun 2019, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Several runners were pleased with how the Altra Paradigm 4.5 helped relieve foot pain. Others specified that the shoe did not cause toe cramps like other running shoes.
The Altra Paradigm 4.5 was also good for walking, according to some users.
Various overpronators expressed their satisfaction with the supportive structure of the shoe.
Many buyers agreed that the shoe was lightweight.
A number of commenters appreciated the stretchable shoelaces of the Paradigm 4.5.
2 reasons not to buy
A user commented that the midsole lacked cushioning and did not absorb shock efficiently.
Some wearers observed that the toe box was too stiff.
Bottom line
The Altra Paradigm 4.5 was considered a fantastic stability shoe by most of its wearers. The shoe was reviewed by the majority as having efficient support features and a comfortable fit. On the other hand, a few commenters had less than satisfying experiences because of issues in the shoe’s structural elements. Overall, the Altra Paradigm 4.5 was found by many as a shoe that effectively delivered its functions."
Adidas Alphaboost, Adidas,99.0,92.0,67.0,$150,$85 (save 43%), Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 10oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Jun 2019, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Some reviewers commented that the Adidas Alphaboost is supportive.
Several consumers say that the shoe is comfortable.
According to those who have bought it, the shoe is best used for long-distance walking and running activities.
Based on some reviews, the footwear is lightweight in structure.
A number of users agree that the footwear is stylish and visually appealing.
It is breathable, as noted by a few testers.
2 reasons not to buy
One of the reviewers said that the shoe's fabric in the toe box is misformed.
A purchaser commented that the Adidas Alphaboost's upper material is not stretchable.
Bottom line
In general, the Adidas Alphaboost has gained positive feedback from the majority of the users. Leaning towards the favorable comments given to the shoe, they claim that the support, style, and its design are excellent. Its features and technologies allow them to perform well in their running activities. Although some have issues with the upper material used in crafting the shoe, others still lauded the Adidas Alphaboosts's excellent construction and quality. Like the Adidas Duramo 9, they recommend the shoe for those who want to enjoy a seamless and comfortable road running experience.
 "
Nike Free RN 2018, Nike,92.0,91.0,1348.0,$100,$80 (save 27%)," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 8.4oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Feb 2018, Normal | Normal,,"9 reasons to buy
Many people considered the Nike Free RN 2018 to be a comfortable running shoe for their daily activities.
Numerous purchasers lauded the lightweight nature of this running companion.
A lot of reviewers welcomed the light and breathable upper unit.
The heel section of the upper firmly secured the foot in place, according to some testers.
The sizing scheme followed expectations, most people reported.
A handful of people liked the various color schemes that were available for this model.
Several runners stated that the forefoot section was broad enough to accommodate the natural spreading of the toes.
The Nike Free RN 2018 didn’t look awkwardly bulky or fat, according to one user.
According to several users, the silhouette looked fashionable enough to be used for casual walks and regular non-strenuous activities.
4 reasons not to buy
Traction wasn’t very efficient on wet surfaces, some people noted.
Small stones tended to get stuck in the grooves of the outsole, most consumers complained.
Part of the collar came up too high, according to a tester. He commented that it rubbed against the skin of his ankle uncomfortably.
A purchaser felt some shin pains while running in a pair of the Free RN 2018.
Bottom line
Many people were appreciative of the Nike Free RN 2018. This neutral road shoe received praise for its appealing looks, various colorways, its secure upper, and its lightweight disposition. Conversely, some weren’t too keen on its wet-surface traction while others complained of stones getting stuck between the flex grooves. Suffice it to say that most of the shoe-enthusiasts who have tried the year 2018 iteration of the Free RN were happy with its performance and construction."
Asics Gel Nimbus 21, Asics,91.0,85.0,1859.0,$150,$90 (save 40%)," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 13mm, Jan 2019," Narrow, Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Normal, Wide", Asics Gel Nimbus 22,"8 reasons to buy
Most users admired the overall structure of the Asics Gel Nimbus 21 because it is durable.
A few wearers noted that the cushioning of the Nimbus 21 feels lighter and more responsive compared to its predecessor.
The shoe has a great fit, according to some reviews.
A couple of users lauded the nice looking design of the shoe.
Several buyers mentioned that the toe-box fits wider than expected.
The Asics Gel Nimbus 21 has a breathable upper, said some comments.
According to some runners, the shoe is very comfortable; the feel is consistent even on long distance runs.
This running shoe offers good heel support, based on a few user reviews.
1 reasons not to buy
It is very expensive compared to other road running shoes.
Bottom line
Majority of the users were welcoming and happy about the Asics Gel Nimbus 21. The shoe obtained a winning spot to many consumers because of its breathability, responsive cushioning, and impressive fit. Though the shoe is expensive, its comfort level and durability were more significant. Overall, the Nimbus 21 is indeed a successful update."
Altra Escalante 2.0, Altra,88.0,84.0,120.0,$130,$65 (save 50%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm, Jul 2019, Normal | Normal,,"8 reasons to buy
Altra Escalante 2’s EGO™ midsole is very bouncy, praised several runners. 
Because of the shoe’s durable FootPod™ outsole, some testers claim that the shoe can perform even on light trails.  
A lot of the reviewers appreciate the step-in comfort delivered by the shoe. 
The shoe keeps the foot secure when running; there weren’t any slippage, commented some delighted users. 
The laces have been kept in place by the lace loops situated on the shoe’s tongue, remarked many experts. 
Because of the added perforations, the shoe is extremely breathable, said some testers. 
A few runners commend the shoe for enabling enhanced speed. 
The Escalante 2 is very durable, affirmed several wearers. 
3 reasons not to buy
Several testers have complained about the shoe not being light enough for a lightweight running shoe.
The upper of the shoe, being a knit upper, is too stiff and firm, remarked numerous experts. 
The shoe has not satisfied its pledge of providing more flexibility, stated some users. 
Bottom line
Claimed to be a “Swiss Army Knife” among running shoes, the Escalante 2 is the perfect shoe for hiking, everyday training, and even half a marathon. This zero-drop shoe has been faced with both positive and negative reception from the public. While a lot of reviewers deemed the upgrades to be unnecessary, a lot were greatly satisfied with the latest changes. One of which includes the level of stability offered by the shoe. According to many, the shoe is very responsive and is very adaptive to the pace of the runner. "
Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 35, Nike,93.0,91.0,2249.0,$120,$87 (save 28%)," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, May 2018," Narrow, Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Narrow, Normal, Wide", Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 37,"8 reasons to buy
Many people liked the aesthetics of the Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 35, emphasizing the freshness of the color schemes.
The zigzag stitching of the engineered mesh was appreciated because it kept the façade durable.
A lot of testers welcomed the full-length Zoom Air unit, which responsibly cushioned the foot and attenuated impact shock.
The grip capability of the outsole unit received praise from a lot of consumers.
Based on several runners’ responses, the Pegasus 35 functioned well across a variety of activities like speed training, even-paced runs, and even half-marathons.
Several wearers admired the overall design of the shoe; they said it is very comfortable.
A few wearers mentioned that the shoe has a lightweight construction.
The Pegasus 35 runs true to size, as mentioned in some user reviews.
4 reasons not to buy
A tester complained that the upper unit of the Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 35 was a bit wide and that it didn’t hug the foot securely.
A few runners reported that the collar wasn’t too secure; the heel tended to slip off the shoe’s opening.
The outer section of the midsole unit creased after a few uses, according to a tester. Such an occurrence supposedly diminished the visual flair of this model.
The shoe is pricey compared to other road running shoes available in the market, said a few users. 
Bottom line
Many people liked the Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 35. They welcomed the color schemes, the sturdiness of the engineered mesh, the comfortable underfoot platform, and the traction-ready outsole. Moreover, the versatility of this model was lauded. On the other hand, several consumers complained of an inconsistent fit, as well as a decline in the quality of the aesthetics via the midsole creasing."
Hoka One One Torrent, Hoka One One,95.0,94.0,77.0,$120,$90 (save 97%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm, Jun 2018, Normal | Normal, Hoka One One Torrent 2,"7 reasons to buy
Some runners commented that the underfoot cushioning of the Hoka One One Torrent felt suitably comfortable.
The spacious toe box allowed natural toe-splay, according to several user reviews.
Most wearers welcomed the reliable traction of the Torrent.
Several purchasers noticed that the shoe drains quickly.
The sizing scheme conformed most user’s expectations.
Many admired the shoe’s durable construction; one user said that after running 100 miles it still performed well.
A couple of reviewers commended the lightweight nature of this running shoe
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of users experienced heel slippage with the Hoka One One Torrent.
Because of the missing rock plate, a few felt the sharp rocks while running on trails.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Torrent is a neutral trail running shoe with responsive cushioning. The shoe was mostly well-received by its purchasers because of its comfort, lightweight construction, traction, and overall performance. The minor issues on heel slippage and missing rock plate are not enough to overshadow the positive feedback. Overall, the Torrent is indeed a successful release."
Saucony Omni ISO 2, Saucony,98.0,97.0,139.0,$130,$75 (save 99%), Road, Stability, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 9.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,," Normal, Wide | Normal, Wide",,"6 reasons to buy
Some of the runners say that the Saucony Omni ISO 2 has a wide toe box.
According to several testers, the shoe is supportive.
The majority of the buyers agree that the footwear is comfortable.
The fit of the shoe is excellent, based on some reviews.
A lot of purchasers love the shoe's good-looking design.
The running shoe is well-cushioned, noted by several consumers.
2 reasons not to buy
The shoe lacks firmness and support in the arch area, as noted by some wearers.
Some users experienced ankle pain after wearing the shoe.
Bottom line
The overall feedback of the Saucony Omni ISO 2 is positive. Consumers admire the shoe’s cushioning, fit and design. While most are happy with the shoe’s performance on the road, a few are disappointed because of the lack of support. Overall, the majority of the users highly recommend the shoe for those who are looking for a reliable, visually-appealing stability shoe."
Asics Gel Cumulus 21, Asics,91.0,84.0,399.0,$120,$66 (save 100%), Road, Neutral, Men: 11.4oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Jan 2019," Narrow, Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Narrow, Normal, Wide", Asics Gel Cumulus 22,"8 reasons to buy
Many of the testers appreciate the plushness of the Asics Gel Cumulus 21. 
It offers a responsive ride, expressed several runners. 
According to quite a few buyers, the running shoe has ample support. 
There are some purchasers who appreciate the durability of the shoe. 
The neutral running shoe is made of high-quality materials, hailed numerous reviewers. 
It has enough room for natural toe splay, commended multiple customers. 
Some commenters laud the snug wrap of the shoe around the foot. 
Various users admire the versatility of the running shoe.
4 reasons not to buy
A number of athletes dislike the bulk of the shoe. 
The outsole of the road running shoe is too stiff, remarked some wearers. 
Quite a few have observed that the shoe has mild tongue slippage. 
According to several experts, the road running shoe lacks breathability.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Cumulus 21 is a performance running shoe that boasts unparalleled speed and comfort. It provides plush underfoot cushioning when worn during long-distance runs. Loaded with the brand's top-tier technologies, the road running shoe flaunts high-strength qualities and premium energy return. With its generous cushioning, foot protection is also amplified, preventing strain or injury. Overall, the design of the Gel Cumulus 21 does not compromise both style and function."
Nike Zoom Pegasus Turbo 2, Nike,81.0,88.0,36.0,$180,$101 (save 44%), Road, Neutral, Men: 7.2oz , Women: 6.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Jul 2019, Normal | Normal,,"10 reasons to buy
Many reviewers agree that the Nike Zoom Pegasus Turbo 2 is lightweight; in fact, even lighter than the previous version. Others specify that it feels less bulky than the first Zoom Pegasus Turbo.
Some commenters have observed a firmer and, therefore, more stable ride with the shoe.
The Zoom Pegasus Turbo 2 enables snappy toe-offs, according to runners.
Several runners praise the comfortability of the shoe. One user, in particular, stated that there were no hot spots in the foot.
The fit of the shoe is commended by several wearers. Some say its sizing is accurate, while others mention a comfortable fit especially at the midfoot.
The mesh of the Zoom Pegasus Turbo 2 is “highly breathable,” and might be “Nike’s best in years,” according to a reviewer.
A number of buyers are pleased with how the shoe looks and feels high-quality.
The midsole provides a responsive step, wrote a satisfied customer.
The Zoom Pegasus Turbo 2 promotes a consistent running form, a reviewer reported.
Runners concur that the shoe is ideal for race days and uptempo workouts because of its structure.
4 reasons not to buy
A couple of users are unhappy with the construction of the upper, particularly the tongue. Some feel it was too thin, while others think it feels odd against the skin.
One commenter wrote that there is no padding in the heel area, which made for a bothersome ride.
Although breathable, the mesh upper of the Zoom Pegasus Turbo 2 is rigid, according to a wearer.
Several customers agree that the shoe is expensive.
Bottom line
With the second version of the Nike Zoom Pegasus Turbo, users have found more positive points than negative ones. A number of factors that pertain to the shoe’s performance have been noticed and appreciated by runners. In addition, the construction and fit of the Zoom Pegasus Turbo 2 have also impressed. Minor disappointments about a few structural elements and pricing make up the negative reviews of the shoe. Despite the criticisms, the Nike Zoom Pegasus Turbo 2 is considered by the majority as a big improvement from its predecessor and, thus, a worthy purchase."
Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 36 FlyEase, Nike,83.0,,8.0,$120,$40 (save 100%), Road, Neutral, Men: 12oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,," Normal, X-Wide | Normal, Wide",,"6 reasons to buy
Several consumers claim that the Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 36 FlyEase has a lightweight construction that permitted all-day wear.
People like the appealing look of this running shoe, stating that they get positive remarks from people when they pass by.
Some testers have expressed their appreciation for the breathability aspect of this product, noting that they didn’t feel any in-shoe stuffiness during the run.
The traction capacity of the outsole unit is praised by most of those who have tested the Air Zoom Pegasus 36 FlyEase.
This Nike running shoe has a midsole that is reactive and comfortable, according to some users.
Based on a couple of reviews, the security given by the heel collar is reliable.
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of testers claim that the underfoot platform has a tendency to emit an annoying squeak when taking each step.
Some runners have complained about the forefoot section’s fabrics rubbing irritatingly against the skin of the toes.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of people towards the Air Zoom Pegasus 36 FlyEase has been positive. This Nike running shoe is welcomed because it apparently has a breathable upper, a lightweight configuration, a dependable traction capacity, and a responsive midsole. On the other hand, the squeaky platform and the too-low forefoot design have become the points that garnered criticism.
Fans of neutral running shoes for the roads are the target market of the Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 36 FlyEase."
Nike Odyssey React Flyknit 2, Nike,86.0,86.0,73.0,$120,$58 (save 61%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 6.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Feb 2019," Normal | Normal, X-Wide",,"6 reasons to buy
One of the testers commented that the Nike Odyssey React Flyknit 2 was easy to break-in.
According to some users, the shoe was comfortable.
Several purchasers said that they also use the shoe for casual and long walks.
It was stylish, based on numerous reviews. Additionally, the shoe's colorways were also liked by purchasers.
A couple of wearers have experienced reduced knee and joint pains after running in the Odyssey React Flyknit 2.
Many users agree that the React foam in the midsole is responsive and bouncy.
3 reasons not to buy
A consumer noted that the shoe was poorly made. The glue to keep the bottoms intact was exposed.
The shoe was not breathable, according to some reviewers.
Some users said that the shoe has a tight toe box.
Bottom line
The Nike Odyssey React Flyknit 2 is a lightweight running shoe designed for the road. It received mixed reviews from the users but in general, it is still considered by the majority as a successful release. This shoe is a good option for those who are looking for a comfortable and good looking neutral shoe."
Nike Zoom Fly 3, Nike,90.0,84.0,12.0,$160,$137 (save 85%)," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 8.9oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Jul 2019, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
 Several testers claim that the Zoom Fly 3 has a sizing scheme that follows their expectations.
Some consumers feel that the underfoot experience of this Nike running shoe is reactive enough to permit speedier toe-offs.
The generous height of the midsole unit allow for extended running sessions, according to most runners.
The aesthetics of this neutral running shoe are praised for being highly appreciable and street-ready.
A couple of purchasers welcome the traction capacity of the outsole, likening it to a car tire that can handle the wet and dry ground.
3 reasons not to buy
Several consumers have complained about the too-soft underfoot experience of the Nike Zoom Fly 3, comparing it to a recovery shoe.
A handful of testers have observed the outsole rubber wearing off after only a few months of use.
The weight e is subjected to criticism for being a bit heavy for a racing shoe.
Bottom line
The Nike Zoom Fly 3 enjoys its fair share of positive reviews from consumers. Its quality is mostly held in high regard, save for the outsole which is apparently quick to wear off. Furthermore, the performance of the midsole has its critics, with some stating that the underfoot experience is a bit too soft for extended runs. But the same part also savors praise from those who like its push-off power. The design is also noticed by admiring eyes.
Fans of road running shoes who are neutral pronators are the target market of the Nike Zoom Fly 3."
Asics Gel Quantum 90, Asics,93.0,90.0,962.0,$90,$40 (save 93%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8.4oz , Women: 6.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
A few users mentioned that the Asics Gel Quantum 90 provides a snug fit.
The shoe is comfortable, according to some purchasers.
Based on user reviews, the shoe has a stretchable upper.
The road running shoe is available in different color options.
The Gel Quantum 90 is affordable.
Several purchasers agree that the shoe is lightweight.
Some users comment on the versatility of the shoe, saying it works well as both active and casual wear.
2 reasons not to buy
Although it is comfortable, some wearers feel the Gel Quantum 90 is not suitable for extended wear.
A couple of reviewers said that the shoe feels tight on the top part of his foot.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Quantum 90 is an affordable running shoe designed for the roads. Some reviewers admired the performance of the shoe while others have minor issues with the fit and the wear experience. Overall, the Asics Gel Quantum 90 is an excellent choice for those who are seeking for a comfortable and close-fitting running shoe."
Hoka One One Mach 2, Hoka One One,90.0,87.0,104.0,$140,$89 (save 36%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 6.6oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,, Normal | Normal, Hoka One One Mach 3,"6 reasons to buy
The underfoot cushioning capacity of the Hoka One One Mach 2 was praised; people stated that it carried the foot responsibly throughout the run.
The firm yet springy cushioning energized the foot and allowed it to move with sureness, according to several runners.
Consumers liked the aesthetics of this running shoe; they reported that the color schemes were able to capture attention.
The upper unit was considered by some purchasers to be comfortable and form-fitting.
Several reviewers were happy with the lightweight configuration of this neutral running shoe.
Traction over wet surfaces was deemed as highly reliable.
2 reasons not to buy
According to some runners, the forefoot section had a noticeably tight fit and that it caused some chafing to occur.
A handful of users weren’t happy with the cushioning system of this road shoe, stating that it was a bit too firm and insubstantial to handle long-distance runs.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Mach 2 has received mostly positive reviews from consumers, particularly those who welcomed its reactive cushioning, the visually appealing looks, the non-irritating upper and the gripping outsole configuration. On the other hand, the fit and cushioning left a lot to be desired as heaps of consumers.
The Mach 2 is meant for neutral pronators and those who like to take to the roads. The balanced underfoot experience can also support supinators (underpronators) who typically need a well-cushioned shoe."
Nike Air Zoom Winflo 6, Nike,89.0,78.0,209.0,$90,$55 (save 99%)," Road, Treadmill", Stability, Men: 11oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,," Normal, X-Wide | Normal, Wide", Nike Air Zoom Winflo 7,"6 reasons to buy
The people who have tested the Nike Air Zoom Winflo 6 commended the color schemes and the modern design; they received compliments while wearing the shoe.
Some people reported that the midsole unit was responsive enough to energize the foot.
A couple of runners who had issues with overpronation lauded the midfoot part of the platform for buttressing the arch and keeping it from collapsing.
This Nike running shoe had a sizing scheme and width profile that apparently followed the expectations of consumers.
‘Comfortable’ was a word that was used to describe the Air Zoom Winflo 6.
The traction capacity of the outsole unit was appreciated by those who like to have proper surface control when they ran.
1 reasons not to buy
The forefoot area of this stability running shoe felt a bit narrow, according to a couple of runners.
Bottom line
The Nike Air Zoom Winflo 6 was able to receive positive reviews from consumers who have tried it. The aesthetics were highlighted for being eye-catching. Also, the midsole was praised for being comfortable and supportive of the arch. This road running shoe became the overpronator’s friend as it supposedly prevented the midfoot from rolling inward too much when transitioning from the heel to the toe. On the other hand, the forefoot was deemed a bit tight by a few purchasers."
Asics Gel Kayano 25, Asics,94.0,87.0,4091.0,$160,$110 (save 31%)," Road, Treadmill", Stability, Men: 11.9oz , Women: 9.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 13mm, Jun 2019," Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Narrow, Normal, Wide", Asics Gel Kayano 27,"9 reasons to buy
The Kayano 25 is very comfortable to wear even for long hours, said several users.
A few lauded the shoe’s appealing design and color options.
Some purchasers appreciated the stability features of the Asics Gel Kayano 25.
The underfoot cushioning system was appreciated by many people.
A couple of reviewers commended the shoe’s roomy toe box which allows natural toe-splay.
Some runners noted that this running shoe has an impressive fit.
The shoe is very versatile; some used this version for casual walks and gym workouts.
According to some user reviews, the shoe is durable.
The Kayano 25 is also available in wide width option.
2 reasons not to buy
The shoe is slightly expensive.
A couple of wearers experienced heel blister and ankle pain with the Asics Gel Kayano 25.
Bottom line
The overwhelming number of positive feedback has proven that the Asics Gel Kayano 25 was satisfactory to most users. A few found the shoe expensive, but a lot of runners were happy with the shoe’s cushioning, stability and versatility. Overall, most purchasers have been enjoying using the Kayano 25 and they're satisfied with their purchase."
Asics GT 2000 7, Asics,94.0,88.0,1691.0,$120,$80 (save 33%), Road, Stability, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 8.7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Nov 2018," Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Narrow, Normal, Wide, X-Wide", Asics GT 2000 8 Lite-Show,"6 reasons to buy
According to some users, the Asics GT 2000 7 is a very comfortable shoe.
Some reviews mentioned that the offers a great level of arch support and stability.
Many users admired the overall design and color options of the GT 2000 7.
Several runners lauded the breathable upper coverage of the shoe.
The shoe runs true to size, a few reviews mentioned.
A few satisfied purchasers said the shoe fits well.
1 reasons not to buy
The shoe is not as durable as the previous model, said some users.
Bottom line
The GT 2000 has been a successful stability shoe model from Asics. The 7th version of the shoe generally gained positive reviews from users. Though some were disappointed because it is not as durable as expected, others are still happy to recommend the shoe. This shoe is great for overpronators who are also looking for comfort and breathability. "
Asics Gel Venture 7, Asics,86.0,68.0,1941.0,$70,$50 (save 29%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, May 2019," Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Normal, Wide, X-Wide",,"8 reasons to buy
A couple of users noted that the Asics Gel Venture 7 did not require a break-in period.
Many customers agreed that the shoe was affordable.
Most wearers found the sizing to be accurate.
The outsole offered good traction, according to some users.
A number of runners were pleased with the support provided by the Gel Venture 7.
Several buyers commented about the nice color options available with the shoe.
The Gel Venture 7 felt comfortable on foot even when worn for long hours, claimed many wearers.
Some runners appreciated that the insole can be replaced by custom orthotics.
2 reasons not to buy
A few users disliked the shoelaces: one thought it was difficult to tie, while another mentioned it broke easily.
There were a couple of comments about the fit: some users thought the toe box was too narrow and rubbed uncomfortably against the skin, while others complained that the heel was too loose.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Venture 7 was well-received by the majority of its users. The shoe’s comfort level, affordability, and structure turned out to be its strongest features. In contrast, the durability, particularly of some upper elements was questioned by a few. All things considered, the Gel Venture 7 was a great follow-up to an already well-performing shoe that many users have come to like."
On Cloud, On,91.0,83.0,1295.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.1oz , Women: 6.5oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,, Normal | Normal,,"8 reasons to buy
Many people claimed that they felt no skin irritation while wearing the On Cloud; the inner sleeve was apparently smooth.
The lightweight build of this running shoe was appreciated by many testers.
The in-shoe experience felt snug yet accommodating, according to most consumers; they didn’t feel as if their movements were restrained.
A lot of runners stated that it was effortless to slip the foot in the foot-chamber of the On Cloud.
The aesthetics of this product were lauded by those who wanted to have a nice-looking shoe for their daily activities.
The cushioning system felt like standing and moving on actual clouds, as stated by several purchasers.
According to a handful of consumers, the grooved configuration of the underfoot platform permitted natural movement through the gait cycle.
This product felt steady and comfortable when taken to workouts at the gym.
2 reasons not to buy
Stones and other outdoor debris didn’t work well with the On Cloud; people complained of pebbles getting lodged between the spaces of the cushioning ‘clouds.’
A few people noted that the back portion of the upper was a bit stiff and that it caused some skin irritation.
Bottom line
The response for the On Cloud was positive. People were generally happy with this road companions performance. They welcomed its flexible and lightweight design, the unique aesthetics, and the versatile construction as they were able to use it for activities other than running. The cloud-like cushioning system apparently evoked the feeling of standing on a soft surface. On the other hand, there were complaints about the midsole’s ‘cloud’ elements retaining stones in the holes of their façade while other issues stemmed from its apparently irritating collar."
Adidas Adizero Adios 4, Adidas,95.0,92.0,6941.0,$140,$66 (save 67%)," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 6.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Dec 2018, Normal | Normal, Adidas Adizero Adios 5,"5 reasons to buy
Several consumers stated that they welcomed the lightweight build of the Adidas Adizero Adios 4.
The rubber that’s used for the outsole unit was appreciated for being grippy and highly durable.
The boost™ foam midsole received praise for being very responsive and ready to absorb impact shock.
People liked the light, flexible and breathable textile of the upper unit.
The general quality of the materials used for the Adizero Adios 4 was lauded; runners felt that it didn’t break down quickly.
2 reasons not to buy
Some testers felt that the upper unit tended to scratch against the skin, causing some chafing.
A few consumers didn’t like the fit profile of this shoe as they felt that it was a bit narrower than their standard fare.
Bottom line
The Adidas Adizero Adios 4 was reasonably well-received. Those who have tried this neutral running shoe were glad because it was light and responsive to their movements and overall performance. The rest of the compliments were for its durability, traction, and breathability. On the other hand, the brunt of the complaints revolved around the irritating upper textile and the apparently narrow width."
Brooks Cascadia 14, Brooks,92.0,89.0,99.0,$130,$100 (save 23%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Jun 2019," Narrow, Normal, Wide | Normal",,"7 reasons to buy
The Brooks Cascadia 14 is a lightweight trail shoe, according to some runners.
Many users find the Cascadia 14 to have good traction, especially on wet surfaces.
Some wearers praised the Brooks Cascadia 14’s fast-drying upper material.
One runner appreciated the gaiter trap feature of the shoe.
A few users agree that the Cascadia 14 does not require a break-in period.
A number of buyers are happy with the various width options available for the shoe.
The Cascadia 14 has a firm yet comfortable cushioning, said a reviewer.
3 reasons not to buy
Several wearers find that the Brooks Cascadia 14 has inaccurate sizing.
A number of runners commented that the shoe does not have a secure fit; some thought the toe box was too large, while others complained of too much room in the heel area.
The sewn-in tongue design of the Cascadia 14 was disliked by some buyers.
Bottom line
Many buyers of the Brooks Cascadia 14 expressed their satisfaction with the trail shoe by praising its performance and features. In particular, users were pleased with the Cascadia 14’s traction, cushioning, and convenience of use. Despite some issues with the shoe’s construction and fitting, the majority of its wearers consider the Brooks Cascadia 14 to be an average trail running shoe."
Under Armour Charged Rogue, Under Armour,93.0,85.0,1552.0,$80,$45 (save 44%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,," Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Normal, Wide", Under Armour Charged Rogue 2,"9 reasons to buy
Some of the buyers said that the Under Armour Charged Rogue has a perfect fit.
Its lightweight structure was admired by many purchasers.
According to those who have bought it, the shoe is comfortable.
Based on several reviews, the footwear is supportive.
The shoe is also reliable for gym and treadmill activities, noted by some consumers.
The Under Armour Charged Rogue is a good-looking shoe according to several testers.
The majority of the users loved the breathable coverage of the upper.
A good number of reviewers noted its excellent cushioning.
The shoe's affordable price is lauded by a lot of wearers.
2 reasons not to buy
The Under Armour Charged Rogue runs small according to some testers.
According to some testers, the netting of the Under Armour Charged Rogue ripped off easily after several uses only.
Bottom line
A lot of buyers were satisfied and happy with the Under Armour Charged Rogue's lightweight construction, fit and comfort. Aside from its structure, they loved how supportive and breathable the shoe is. Although some of them have issues on the sizing and durability, overall, the Under Armour Charged Rogue was accepted by a lot of consumers. This shoe is a good option for those who are looking for an affordable yet dependable running partner."
Hoka One One Rincon, Hoka One One,82.0,91.0,7.0,$115,$92 (save 99%), Road, Neutral, Men: 7.7oz , Women: 6.3oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm, Jul 2019," Narrow, Normal | Normal",,"6 reasons to buy
Majority of Hoka One One Rincon users like the fact that the shoe is incredibly lightweight.
Most of the wearers appreciate the shoe’s breathability, keep them comfortable during their runs.
A number of users compare it to the popular Clifton 6 with how good the cushioning is.
A couple of wearers say that even after long hours of wearing the Rincon, their feet do not feel fatigued at all.
The shoe is said to be very comfortable straight out of the box which a lot of users like.
Some wearers like the Rincon for its unique aesthetic design.
2 reasons not to buy
One user has mentioned that the outsoles of the Hoka One One Rincon wear down too quickly.
A couple of wearers have noted that the shoe’s rubber outsole is too minimal for their liking.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Rincon is a running shoe geared toward neutral runners, but it has just a hint of firmness and energy return that allows it to be versatile for a wide range of workouts.  It will appeal to runners who prefer a light, breezy feeling under their feet, no matter how fast or slow they prefer to run in it. Despite some durability issues, the Hoka One One Rincon is still appreciated for having the right amount of cushioning for recovery efforts. It is also lightweight enough for fast race days, making this Hoka shoe a versatile addition to any athlete's running shoe arsenal."
Nike React Infinity Run Flyknit, Nike,85.0,87.0,9.0,$160,$110 (save 65%), Road, Neutral, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm, Jan 2020, Normal | Normal,,"9 reasons to buy
Several consumers believe that the Nike React Infinity Run offers accommodating steadiness during the run.
The underfoot experience is considered speedy and springy without being unwieldy during long runs.
Some users have commended the roomy toe box of this Nike running shoe.
The upper unit has received positive remarks for welcoming the natural shape and motion of the foot.
The general durability of this product is lauded by runners who desire a long-lasting running shoe.
According to some testers, the platform is able to stave off knee discomfort and strain on the muscles of the leg.
The visual aspect of this product has been deemed agreeable and versatile enough for casual strolls.
Most users believe that this model is a lightweight option for all-day use.
One trait that people have come to appreciate from the outsole unit of the React Infinity Run Flyknit is the surface grip.
3 reasons not to buy
A break-in period is needed to fully appreciate a secure yet accommodating in-shoe wrap, based on a couple of reviews.
A few people have reported that the forefoot section is a bit restrictive.
Some users believe that the heel part of the upper has difficulty locking the heel in place.
Bottom line
The overall reaction towards the Nike React Infinity Run has been positive. This neutral running shoe is welcomed because it apparently has a steady in-shoe construction that permits balanced movements on the ground. The shoe delivers a stable ride and an exceptional energy return, both of which contribute to optimum performance. The overall construction also contributes to injury prevention for more comfortable wear.
Fans of running shoes that offer steadiness for neutral pronators can enjoy the React Infinity Run."
New Balance Fresh Foam 1080 v9, New Balance,94.0,89.0,3727.0,$150,$113 (save 100%), Road, Neutral, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Dec 2018," Narrow, Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Narrow, Normal, Wide, X-Wide", New Balance Fresh Foam 1080 v10,"6 reasons to buy
Many users agreed that the New Balance Fresh Foam 1080 v9 runs true to size.
A couple of wearers noticed that the 9th version of the Fresh Foam 1080 feels significantly lighter than the older version.
Some runners thought the shoe was stylish.
According to several users, the New Balance 1080 v9 is a comfortable running shoe.
A few consumers were delighted by the shoe’s wide and extra wide width options.
A number of buyers admired the comfortable cushioning of the New Balance Fresh Foam 1080 v9.
3 reasons not to buy
The New Balance 1080 v9 is a bit expensive.
One user expressed disappointments because he developed a blister in the heel area after the first run.
Another purchaser noticed a strange fit in the heel section.
Bottom line
The New Balance Fresh Foam 1080 v9 has gathered several positive reviews about the sizing, style, and cushioning. Though there were criticisms about the shoe’s fit and price, overall, the shoe is still considered as efficient running footwear. The shoe has promising features but there is still a room for improvement."
Saucony Triumph 17, Saucony,88.0,92.0,32.0,$150,$100 (save 33%), Road, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Nov 2019," Normal, Wide | Normal, Wide",,"9 reasons to buy
Many people claimed the midsole unit of the Saucony Triumph 17 is responsive enough to energize the foot while running. 
The underfoot cushioning of this road running shoe is so soft and bouncy, according to several reviewers. 
A lot of people were impressed with the lightweight structure of this running gear. 
Some users expressed that the overall construction and performance of the Saucony Triumph 17 is a lot better compared to its predecessors. 
This running partner offers great traction on varied surfaces, some commenters mentioned. 
A few runners noted that the Saucony Triumph is perfect for long-day and easy recovery runs. 
Numerous consumers appreciated the brand new look of this running companion. Some of them also mentioned that its stylish design is also great for casual walks. 
The rubber material that is used in the outsole unit of the Saucony Triumph 17 was lauded by many purchasers for being highly durable. 
Several wearers appreciated the flexible and breathable upper unit of this running shoe. 
1 reasons not to buy
A tester reported that the midsole cushioning of the Saucony Triumph 17 is a bit firm. 
Bottom line
The 17th version of the Saucony Triumph received positive reviews from a lot of satisfied runners and trainers. Aside from the shoe’s stylish design, people also welcomed the updated cushioning system that made the shoe more comfortable and supportive. Consumers were very happy about the shoe’s gripping ability and lightweight construction that both enhance the running speed of the user. Moreover, the majority of the users recommended the Saucony Triumph 17 for being highly durable and breathable. "
Nike Renew Run, Nike,86.0,,32.0,$90,$57 (save 100%), Road, Neutral,,,,,," Normal, X-Wide | Normal, Wide, X-Wide",,"6 reasons to buy
The general durability of the materials used for the Nike Renew Run is welcomed by most consumers.
Several consumers have claimed that the overall weight of this running shoe is light.
People are happy that the looks can transition between active and fashion-focused lifestyles.
The toe box is praised for permitting the toes to splay naturally during the run.
According to some testers, the upper unit of this Nike running shoe is breathable enough for all-day wear.
The heel part of the cushioned platform is welcomed for having a moderately dense balance-point.
2 reasons not to buy
Some users say the fabric underneath the tongue unit tends to rub uncomfortably against the skin.
A few testers report that the in-shoe experience is a bit restrictive.
Bottom line
All-in-all, people are happy with the Nike Renew Run and what it has to offer. This neutral running shoe offers lightweight construction, sturdy materials, a breathable upper unit, and a well-balanced midsole. Daily runners can expect a supportive and secure platform that also provides comfort in each move.
Fans of road running shoes are the target market of the Nike Renew Run."
Nike Air Zoom Winflo 7, Nike,90.0,93.0,8.0,,, Road, Neutral,,, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,," Normal, X-Wide | Normal, Wide",,"5 reasons to buy
Several reviewers claim that the Nike Air Zoom Winflo 7 is very breathable. 
Some testers appreciate the versatility of the shoe; it can be used in multiple activities. 
It is very comfortable, admired many users. 
The running shoe has a sticky grip, commended quite a few runners. 
According to a number of commenters, the shoe has sufficient support.
2 reasons not to buy
A few experts are disappointed with the shoe’s lack of responsiveness. 
There are some who are skeptical about the shoe’s stack height.
Bottom line
With longer runs in the mind, the Nike Air Zoom Winflo 7 is equipped with the best cushioning system. Its general design is centered on keeping the wearer’s focus only on running and nothing else. Dubbed as an affordable running shoe, the Air Zoom Winflo 7 boasts ultimate comfort and traction on various surfaces."
Asics Gel Venture 6, Asics,94.0,87.0,10009.0,$70,$48 (save 31%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.2oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,," Normal, X-Wide | Normal, Wide", Asics Gel Venture 7,"9 reasons to buy
Most customers appreciated the strong build of the Asics Gel Venture 6, which made it great for trail running.
The runners mentioned that the shoe remained very comfortable throughout their long runs.
The users liked the fit of the Asics Gel Venture 6.
Most individuals thought that the shoe runs true to size.
The shoe offers a great level of support, according to a few users.
Many runners admired the versatility of the shoe; they wear the shoe for biking, hiking, and walking.
A runner appreciated the extra reinforcement on the shoe’s sides, as well as the supportive heel collar.
A majority of testers were happy with the overall aesthetic look of the shoe.
The individuals lauded the affordable price of Gel Venture 6.
3 reasons not to buy
A couple of wearers noticed that the gel cushioning is too firm for their liking.
A runner found these shoes to be a bit heavy for trail running.
A few users noticed that the outsole is not as grippy as expected.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Venture 6 is a versatile running shoe with all the qualities a runner would expect in a pair of agreeable trail running shoes. Many users are satisfied with the shoe because it is comfortable, stylish, supportive and durable. Though there are a few flaws,  overall, Venture 6 is a wise option for most individuals looking for an all-rounder in a reasonable price range."
Brooks Adrenaline GTS 20, Brooks,95.0,90.0,138.0,,, Road, Motion control, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm, Nov 2019," Narrow, Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Narrow, Normal, Wide, X-Wide",,"9 reasons to buy
Many consumers said that the Brooks Adrenaline GTS 20 is comfortable. 
The shoe offers a stable ride, said a few testers. 
Numerous runners love its updated, stylish design. 
A lot of reviewers mentioned that it is more cushioned compared to its predecessor. 
Several users mentioned that the shoe is perfect for long runs. 
Adrenaline GTS 20 offers a snug fit, based on some reviews. 
It offers excellent arch support that helps prevent pain, stated a buyer. 
A couple of purchasers love the spacious feel in the toe box. 
Adrenaline GTS 20 is a solid yet lightweight running shoe, a user claimed.
3 reasons not to buy
A few wearers complained about the Adrenaline GTS 20’s narrow heel area.
One commenter expressed that the tongue is unusually long. 
The shoe has limited color variations, according to some consumers. 
Bottom line
The Adrenaline GTS 20 received diverse reviews from consumers. The modern, streamlined design of this road running shoe was appreciated by many runners. Although a few users were disappointed about the shoe’s narrow heel section and limited color variations, others still recommended the shoe for its overall performance. 
The shoe is perfect for runners who are looking for a blend of flexibility, comfort, and support. "
Merrell Agility Synthesis Flex, Merrell,96.0,96.0,208.0,$110,$77 (save 30%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.5oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
One user said that the shoe felt like it was well-made.
Another tester observed that it was easy to slip on a custom orthotic without experiencing problems with the fit of the shoe.
Many found that there was no need to break the shoe in.
A majority of reviewers found the shoe to be light.
Some runners thought that the traction was sufficient for light running.
The fabric of the upper is praised for being breathable by many users.
2 reasons not to buy
The midfoot area is too narrow for some wearers.
Several users complained of foot and leg pain after wearing the shoe.
Bottom line
The Merrell Agility Synthesis Flex is a comfortable trail running shoe that was found to be light and comfortable by plenty of reviewers. Many observed that the shoe didn’t need to be broken in which made it ready to use right out the box. There were those that did not find the fit true to size, but the reasonably priced trail runner still proved to perform well on trails that are not so technical."
New Balance 1500 v6, New Balance,90.0,90.0,9.0,$125,$80 (save 36%), Road, Stability, Men: 8.6oz , Women: 6.5oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,," Normal, Wide | Normal, Wide",,"7 reasons to buy
Many purchasers noted that the New Balance 1500 v6 is comfortable. 
The shoe fits true to size, based on some reviews. 
A couple of buyers said the shoe is lightweight.
Some users mentioned that it offers a better fit than its predecessor. 
A wearer is pleased with the stability provided by the shoe. 
Several consumers commented that it is also good for casual walks. 
People liked the stylish design of the shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
A tester reported that the shoe’s outsole is not supportive enough.
It is comfortable but not good for racing, said a runner.
Bottom line
New Balance 1500 v6 is a road racing flat designed to help the runners achieve their optimal performance goals. The shoe features a race day-inspired designed and advanced technologies that provide quicker rebound and support for long-distance running."
Hoka One One Arahi 3, Hoka One One,91.0,81.0,121.0,$130,$105 (save 19%), Road, Stability, Men: 9.6oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,," Narrow, Normal, Wide | Narrow, Normal, Wide", Hoka One One Arahi 4,"5 reasons to buy
Some users admired the lightweight design of the Hoka One One Arahi 3.
A few wearers noted that the shoe does not feel or look bulky at all unlike other Hoka running shoes.
Several narrow-footed lauded the overall fit of the Arahi 3; they said the shoe fits comfortably.
A significant number of runners were satisfied with the shoe’s maximum support.
The shoe has a roomy toe-box, said a few purchasers.
4 reasons not to buy
A few disappointed users mentioned that the shoe has poor cushioning compared to the Arahi 2.
Medium-footed runners found the Arahi 3 too narrow for their foot shape.
Some purchasers mentioned that the upper is too soft and lacks strength.
According to a few user reviews, the color options are unpleasant.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Arahi 3 gathered mixed reviews from users. Some admired the shoe’s lightweight design, stability, and comfort while others were disappointed with the shoe’s cushioning and fit. Overall, the Arahi 3 is still considered by some as an efficient runner, but there is still a significant room for improvement."
Altra Superior 4.0, Altra,94.0,88.0,361.0,$110,$80 (save 27%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 7.9oz , Women: 6.6oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm, Jan 2019, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Some consumers claimed that the upper unit had a stretchy and accommodating build which allowed the foot to relax while feeling secure.
The breathability of the upper was lauded, with people commenting that they didn’t feel stuffiness taking over their runs.
Several purchasers noted that they didn’t need to break-in the Altra Superior 4.0 as it felt comfortable and responsive from the start.
The underfoot platform was considered by testers to be bouncy and reactive to the natural movement of the foot.
People were happy that the Superior 4.0 had a lightweight construction. They didn’t feel their movements being tarnished.
Most runners considered this product to have accurate measurements for width and length.
2 reasons not to buy
Some users feel that the sole unit is too thin and gives limited protection.
A couple of testers didn’t like that the shoelaces are a bit too long.
Bottom line
The Altra Superior 4.0 was able to capture the appreciation and trust of a majority of those who have tried it. This neutral running shoe had praised showered over it because of its secure yet breathable façade, the highly reactive midsole foam, and the true-to-size-and-width configuration. On the other hand, several trail runners expressed disappointment over some structural elements.
This product aims to cater to people who enjoy running on trails and experiencing enhanced steadiness on unpredictable ground. Its light and flexible build welcome the natural biomechanical capacities of the foot."
Puma Hybrid Astro, Puma,98.0,89.0,130.0,$110,$55 (save 100%), Road, Neutral, Men: 12.7oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm, Jul 2019, Normal | Normal,,"8 reasons to buy
Some purchasers say that the Puma Hybrid Astro delivers high energy-return making each of their strides quick. 
The PROFOAM technology added in the midsole of the shoe provides a high rebound, says some buyers. 
Some of the users lauded the high level of support and cushioning of the shoe.
A lot of the runners like the customizable fit the shoe offers because of the NETFIT technology employed along with the lacing system of the shoe.
The shoe is highly durable, some purchasers state. 
The shoe offers snug-fit and stability, according to several wearers.
The overall aesthetic of the shoe is lauded by various people because of the shoe’s stylish features.
The external heel counter of the shoe is praised by numerous users for its flexibility.
4 reasons not to buy
The Netfit upper of the shoe is too constricting for some of the users.
The downside of the Hybrid foam employed in the midsole of the shoe is that it makes the shoe feel heavier, according to a few wearers.
Some of the male runners find it difficult to tighten the laces.
For the female runners, some of them claim that the shoe is loose on the heel area. 
Bottom line
The overall reception for the Puma Hybrid Astro was highly positive. The aesthetics of the shoe was highly appreciated by the purchasers. They deemed this long-distance running shoe fit for both casual and running occasions. There were some complaints regarding the constriction of movements, but a lot of the runners were satisfied by the overall durability, comfort, and stability of the shoe. "
Hoka One One Elevon,,86.0,79.0,982.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 8.6oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,, Hoka One One Elevon 2,"8 reasons to buy
Some runners mentioned that the shoe delivered good support.
Plenty of users appreciated the style and design of the shoe’s upper.
A few reviewers were glad about the level of responsiveness delivered. One mentioned that he felt enough spring effect during runs.
A majority of testers admired the Hoka One One Elevon’s lightness.
Most runners were glad that it did not require any break-in
Based on a few reviews, there was a good selection of colors for both men and women’s versions.
The upper was observed to be compliant, comfortable and breathable for many users.
Those whose first Hoka shoe was the Elevon mentioned that the cushioning was sufficient.
5 reasons not to buy
One user mentioned that the interior felt firmer compared to other Hokas.
Those who have run in several Hoka shoes before observed that the cushioning wasn’t as plush.
One user mentioned that she had to remove tiny pebbles that got stuck on the outsole with a screwdriver every time she got back from running.
One user said that the outsole already showed signs of wear after running four times for three to nine miles.
Most were not pleased about how high the price was with the quality and cushioning delivered.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Elevon is a road running shoe that plenty of users appreciated for its responsiveness. User complimented the style, compliance, and breathability of the upper. On the downside, a lot of testers said that the size ran a half or full size bigger than usual. Hoka fans also mentioned that the plushness was lesser than they expected. The same goes with the durability of the outsole and stitching on the upper. Nevertheless, the Elevon was still found to be a shoe worth checking for those seeking a lightweight trainer with sufficient responsiveness and adequate cushioning."
Saucony Ride ISO,,90.0,84.0,917.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Saucony Ride ISO 2,"7 reasons to buy
The upper unit of the Saucony Ride ISO was considered by many reviewers to be comfortable.
The various color schemes were considered to be very endearing to the eyes.
The roomy forefoot section was lauded because it allowed the natural spreading of the toes.
Several runners liked the ankle and heel support given by the back portion of the upper unit.
A few wearers admired the lightweight construction of the Ride ISO.
The running shoe is flexible, said a few reviews.
Many runners who suffered from underfoot problems such as tendon or muscle strain reported that the midsole carried the foot correctly.
3 reasons not to buy
Some consumers felt that the medium width profile was a bit narrow.
The underfoot platform was not as supportive and comfortable as expected, a handful of testers claimed.
Several people believed that the sizeable sole unit made the whole façade of this shoe look bulky.
Bottom line
Many of those who have bought the Saucony Ride ISO were happy with its performance. They welcomed its pleasant upper construction, the eye-catching color options, and the wide toe-box. But the underfoot cushioning system garnered a divided response, with some runners stating that it was supportive and others claiming the opposite. Overall, the shoe is a successful release but there is still room for improvements. "
New Balance Fresh Foam Beacon v2,,88.0,87.0,24.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.7oz , Women: 6.6oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A few runners praise the comfort that the Fresh Foam Beacon v2 offers. 
A lot of the runners commend the lightweight feel the shoe has. 
The colorway is appreciable, as commented by some wearers. 
A lot of the runners commend the lightweight feel that this neutral running shoe offers. 
Even with the presence of the Fresh Foam technology, the shoe still provides enough support and stability with its solid underfoot, a few reviewers commented.
The shoe enhances speed, noted one runner. 
It can be worn for running and casual occasions, remarked some runners. 
2 reasons not to buy
The heel slippage of the shoe is very disappointing, remarked one buyer. 
Several runners have complained that the shoe does not provide sufficient cushioning. 
Bottom line
A lot of the reviews state that the New Balance Fresh Foam Beacon v2 is an improved version of its predecessor: New Balance Fresh Foam Beacon. Sporting its engineered mesh upper, a lot of the runners have praised the comfort and flexibility offered by the shoe. The employment of the Fresh Foam midsole has also increased the overall comfort of the shoe. Although there have been some comments on its heel slippage, many were still convinced that shoe is still very suitable for long-distance running as it can handle great miles. "
Nike Joyride Run Flyknit,,77.0,85.0,7.0,,, Road, Neutral,,, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Majority of Nike Joyride Run Flyknit wearers like the cushioning impact of the TPE foam beads.
Some users have said that the Flyknit upper provides a secure and breathable fit.
According to several reviewers, the Joyride Run Flyknit feels very lightweight when worn.
Most runners say that the shoe is the most shock-absorbent Nike running shoe they have had.
A notable number of wearers like the fact that the Nike Joyride Run Flyknit has good looking aesthetics, sleek colorways, and functional.
A handful of wearers note that the shoe's built loop at the heel makes putting the shoe on a lot easier.
Based on some reviews, the shoe's rubber outsole proves to be durable and offers excellent traction.
More than a couple of users note that the shoe's cushioning is very responsive.
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of runners say the shoe has a low amount of energy return.
The shoe rubs uncomfortably against the skin when worn without a sock, according to a reviewer.
Bottom line
The Nike Joyride Run Flyknit is designed to help make running feel easier, especially on recovery days. The shoe is praised for its innovative tiny TPE foam beads. It is strategically placed underfoot, conforming to the wearer's foot. It provides the most personalized sensation that a lot of users have felt in a shoe for a long time. Although a bit lacking in responsiveness, the majority of reviews still recommend the Joyride Run Flyknit for its remarkable cushioning and comfort."
Merrell Trail Glove 5,,86.0,84.0,280.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 6.9oz , Women: 6oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The traction capacity of the Merrell Trail Glove 5’s outsole unit was deemed efficient by several testers; they stated that they didn’t experience any slippage during their runs on the trails.
Some consumers reported that the upper was snug but non-restrictive; they felt secure and well-supported while wearing this running shoe.
A few people noted that the color schemes were eye-catching; they claimed that the visuals were stylish.
The lightweight structure of this product was appreciated by minimalist runners.
Some testers stated that the Merrell Trail Glove 5 remained useful during activities that didn’t involve running, like urban walks and light exercises on groomed trails.
The shoe is affordable.
2 reasons not to buy
Some users found the collar to be too high, which made a portion of the interior rub uncomfortably against the skin.
The shoe's sole unit is too stiff, according to a couple of wearers.
Bottom line
Praise was dutifully given to the Merrell Trail Glove 5 because it was able to meet the expectations of consumers, particularly those who desire a trail running shoe that doesn’t have a bulky frame or a restricting design. The versatility and effectiveness of this product’s components became highlights, with some people even claiming that they were able to use it on the roads. On the other hand, a handful of runners felt that the available sizes for this neutral shoe were more substantial than their usual choices."
Asics Gel Contend 6,,87.0,,38.0,,," Road, Mud", Stability, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Some of the users said that the Asics Gel Contend 6 is comfortable to wear.
It is breathable, as noted by a purchaser.
Many testers loved its affordable price.
According to those who have bought it, the running shoe has an excellent grip.
Several reviewers commented that the shoe is supportive.
The majority of the consumers agreed that the running footwear is durable. 
A few buyers observed that the shoe provides a perfect fit.
It is stylish, most wearers mentioned.
2 reasons not to buy
One of the consumers said that the Asics Gel Contend 6 did not help to heal his issue with Plantar Fasciitis. He still needs t put insole inserts.
A user mentioned that he has no plan of wearing the running shoe in the winter season. The shoe feels cold, so its best to use it during summer.
Bottom line
With short and long runs in mind, the Asics Gel Contend 6  is equipped with the features and technologies that suit every runner's needs. Dubbed as one of the comfortable, supportive, and affordable running shoes, the Gel contend 6 will surely make the majority of the users happy and satisfied."
Asics Gel Kahana 8,,89.0,78.0,2792.0,,, Trail, Stability, Men: 11.9oz , Women: 9.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
There were commenters who regarded the upper unit, and they stated that they were impressed with the durability of the fabrics & overlays.
Many agreed that the tight-weave mesh was able to keep dirt and small debris away from the interior foot-chamber.
Several testers welcomed the laces of this shoe, which, for them, had an adequate length; they also noted that the laces didn’t unravel easily.
The platform of the Asics Gel Kahana 8 was able to provide great impact resistance, wrote a tester.
An expert reviewer commended the foam unit in the mid-sole, noting that it’s capable of ensuring comfortable strides throughout the running session.
The firm unit under the arch was efficient in delivering stability to those with overpronated motion, reviewers wrote.
The lugged outsole unit received praise from those who felt that they were able to traverse the unpredictable trails with ease.
‘Comfortable’ was a word many consumers used when describing their time with this running shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
There were purchasers who wrote that the outsole of this shoe didn’t handle slippery surfaces well; they fell several times.
There were a lot of complaints about the outsole tread and lug-pattern, which apparently came off too easily.
It felt a bit narrow, according to a few runners.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Kahana 8 received high praise from users and expert reviewers. They felt that it was able to provide them with quality and reliable service on the great outdoors. Overpronators rejoiced because of its stability mechanics. For many, the components were efficient, and the running experience was satisfying. But it disappointed a few consumers, who had their own gripes about this version."
On Cloud X,,89.0,88.0,569.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.1oz , Women: 6.6oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
Many runners considered the Cloud X to be the best shoe yet from On, because of its outstanding performance and the on-foot experience it brought.
The midsole has been incredibly light yet responsive, according to a user.
The shoe was extremely comfortable even from the first use, a wearer commented.
One athlete remarked that the shoe provided relief for their bunions.
The Cloud X allowed complete freedom of movement, no matter the activity, an impressed user said.
There was exceptional lateral support from the midsole, wrote a reviewer.
A buyer praised the superb cushioning that was present during high-intensity interval training (HIIT).
The open toe box allowed the foot to spread naturally during medium-paced runs, a runner observed.
The foot lockdown supplied by the midfoot area was effective in preventing slippage, as stated by a wearer.
3 reasons not to buy
The outsole was quite challenging to clean, according to a user.
Some runners felt that the sole unit was far too firm to be used as a daily runner.
A couple of reviewers thought the laces were too long.
Bottom line
The Cloud X from On Running managed to get high marks from consumers. Many users commended the shoe’s construction and the effectiveness of its features. It received very little criticism, but the consumers believe there is still room for improvement for the Cloud X. Overall, as a lot of people considered the Cloud X to be versatile and supportive, it is safe to say that it was a winning shoe."
New Balance Fresh Foam Roav, New Balance,86.0,60.0,63.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
A good number of users commented that the New Balance Fresh Foam Roav is very comfortable.
Several testers said that the design of the shoe is stylish.
It is lightweight, according to those who have tried it.
The shoe was good to wear for running, walking, and gym activities as well as casual occasions.
A significant number of users admired the excellent cushioning of the Fresh Foam Roav.
Based on some reviews, the shoe has a wide toe box.
2 reasons not to buy
The integrated tongue is quite bothersome, a few wearers noted.
The New Balance Fresh Foam Roav is not supportive, as mentioned by some buyers.
Bottom line
Based on the positive reviews, the New Balance Fresh Foam Roav is indeed a well-loved running shoe. 
This road running companion was evidently excellent when tackling different paved surfaces. The design and comfort level was given attention and received praises. Despite a few issues on the sizing and supportive feature, this running companion is still recommended by many."
Mizuno Wave Inspire 15,,95.0,90.0,1169.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Mizuno Wave Inspire 16,"6 reasons to buy
Most users lauded the supportive feature of the Mizuno Wave Inspire 15.
Several runners were satisfied with how comfortable the shoe is, especially on long-distance runs.
A few admired the lightweight design of the Wave Inspire 15.
Some happy wearers said the shoe offers a smooth ride.
The shoe is not only good for running but also for gym activities and indoor training, according to some user reviews.
A couple of buyers liked the shoe’s stylish design and color options.
2 reasons not to buy
Based on some reviews, the heel cup of the Wave Inspire 15 is too tight.
Various purchasers were doubtful of the shoe's durability as they have observed some parts to come apart after a few uses.
Bottom line
In summary, the Mizuno Wave Inspire 15 has proven itself to be a solid stability shoe. According to some users, the shoe has ticked all the boxes on what an ideal stability shoe should have. Runners admired how comfortable, supportive and responsive the shoe is. For a series that is doing quite well, the Mizuno Wave Inspire has nailed it once again with version 15."
Adidas Pulseboost HD,,89.0,80.0,198.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12oz , Women: 12oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Adidas Pulseboost HD LTD,"6 reasons to buy
Most consumers claim that the Adidas Pulseboost HD has a quality that is robust and reliable.
A lot of testers feel that the cushioning system is robust enough to support the foot for extended periods.
The style of this Adidas running shoe is praised for being performance-ready and able to handle casual walks at the same time.
‘Comfortable’ is a word that many purchasers have used to describe their time with this product.
The traction capacity of the outsole has received appreciation for being precise and balance-assuring.
Some runners feel cool and dry inside the interior compartment because of the well-ventilated upper.
3 reasons not to buy
The midsole unit doesn’t have a lot of cushioning to support extended running sessions, according to several testers.
A couple of consumers claim that it is difficult to wear this shoe; the one-piece opening is restrictive and small.
Some believe that the fabrics of the upper have a tendency to irritate the skin.
Bottom line
The Adidas Pulseboost HD has enjoyed mostly positive reviews from consumers. This running shoe is lauded for being versatile enough to handle both running sessions and fashion-centered excursions. The updated midsole is highlighted as a robust accouterment for each activity. Moreover, the traction-ready outsole and the breathable upper also relish in the accommodating feedback. On the other hand, the width and size are criticized for being tight and small, respectively.
Fans of neutral running shoes are the ones who are likely to have fun with the Adidas Pulseboost HD."
Asics Gel Nimbus 22,,93.0,88.0,169.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 13mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
According to some runners, the Asics Gel Nimbus 22 is supportive. 
The majority of the buyers agreed that the shoe is comfortable to wear. 
A user noted that the shoe offers a more structured midfoot and heel design. 
Many purchasers have appreciated the shoe’s spacious toe box. 
The Gel Nimbus 22 is durable, based on a couple of reviews. 
Some reviewers said that this shoe feels softer compared to its previous versions. 
A few wearers said that the shoe is perfect for long runs. 
People like the stylish design of this updated shoe. 
2 reasons not to buy
The shoe is heavy, said a consumer. 
A few reviewers think the Gel Nimbus 22 is expensive.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Nimbus 22 was welcomed by a lot of runners and shoe enthusiasts because of the comfort that it provides. Users experience a soft and responsive ride because this neutral running shoe is packed with technologies that boost the running performance. It is the best option for those who are looking for a durable and responsive running companion."
Asics GT 1000 7,,91.0,82.0,1784.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Asics GT 1000 9,"6 reasons to buy
A lot of people lauded the longevity of the Asics GT 1000 7’s materials, stating that the overall construction was sturdy and sound.
Some testers commented that this companion for the roads didn’t have an awkwardly bulky configuration.
The cushioning system was given praise for being lush and consistent throughout each run.
Mild and moderate overpronators praised the stability mechanisms in the underfoot platform, declaring that they dutifully supported the needs of their running gait.
Most runners liked the aesthetics of this product; they wrote that the visual aspect was striking.
More than a handful of purchasers were happy that this member of the Asics running shoe roster was lightweight despite the presence of many features.
3 reasons not to buy
A handful of testers complained that the supposed regular width options of the GT 1000 7 were narrower than their expectations.
Some consumers observed that the toe box was too tight that it bunched their toes uncomfortably during the run.
There were complaints about the stability mechanisms not being very noticeable; purchasers who reported this occurrence didn’t experience a well-supported tim
Bottom line
The user feedback towards the Asics GT 1000 7 was generally positive. People liked this running shoe. Many of them reported that the quality of the materials was dependable while other consumers were happy with the looks and the lightweight build of the entire silhouette. On the other hand, some people were on the fence when it came to the fit profiles and the stability features; while a portion of the testers was happy with the pronation control, another group stated that they barely felt buttressed and comfortable inside the foot-chamber."
Saucony Switchback ISO,,87.0,90.0,64.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A few lauded the BOA system of the Saucony Switchback ISO.
The upper area is supportive, based on a review.
According to one of the reviewers, the heel cup is stable and fits well.
The materials used in the edges of the upper area of the shoe is simple and perfect in shape.
It runs true to size, as noted by a consumer.
The shoe is comfortable, according to a tester.
The Switchback ISO is durable.
2 reasons not to buy
A buyer said that the running shoe is not stylish enough.
The shoe is slightly expensive.
Bottom line
Most of the buyers are happy with the Saucony Switchback ISO's design and performance on the trail. Aside from its structure, they also loved the comfort that the shoe provides. Overall, the Saucony Switchback ISO is a successful release considered by many as reliable trail running shoe for neutral runners."
On Cloudflow,,92.0,88.0,456.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 6.7oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,, On Cloudflow 2.0,"8 reasons to buy
Many runners welcomed the On Cloudflow, stating that it performed well.
Several testers were thankful that this shoe was able to provide comfort to their feet.
Wearing this shoe for long periods of time didn’t cause any strain or discomfort to the muscles, according to those who have tried it.
A lot of consumers were satisfied that it was lightweight.
The design and the color schemes received some praise; there were runners who thought that it was visually appealing.
Some testers were confident about this shoe’s quality, commending its apparently robust material-construction.
The cushioning system was comfortable and responsive, conveyed a reviewer.
A runner stated that they were able to use the On Cloudflow for a variety of activities on the flat surfaces and they reported that it stayed agreeable throughout.
3 reasons not to buy
A tester reported that rocks kept getting stuck in the crevices and holes of the sole unit, and that they were hard to get out.
The outsole wasn’t able to grip wet surfaces well, a reviewer wrote.
A runner noted that the rubber pattern below each cloud pod wore off quickly.
Bottom line
The On Cloudflow gained some fans because of its efficacy and its agreeable design. Many runners welcomed its lightweight nature, its responsive cushioning systems, and its apparently cool aesthetics. There were close to no complaints when it comes to this neutral road shoe."
Merrell Vapor Glove 4,,91.0,86.0,451.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 5.6oz , Women: 4.3oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Most consumers have welcomed the close-to-the-ground profile of the Merrell Vapor Glove 4.
The flexibility of this product is lauded by testers.
Several reviews emphasize the lightweight structure’s capacity to permit all-day wear.
The traction equipped by the outsole unit is deemed reliable by a lot of purchasers.
The aesthetics of this running shoe are appreciated, with some testers believing that the facade is great for casual walks.
Fans of minimalist running shoes like the barefoot-like quality of their performances when wearing the Vapor Glove 4.
The sole unit provides an excellent ground feel, according to a few users.
A couple of purchasers have observed the upper material to dry quickly whenever they run in wet conditions.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners have complained about the materials of the insole and the upper being susceptible to odor.
The thinness of the underfoot platform paved the way for worn outsoles and holes, according to a few testers.
A couple of wearers have noted the frontmost eyelet rubbed against the skin uncomfortably.
Bottom line
People generally like the Merrell Vapor Glove 4 and what it has to offer. This product is deemed versatile and accommodating, particularly to those who welcome a near-the-ground experience. The highlights include the flexible construction, the cool looks, and the effective gripping capacity. On the other hand, some have complained of fabrics that are prone to odor while others criticized the flimsy durability of the outsole.
Fans of neutral running shoes that don’t have a lot of heft to its construction are likely to enjoy the Vapor Glove 4."
Asics Gel Scram 5,,91.0,,97.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 12oz , Women: 9.3oz,,, May 2019,,,"5 reasons to buy
Several stated that the Asics Gel Scram 5 is very comfortable to wear.  
Many appreciate the lightness of the platform. 
It has a secure fit, commented a few runners. 
According to some, the shoe is very durable; it withstands harsh elements. 
A number of users note that it is versatile; the shoe has grippy traction on varied surfaces. 
2 reasons not to buy
It lacks arch support, remarked some reviewers. 
The underfoot of the shoe feels a little stiff, expressed quite a few.
Bottom line
Touted as a versatile trail running shoe from Asics, the Gel Scram 5 sports a multi-surface grip ability, enabling you to conquer a multitude of terrains. It is packed with some of the brand’s state-of-the-art, reliable technologies to supplement unrivaled support. To combat odor production within the foot chamber, the Asics Gel Scram 5 is engineered using highly breathable materials that help wick away moisture. "
Asics Gel Quantum 360 5,,91.0,88.0,177.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 14oz , Women: 11oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
According to many users, the Asics Gel Quantum 360 5 is very comfortable to wear. 
The shoe fits perfectly, several reviewers stated. 
There is sufficient support provided by the shoe, remarked some runners. 
It is highly versatile as it can be used for both running and other casual activities, commended several testers. 
Many of the customers admire the protection delivered by the Gel Quantum 360 5. 
The cushioning of the shoe allows a highly responsive ride, a few runners expressed. 
Some of the wearers have shared that their speed has increased with the aid of this road running shoe. 
3 reasons not to buy
One of the downsides of the shoe is its lack of breathability, a reviewer commented. 
Some of the runners have developed blisters after wearing the shoe for some time. 
The Asics Gel Quantum 360 5 is quite heavy, a few users said. 
Bottom line
Promising to deliver a bouncy and comfortable running experience, the Asics Gel Quantum 360 5 impressed many of the runners with the level of comfort it offered. Although the reception of the shoe has been of varying views, the positives still outweigh the bad. Many purchasers appreciate the versatility of both the design and performance of the shoe, enabling users to use it for both running and non-running related activities. Despite the concerns regarding its breathability and weight, many runners still lauded the responsive ride it supplemented. And because of all the good qualities of the shoe, many claim that they will surely recommend this athletic wear to their peers. "
Brooks Addiction 13,,86.0,88.0,1525.0,,, Road, Motion control, Men: 13.3oz , Women: 12.2oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Brooks Addiction 14,"6 reasons to buy
Several testers stated that a break-in period was not needed for this shoe; it was apparently comfortable right out of the box.
This running shoe offered adequate support during speed workouts and daily walks, some people noted.
Consumers lauded the cushioning system of the Brooks Addiction 13, emphasizing its capacity to prevent the foot and leg from experiencing strain.
The traction capacity of the outsole unit was touted to be highly reliable, according to many consumers.
Heavyset runners were happy that the underfoot platform was able to retain its structural integrity and carry the weight of their bodies.
The stability mechanisms present in this product were lauded because they corrected pronation and guided the gait.
6 reasons not to buy
Some consumers stated that the in-shoe experience was narrower than what they expected.
According to several testers, the eyelets of the upper unit tended to rub against the skin, causing hot spots and irritation.
The collar of this shoe has developed some holes, giving doubt as to the overall durability of the façade.
The forefoot section was too snug that the fabrics rubbed against the toes and bunched them together awkwardly, based on a handful of reviews.
Some runners didn’t like the color schemes that were available for the Brooks Addiction 13, stating that the options were bland.
The underfoot platform was thick and inflexible, a few people complained.
Bottom line
The Brooks Addiction 13 didn’t garner exclusively positive feedback from its consumers. While many runners were happy with this motion control shoe’s comfortable and durable cushioning unit, a handful of them also complained that it was stiff and bulky-looking. And while the stability mechanisms were lauded for being highly efficient at maintaining a stable gait, the fit-profile was criticized for being too narrow. Those who liked this road shoe got what they asked for, but there were others who didn’t thoroughly enjoy what it had to offer."
Adidas Solar Boost 19,,94.0,93.0,161.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Most testers like the lightweight structure of the Adidas Solar Boost 19.
Several consumers have noted that the design of this running shoe is eye-catching and contemporary.
Some runners welcome the steadying mechanisms that are present in the midsole unit, believing that the quality of their runs has improved because of such features.
According to a handful of purchasers, the upper feels like a sock that follows the shape and motion of the foot.
The fit is secure and reliably accommodating, based on some user reviews.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people have observed the fabrics of the upper unit tearing apart after only a few uses.
A couple of users have complained about the midsole separating quickly from the upper, rendering the shoe unusable.
Bottom line
There are many positive points about the Solar Boost 19. This Adidas running shoe is lauded for having a form-fitting and non-irritating upper unit, a steady and reactive midsole, and a construction that is light and adherent to the motion of the foot. But along with the praise comes a set of complaints that focused on the materials quickly degrading or separating. Durability apparently becomes the bane of this product.
Fans of road running shoes and those with neutral pronation are the ones who are welcome to enjoy the Adidas Solar Boost 19."
Nike Air Zoom Vomero 13,,89.0,82.0,441.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Nike Air Zoom Vomero 14,"7 reasons to buy
The Nike Air Zoom Vomero 13 made use of a pleasing design, several consumers noted.
Some runners stated that the overall experience with this shoe was comfortable.
The underfoot cushioning unit felt springy and responsive, most testers reported.
The outsole’s traction capacity gained favor as it allowed precise movements on the ground.
A heavyset runner commented that this running shoe was efficient at ensuring responsible cushioning and in-shoe support.
According to a few users, the upper offered a not-so-tight coverage.
The weight was deemed adequately light.
1 reasons not to buy
A few purchasers felt that the forefoot section felt a bit narrow.
Bottom line
The Nike Air Zoom Vomero 13 was deemed an excellent update, having received numerous positive reviews from consumers and reviewers. They welcomed its eye-catching looks, its comfortable foam midsole, and its traction-ready outsole. They are also appreciative of its weight and price. A few people thought that the forefoot was narrow, but such a complaint didn’t overshadow the positivity directed towards this neutral running shoe."
Hoka One One Bondi 6,,88.0,85.0,794.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 8.6oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
People mostly liked the cushioning capacity of the Hoka One One Bondi 6, stating that it was good at returning energy to the foot.
This running shoe was touted to be efficient at being a part of work apparel; people have used it for their shifts.
Those who had issues with the joints, tendons or muscles of their lower extremities felt that this product was able to stave off any discomfort during the activities.
The color schemes were lauded; runners were happy with the way the colors caught attention.
The breathability of the upper unit was welcomed; it’s said to be better than the capacity of the previous version’s fabrics.
4 reasons not to buy
Several consumers felt that the Hoka One One Bondi 6 was too narrow.
The tongue unit was detested by some runners, emphasizing that it rubbed uncomfortably against the instep.
The rubber outsole was observed by a handful of testers to wear off after only a few miles on the road.
A few purchasers claimed that the underfoot experience was a bit stiffer than the previous iteration.
Bottom line
People were mostly happy with the Hoka One One Bondi 6 and how it performed. Many of them liked the energy-returning and strain-preventing nature of the underfoot platform. The versatility of this road companion also received praise. The complaints that it garnered involved the lasting power of the outsole, the supposed stiffness of the in-shoe feel, and the irritating rubbing of the tongue unit."
Under Armour Charged Assert 8,,92.0,80.0,4462.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Many consumers claim that the Under Armour Charged Assert 8 has a comfortable construction that allows them to wear it all day.
Most testers believe that this running shoe has a versatile look that permits it to be worn on a variety of occasions.
The product is praised for being affordable and at par with the quality of materials and its performance.
The weight of this road running shoe has been lauded for being light enough for extended running sessions.
Several people are happy with the cushioning system of this shoe, stating that it responsibly cushioned each step.
Surface traction is deemed reliable by those who appreciate precise movements on the roads.
3 reasons not to buy
A couple of purchasers report that the forefoot section of the upper unit has started to tear apart after only a few uses.
Some runners lament the lack of support near the arch.
The fabrics of the upper have a tendency to rub against the toes irritatingly, according to a few testers.
Bottom line
The overall feedback towards the Charged Assert 8 has been positive. Runners are generally appreciative of what this Under Armour running shoe had to offer. The underfoot cushioning system and the lightweight construction are particularly highlighted as the sources of all-day comfort, even when the product is used for casual purposes. On the other hand, the durability and blister-inducing fabrics of the upper are criticized.
Fans of neutral running shoes that are specially made for neutral foot pronation are the target market of the Under Armour Charged Assert 8.
 "
Brooks Pureflow 7,,89.0,82.0,878.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.9oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Many consumers appreciated the design of the Brooks Pureflow 7.
A lot of people felt that this running shoe was lightweight.
‘Comfortable’ was a word that many used to describe this product.
The versatility of this product was well-liked. People stated that using it for running, walking and standing for long periods didn’t become uncomfortable.
Some people remarked that the redesigned tongue unit no longer rubbed against the skin, unlike the previous version.
The underfoot cushioning system was lauded for being soft and responsive.
Most of those who have bought this road companion noted that the general quality of the materials was robust.
The upper unit was soft and flexible, according to a handful of users.
7 reasons not to buy
Several consumers who had wide feet lamented the snug toe box of the Pureflow 7.
Rocks tended to go inside the foot-chamber through the collar, according to a tester.
The material on the ankle collar rubbed uncomfortably against the skin, some runners complained.
A few people noted that the foot-chamber had too much room in it. They felt some in-shoe wobbling.
Based on a couple of reviews, a break-in period of several uses was necessary to get an optimized in-shoe experience.
Some consumers claimed that the midsole was too stiff for natural movement.
More than a few persons grumbled of a fatigued midfoot upon wearing this shoe for more than thirty minutes.
Bottom line
The feedback for the Brooks Pureflow 7 was relatively positive. A lot of consumers felt that this neutral road shoe was suitably lightweight, comfortable and versatile. They also welcomed its reactive midsole compound. But some people didn’t like the in-shoe experience, emphasizing an inconsistent fit. Others complained of the upper materials rubbing against the skin."
New Balance Rubix,,95.0,90.0,57.0,,, Road, Motion control, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Many buyers agreed that the New Balance Rubix is a good-looking running shoe.
One user mentioned that the shoe offers enough amount of flexibility while running.
The shoe is true to size, said a few users.
The Rubix delivers a smoother transition compared to other motion-control shoes, a reviewer shared.
This road running shoe is durable, said a few buyers.
4 reasons not to buy
Several purchasers agreed that the New Balance Rubix has a narrow and tight fit.
A  few runners were annoyed by the design of the tongue.
A couple of wearers mentioned that the shoe feels clunky underfoot.
Some disappointed users mentioned that the shoe is not comfortable; they experienced pain while running and walking.
Bottom line
The Rubix is a new running shoe model from New Balance. It seems that it failed to capture the heart of many users as it gained mixed reviews from its wearers. Some runners were impressed by the shoe’s good-looking design, but many others have found significant flaws in the design. Overall, the New Balance Rubix still needs more improvement."
Adidas Ultraboost All Terrain,,93.0,84.0,767.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The outsole of the Ultraboost All Terrain delivers fantastic traction, as commented by one runner.
Many users were impressed with the water-repelling feature of the shoe.
A lot of people mentioned that it has a suitable fit.
Several runners likened the experience of wearing the shoe to stepping on clouds because of the amount of comfort that it gave.
One reviewer was happy with the way the Primeknit hugged the foot; it apparently resulted in a balance of softness and security that allowed for a problem-free run.
4 reasons not to buy
Some users felt that the fabric of the sock-like collar is uncomfortable on the skin; others said it hurt their ankle after a few miles of running.
This shoe is supposed to be an upgrade yet it did not feel a lot different from previous versions, according to a reviewer.
A tester relayed that the upper does not provide adequate support, thus resulting in foot-wobbling and sliding.
Many buyers mentioned that the tongue design is unappealing, affecting the overall look of the shoe.
Bottom line
As an improved version of an already well-performing shoe, the Ultraboost All Terrain is packed with new and unique features that aim to live up to the name of the series. While many buyers did not regret getting the Ultraboost All Terrain, there were a few who thought that this trail running shoe was not worth its high price tag."
Asics Gel Cumulus 20,,91.0,87.0,1507.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Cumulus 22,"10 reasons to buy
The Gel Cumulus 20 enabled the feeling of running on soft ground, a user commented. Others likened it to “running on clouds” and “running on marshmallows.”
Various wearers found the sizing to be accurate.
The midsole provided sufficient cushioning and underfoot support, according to a runner.
The shoe performed great in all-day runs, as well as walking and some light exercises, as experienced by a user.
A runner claimed that the shoe offered a secure fit that was not too cramped.
Many reviewers found the shoe to be lightweight, and some were happy that it did not weigh the foot down while running.
The heel area was very supportive, which was perfect for heel-strikers, said a tester.
The mesh upper felt nice on the foot while running in warm weather, a user remarked.
Several runners found the outsole to be firm yet flexible.
A lot of buyers were happy that the neutral colorways available were easy to pair with outfits.
2 reasons not to buy
One customer stated that the shoe was stiff at first and needed a break-in period.
The Flytefoam® midsole seemed lacking in bounce and liveliness, a reviewer wrote.
Bottom line
The Gel Cumulus series has remained a runner favorite, based on the positive reviews the 20th iteration has received. The various structural elements of the shoe have proven their efficiency, while the features have stayed functional. Very few negative opinions surrounded the shoe’s design, and with this, the Gel Cumulus 20 has proven its unwavering reliability."
Nike Legend React,,89.0,81.0,405.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The breathability of the Nike Legend React’s upper unit was lauded by those who have tried it.
People noted that the flexible platform permitted the natural bending capacity of the foot.
The springy nature of the cushioning unit was welcomed; people claimed that it accommodated energized steps.
This running shoe was appreciated for being a versatile option; athletic and casual uses were easy to pull off, according to several consumers.
Purchasers were happy with the price of this shoe, emphasizing its affordability.
The in-shoe wrap was viewed as smooth and non-irritating.
Runners praised the abundance of the color schemes that were available for this running shoe; they liked that the hues were vibrant and attention-grabbing.
2 reasons not to buy
The durability of the shoe, especially in the forefoot area, was questionable to some users.
Numerous buyers were disappointed with the inaccuracy of the shoe's color scheme.
Bottom line
All-in-all, the Nike Legend React was able to accommodate the desires of people when it comes to a shoe that has the React technology. The price was one of the aspects that people liked, along with the flexible and springy underfoot experience. Meanwhile, the shoe's durability and physical appearance, particularly the color, were factors that did not satisfy users. Despite these criticisms, they are still outweighed by the positive reviews, which indicate that the Legend React is a running shoe that performs its functions well."
Nike Joyride Dual Run,,88.0,87.0,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 11mm , Women: 11mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Many users appreciated the Nike Joyride Dual Run’s lightweight structure. 
People loved the comfort that this shoe provides. 
This running partner is supportive, according to some wearers. 
It delivers a soft and responsive ride, based on reviews. 
Several purchasers said that the shoe is also suitable for casual walks. 
A reviewer claimed that the shoe can keep the foot warm in cold conditions.
3 reasons not to buy
A couple of buyers noted that the toe box section is a bit narrow.
The tongue makes the shoe difficult to slip on and off, said a tester. 
One user complained that this shoe is not durable enough for running.
Bottom line
The Nike Joyride Dual Run is a comfortable running shoe designed for neutral runners or those who do not overpronate. This shoe features Nike’s latest cushioning technology that offers a soft and responsive ride. It is designed to accommodate runners who are looking for comfort, flexibility, and versatility. This shoe is also perfect for walking and gym sessions."
Nike Air Zoom Streak LT 4,,81.0,80.0,6.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The lightweight nature of the Nike Air Zoom Streak LT 4 garnered positive remarks from testers.
The sizing scheme was welcomed because it apparently met the expectations of many.
A couple of consumers lauded the form-fitting coverage of the façade, emphasizing that such a configuration enabled speedy performances on the road.
The outsole delivered good grip on the surfaces, according to a runner.
The various color options were pleasing eye-catchers, based on several reviews.
2 reasons not to buy
Several purchasers felt that this shoe required some runs before breaking in.
Some testers stated that the cushioning unit was a bit too thin for their pleasure.
Bottom line
Many consumers were happy with what the Nike Air Zoom Streak LT 4  had to offer. They liked the weight profile, the true-to-size build, the secure upper configuration, and the grippy outsole. Conversely, a handful of reviews weren’t happy with this neutral shoe, emphasizing an uncomfortable break-in period and a thin underfoot platform."
Hoka One One Hupana 2,,91.0,88.0,693.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.2oz , Women: 6.3oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Many people liked the sporty yet appealing design of the Hoka One One Hupana.
The expanded set of color schemes was well-received; purchasers noted that it allowed them the freedom to pick and enjoy the aesthetics.
Most of those who have tested this running shoe welcomed its lightweight construction.
Running in this model felt fast and energized, some consumers reported.
Some runners agreed that this shoe was true to size.
The durability of the cushioning system and the outsole were lauded.
The traction capacity of the ground-contact foam was given praise; many runners felt that it was efficient at delivering surface control.
The interior sleeve of the upper was deemed to be smooth against the skin.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners claimed that the midfoot and forefoot sections had a tight fit.
A tester observed the upper fabrics becoming loose after only a few uses.
Bottom line
The Hupana 2 from Hoka One One became a darling of consumers and reviewers alike. They were happy with its efficient components, such as the durable underfoot platform, the soft coverage, the pleasing aesthetics, and the lightweight build. Some minor gripes were said about this neutral shoe, but those comments didn’t become deal-breakers."
Nike Legend React 2,,92.0,95.0,8.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,, Nike Legend React,"7 reasons to buy
Many people testified that the Nike Legend React 2 is comfortable. 
It offers good arch support, said a user. 
A couple of buyers noted that it is good for walking and running. 
Numerous purchasers love the stylish design of the shoe. 
A few runners appreciated its lightweight construction. 
It is true to size, according to a reviewer. 
The shoe is responsive, based on some reviews. 
2 reasons not to buy
Nike Legend React 2 is bulky, according to a consumer. 
The shoe is a bit tight, reported a tester. 
Bottom line
The Nike Legend React 2 is a lightweight running shoe that delivers soft and responsive cushioning, providing a comfortable running experience. The shoe’s durable and breathable upper is responsible for keeping the foot dry and comfortable throughout the running session."
New Balance Fresh Foam Vongo v4,,86.0,88.0,28.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 9.1oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Many users say the New Balance Fresh Foam Vongo v4 is a comfortable shoe.
The shoe proves to help relieve certain discomforts, such as bunions and back pains, as told by some wearers.
Several buyers agree that the Fresh Foam Vongo v4 is sturdy and durable.
A couple of runners have noted that the cushioning of the shoe is just right: not too stiff and not too soft.
Transitions are fluid with the New Balance Fresh Foam Vongo v4, according to numerous runners.
2 reasons not to buy
A lot of reviewers wrote that the shoe feels more substantial compared to the previous version.
Some users complain that the heel area of the New Balance Vongo v4 does not provide a secure fit and causes discomfort.
Bottom line
The fourth edition of the New Balance Fresh Foam Vongo continues to be a favorite among stability shoe wearers. This shoe received positive comments about its comfort level, durability, and fantastic performance. On the other hand, a few buyers were not sold on the shoe’s weight and heel structure. 
Overall, the Fresh Foam Vongo v4 has proven itself to be a fantastic running companion as users find it recommendable and reliable."
Nike Quest 2,,85.0,81.0,6.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral,,, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
Many buyers hail the Nike Quest 2 for being super comfortable.
The running shoe is very responsive, claimed a number of testers. 
Multiple reviewers appreciate the lightness of the road running platform. 
Several purchasers hail the sticky traction of the neutral runner. 
Quite a few users commend the versatile function of the running shoe. 
Some wearers have observed that the shoe offers a stable running performance. 
The lightweight running shoe is highly durable, praised various shoppers. 
A number of consumers laud the impact protection of the running shoe. 
The shoe is very breathable, shared several customers.
4 reasons not to buy
Some commenters have expressed that the running shoe lacks arch support.
The neutral running shoe rubs on the foot, remarked some runners. 
A few athletes state that the road running shoe is loose. 
According to several experts, the shoe is too wide.
Bottom line
Sporting a technical look with reliable features, the Nike Quest 2 is perfect for runners seeking to go the distance. With the technologies and components loaded into the running shoe's engineering, it offers an outstanding blend of comfort and support. Since it is built for distance races, it incorporates featherlight elements that increase the runner's propulsion. At an affordable price, athletes can expect a stable, breathable, and comfortable run from the Nike Quest 2."
Adidas Ultraboost S&L, Adidas,95.0,,19658.0,$180,$85 (save 53%), Road, Neutral,,,,, Mar 2019, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Consumers generally like the colorful hues that grace the façade of the Adidas Ultraboost S&L.
Several testers have lauded the comfort given by the midsole unit of this running shoe.
The suede panel system gives a premium look and delivers extra oomph to the fit-adjustment capacity of the upper, according to most reviewers.
Some users have given praise to the reflective element on the upper for being a visual indicator during those nighttime runs.
Based on many reviews, the lightweight construction of the Ultraboost S&L has allowed all-day wear.
The outsole unit is praised for having the capability to handle movement on the ground; people have observed that brakes, swerves, and steps are easy because of the Continental™ rubber.
1 reasons not to buy
A handful of consumers have felt that the in-shoe experience is a bit loose; they recommend sizing down when getting a pair.
Bottom line
The feedback for the Ultraboost S&L has been overwhelmingly positive. People liked this Adidas running shoe for being suitable for their daily activities. The comfortable midsole, the eye-catching design, and the premium quality are apparently the aspects that made the shoe as complete as can be. On the other hand, some consumers have deemed the overall hug of the shoe’s outline to be looser than usual.
Neutral pronators and those who enjoy the thrill of taking to the roads are the ones who are welcome to use the Adidas Ultraboost S&L."
Altra Olympus 3.5,,95.0,93.0,61.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 8.9oz,,,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Some of the testers commented that the Altra Olympus 3.5 is comfortable.
The shoe is best for hiking as well as road and trail running activities, according to a few buyers.
Based on reviews, the shoe has been praised for its wide toe box.
Several purchasers said that the Olympus 3.5 provides excellent traction.
One of the consumers loves the snug fit that the shoe delivers.
According to those who have tested it, the shoe is well-cushioned.
3 reasons not to buy
One of the reviewers said that the Altra Olympus 3.5 is expensive.
A tester noted that the shoe feels heavy and looks bulky.
According to a user, the Olympus 3.5 does not drain very well.
Bottom line
Overall, the Altra Olympus 3.5 has received a lot of praise because of its fantastic construction. With its comfortable fit and excellent cushioning, many users are happy and satisfied. To win the majority of the consumers, this versatile shoe makes sure to perform well on different walking, hiking, and running activities. Despite the issues on its price and bulky look, others still lauded its fantastic construction. The Altra Olympus 3.5 is recommended by many to those who want to be successful in tackling difficult and dangerous trail-running activities."
New Balance Fresh Foam Zante Pursuit, New Balance,90.0,85.0,271.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.4oz , Women: 6.1oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm, Jan 2019,,,"8 reasons to buy
Many users admired the lightweight construction of the New Balance Fresh Foam Zante Pursuit.
Several runners lauded the shoe’s breathable coverage.
According to many user reviews, the shoe is very comfortable, especially for those with plantar fasciitis.
The running shoe has a roomier and softer toe box, as mentioned by most buyers.
Majority of the purchasers said that it is true to size.
The Fresh Foam Zante Pursuit has a great, eye-catching design, said a few comments.
A few reviews mentioned that the shoe is very responsive.
The shoe has a durable design, said a couple of buyers.
2 reasons not to buy
A few users mentioned that the sole of the Zante Pursuit is not flexible.
A couple of runners were disappointed by the shoe’s loose heel fit.
Bottom line
The New Balance Fresh Foam Zante Pursuit is a lightweight road running shoe that made most users happy and satisfied. Runners admired the shoe’s design, responsiveness, and durability. Though it had minor issues on heel fit and the sole being too stiff, most users would still recommend the shoe because it is comfortable and breathable."
Saucony Kinvara 10,,93.0,91.0,461.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 6.7oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Saucony Kinvara 11,"5 reasons to buy
Those who have tested the Saucony Kinvara 10 stated that it had a lightweight build that didn’t weigh down the foot.
A handful of reviewers welcomed the cushioning system, stating that it offered proper cushioning throughout their activities.
The aesthetics of this running shoe were lauded for being treats to the eyes; people were happy with the vibrant color schemes and the modern design.
Some consumers felt that the cover system and the underfoot platform were form-accommodating and able to conform to the natural movements of the foot, thereby ensuring a versatile ride.
The midsole unit was springy yet stable, according to a couple of runners; they observed that they didn’t lose any steadiness while standing idly or moving through the gait cycle.
2 reasons not to buy
The upper quickly accumulated dirt, some testers stated. The colors got washed out because of the dust that clung to the facade.
A few consumers felt the weight of this running shoe; they believed that it was somehow slightly heavier than they anticipated.
Bottom line
A generally positive response was afforded the Kinvara 10 from Saucony. This neutral running shoe was apparently versatile enough to handle many types of activities, with its midsole and upper gaining appreciation for being highly reactive to the shape and movement capacity of the foot. The lightweight configuration and playful colorways were also praised. On the other hand, some people complained about the dirt-magnet nature of the upper, as well as a slightly noticeable weight that countered its supposed lightweight structure."
Nike Downshifter 9,,90.0,91.0,8.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 8.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Nike Downshifter 10,"8 reasons to buy
Many satisfied users mentioned that Nike Downshifter 9 is comfortable to wear. 
A lot of people appreciated the shoe’s lightweight structure. 
Some purchasers said that this running companion is supportive. 
The shoe is very flexible, according to several commenters. 
A few consumers confirmed that this running shoe is breathable. 
Buyers are happy that the price for a pair of the Downshifter 9 is affordable. 
Numerous reviewers commented that this shoe is stylish.
This running partner is also suitable for workouts and casual wear, based on reviews.
3 reasons not to buy
A handful of wearers complained that the Nike Downshifter 9 does not offer enough cushioning. 
The upper of the shoe is not durable enough for running, said a couple of runners. 
A few testers reported that this shoe felt a bit narrow for them.
Bottom line
The Nike Downshifter 9 is among Nike’s best value-for-money performance running shoes. It features a simple yet stylish design that is ideal for regular runs, workout sessions, and everyday wear. This neutral running shoe delivers the necessary protection and support that fit the needs of runners and athletes of all levels. It is suitable for consumers seeking flexibility, comfort, and versatility."
New Balance 1400 v6,,95.0,95.0,281.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.2oz , Women: 6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The shoe is comfortable to use especially when running and walking, according to some buyers.
Its lightweight feature was admired by a lot of testers.
Reviewers said that the flexible upper part of the shoes wraps the foot evenly.
Some users noted that the New Balance 1400 v6 leaves no rubbing spots. It prevents hurtful feelings on the foot.
A significant number of consumers agreed that the fit was excellent.
2 reasons not to buy
The insole of the shoe is too thick, based on one review.
Some wearers commented that the back part of the shoe lacks the capability of being reflective.
Bottom line
A handful of wearers agreed that the New Balance 1400 v6 is a dependable shoe for daily walking and running sessions. Although some of them have problems with its thick insole and reflective details, others still lauded the shoe's perfect fit and performance. Overall, the footwear is a good option for those who are looking for a comfortable and flexible footwear."
Altra Torin 4,,95.0,88.0,228.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.1oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Heel strikers liked the stack height of the platform, stating that the impact forces that were produced by the foot-strike were dutifully mitigated.
Some testers commented that the in-shoe experience was snug but not limiting.
The upper unit was praised for allowing air into the interior chamber and maintaining a fresh experience for the foot.
Several consumers claimed that the versatility of the Altra Torin 4 permitted them to enjoy walking to work and doing their daily tasks.
The flexibility of the sole and the stretchiness of the upper was appreciated.
2 reasons not to buy
The midfoot area was too tight to some wearers.
The responsiveness of the shoe could do better with some improvement, according to a reviewer.
Bottom line
All in all, the response for the Altra Torin 4 was quite positive. People enjoyed this running shoe’s accommodating design and agreeable upper unit. The midsole was also praised for being able to adapt to the movements of the foot and provide reliable cushioning. On the other hand, some people determined that the shoe needed to work on its responsiveness and fit specifications.
The Altra Torin 4 is a road running shoe that’s made for neutral pronators."
Nike ZoomX Vaporfly Next%,,82.0,93.0,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.6oz , Women: 6.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
Majority of its users find the Nike ZoomX Vaporfly Next% to be a lightweight running shoe.
Some runners describe the Vaporfly Next% as the fastest running shoe they have ever worn.
The shoe’s overall structure has visibly improved compared to the previous version, according to a reviewer.
A number of commenters feel the shoe provides a flawless fit.
A few users find the outsole of the ZoomX Vaporfly Next% to hold up better than that of its predecessor. 
The new upper material and lacing setup offer a lightweight yet stable frame around the foot, a couple of wearers reported. Meanwhile, others claim that the upper is snug yet breathable. 
The sole unit’s wider base helps in balancing the foot, according to a tester.
Several wear-testers praised the ZoomX midsole as bouncy and soft, with some even saying it is the most cushioned foam they have encountered.
Many users attribute the faster and more responsive ride to the shoe’s updated, lower drop.
2 reasons not to buy
The flimsy quality of the tongue makes it difficult to lay flat or stay in place on top of the foot, said a reviewer.
A few consumers disliked the expensiveness of the Vaporfly Next%.
Bottom line
The Nike ZoomX Vaporfly Next% is considerably a successful shoe release, as attested by both running professionals and casual runners. The new features presented by Nike in this shoe has impressed the majority, thus making them claim that the shoe is a huge upgrade from the earlier version of the ZoomX Vaporfly Next%. The shoe’s performance has also allowed some users to say it is a must-have for running. With very little criticism coming from buyers, it is safe to say that the ZoomX Vaporfly Next% is worth the purchase despite its hefty price tag."
Salomon Speedcross 4,,91.0,84.0,9304.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Salomon Speedcross 5,"10 reasons to buy
A good number of trail runners and hikers find the Salomon Speedcross 4 to be very comfortable.
The traction is a monster on mud, snow, and even in wet conditions, according to a majority of the reviews.
It has decent ground feedback, based on the observations of several users.
The price is considered by many as well worth the performance and durability.
The Quicklace system makes cinching easy and very convenient.
The anti-debris mesh readily wards off dirt and trail debris.
A handful noted that the outsole of the 4th version of the Speedcross is significantly more durable than the earlier version.
Some runners welcomed the more rounded toe box for improved comfort and toe splay.
A large number of runners praised the Endofit inner sleeve as it wraps the foot in comfort while the Sensifit overlays provide support and improved precision where fit goes.
More than a couple of wear testers were amazed by the responsiveness and nimble ride for such a burly shoe.
4 reasons not to buy
The high stack height and prominent lugs may cause some issues on uneven and rugged terrains.
A handful remarked that it does not dry as quickly as they would want it to.
Breathability is a bit hampered by the anti-debris mesh, according to a few.
Some runners also mentioned that it is a bit smaller and narrower than the past version.
Bottom line
The Salomon Speedcross 4 is something hordes of fans of the line will be very familiar with. There is still that insane traction on almost all surfaces, but with the added durability in the outsole to match its performance. It is quite light and nimble and comes in a variety of colors that will suit the fashion tastes of just about everyone. The running shoe excels on steep inclines, grass, loose gravel, and almost any slippery surfaces."
Asics Gel Excite 6,,95.0,87.0,1104.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.6oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Excite 6 Twist,"9 reasons to buy
Some runners found the Asics Gel Excite 6 to be comfortable enough for daily use. Others mentioned it felt great in both walking and running.
Many buyers agreed that the shoe is affordable.
A lot of users were satisfied with the accurate sizing of the Gel Excite 6.
A few reviewers commented on the flexibility of the midsole.
The upper was extremely breathable, according to several customers.
The shoe helped with reducing foot and ankle pains, a couple of wearers observed.
Runners thought the removable insole of the Gel Excite 6 to be convenient.
Numerous buyers were happy with the various width options of the shoe.
The Gel Excite 6 was a lightweight running shoe, many users attested.
1 reasons not to buy
A bit tight at the toe area, a few commenters wrote.
Bottom line
Like its predecessor, the Asics Gel Excite 6 was still well-received by the market. Various users were very pleased with the shoe’s performance and features that they were willing to repurchase, while others admired that the Gel Excite 6 was comfortable from first use. With the majority of its buyers claiming that the shoe is recommendable, it can be concluded that the Asics Gel Excite 6 is a successful release."
New Balance Fresh Foam Beacon, New Balance,92.0,89.0,327.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.5oz , Women: 6.2oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,, New Balance Fresh Foam Beacon v2,"8 reasons to buy
The New Balance Fresh Foam Beacons is a comfortable running shoe, said some users.
The shoe delivered a fantastic ride that was consistent throughout a marathon, commended a runner.
According to some reviews, the Beacon provided plenty of cushioning that was perfect for long-distance pavement runs.
Several users agreed that the Fresh Foam Beacon was a lightweight running shoe.
The midsole provided adequate arch support, stated a runner. Another remarked that is was responsive and firm enough to supply speed.
One customer wrote that the upper was flexible.
A couple of runners admired the colors of the Fresh Foam Beacon. 
This running shoe has a reasonable price.
3 reasons not to buy
The sizing of the New Balance Beacon was too small, according to a few wearers.
A few runners were disappointed because of the shoe's narrow forefoot.
Some users are disappointed because the insole keeps on sliding around.
Bottom line
For the majority of its users, the New Balance Fresh Foam Beacon delivered the perfect balance of cushion, lightness, and snappiness. Many were very impressed with its performance and thought there was little to none about the shoe that was worth criticizing. Overall, the Fresh Foam Beacon was a shoe that many considered as highly recommended to anyone looking for reliable running gear."
Saucony Omni ISO,,93.0,88.0,292.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Saucony Omni ISO 2,"5 reasons to buy
One of the buyers said that the fit was perfect.
According to a review, the Saucony Omni ISO has better tongue unit when compared to the previous model.
Based on a review, it is a great stability shoe.
It was lightweight, according to those who have tried it.
According to one of the consumers, the Omni ISO was responsive.
1 reasons not to buy
One of the users said that the shoe has limited color options.
Bottom line
Overall, the majority of the runners lauded the Saucony Omni ISO's construction and design. Aside from its style, they admired the shoes excellent fit. Although one of them had issues with its limited color schemes, the footwear is still recommended by other users because of its responsiveness and performance on different paved surfaces."
Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 37,,91.0,92.0,8.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Responsiveness: The midsole of the Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 37 offers ample rebound for high energy return. 
Support: According to several users, the shoe pronounces arch support, stabilizing their ride.
Flexibility: Many purchasers love the flexible upper of the running shoe.
Comfort: Quite a few wearers appreciate the plushness of the shoe's cushioning. 
Fit: A couple of experts commend the snug wrap of this road running shoe.
Weight: Various reviewers laud the lightweight construction of the Nike shoe.
Traction: It has a sticky grip on different surfaces, hailed a number of commenters.
3 reasons not to buy
Breathability: The shoe does not have sufficient ventilation, expressed a few reviewers.
Laces: Testers have shared that this neutral running shoe's laces are too short.
Break-in: There are some athletes noting that at first use, the shoe rubs against the foot.
Bottom line
A springier and more comfortable ride — this is what the Nike Zoom Pegasus 37 promises to deliver. With its top-of-the-line features, the shoe surely doesn’t disappoint. Touted as an all-around running platform, the Pegasus 37 from Nike is a great companion may it be in runs and everyday training. Sporting the brand’s premier technologies, this road runner amplifies durability and boasts superior traction without sacrificing weight."
Under Armour HOVR Infinite,,92.0,88.0,168.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 8.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Under Armour HOVR Infinite 2,"8 reasons to buy
The Under Armour HOVR Infinite is comfortable enough for everyday use, according to various customers.
The HOVR midsole provided great energy return, a couple of runners reported.
One reviewer said the shoe fit snugly without being too tight.
A few purchasers were impressed with the connectivity feature of the HOVR Infinite.
The shoe is also suitable for walking and for gym workouts, commented by some users.
Many wearers were pleased with the width options offered with the shoe.
A constant buyer wrote that the HOVR Infinite is one of the brand’s highest-quality shoes in terms of materials and construction.
Several users confirmed the smooth transition that the shoe provides.
3 reasons not to buy
The Bluetooth connection of the HOVR Infinite experiences glitches sometimes, a user said.
One runner claimed the shoe is not comfortable to be used for long-distance runs.
A couple of wearers observed that the shoe took a long time to be broken in.
Bottom line
The Under Armour HOVR Infinite was favorably accepted by the majority of its users. Positive reviews surround the shoe, mostly regarding its functionality and construction; there are minimal criticisms on a few of the shoe’s features. Many of the purchasers of the Under Armour HOVR Infinite were satisfied with the shoe and claimed that they would recommend it to other potential buyers. To them, Under Armour was successful in creating a running shoe that combines performance and technology."
Asics Gel Contend 5,,90.0,78.0,2422.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Contend 6,"6 reasons to buy
Those who have tried the Asics Gel Contend 5 generally welcomed the in-shoe feel, stating that it was pleasant to the foot.
People appreciated the price of this running shoe; they noted that it was agreeably affordable.
The underfoot cushioning given by this product was considered to be comfortable for all-day wear.
Consumers noted that the width profiles followed their expectations; they didn’t feel as though the in-shoe experience was too tight or too loose.
The weight of the Gel Contend 5 was considered to be light as it didn’t feel as though it weighed down the foot.
It is available in a wide fit option.
1 reasons not to buy
A few individuals claimed that the sizing scheme was smaller than what they were used to.
Bottom line
People loved the Asics Gel Contend 5. This running shoe gained fans for becoming highly comfortable and agreeable to wear. The width profiles were welcomed, as were the secure upper and the accommodating underfoot cushioning unit. On the other hand, a handful of consumers who didn’t sit well with the available sizes, claiming that they were smaller than the usual fare.
This product is for neutral pronators and those who desire a versatility that accommodates their active lifestyles. Urban adventurers who enjoy road running are also the ones that are most likely going to enjoy the Gel Contend 5."
Asics Gel Quantum 180 4,,91.0,,311.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.6oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Several users reported that the Asics Gel Quantum 180 4 fits perfectly to their feet.
The midsole provides utmost comfort even when worn for long periods of time, attested by many wearers.
A lot of buyers regarded the shoe’s stylishness positively. In addition, many said they like the colorways of the shoe.
The shoe is suitable not only for running but also for workouts, according to some customers.
There were a lot of positive comments about the lightness of the Gel Quantum 180 4.
3 reasons not to buy
A user mentioned that one shoe makes a rubbery sound, which they found bothersome.
Few customers found the Gel Quantum 180 4 to be expensive.
A couple of wearers found the collar to be too high; others complained they got blisters from this detail.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Quantum 180 4 has been welcomed by many runners, including those who have also worn the previous iterations of the series. While the majority of buyers felt satisfied with the shoe’s comfort level and functionality, others found themselves looking for improvement with the construction. Despite the negative feedback, the Gel Quantum 180 4 is still a recommendable shoe for many users."
Altra Kayenta,,89.0,96.0,75.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 5.9oz , Women: 4.9oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"10 reasons to buy
Some of the buyers commented that the Altra Kayenta has great cushioning.
According to one of the testers, the shoe feels better in the ankle and heel area when compared to other Altra models.
The footwear fits like a glove, based on some comments.
The majority of the reviewers said that the Kayenta has a lightweight structure.
A lot of consumers appreciated its springy ride.
The wide toe box of the shoe was loved by a significant number of purchasers.
According to many users, the shoe provides enough stability throughout the run.
The amount of traction delivered by the footwear is appreciated by several wearers.
Its responsiveness is excellent, noted by a lot of consumers.
The durability of the shoe is admired by many users.
1 reasons not to buy
One of the consumers noticed that debris and small stones are entering the shoe through the gap in between the sole and the mesh material.
Bottom line
A wide variety of buyers, professional and casual runners alike, are happy and contented with the overall structure of the Altra Kayenta. Aside from its construction, they admired its fit and cushioning. Overall, the Altra Kayenta has gained the approval of the majority because of its excellent performance, comfort, and responsiveness.  They love the stability, durability and the lightweight ride it provided."
Adidas Pureboost Go,,94.0,90.0,605.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Most people who tried the Adidas Pure Boost Go stated that it offered them great comfort.
The width profiles of both the men and women’s versions were lauded for being adherent to expectations.
Some consumers lauded the upper unit was praised for being able to stretch and accommodate wide feet.
The underfoot cushioning agreed with long distance running sessions, some runners noted.
Impact mitigation and heel steadiness were considered by many to be spot-on.
The quality of the materials was deemed to be top-notch.
People considered the price for a pair of the Adidas Pure Boost Go to be affordable.
2 reasons not to buy
According to several testers, the outline of the toes showed unappealingly against the knitted fabric; they also noted that it may potentially damage the material.
A few consumers reported that crisscrossing shoelaces tended to put some pressure on the instep.
Bottom line
Those who have tried the Adidas Pure Boost Go were happy with its performance. For them, this neutral running shoe provided a comfortable experience on the roads. The stretchy upper, the steady platform, and the price were subjects of positivity. On the other hand, there were those who didn’t like some traits of the upper, like the low forefoot profile and the irritating instep."
Brooks Ravenna 10,,94.0,88.0,2385.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.4oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Brooks Ravenna 11,"7 reasons to buy
Those who have tried the Brooks Ravenna 10 stated that the lightweight platform evoked a feeling of merely wearing a slipper.
The width profiles were appreciated because they welcomed the outline of the foot and provided a snug yet secure coverage.
Several reviewers have expressed their approval of the price tag; they felt that it was wallet-friendly.
The holistic stability configuration of the Ravenna 10’s midsole was welcomed by both overpronators and neutral pronators who deemed it unobtrusive.
The outsole unit’s traction capacity was lauded for being efficient on both dry and wet surfaces.
People felt that the materials used for this stability running shoe were dutifully durable.
Several shoe enthusiasts have expressed their appreciation of the Brooks Ravenna 10’s color schemes; they stated that the understated yet eye-catching mix of hues allowed them to welcome some stylish sensibilities to their running sessions.
2 reasons not to buy
Some testers stated that the GuideRails on the sides of the shoe were too stiff.
A couple of reviewers observed that the weight of the Ravenna 10 was a bit noticeable and that it slightly diminished their speed.
Bottom line
The Brooks Ravenna 10 was generally well-received by both neutral pronators and those who desired underfoot stability. The testers were also appreciative of the lightweight construction of this road running shoe, as well as the agreeable width options, affordable price, and general sturdiness. On the other hand, some consumers didn’t like that the holistic stability feature was a bit stiff or that the weight is noticeably hefty. But overall, the Ravenna 10 is still deliberated as a worthy addition to the long-running roster of stability footwear from Brooks."
Altra Escalante Racer 19,,99.0,93.0,78.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.8oz , Women: 5.7oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,, Altra Escalante 2.0,"6 reasons to buy
The lightweight construction of the Altra Escalante Racer 19 is praised by those who have tested it.
Most testers have expressed their appreciation for the breathable upper unit of this running shoe.
The flexibility of this product is welcomed by those who appreciate natural movement.
Runners who are into marathons and other long-distance running activities welcome this Altra running shoe because it is versatile and durable.
The grip of the outsole is lauded by testers who value surface adhesion and movement control.
The minimalist design works well with the contemporary color schemes, based on a couple of reviews.
2 reasons not to buy
Some consumers didn’t like the open structure of the mesh upper, stating that it awkwardly showed the foot that it covers.
The close-to-the-ground experience given by the Escalante Racer 19’s midsole is not popular among those who desire a bit more support during long-distance running sessions.
Bottom line
Overall, the Altra Escalante Racer 19 is received well by the runners who have purchased and worn it. This product is apparently a worthy product that utilizes its light and flexible structure as a catalyst for reliable performances, especially when tackling extended running activities like contests and speed training sessions. On the other hand, the negative points address the awkward-looking holes of the mesh upper, as well as the thinner-than-usual midsole.
Fans of minimalist running shoes designed for race-day are the target market of the Altra Escalante Racer 19.
 "
Asics Gel Nimbus 20,,87.0,82.0,3840.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 13mm,,, Asics Gel Nimbus 22,"9 reasons to buy
Many buyers commented that the shoe was comfortable.
A lot of testers admired its great-looking design.
Some purchasers mentioned that the shoe was true to size.
According to those who have tried it, the Asics Gel Nimbus 20 has a wide range color variation.
The majority of the consumers noted that the shoe provided excellent support on a variety of surfaces.
The Asics Gel Nimbus 20 was lightweight, according to many buyers.
The cushioning of the shoe was incredible, based on observations.
A handful of purchasers agreed that the fit was perfect.
Several runners loved its well-constructed upper.
4 reasons not to buy
Some of the users said that the toe box was narrow.
Several testers agreed that the Asics Gel Nimbus 20 has minimal arch support.
According to a lot of buyers, the shoe has a stiffer footbed when compared to the previous models.
One of the runners felt a little pain in the Achilles and calves’ area.
Bottom line
A lot of wearers commented that the Asics Gel Nimbus 20 was a comfortable running shoe. They were satisfied with its visually-appealing design and attractive color variations. They loved wearing the shoe on different paved surfaces. Although several of them said that it has a narrow toe box, others still recommended the shoe because of its perfect fit. Some were also disappointed with its stiff footbed. In general, the majority of the purchasers said that the Asics Gel Nimbus 20 was an excellent choice for those who want a stylish, well-constructed and supportive yet lightweight running shoe."
New Balance FuelCell Rebel,,81.0,92.0,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.3oz , Women: 6.2oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Many users find the New Balance FuelCell Rebel to be a lightweight running shoe. Some even say it feels as light as a sock.
The FuelCell midsole has impressed the majority of runners: a few have said it allows for smooth transitions, while others claim its responsiveness contributes to achieving their personal best time.
A lot of wearers are happy with the various width options of the FuelCell Rebel.
One reviewer mentioned that the shoe is comfortable on concrete surfaces.
Numerous buyers are impressed with the style of the shoe.
The New Balance FuelCell Rebel is excellent for long-distance runs and powerwalks, according to an athlete.
Some buyers like the soft and comfortable upper of the FuelCell Rebel.
5 reasons not to buy
A commenter wrote that the outsole has a “weird shape” that looks off.
Some wearers found the shoelaces to be too long.
There is not enough padding at the heel area, according to some runners.
The fit of the shoe is too tight around the toes, as stated by a few reviewers.
A user complained that the shoe constantly needs adjusting because of its inexact fit; therefore, not providing enough support.
Bottom line
The New Balance FuelCell Rebel is an “amazing” running shoe, as reported by numerous of its users and testers. The shoe has reliable features and technologies that make it ideal for everyday use, as well as a variety of distances. Although there are some issues with fit and structural elements, many still consider the FuelCell Rebel as their go-to running shoe and would recommend it to their peers."
Nike Revolution 5 FlyEase,,83.0,,8.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A lot of the purchasers praise the lightness of the Nike Revolution 5 FlyEase. 
According to several buyers, it is very versatile.  
Quite a few wearers find the road running shoe very comfortable.
Various reviewers laud the running platform for allowing easy foot entry. 
The running shoe has good support, reported some customers.
Multiple runners hail the neutral shoe for having high-quality materials.
It has a convenient closure system, observed some users.
3 reasons not to buy
The running shoe lacks cushioning, shared several commenters. 
It has a loose fit, remarked a few testers. 
For some, the shoe requires a long break-in period.
Bottom line
With engineering that is focused on offering convenience to the wearer, the Nike Revolution 5 FlyEase surely does not disappoint. Offering a minimalist design, the shoe is perfect for both running and casual activities. With a midsole foam rich in plushness, the road running shoe optimizes comfort."
Hoka One One Challenger 5 ATR,,95.0,89.0,70.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.4oz , Women: 7.7oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A few users mentioned that the Hoka One One Challenger 5 ATR is a lightweight trail running shoe.
Some runners admired the roomy toe box of the Challenger ATR 5; they said it gave their toes more freedom to move.
One user with plantar fasciitis expressed his satisfaction because the shoe helped with the pain.
A couple of wearers admired the shoe’s arch support; they said the arch support is as great as the previous version.
The Hoka One One Challenger ATR 5 fits well, said one review.
Several runners liked the shoe’s cushioning; it gave them a well-cushioned running experience.
According to a few reviews, feels good on concrete even if it is advertised as a trail running shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
Some users were unhappy with the Hoka One One Challenger 5 ATR because it feels too stiff.
One disappointed user mentioned that the tongue for the shoe causes discomfort.
One runner developed blisters after a few long runs.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Challenger 5 ATR gained positive reviews from various trail runners who were impressed with its lightweight design, great arch support, and roomy toe box. Many users also enjoyed the shoe’s not-so-firm cushioning. Although some have issues with the tongue, and for it being too stiff, the Challenger ATR 5 is a running shoe most buyers considered to be worth the purchase."
Adidas Response Trail,,92.0,87.0,131.0,,, Trail, Neutral,,,,,,,,"8 reasons to buy
The upper unit of the Adidas Response Trail was deemed by several testers to be snug and secure.
A handful of consumers liked the contemporary design of this product, emphasizing that the aesthetics permitted casual wear.
The price was considered by some to be affordable.
A couple of purchasers noted that the spacious toe box allowed the toes to spread naturally with every step.
The lightweight nature of this trail companion gained the favor of many consumers.
The cushioning system was lauded for being comfortable and responsive.
Most runners liked the traction-capability of the Response Trail’s outsole unit.
The waterline overlay staved off mud and mild splashes effectively, a user reported.
2 reasons not to buy
A purchaser claimed that the upper unit of the Response Trail was too stiff for natural movement.
A consumer complained that it lacked cushioning.
Bottom line
Neutral runners were mostly receptive of the Adidas Response Trail. They welcomed its inexpensive price, the lightweight components, and the trail-ready configuration of its various sections. On the other hand, there were separate complaints regarding a stiff upper, an inconsistent sizing scheme, and insufficient cushioning. Overall, this Adidas trail running shoe gained highly positive remarks from reviewers and users."
Hoka One One Stinson ATR 5,,84.0,83.0,84.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 12.1oz , Women: 9.9oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The outsole of the Hoka One One Stinson ATR 5 provides outstanding traction in muddy surfaces, according to a customer.
Several runners commended the shoe’s underfoot support.
The Stinson ATR 5 offers excellent cushioning, wrote many commenters.
Many users have praised the comfortable in-shoe feel delivered by the shoe.
A couple of buyers were pleased with how the shoe relieves their plantar fasciitis.
4 reasons not to buy
The toe box is too narrow, a couple of reviewers said.
The insole makes a squeaky sound that had to be remedied to make it less bothersome, a buyer mentioned.
One user complained about the stiff heel of the Stinson ATR 5.
The design of the shoe looks “dorky,” a buyer commented.
Bottom line
If one would compare it to the previous version, the Hoka One One Stinson ATR 5 seems to get a lower satisfaction rating among users. Although there were various positive reviews about the shoe’s functionality, there were just as much negative comments about its design and structure. Overall, the Stinson ATR 5 looks to be a good running shoe, but maybe just average at best."
Saucony Fastwitch 9,,90.0,89.0,30.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 6oz , Women: 5.1oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Many runners have noted that the Saucony Fastwitch 9 feels lightweight, thus ensuring a comfortable ride.
Some users were happy on how well the shoe's grip performed on road terrains while providing a smooth ride.
A number of wearers claimed the Fastwitch 9 to be a fast shoe, which is great for a running shoe that is aimed at high mileage runs.
Most users liked the shoe's responsiveness. They claimed its good responsiveness resulted in pure speed during their road runs.
The shoe's toe box was also praised as it is spacious enough to allow the feet to splay naturally during the runs.
A few testers mentioned how the shoe's tongue was comfortable, had an elastic sock-like fit, and securely stayed in place.
The shoe's outsole durability was also praised by most of its wearers, thanks to its PWRTRAC outsole material.
One reviewer thought the styling on the Fastwitch 9 was much improved than the Fastwitch 8.
3 reasons not to buy
A few of the Fastwitch 9 users mentioned that the fit of the toe-box is not tight and not wide enough.
According to a couple of wearers, the shoe's outsole was a bit complicated as it allowed water and debris to enter, which became an issue for several occasions.
Also mentioned by some users is that the Fastwitch 9 had too much cushioning for a racing shoe.
Bottom line
The new Fastwitch 9 with its lightweight SSL midsole and PWRTRAC outsole gives great cushion and traction that most runners admire. Majority of its wearers also liked the engineered mesh upper that provides a breathable fit that they found very comfortable.  Although not well received by runners who are flat footed and a few unfavorable reviews about the shoe's tight toe box, majority of runners still laced up, pushed the pace, and won races in their all-new Fastwitch 9."
Adidas Solar Glide ST,,92.0,83.0,565.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.2oz , Women: 9.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Adidas Solar Glide ST 19,"8 reasons to buy
The majority of the users of the Adidas Solar Glide ST described it as a comfortable shoe.
A great-looking running shoe, a couple of reviewers
The shoe fitted like a glove even at first use, said a wearer. Another stated that it didn’t need a break-in period.
The Solar Glide ST was surprisingly durable and hard-wearing, as told by a customer.
One buyer claimed the Solar Glide ST as Adidas’ most effective stability shoe.
Many runners were happy that the shoe was lightweight.
The shoe provided a fast and snappy ride, according to a reviewer.
One user appreciated the unique heel design, which stood out among all the other structural elements of the shoe.
1 reasons not to buy
One runner said they got a few blisters from wearing the shoe.
Bottom line
According to many runners, the Adidas Solar Glide ST is a highly recommendable running shoe, especially for overpronators who run on a regular basis. The shoe was very efficient and reliable, and it was able to deliver a solid performance no matter how long the distance. Many reviewers expressed their hope for the Solar Glide ST to stay in the market for an extended period of time."
Asics Gel Kenun,,88.0,86.0,279.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.2oz , Women: 9.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Kenun 2,"7 reasons to buy
Some testers commented that the Asics Gel Kenun delivered excellent foot support.
A handful of runners appreciated the amount of grip the shoe provided.
Many purchasers said that it was comfortable.
Several wearers agreed that the shoe performed well on both indoor and outdoor walking and running activities.
Most of the purchasers loved its incredible cushioning.
Several wearers commented that the Asics Gel Kenun was lightweight.
Many reviewers loved its underfoot feel.
2 reasons not to buy
Based on observations, the shoe has a narrow toe box.
A good number of consumers said that it was expensive.
Bottom line
Overall, the majority of the purchasers said that the Asics Gel Kenun is an excellent option for those who want a well-cushioned, supportive and comfortable running shoe. They appreciated its incredible grip and underfoot-feel. They loved wearing the shoe on walking and running activities. Although several of them said that it has a narrow toe box, others still recommended the Asics Gel Kenun because of its remarkable performance."
Salomon XA Pro 3D,,92.0,89.0,7209.0,,, Trail, Stability, Men: 14.5oz , Women: 12.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Salomon XA Pro 3D V8,"6 reasons to buy
It is an ideal shoe for all weather because of its cool, breathable, quick drying upper.
Its lightweight nature makes it ideal for trail running and hiking.
It has a dependable waterproof design that allows running on muddy or wet surfaces.
It is comfortable to wear on wild environment and on rocky grounds.
The lacing system is impressive with its innovative and convenient design.
The weight is trimmed down, but the quality and performance are powered up for better trail running experience as commented by many runners.
3 reasons not to buy
This shoe is expensive.
The heel part provided minimal shock absorption for testers.
The support in the ankle was lacking in this shoe, as commented by some runners.
Bottom line
The Salomon XA Pro 3D is a trail running shoe that’s built with some of the most impressive technologies. The features of the upper were really made dependable, and the mid-sole offers a very comfortable system to keep the foot protected and supported. Although it is an expensive shoe, its quality, value, performance, and design are worth the price."
Asics Gel Pulse 11,,94.0,,195.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.4oz , Women: 9.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Asics Gel Pulse 12,"6 reasons to buy
Several buyers say that the Asics Gel Pulse 11 is comfortable.
Some of the testers commented that the shoe is best for general recreational wear and long-distance running activities.
Various users love the snug fit of the Gel Pulse 11.
According to those who have tried it, the shoe is stylish. 
The majority of the wearers love the feel of the Gel cushioning while running.
The shoe is well-cushioned, based on some reviews.
1 reasons not to buy
A few numbers of users commented that the footwear has a narrow toe box.
Bottom line
Overall, the Asics Gel Pulse 11 definitely impressed the majority of the consumers. With its features and technologies, the shoe received positive comments about its comfort level, cushioning, and design. Aside from its design, the snug fit was also agreeable for most of the users. Although some have found toe box issues, a good number of them still lauded the visually-appealing style and excellent performance of the Asics Gel Pulse 11 on the roads."
Saucony Guide ISO 2,,92.0,87.0,456.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Most reviewers agreed that the Saucony Guide ISO 2 is a comfortable running shoe.
Many wearers attested that the shoe provides great in-shoe feel.
According to a few buyers, the Guide ISO 2 is very durable; it is made from top-notch materials.
A few runners mentioned that the shoe has a really good stability feature.
Some users admired the shoe ’s overall design and stylish construction.
The shoe has a reasonable price tag.
3 reasons not to buy
One user experienced blister while wearing the shoe.
A couple of runners felt that the shoe is a little too stiff to start.
A few noticed the shoe has a weird fit; the forefoot is too narrow and the heel is too wide.
Bottom line
The Saucony Guide ISO 2 has plush cushioning with a great amount of stability. Though it received many satisfactory reviews, others could not help but compare it in favor of its predecessor. Most of the users admired the shoe’s design, durability, and stability features, but others found faults in its fit. Overall, the Guide ISO 2 is a comfortable shoe, but it still needs some improvements to achieve a completely praiseworthy performance."
Skechers GOrun Ride 8 Hyper,,86.0,92.0,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.7oz , Women: 7.2oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The majority of the users remark that the Skechers GOrun Ride 8 Hyper is lightweight.
Some of the wearers commented that the shoe is comfortable.
A few reviewers noted that the running footwear is well-cushioned.
Several users loved its excellent traction.
A lot of runners commend the speed offered by the GOrun Ride 8 Hyper.
Based on a review, the running shoe's upper area is soft.
The price is reasonable for the quality it provides, a buyer noted.
2 reasons not to buy
One of the users notes that the shoe is not bouncy.
The forefoot area is a bit tight for some wearers.
Bottom line
In general, the Skechers GOrun Ride 8 Hyper has made the majority of the users satisfied and happy with its structure and performance. The shoe is considered to be light, bouncy, and protective, making it a good purchase for many. The excellent performance, quality, and lightweight structure of this running gear allow it for long, fast-paced activities."
Nike Zoom Gravity,,76.0,60.0,10.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The cushioning system of the Nike Zoom Gravity is appreciated because it can return energy to the foot and mitigate landing impact with ease.
Some users believe that this product has a price that is affordable.
The lightweight construction of this Nike offering is lauded by most of those who have tested it.
The design and color schemes are welcomed because they apparently allow versatile use.
Based on a handful of reviews, the surface traction given by the rubber outsole is dependable.
2 reasons not to buy
Some people have complained that the fabric near the forefoot section of the upper unit is quick to rip open.
The toe box is a bit restrictive, according to a lot of purchasers; apparently, the toes keep rubbing against each other and the inner sleeve.
Bottom line
Those who desire speedy and confident performances on the roads can look towards the Zoom Gravity from Nike’s Running line for the exact support that they need. The overall design of this product is meant to accommodate natural motion. It is lightweight, flexible, and its platform is responsive. Even the outsole has been given attention as its rubber is essential for confident steps and management of speed."
Saucony Triumph ISO 5,,94.0,87.0,289.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.4oz , Women: 10oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Several runners admired the breathable coverage of the Saucony Triumph ISO 5.
A few mentioned that the shoe offers the right amount of support they needed while running.
Some users expressed satisfaction over the shoe’s soft and responsive cushioning; they said they run without sacrificing too much energy.
Many wearers lauded the shoe’s comfortable fit.
The Triumph ISO 5 has a roomy toe box and a few runners were happy with it.
A couple of purchasers are pleased with the premium build of the shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
Narrow-footer runners found the forefoot to be too wide for their measurement.
The traction of the outsole is lacking on wet surfaces, some users complained.
Bottom line
Designed for long-distance runs, the Saucony Triumph ISO 5 offers a good balance of cushioning, comfort, fit, and performance. The shoe has gathered mixed reviews from its users. Others find the shoe satisfying because of its responsive cushioning, while a few are disappointed because of the limited traction it offers. Despite the mixed feedback, the majority still thinks that the Triumph ISO 5 delivered a significant improvement over the 4th version."
Saucony Guide 13,,92.0,91.0,21.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 9.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The cushioning system that is present in the Saucony Guide 13 is lauded by most consumers.
The upper unit of this product is praised for adequately securing the foot and staving off in-shoe quivering.
Some consumers have noted that the build-quality of this running shoe is superb and reliable.
Several people proclaim the versatile nature of this product, stating that they can use it for running and daily walks in the urban environment.
The midfoot portion of the platform feels highly supportive of the arch, according to some purchasers.
Breathability is a trait that is quickly appreciated by those who have tested this shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
A few testers have noted that the underfoot experience is a bit bulky and unwieldy thanks to the midsole unit’s helping of technologies.
A stiffness is felt in the midsole, and it’s jarring to the natural flexibility of the foot, based on a couple of reviews.
Bottom line
The overall feedback of people towards the Saucony Guide 13 has been largely positive. The optimistic reaction is indicative of the solid design philosophy that has governed the creation of this long-running line of stability shoes. The upper unit’s breathability and the supportiveness of the midsole unit are highlighted. Runners are guaranteed superb cushioning and fluid guidance throughout the gait cycle.
The target market of the Saucony Guide 13 is the fans of road running shoes that combat overpronation."
Under Armour HOVR Sonic 3,,90.0,91.0,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
A lot of runners appreciated the Under Armour HOVR Sonic 3’s overall quality. 
This running shoe is comfortable to wear, based on reviews. 
Several users mentioned that this shoe is highly durable. 
One commenter noted that it is suitable for both hot and cold conditions. 
The shoe offers just the right amount of support, some buyers claimed. 
The shoe’s performance tracking feature was praised by a lot of satisfied wearers. 
A few purchasers appreciated this shoe’s lightweight structure. 
This running partner is flexible, according to some reviewers.
4 reasons not to buy
Some runners felt that the Under Armour HOVR Sonic 3 is a bit tight. 
One user noted that the sweat stains are visible on the upper. 
It is a bit expensive compared to other running shoes, according to a buyer.
A couple of testers experience tracking issues with the MapMyRun app. 
Bottom line
The Under Armour HOVR Sonic 3 is packed with advanced technologies helping the user become a better runner. It is designed to provide a light and well-protected ride, making the platform perfect for long-distance runs. This neutral running shoe is suitable for runners who are looking for cushioning, flexibility, and versatility. 
 "
Adidas Supernova,,90.0,86.0,658.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.5oz , Women: 9.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Most customers appreciated the cushioning of Adidas Supernova, stating that it was responsive.
Purchasers found its lightweight nature very agreeable for their feet.
Many of the testers found these shoes to be extremely comfortable during their running sessions.
Users found the shoe to be true to size and performed well in long runs.
A user welcomed its durable build and recommended it for everyday use.
A user appreciated the webbed design on the outsole, which provided traction and encouraged flexibility.
Most customers seemed content with the overall appearance of the shoe.
The many available color schemes appealed to those who wanted to try it.
4 reasons not to buy
A user complained that the shoe was slightly slippery at Achilles area; he also felt pain under his heel.
A customer found the mid-sole uncomfortable compared to other shoes he had tried.
A few disliked its apparently narrow upper coverage.
Some complained that the shoe was heavy.
Bottom line
Adidas Supernova is a comfortable neutral running shoe with enhanced cushioning and traction system. It is a moderately weighted shoe which holds one’s feet firmly and remains true to size. The technologies incorporated in the model reduce the impact on the ground, re-energize feet and keep them cool and dry. It has a nice appearance overall and is available in different colors."
Adidas Rockadia Trail,,92.0,93.0,6014.0,,, Trail, Neutral,,,,,,, Adidas Rockadia Trail 3,"9 reasons to buy
Many runners agreed that the price of the Adidas Rockadia Trail was affordable.
The outsole unit of this running shoe was appreciated by many trail adventurers; they wrote that its grip capability was reliable.
Several consumers were able to use this shoe on flat surfaces; they wrote that it was still efficient and agreeable for their feet.
The visual aesthetics of this shoe were welcomed by a lot of testers; many of them received compliments while wearing it.
A lot of runners considered this shoe to be a comfortable one.
A number of purchasers wrote that the Adidas Rockadia Trail was durable and long-lasting.
According to a tester, wearing and using this shoe didn’t cause any discomfort in the foot.
Scores of runners were very comfortable in this shoe.
Based on the comments of a small number of reviewers, the shoe is of very high quality.
3 reasons not to buy
Numerous reviewers have observed a squeaking sound, which bothers them.
It felt a bit narrow, as noted by more than a handful of consumers.
There are no optional widths.
Bottom line
The Adidas Rockadia Trail was welcomed by many runners because they liked its price, its design and its overall functionality. Even though it’s for trails, a number of consumers were also able to use this on the roads and it worked well for them. Although it was a bit narrow for some, this neutral running shoe was still able to gain generally positive remarks."
Adidas Runfalcon,,90.0,,3608.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"4 reasons to buy
A few admired the good looking design and color options of the Adidas Runfalcon.
Some users lauded the shoe’s high-quality materials.
According to some comments, the shoe is very lightweight.
The Adidas Runfalcon is very affordable.
2 reasons not to buy
The shoe is not as comfortable as expected, noted in some user reviews.
The Runfalcon looks bulky, said a few runners.
Bottom line
As a new Adidas running shoe, the Runfalcon has not yet achieved total success. The shoe gathered mixed feedback from users. Some runners admired the shoe’s design, high-quality materials, and affordable price. Negative comments also surround the shoe’s hard cushioning and overall performance. With the negative comments, there is still room for improvement for this shoe."
Brooks Transcend 6,,94.0,89.0,2355.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.4oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Brooks Transcend 7,"6 reasons to buy
Many consumers felt that the cushioning system of the Brooks Transcend 6 was comfortable and highly responsive.
The stability mechanisms received high praise from overpronators who desired responsible and agreeable support during their runs.
According to several runners, the toe box was spacious enough to welcome the natural splaying of the toes.
Most testers agreed that the Transcend 6 was relatively lightweight, considering that it’s a stability running shoe.
This product didn’t make the foot look awkwardly big, based on a handful of reviews.
The color schemes were welcomed; people stated that they were vibrant and eye-catching.
2 reasons not to buy
Some people felt the weight of this running shoe, stating that the somehow felt it drag the foot down, but not by much.
A few purchasers were not happy with the inner sleeve of the upper unit, stating that it trapped warmth and prevented cool air from circulating.
Bottom line
The overall response towards the Brooks Transcend 6 was positive. A lot of people really liked this stability running shoe. They stated that the underfoot experience was luxurious and supportive. Their pronation problems were apparently addressed quickly and efficiently. Moreover, a bevy of testers was happy with the looks, as well as the in-shoe experience. Inversely, several groups of runners were unhappy with the stifling upper unit while others lamented the subpar breathability of the material."
Zoot Del Mar,,89.0,80.0,98.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11oz , Women: 10oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The open mesh and internal liner fabric make up the upper of the Zoot Del Mar, providing maximum comfort and superb fit.
Some runners applauded the no-sew construction of this shoe for added support and minimizes blisters.
Most reviews took note of the generous cushioning of the shoe.
The Proprietary Zoot EVA for absorbing shock performs well as mentioned by most reviews.
Majority of the runners experienced a lightweight feel with solid rebound.
The overall construction and design of the Zoot Del Mar gained positive feedback from most runners.
4 reasons not to buy
The Del Mar is slightly expensive.
Limited color variations.
Some observed that the shoe is too narrow for them.
This shoe is slightly heavy.
Bottom line
The Zoot Del Mar is a neutral training shoe that offers superb cushioning and comfort. It gained positive response from runners because of its performance, construction and durability. The no-sew design is a great plus for this shoe. Though it also received negative comments, it is still safe to say that the shoe is a very reliable road partner."
Nike Flex Experience RN 9,,85.0,,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 7.4oz,,,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The Nike Flex Experience RN 9 has a design that is appealing to the eyes, according to several consumers.
Several consumers are happy with the lightweight nature of this road running shoe.
The midsole unit is said to provide responsive performances.
Users are particularly positive about the flexibility of the platform as it allows for natural transitions.
Breathability is a trait that people seem to appreciate from this product.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people believe that the heel part of the in-shoe experience is a bit restrictive.
Traction is flimsy with this shoe’s non-rubber outsole, according to several purchasers.
Bottom line
People are mostly positive with the Nike Flex Experience RN 9. This product is deemed suitably lightweight and ready to perform feats of speed and efficient running. Natural gait progression is apparently the name of the game of this model. With the shoe's supportive platform, running can be secure and comfortable at the same time.
Fans of road-ready running footwear can enjoy the Flex Experience RN 9."
Salomon Sense Ride 2,,93.0,91.0,82.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Salomon Sense Ride 3,"6 reasons to buy
People who have tested the Salomon Sense Ride 2 felt that it remained comfortable, even after miles of running.
The grip capacity was considered by many to be versatile enough to handle for hard and soft ground.
The cushioning system was appreciated for being full-bodied and long-lasting.
Most consumers stated that the width profile followed their usual expectations.
The toe box was spacious enough to accommodate the natural splaying capacity of the toes, several runners commented.
The shoe is breathable.
1 reasons not to buy
A couple of testers reported that the inner sleeve rubbed uncomfortably against the skin during the initial runs.
Bottom line
Feedback for the Salomon Sense Ride 2 was positive. People were generally happy with what this product had to offer. The longevity of its materials and its capacity to remain agreeable after many miles became the highlights of consumers’ experiences. The accommodating forefoot design and the reactive midsole were also hailed. On the other hand, a couple was unhappy with the initially irritating inner wall of the upper unit.
The Salomon Sense Ride 2 is designed for neutral pronators who enjoy adventuring on the trails. It is also made to welcome novice and expert runners alike."
Nike Pegasus Trail 2,,88.0,83.0,5.0,,," Road, Trail", Neutral, Men: 11.7oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Comfort: The majority of users testify that the Nike Pegasus Trail 2 is comfortable. 
Grip: This shoe offers excellent traction on both wet and dry surfaces, based on many reviews. 
Toe box: Multiple commenters appreciate the shoe’s roomy toe box. 
Cushioning: The React foam has pleased a lot of runners with its softness and responsiveness. 
Versatility: Several wearers confirm that it is suitable for both road and trail runs.
2 reasons not to buy
Weight: Some consumers dislike that the Pegasus Trail 2 is a bit heavier than the other Nike running shoes. 
Stack height: A couple of testers have felt disconnected from the ground due to the thick sole of the shoe.
Bottom line
Built with plenty of cushioning and a durable outsole, the Nike Pegasus Trail 2 is designed to deliver a smooth transition from the road to the trail. It is ideal for runners seeking a comfortable and versatile trail running footwear. This neutral running shoe works best for runners with normal gait or those who do not overpronate."
Saucony Freedom ISO 2,,93.0,85.0,144.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.1oz , Women: 8.2oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
The upper felt much more durable compared to the previous version, a reviewer wrote.
One user stated that the updated midsole of the Saucony Freedom ISO 2 helped keep the foot centered.
The shoe did not cause hot spots even with extended periods of wear, a runner noticed.
Many buyers commented that the shoe was lightweight.
The upper was very breathable, according to several wearers.
A lot of customers liked the design of the Freedom ISO 2.
There was adequate traction from the outsole, a number of runners remarked.
The shoe was extra supportive at the ankle area, said a reviewer.
The EVERUN™ midsole was responsive and springy as expected, one runner stated.
3 reasons not to buy
The Freedom ISO 2 ran large in sizing, claimed a couple of wearers.
The ride was not as stable as with the original version, a user expressed.
One commenter noted that the shoe was not as affordable as its predecessor.
Bottom line
According to many users, the Saucony Freedom ISO 2 was a well-crafted running shoe that offered an exceptional performance in a great-quality package. A lot of Saucony loyalists were pleased with the improvements made to the shoe. Overall, the majority stated the Freedom ISO 2 made their runs better, and that they genuinely enjoyed wearing the shoe."
The North Face Ultra 109 GTX,,93.0,91.0,843.0,,, Trail, Stability,,,,,,,,"7 reasons to buy
According to the majority, the North Face Ultra 109 GTX is a pair of highly comfortable shoes.
Several runners mentioned that the shoe provided the needed level of protection underfoot to run over rocks and similar risky terrains.
Many users lauded the enhanced breathability of the shoe which kept both the user’s feet and the shoe dry throughout the running sessions.
Some users were of the opinion that the footwear had a rugged build.
A few customers appreciated the traction of the footwear over tricky slopes and rocky trails.
A number of users agreed that the shoe runs true-to-size.
The Ultra 109 GTX is an affordable waterproof running shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
Many customers had issues with the durability of the shoe’s upper; apparently, it started to tear at different places after only a few miles of running.
For a runner, the outsole started to wear off after only a few days of use.
One of the users commented that the right shoe behaved very poorly as compared to the left one in terms of waterproofing; the fabric allowed water to seep through.
Bottom line
The North Face Ultra 109 GTX offers a great blend of toughness and flexibility. This stability trail running shoe performs very well on wet or tricky surfaces and keeps the user’s interest engaged in running owing to its excellent all-around features. For its future versions, however, it is recommended that the shoe does a bit more work on its design in terms of the long-term durability."
Adidas Pureboost DPR,,93.0,85.0,3657.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The Adidas Pure Boost DPR was so comfortable that it almost felt like slippers, a reviewer mused.
One user felt the shoe was versatile enough to be used for gym workouts.
Various wearers thought the shoe delivered sufficient arch support.
The shoe was very useful for interval and up-tempo runs, several athletes thought.
A buyer commented that the toe box was roomy yet secure.
The hardened outsole of the Pure Boost DPR provided excellent protection from road imperfections, wrote a reviewer.
The Pure Boost DPR has improved many of the flaws of the original Pure Boost running shoe, according to a satisfied runner.
5 reasons not to buy
The midsole did not seem to be as plush as other shoes with the boost™ midsole, a user observed.
The unusually thin tongue was flimsy and bothersome, according to a wearer.
Another reviewer criticized the tongue for being too long that is pushed sideways and is folded over during running.
A couple of consumers thought the shoe was expensive.
Some runners felt that the external heel counter required a break-in period before being a comfortable part of the shoe.
Bottom line
Although the Adidas Pure Boost DPR was successful in delivering a comfortable ride and a smooth performance, it still received negative feedback from consumers. Some runners thought it was an average running shoe that had nothing new nor unique to offer; others were unhappy with the shoe’s construction and had cited other Adidas models to be better runners."
Asics HyperGel Kenzen, Asics,90.0,85.0,123.0,,, Road, Neutral,,, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Mar 2018,,,"7 reasons to buy
The upper sock-like feel of the shoe was excellent, according to some purchasers.
A handful of runners noted that the footwear was flexible.
A significant number of users observed that the shoe was comfortable.
The majority of the buyers loved its no-lace feature.
According to some wearers, the Asics HyperGel Kenzen was supportive.
Several testers loved its fantastic cushioning.
The weight profile of this product was deemed to be suitably light.
3 reasons not to buy
One of the testers said that the shoe should have other color options to choose from.
Some users commented that it was difficult to get the shoe on.
Some people felt that the uneven color designs of the midsole unit evoked an unpleasing stain-like look.
Bottom line
The Asics HyperGel Kenzen was lauded enough by the majority of the consumers who have tried it. A lot of them admired the comfort, and the sock-like feel it provided. Aside from its amazing construction, wearers gave recognition to the shoes’ arch support. Although some of the users have issues with the fit and visual aspects, others still recommend the footwear because of its performance. Generally, the Asics HyperGel Kenzen has made a lot of consumers happy and contented because of its excellent construction, flexibility and cushioning."
New Balance Fresh Foam Hierro v5,,82.0,77.0,9.0,,, Trail, Neutral,,, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A lot of satisfied users mentioned that this shoe is comfortable. 
It offers a stable ride, according to a couple of runners. 
Many buyers praised the shoe’s excellent cushioning system. 
Several consumers noted that it offers a good grip. 
A few wearers appreciated the outsole’s durability. 
The shoe’s stylish design is also perfect for casual walks, users claimed. 
Some people love the quality of the materials used in the shoe. 
3 reasons not to buy
The toebox is a bit tight, and the upper rubs against the foot, some users mentioned. 
A couple of buyers commented that the shoelaces are not durable. 
Many purchasers complained that the Fresh Foam Hierro v5 is heavy. 
Bottom line
The New Balance Fresh Foam Hierro v5 is a stylish trail running shoe that is designed for runners with neutral gaits. It features state-of-the-art technologies and materials that aim to provide protection and help enhance the running efficiency. This New Balance trail running shoe offers long-lasting comfort even on the toughest terrain. "
, Skechers,,92.0,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 6.6oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Skechers GOrun Pure 2,
Hoka One One Gaviota 2,,88.0,87.0,117.0,,, Road, Motion control, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
One runner mentioned that he was able to run in the Hoka One One Gaviota 2 without experiencing any pain. He also felt that his recovery time might lessen because of the shoe's stability features and cushioning.
Some testers mentioned how great the shoe felt. Unlike other shoes, it did not aggravate their knee and foot issues.
A lot of reviewers appreciated the level of comfort delivered.
According to one user, the shoe felt stable during her runs.
One female user was happy about how the wide version fit her foot.
3 reasons not to buy
One male user mentioned that the midfoot section was as tight as the one on the first version. Even though he loosened the laces, the area under the tongue still felt constricted.
Some female reviewers weren't happy that there were not enough colorways for the wide version of the Hoka One One Gaviota 2.
Almost all female testers commented negatively on the color selection available. It would have been better if there were more vibrant options, they said.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Gaviota 2 is a road shoe designed to handle the needs of runners who overpronate. Plenty of users found it to be comfortable and supportive. It did not cause them any pain nor did it aggravate underlying problems. There were users, however, who weren't pleased with the colorways the shoe came in. Nevertheless, the second version of the Hoka One One's Gaviota still proved to be a supportive shoe that allows runners to go the distance."
Adidas Solar Boost ST 19,,78.0,80.0,19.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11oz , Women: 10oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Based on a handful of reviews, the upper unit of the Adidas Solar Boost ST 19 is capable of delivering a secure yet flexible foot-wrap.
The stability mechanisms of this road running shoe are welcomed because they are said to maintain a neutral stance when standing and taking each step.
Most testers have claimed that the primary cushioning unit used in the midsole is efficient at doling out reactive performances on the asphalt.
The midsole unit has a sturdiness that can handle heavy body weights, according to several consumers.
Some reviews emphasize a feeling of enjoying a natural step with the form-fitting and movement-accommodating design.
A couple of runners are happy with the versatile construction of this stability running shoe, stating that they are able to use it in the gym or for casual walks.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people have expressed their disappointment with the tailored fit-enhancing layers on the upper, stating that they look unappealing and have a tendency to wear off quickly.
The heel part is deemed a bit too soft for comfort and true lockdown, according to some runners.
Bottom line
Form-fitting comfort and a stable ride are the highlighted elements that apparently make the Solar Boost ST 19 an agreeable product for daily runs. People generally welcome this update, stating that they are happy with the overall design and functionality. The versatile aesthetics are also deemed accommodating. On the other hand, the in-shoe lockdown is criticized for being a bit flimsy.
Those with unusual inward rolling of the foot during the gait progression (overpronation) are the target market of the Adidas Solar Boost ST 19."
Mizuno Wave Sky WaveKnit 3,,88.0,90.0,112.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 9.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
The comfort level of the Mizuno Sky Waveknit 3 has received various levels of praise. Some say wearing the shoe feels like walking on clouds, while others report it is the most comfortable shoe they have ever worn. 
The XPOP midsole of the Sky Waveknit 3 is responsive, bouncy, and it performs just as well as it claims, according to some reviewers.
The shoe has a soft platform that helps ease the impact of running on hard surfaces, a user states.
Several wearers agree that the shoe offers excellent arch support.
A couple of users think the upper is breathable while still providing a secure fit.
Many buyers are impressed with the stylish appearance of the Sky Waveknit 3.
The lightweight quality of the shoe makes it ideal for hot, summertime runs, according to one commenter.
The shoe is flexible enough to be worn right out of the box, a few wearers have suggested.
1 reasons not to buy
The Mizuno Waveknit 3 is an expensive running shoe, as observed by some purchasers.
Bottom line
The Mizuno Sky Waveknit 3 has received many positive feedback from runners, including the shoe’s comfortability, supportive structure, and reliable features. Some, on the other hand, have disliked that the shoe is high-priced. Despite this, many users still consider the Sky Waveknit 3 as recommendable as it is “worth every penny,” and that, because of it, they would buy more Mizuno running shoes in the future."
Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 34,,92.0,89.0,688.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 37,"10 reasons to buy
A majority of the users commented that the Pegasus 34 is extremely comfortable.
A lot of buyers have observed that the shoe is lightweight yet durable.
Some mentioned that the shoe is good to go right out of the box, and that did not require breaking in.
The Pegasus 34’s responsive nature was also commended by many of its testers.
With numerous color choices, many users found the Pegasus 34 to be stylish.
There were several opinions on how the shoe fits: a lot of users mentioned it is true to size, and others were impressed with the more focused fit and the support it provides.
The shoe gives a smooth ride and it feels fast, according to some.
One user said the Pegasus 34 reduced their knee and calf discomforts.
Even more breathable than the previous version, as noticed by numerous runners.
The shoe allows for great foot control with its awesome traction, based on the observation of one user.
4 reasons not to buy
Some runners mentioned that the Pegasus 34 has irregular padding and puts uneven pressure on their foot.
More than a handful of users commented that the laces were difficult to adjust, and another said they caused some discomfort on the top of his foot.
A couple of users said that the Pegasus 34 had poor durability and that it had the tendency to break apart quickly.
There were some buyers who were not impressed by the cushioning of the Pegasus 34.
Bottom line
On its 34th iteration, the Nike Air Zoom Pegasus has kept most of the features of the previous version, only updating the features of the upper. Like its predecessors, the Pegasus 34 has a level of durability and comfort that provides an incredible support and allows great foot control. This version still employs the signature cushioning of the Pegasus line, which is great for road-running. With most users commending its improved flexibility and breathability, the Pegasus 34 is designed to impress neutral runners undertaking tough roads."
On Cloudace,,87.0,88.0,107.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.8oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 7mm , Women: 7mm,,,,"10 reasons to buy
A good number of buyers commented that the shoe was supportive.
It was comfortable, according to several runners.
The On Cloudace is best for road and trail running activities because of its excellent traction, based on some reviews.
A significant number of wearers noted that the footwear was lightweight.
A lot of consumers noted that the footwear was well-cushioned.
A bouncier ride was experienced by many runners.
A handful of wearers lauded the shoe's durability.
According to those who have tried it, it is a good-looking shoe because of its earthy color schemes.
Based on reviews, the On Cloudace was flexible.
The excellent traction provided by the outsole was appreciated by a lot of runners.
2 reasons not to buy
Some consumers felt hot during the running activity. They said that the shoe was not breathable.
According to one of the users, the cloud pods in the back area of the On Cloudace were firmer when compared to previous models.
Bottom line
The overall response for the On Cloudace has been very positive. Users loved its durability, color tones, and lightweight structure. The casual shoe-enthusiasts were also satisfied and happy about its great-looking design and performance on different surfaces. Although several of them have issues with breathability and the firm cloud pods, others still recommend the On Cloudace for those who are looking for a shoe with the right blend of comfort, flexibility, stability, support, and quality."
Saucony Kinvara 11,,87.0,91.0,9.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.2oz , Women: 7.1oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
The majority of the buyers agreed that the Saucony Kinvara 11 is comfortable.
A lot of users commented that the running shoe is lightweight.
Most of the testers said that the Kinvara 11 has a perfect fit.
The shoe is responsive, based on the reviews.
According to those who have tried it, the running footwear is stable.
It is well-cushioned, as noted by many reviewers.
Its flexibility is admired by several users.
Many testers mentioned that the shoe has excellent quality.
3 reasons not to buy
One of the users complained that the tongue unit is a bit thick.
A wearer mentioned that the eyelet has a thick leather reinforcement design that makes it too bulky.
According to a consumer, it feels tight in the toe area.
Bottom line
The majority of the users are mostly amazed and contented with what the Saucony Kinvara 11 has to offer. This running footwear is said to be successful in delivering an efficient and responsive ride to its users. The outsole, midsole, and upper construction of the shoe are excellent. People feel confident wearing the Kinvara 11 because of the fantastic and amazing combination of features and technologies integrated into the shoe. Highlighted is the guarantee of improved performance and enjoyable ride by the users.
 "
Nike Free RN 5.0,,91.0,86.0,459.0,,, Road, Neutral,,, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm, Mar 2019,,,"6 reasons to buy
Several consumers felt that the cushioning system was suitably agreeable for short running sessions and urban walks.
The cleatie design of the upper unit allowed the foot to enter the interior chamber with ease, according to a handful of testers.
Some people noted that the Nike Free RN 5.0 was a solid choice for those who are just starting to get the hang of running.
A majority of purchasers reported that the sizing scheme and width profiles followed their expectations.
The flexibility was welcomed by those who liked to encourage the natural movement of their feet.
The upper unit stretched and acclimated itself to the inherent swelling and bending capacity of the foot as it moved, based on a few reviews.
3 reasons not to buy
Several reviewers warned that the Free RN 5.0 was not a reliable shoe for long-distance racing as it didn’t have a supportive midsole construction.
A couple of runners claimed that the fit was a bit tight; they recommended sizing up to achieve a relaxed in-shoe feel.
The laces were a tad short, according to a handful of consumers.
Bottom line
Neutral pronators and road running fans are the target market of the Nike Free RN 5.0. The shoe was able to receive mostly positive feedback from Nike running shoe enthusiasts and those who like to take to the roads. The cushioning system was highlighted as the element that turned their heel-to-toe transitions into enabled actions. The form-fitting upper was also praised. On the other hand, the sizing scheme received mixed responses because while some people felt that it trailed expectations, others deemed a tightness that required sizing up."
New Balance Fresh Foam Lazr v2 HypoKnit, New Balance,90.0,,323.0,$90,$70 (save 99%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9.1oz , Women: 7.1oz,,,," Normal, Wide | Normal, Wide",,"7 reasons to buy
Most of the testers commented that the New Balance Fresh Foam Lazr v2 HypoKnit is true to size.
The majority of the users said that the shoe is comfortable.
It fits perfectly according to those who have bought it.
The Fresh Foam Lazr v2 HypoKnit is a good-looking shoe, based on some reviews.
The footwear is also good for walking, gym activities, and casual wear to run errands.
It  , noted by consumers.
Many purchasers admired the wide toe box of the shoe.
1 reasons not to buy
Most of the buyers commented that the New Balance Fresh Foam Lazr v2 HypoKnit has a narrow opening. 
Bottom line
The New Balance Fresh Foam Lazr v2 HypoKnit was admired and appreciated by those who have bought this. Overall, the functionality of the materials used in crafting the shoe received a lot of praise as it performed really well on paved surfaces. The design, responsiveness, and comfort level were also admired as it added to the efficiency of the runner. Despite the issue on the narrow opening of the shoe, others still recommend the New Balance Fresh Foam Lazr v2 HypoKnit because of its excellent quality, performance, and functionality."
Merrell Bare Access XTR,,82.0,80.0,8.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.5oz , Women: 6.7oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Some users applaud the Merrell Bare Access XTR’s lightweight structure.
The majority of the buyers have positive reactions to the traction it offers. 
One of the most popular comments from consumers is the comfort that Merrell Bare Access XTR provides.
A lot of consumers appreciate its flexibility when it comes to interchanging usage from walking, running on pavements and complex trails. 
Some runners gave good reviews about its minimalistic design while still having sufficient cushion. 
Many users compliment the great ground connection they feel when they run using Merrell Bare Access XTR.
3 reasons not to buy
A good number of runners criticize the level of durability of the upper mesh.  
One user commented that the shoe felt somewhat tight in the width and toe box.
A couple of wearers have observed the rubber of the outsole to wear out quickly.
Bottom line
Overall, the Merrell Bare Access XTR is accepted by the majority of the users to be a fantastic pair of shoes. The footwear is loved by many because of its traction and impeccable ground connection that makes it easy to run on trails. Although others have issues with its width, durability, and toe box, others still lauded its minimalistic design. Without sacrificing the cushioning requirement, the shoe provides the foot with comfort and protection during the activity. Its breathable upper mesh was also loved by many buyers. It offers excellent ventilation that is beneficial to the foot during the running session."
Saucony Echelon 7,,94.0,92.0,132.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.5oz , Women: 11.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
A couple of runners appreciated the comfortable fit of the Saucony Echelon 7.
Many users expressed happiness over the shoe’s large toe-box; they said it offers enough room for toe splay.
The shoe offers the right amount of support, a reviewer said.
Several users mentioned that the Echelon 7 is very comfortable.
The Saucony Echelon 7 has good-looking colors, said a few buyers.
It requires no break-in period, according to one user.
2 reasons not to buy
Some users remark that the shoe lacks flexibility.
The shoe has a heavy construction.
Bottom line
The positive reviews of the Saucony Echelon 7 have significantly outnumbered the negative ones. Several users have shared their pleasant experience in terms of the shoe’s design, comfort and large toe-box. A few runners have encountered issues with the shoe's flexibility and weight, but overall, this Orthotic-friendly running shoe has proven to be a successful release."
Mizuno Wave Creation 20,,93.0,,316.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 14oz , Women: 11oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Mizuno Wave Creation 21,"6 reasons to buy
Some of those who have tried the Mizuno Wave Creation 20 stated that the cushioning system was generous enough to protect against underfoot issues like plantar fasciitis.
The inner sleeve of this running shoe was considered to be agreeable to the skin of the foot.
A few people noted that a break-in period was no longer needed when it comes to this product; they immediately felt comfortable from the first run.
All-day running sessions remained pleasant with this road companion, according to a handful of consumers.
A couple of runners welcomed the color schemes, stating that they made the façade more appealing to the eyes.
The outsole unit’s traction capacity was lauded as it kept the foot steady on the surfaces.
2 reasons not to buy
A few runners noted that the toe area was a bit tight.
Several users mentioned that the outsole wears down quickly.
Bottom line
People were generally appreciative of the Mizuno Wave Creation 20. They were happy with what it had to offer. The cushioning system was highlighted for being highly supportive and pleasant from the start. The in-shoe experience was also welcomed as it gave comfort throughout the day. A few people complained about the fit and durability, but that’s what apparently covers the unsavory side of this otherwise stellar addition to the Mizuno running shoe family."
New Balance 990 v5,,95.0,93.0,406.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 13.7oz , Women: 11.3oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
One user described the New Balance 990 v5 as a shoe with a “combination of cushioning and support.”
Some noted the flexible unit of the 990 v5.
Many wearers commented about the comfortability of the shoe. Others said it was more comfortable than its predecessor, while some likened wearing the shoe to “walking on a cloud.” 
Several runners had a pleasant experience with wearing the shoe all day.
The New Balance 990 v5 was also suitable for treadmill running and elliptical workouts, according to a couple of athletes.
The shoe gave a snug fit that was not too tight, said a reviewer.
A number of wearers found the 990 v5 to fit true to size.
4 reasons not to buy
A couple of buyers experienced the insole to flatten out quickly.
The 990 v5 was heavier compared to its predecessor, according to some wearers.
There were several who had issues with the tongue: some said it was too thick and long; another mentioned the stitching of the tongue rubbed uncomfortable against the foot.
The upper’s construction was criticized by a couple of users: one commented that it was easily punctured by their big toe, while another relayed that the part that covers the instep was cutting at their skin.
Bottom line
The New Balance 990 series has retained its cult following status with the overall positive reception of the 990 v5. The shoe was praised for the comfort it provided, as well as its fit and display of versatility. However, many runners had less than satisfying experiences when it came to the shoe’s durability and weight. Despite these criticisms, the New Balance 990 v5 was still a successful release as users have recognized its improvements from the previous version and expressed their desire to repurchase the shoe in the future."
Nike Air Zoom Winflo 5,,90.0,83.0,1330.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Nike Air Zoom Winflo 7,"8 reasons to buy
The underfoot cushioning unit of the Nike Air Zoom Winflo 5 was lauded for stabilizing the foot as it goes through the gait cycle.
Some testers who suffered from plantar fasciitis were thankful that the midsole alleviated the pain.
The color schemes were welcomed; people liked the vibrancy of the façade.
Several people claimed that this shoe was suitably true-to-size.
A handful of consumers liked that the toe box was roomy enough to accommodate toe-splay.
Some heavyset purchasers observed the platform holding the weight of their body adequately; they didn’t feel the foam buckle or sag.
Wearing this running shoe for extended periods didn’t result in foot-fatigue, according to many shoe enthusiasts.
The width profiles of both the men and women’s versions were deemed accurate.
3 reasons not to buy
A few people complained that this looked awkwardly massive.
The shoe was not lightweight to some users.
The durability of the shoe was not satisfactory to various wearers.
Bottom line
The Nike Air Zoom Winflo 5 was considered by many to be a worthy addition to the Winflo series of running shoes. The midsole unit became the focus of the acclaim; people liked its pain-alleviating construction and the pronation-correcting midfoot section. A lot was also stated about its width and sizing schemes adhering to expectations. On the other hand, some consumers weren’t happy with the shoe's weight and the quality of the materials. Overall, the Nike Air Zoom Winflo 5 is determined to be an excellent running companion that delivers expectations."
Saucony Liberty ISO,,93.0,88.0,169.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 8.7oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Saucony Liberty ISO 2,"8 reasons to buy
A lot of runners commented that the shoe was responsive.
According to some testers, the product was supportive.
Many reviewers agreed that the fit was perfect.
Several wearers were impressed with the Saucony Liberty ISO's lightweight structure.
A good number of buyers said that the upper construction was excellent.
The majority of the users reported that the shoe was not only best for those who overpronate but also for those who have neutral foot motion.
Several consumers loved the apparently eye-catching color schemes.
It has a durable outsole, noted by many buyers.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners observed that the price was high.
Many users commented that it has limited color variations.
Bottom line
The majority of the runners agreed that the Saucony Liberty ISO was comfortable and supportive. They were impressed with the product's lightweight structure and perfect fit. Although several of them were disappointed with its high price and limited color options, others still recommended the shoe because of its responsiveness and sole durability. Some of them were also happy because of the product's excellent upper construction."
Salomon Supercross,,94.0,86.0,60.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Several testers claim that the forefoot section of the Salomon Supercross allows their toes to splay naturally.
The Quicklace® system has gained some fans who desire a fit adjustment method that is effortless and barely-there.
Some consumers feel that the weight of this Salomon running shoe is lighter than other trail-optimized athletic footwear.
The outsole unit is praised for offering a reliable grip on soft and muddy terrains.
Most purchasers laud the padded collar and tongue, stating that these elements permit them to feel secure and locked in place.
The cushioning system is perceived to be highly comfortable and capable of maintaining a well-rounded heel-to-toe transition.
2 reasons not to buy
The shoelaces were too long, according to some reviewers.
A couple of runners have raised complaints about the securing tab of the Quicklace® getting clogged up with mud.
Bottom line
All-in-all, the feedback given to the Salomon Supercross has been positive. Many of those who have tried it are in agreement when it comes to the quality of the build and the efficacy of the design. The traction-ready outsole, the single-pull lacing system, and the foot-welcoming interior chamber put a spotlight on this running shoe. On the other hand, some complaints churn the opposite of satisfaction as runners note the smaller-than-usual sizing scheme, as well as the mud-attracting lacing system.
The Salomon Supercross is made for fans of Salomon trail running shoes and those who have neutral foot pronation."
Brooks Anthem 2,,92.0,,260.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.3oz , Women: 8.2oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Brooks Anthem 3,"7 reasons to buy
A consumer commented that walking on the Brooks Anthem 2 feels smooth.
The shoe is true to size.
According to a buyer, the Anthem 2 was not only suited for walking and running but also best for jogging.
It is lightweight, according to several reviewers.
A lot of testers said that the shoe is comfortable.
One user commented that she no longer had pain on her hip flexors and knees when she started using the shoe.
Several testers agreed that the Brooks Anthem 2 is durable.
1 reasons not to buy
One of the purchasers noted that the Anthem 2 is less cushioned when compared to other Brooks models.
Bottom line
The majority of the users claimed that the Brooks Anthem 2 is one of the most comfortable shoes they have ever worn. A lot of them admired the size and lightweight structure of the shoe. Although one of the buyers had issues with the cushioning, most of the testers still recommend the Brooks Anthem 2 when looking for a running shoe. In general, the Brooks Anthem 2 was accepted by many and is considered as a successful release from Brooks."
Salomon XA Pro 3D GTX,,91.0,85.0,4415.0,,, Trail, Stability, Men: 14.3oz , Women: 12.5oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Salomon XA Pro 3D V8 GTX,"6 reasons to buy
The GORE-TEX upper membrane offers a comfortable foot wrap that’s also waterproof.
The added features in the upper help the runner to be as efficient as possible when taking on adventures.
Runners welcomed the inclusion of anti-debris mechanics, which enhances the XA Pro 3D GTX’s protective capabilities.
The mid-sole was crafted to provide underfoot comfort that’s reliable and consistent.
The stability and motion control mechanics in the shoe maintain balance and right positioning of the foot.
Runners liked the anti-abrasion capability of the outsole unit, making it ideal for tackling harsh surfaces.
3 reasons not to buy
The XA Pro 3D GTX is a very expensive running shoe.
The men’s version is much heavier than the women’s version and many testers have observed this.
There were reviewers who criticized this shoe for being too narrow.
Bottom line
The XA Pro 3D GTX is a popular Salomon trail shoe for those who want a comfortable gear that would protect and secure their feet. It has moderate arch support and pronation control mechanics for those who want to have additional underfoot cradling."
Adidas Adizero Prime,,86.0,80.0,115.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The Primeknit upper stretched properly and accommodated the natural swelling of the foot as it took each speedy footstep, according to several testers.
People generally liked the quality of the materials used in the Adidas Adizero Prime, stating that the upper and sole unit didn’t break down quickly.
The lightweight structure of this running shoe became a highlight for those who welcomed an in-shoe experience that didn’t drag the foot down.
Runners felt that the boost™-reinforced midsole was reactive and comfortable.
Most consumers noted that the width profile followed their usual expectations, allowing the foot to feel secure without experiencing an uneven tightness.
2 reasons not to buy
A few runners noticed the rubber outsole wearing off after several uses.
The costly price was a shock to consumers.
Bottom line
The Adidas Adizero Prime was able to capture praise from the majority of those who have tried it. People welcomed the upper unit’s form-welcoming structure, as well as the responsive midsole unit. The overall durability and efficacy of the components also became acmes when it comes to this product. On the other hand, the half-size small build and the high price discouraged testers.
Neutral pronators and enthusiasts of road running are the ones who are most likely going to enjoy the Adidas Adizero Prime. It can also function well as a casual sneaker."
Brooks Bedlam,,89.0,79.0,244.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.2oz , Women: 9.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Brooks Bedlam 2,"6 reasons to buy
The interior chamber of the Brooks Bedlam was welcomed by many consumers who liked a more forgiving in-shoe experience.
People appreciated the GuideRails configuration; they stated that it kept the foot from wobbling on the platform.
The cushioning system gained praise for being springy without being too spongy.
Overpronators thought that the stability mechanisms present in this product worked well in preventing underfoot discomfort and gait deviation.
Most consumers were happy that the Bedlam looked visually endearing.
The general consensus deemed the fit and sizing to be adherent to expectations.
1 reasons not to buy
The instep section of the upper tended to cause some hot spots on the skin, according to several testers.
Bottom line
Most of those who have tried the Brooks Bedlam seemed to welcome its arrival. They liked this road running shoe’s capacity to provide a stable platform on which the foot can rest. They also appreciated the endearing looks, the correctness of the size and width, and the comfortable in-shoe experience. But there were a few people who felt some hot spots due to the material on the upper unit."
Asics Gel Excite 4,,92.0,86.0,3200.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 8.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Excite 6 Twist,"9 reasons to buy
Many runners were impressed by the comfortable ride of the Excite 4.
The price tag is wallet-friendly.
It has decent durability coming from a shoe of this price, according to a few comments.
Several runners loved the freshness of the colors and the style of the 4th iteration of the Excite.
Quite a number of reviewers were surprised by the noticeable responsiveness of the shoe.
The shoe runs light, observed a significant number of runners.
The Gel Excite 4 is available in different width options.
It is also used for training by more than a handful of runners.
A significant number of users who are up on their feet all day valued the cushioning and comfort of this shoe.
4 reasons not to buy
A handful of reviews mentioned that it runs smaller than standard Asics shoes.
The traction isn’t as good on wet surfaces, as noted by some.
It is a little narrower than its predecessor, according to some reviewers.
More than a handful of reviewers said that they needed break-in time for this shoe.
Bottom line
The Gel Excite 4 remains to be a very solid choice for entry-level runners because of its moderate cushioning with noticeable responsiveness. For its affordable price tag, the comfort, durability, and arch support of this shoe makes it a great buy for anyone looking for a lightweight trainer."
Nike Zoom Pegasus Turbo,,92.0,91.0,358.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 6.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Nike Zoom Pegasus Turbo 2,"7 reasons to buy
The Nike Zoom Pegasus Turbo had the “comfiest cushioning set-up” they have ever worn, a reviewer stated.
Many users agreed that the shoe is lightweight.
A versatile shoe that performed well both as running gear and lifestyle wear, according to a buyer.
Several praises were made regarding the shoe’s design and appearance.
The ZoomX foam delivered a ride that was not overly bouncy, said a runner. Another user commended the ZoomX as it allowed for a maximum ground feel.
The shoe was able to maintain a brand-new look even after 100 miles, a runner mentioned.
One user claimed to feel less fatigue after starting to run in the shoe.
1 reasons not to buy
Some users thought the Zoom Pegasus Turbo was expensive.
Bottom line
Wearers who were after a shoe that looked and performed outstandingly were satisfied with the Nike Zoom Pegasus Turbo. The shoe was highly praised for its cushioning and durability, and many experienced an above-average ride with long-lasting comfort. Overall, the Zoom Pegasus Turbo met the expectations of users and had successfully proven fit to be part of the Pegasus series."
Topo Athletic Ultraventure,,91.0,93.0,35.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The traction capacity of the Topo Athletic Ultraventure’s outsole unit was lauded for being precise and dependable.
The midsole’s multiple densities protected the foot from sharp surfaces and debris, according to several consumers.
Some testers commented that the breathability of the upper unit was agreeable; they didn’t feel any buildup of stuffiness while wearing this product.
The inner sleeve was soft and comfortable, according to a handful of testers. Blisters and hot spots apparently didn’t become a problem for them.
Most purchasers commended the color schemes of this shoe, stating that the various hues were appealing to the eyes.
Runners were happy with the durability of the Ultraventure; the materials didn’t wear off or tear apart quickly.
1 reasons not to buy
A few consumers complained that the Topo Athletic Ultraventure was a bit narrower than what they were used to.
Bottom line
The response of runners when the Ultraventure was released was overwhelmingly positive. This addition to the global roster of Topo Athletic running shoes was hailed as a reliable companion for the trails. The durability of the components, the steadiness of the midsole and the well-ventilated upper became the elements that caused people to appreciate the whole package. On the other hand, a handful of people claimed that there was some tightness when the foot rested in the interior chamber.
The Topo Athletic Ultraventure is a trail shoe that’s meant for both neutral pronators and fans of stability running footwear."
Merrell Nova,,93.0,94.0,27.0,,, Trail, Neutral,,,,,,,,"7 reasons to buy
People who have tested the Merrell Nova were happy with its lightweight build, stating that they never felt as though the product weighed them down.
The underfoot cushioning system was appreciated for being responsive and comfortable.
Many purchasers were happy with the looks of this running shoe, claiming that the color schemes were visually appealing.
The fit profile was welcomed because it welcomed the foot without feeling too snug or restricting.
Several testers commented that the flexibility of the product enabled natural and pleasant movements over the surfaces.
The general quality of the materials received praise, with runners stating that the product lasted long.
A lot of consumers liked the grip capacity of the Merrell Nova; they felt that they were able to ignore the fear of slipping and weave through the trails with confidence.
1 reasons not to buy
A few people lamented the lack of arch support, writing that the midsole didn’t avert any pronation concerns.
Bottom line
Runners who were able to wear the Merrell Nova were happy with what it had to offer. The overall build of this trail runner apparently accommodated the natural movement capacity of the foot. This product was also deemed suitably light and well-constructed. On the other hand, some runners bemoaned the midsole’s focus on natural pronation and the absence of a supportive feature for the midfoot.
The Nova from Merrell is an addition to the worldwide family of trail running shoes. It is also a product intended for neutral pronators."
Altra Vanish-R,,77.0,81.0,98.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"7 reasons to buy
According to some purchasers, the footwear was lightweight in structure.
A good number of buyers noted that the fit was perfect.
Several wearers admired the Altra Vanish-R's flexibility.
Many testers agreed that the shoe was responsive.
A handful of runners said that the footwear was comfortable.
Several consumers noted that the upper unit of the Altra Vanish-R offered a glove-like fit.
Gaining control and feeling the ground beneath the sole unit was a satisfying aspect, several users observed.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners observed that the tongue unit was too thin.
One of the buyers said that the Altra Vanish-R is not durable.
Bottom line
A significant number of runners agreed that the Altra Vanish-R was comfortable and responsive. They were contented with the footwear's lightweight structure and perfect fit. Although several of the users have issues with its thin tongue unit, others still recommend the shoe because of its flexibility. Overall, a lot of the users are satisfied and happy because of the Altra Vanish-R's excellent performance."
New Balance 880 v8,,93.0,84.0,78.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, New Balance 880 v7,"7 reasons to buy
Those who have tested the New Balance 880 v8 felt that it accommodates their sizing preferences.
Several people noted that there was sufficient room in the forefoot for natural toe-splay.
The underfoot cushioning caused a smooth yet snappy transition through the gait cycle, some runners commented.
The midsole alleviated any muscle strain during the run, according to a reviewer.
Runners were generally appreciative of this model’s eye-catching color options.
This running shoe was deemed worthy of its price because it had high-quality materials.
People liked that a wide-width variant was available from the get-go.
2 reasons not to buy
Some users thought the New Balance 880 v8 is a heavy shoe.
The rectangular lace-holes apparently ruined the structure of laces that go through them, according to a few consumers.
Bottom line
People were mostly happy with the New Balance 880 v8. They liked this road shoe’s wide toe-box design, comfortable underfoot cushioning, and the appealing colorways. But some weren’t as enthusiastic about it because they claimed that it was hefty. Overall, this neutral pronator’s companion is considered to be a welcome addition to New Balance’s stable of athletic footwear."
Adidas Astrarun, Adidas,83.0,,8.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The underfoot experience of the Adidas Astrarun is lauded for being responsive and flexible.
Some people have noted that this Adidas running shoe has a design that is versatile enough to handle many types of activities.
The lightweight structure of the Astrarun is praised as it allows the runner to wear the shoe for extended periods.
A few reviews have mentioned the flexible midsole and its capacity to propel the foot forward with ease.
Several users have found that the upper gives a secure and reliable fit.
3 reasons not to buy
According to some users, the inner portion of the shoe causes chafing at the toe area.
Some have observed the upper unit developing some holes after only a few uses.
The outsole unit is so thin that it is quick tao wear off, based on a handful of reviews.
Bottom line
The overall reaction towards the Adidas Astrarun has been mostly negative. This running shoe is praised for its appealing looks and comfortable midsole construction. However, the durability of its materials and quality of the in-shoe feel are much criticized.
Fans of road running shoes that are for the neutral pronation of the foot are the target market of the Adidas Astrarun."
New Balance 860 v9,,88.0,86.0,166.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.5oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, New Balance 860 v10,"7 reasons to buy
Several people stated that the upper unit of the New Balance 860 v9 was suitably breathable, especially during extended running sessions.
People generally liked the underfoot experience of this running shoe, claiming that it was comfortable and responsive.
The stability mechanisms of this product were appreciated for being able to avert overpronation and tendon strain.
According to some testers, the in-shoe chamber was spacious enough to welcome custom orthotics.
Some consumers felt that the weight of this product was lighter than most stability shoes in the market.
Purchasers welcomed the variety of color schemes that were available for this model, stating that the aesthetics allowed them the chance to express themselves visually.
The multiple width profiles were lauded by runners who wanted shoes that could accommodate an assortment of foot types.
3 reasons not to buy
According to a tester, the outline of the tongue unit irritated the top of the foot.
A few people stated that the 860 v9 had a narrow interior coverage, causing them to experience discomfort while running.
Some consumers lamented the lack of a protective toe cap as they experienced some surface abrasion and fabric tearing during their runs.
Bottom line
Many people were happy with the New Balance 860 v9. This addition to the global roster of stability running shoes was apparently able to provide precise steadiness during the run. The breathable upper, the eye-catching aesthetics, and the accommodating width profiles similarly received praise. On the other hand, there were complaints about the irritating structure of the tongue, the lack of a toe cap, and the apparently narrow in-shoe experience."
Asics Gel Contend 4,,93.0,89.0,4305.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Contend 6,"9 reasons to buy
Several runners exclaimed that the Gel Contend 4, by far, is the most comfortable shoe they have ever bought.
It has a bang for the buck price tag.
More than a handful noted that it looks much better than the past model.
Asics offers the shoe in different widths.
There are already a handful of different color options.
A few runners have used it as a gym companion as well.
The removable insole accommodates various orthotics.
The roomy interior was greatly appreciated by more than a few.
The shoe is very breathable, according to some reviewers.
2 reasons not to buy
Based on the observations of a few fans of the Contend, the 4th edition is not as supportive as before.
A couple of buyers felt that the fit was a tad too loose.
Bottom line
Although not as heralded as some of the latest releases from Asics, the Contend 4 is already shaping up to be one of the most reliable and sturdy low mileage trainers that should benefit entry level runners or those who are looking for an easy day on the road. The shoe has very decent arch support, a plush interior, and adequate durability for those miles on the road."
Under Armour HOVR Phantom SE,,88.0,76.0,61.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 8.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
One user liked the heel cushioning of the Under Armour HOVR Phantom SE and said it contributed to a secure fit of the shoe.
Some wearers appreciated the soft and plush feel of the upper material.
Many purchasers were happy with the appearance of the HOVR Phantom SE.
The running shoe was comfortable to wear even without socks, according to various customers.
Various testers were impressed with the connectivity feature of the shoe.
The reflective feature of the HOVR Phantom SE was admired by numerous users.
The shoe was found to be lightweight by a lot of wearers.
A good number of customers were pleased with the reasonable pricing of the Under Armour HOVR Phantom SE.
4 reasons not to buy
A lot of buyers noted that the shoe ran small.
The outsole’s traction is “questionable” on some wet surfaces, a runner observed.
The shoe stretched out excessively and became loose after only a few wears, said a runner. Another user claimed the shoe is not recommendable for long-distance running.
Several purchasers noticed the HOVR Phantom SE required a break-in period.
Bottom line
The reception of the Under Armour HOVR Phantom SE has been mostly positive. Most of the reviewers were quick to commend the shoe for its comfort level and functionality. Other aspects of the shoe were also praised, like its price and appearance. Meanwhile, a few negative comments surround the shoe’s sizing and durability. Overall, with the number of favorable reviews it has received, the HOVR Phantom SE was successful in delivering the intended outcome to its target market."
Nike Run All Day 2,,83.0,,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 10.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Several reviews have commented that the midsole unit of the Nike Run All Day 2 is able to offer comfort and responsive performance.
Some users believe that this neutral running shoe doesn’t need a break-in period to be comfortable.
The breathability of the upper unit is praised for maintaining a sweat-free in-shoe experience.
The flexibility of the platform is welcomed by those who appreciate a shoe that can accommodate natural motion.
Consumers have noted that the outsole traction is reliable and precise.
2 reasons not to buy
The overall design of the facade looks cheap and unappealing, according to some users.
A few people have noted that the forefoot section has a tendency to bunch the toes together uncomfortably.
Bottom line
The overall feedback towards the Nike Run All Day 2 has been positive. People are happy with the flexible and accommodating performance of this product. The responsive platform and breathable upper are particularly highlighted. On the other hand, the restrictive forefoot section has been criticized.
Fans of Nike shoes designed for the roads can enjoy the Nike Run All Day 2."
Brooks Transcend 6,,94.0,89.0,2355.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.4oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Brooks Transcend 7,"6 reasons to buy
Many consumers felt that the cushioning system of the Brooks Transcend 6 was comfortable and highly responsive.
The stability mechanisms received high praise from overpronators who desired responsible and agreeable support during their runs.
According to several runners, the toe box was spacious enough to welcome the natural splaying of the toes.
Most testers agreed that the Transcend 6 was relatively lightweight, considering that it’s a stability running shoe.
This product didn’t make the foot look awkwardly big, based on a handful of reviews.
The color schemes were welcomed; people stated that they were vibrant and eye-catching.
2 reasons not to buy
Some people felt the weight of this running shoe, stating that the somehow felt it drag the foot down, but not by much.
A few purchasers were not happy with the inner sleeve of the upper unit, stating that it trapped warmth and prevented cool air from circulating.
Bottom line
The overall response towards the Brooks Transcend 6 was positive. A lot of people really liked this stability running shoe. They stated that the underfoot experience was luxurious and supportive. Their pronation problems were apparently addressed quickly and efficiently. Moreover, a bevy of testers was happy with the looks, as well as the in-shoe experience. Inversely, several groups of runners were unhappy with the stifling upper unit while others lamented the subpar breathability of the material."
Adidas Solar Blaze,,89.0,,258.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 11.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Most of those who have tried the Adidas Solar Blaze feel that the price is very affordable.
The traction capacity of this Adidas running shoe is lauded for being precise and highly dependable.
Several testers claim that the silhouette of this product is flexible enough to welcome the natural movement capacity of the foot.
The various color schemes have gained some favor from those who liked eye-catching hues and designs.
The inner sleeve permits the foot to feel a soft and accommodating wrap, according to some consumers.
2 reasons not to buy
The materials of the shoe looked flimsy and incapable of handling long miles, according to some buyers.
The toe box is too tight, as mentioned by a couple of wearers.
Bottom line
The general feedback towards the Adidas Solar Blaze has been positive. People like this road running shoe for being adaptable and form-accommodating apparel. Some of the highlights include the grip capacity of the outsole unit, the flexibility of the design, the attention-grabbing silhouette, and the non-irritating cover system. On the other hand, the durability of the shoe is doubtful to some reviewers.
Fans of neutral running shoes and foot-apparel meant for the roads are the ones who are likely to acclimate well with the Adidas Solar Blaze."
Zoot Laguna,,89.0,90.0,35.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 8.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The lightweight, breathable mesh upper of the Zoot Laguna provides comfort.
The bare-fit internal liner technology for a sock-like feel gained several thumbs-up from runners.
The Laguna features a minimal carbon rubber pods, providing better grip in the toe and heel.
The overall construction and durability features of the shoe were applauded by most runners.
The design is impressive as noted in some reviews.
2 reasons not to buy
Some observed that the Zoot Laguna is a bit heavy for long-distance runs.
Some noticed that this shoe needs more cushioning.
Bottom line
The Zoot Laguna is a reliable training shoe. Some reviewers are happy with this shoe because it is very comfortable and durable. It provides a secure fit and good arch support."
Adidas Senseboost Go,,95.0,90.0,127.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"10 reasons to buy
Some users mentioned that the upper was supportive, adaptable, and breathable. It can also keep the foot dry all day long. 
The Adidas Senseboost Go is responsive without being too soft or springy, according to some testers. 
A few runners commended the high-quality quality construction of the outsole and upper sections of the shoe. 
This neutral running shoe has the right amount of width compared to the other Adidas running shoe, a buyer mentioned. 
One tester mentioned that the shoe was comfortable and has kept his foot from being sore after working all day. 
The Adidas Senseboost Go is suitable for running, walking, and workout sessions, according to various wearers.
The Continental rubber provides great traction on both wet and dry surfaces, a consumer claimed. 
A good number of satisfied purchasers love the light structure and flexibility of this running shoe. 
The cushioning comes in a sufficient amount: not too firm and not too soft, according to several reviewers. 
Many people like the stylish design and color schemes of the Adidas Senseboost Go.
3 reasons not to buy
A consumer remarked that the Adidas Senseboost Go shoe was very bulky and made his foot look way bigger. 
One reviewer mentioned that the shoe’s Boost foam required their ankles have to adjust and do a lot of stabilization, especially at high speeds. 
A few users noticed that their foot sometimes slides up and down during workout sessions. 
Bottom line
The majority of the users agreed that Adidas Senseboost Go is suitable for both walking and running activities. They were happy with this running gear’s stylish design, lightweight structure, and cushioning system. People also appreciated and recommended the shoe because of its durability and breathable coverage. On the other hand, the looseness in the forefoot area and softness of the Boost foam were factors that didn’t get well with several users. "
Adidas Pureboost RBL,,89.0,75.0,186.0,,, Road, Neutral,,, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The Adidas Pureboost RBL was perfect for both city running and walking, according to several wearers.
Numerous runners were pleased with the water-repellent feature of the shoe.
There were a lot of positive comments regarding the shoe’s design. Others also mentioned the suitability of the shoe for casual wear.
A lot of reviewers claimed the Pureboost RBL was a comfortable shoe.
The shoe provided excellent heel support, especially during running, said a commenter.
The Pureboost RBL was able to maintain a stable ride on uneven surfaces, stated a buyer.
3 reasons not to buy
One wearer thought the shoe fit smaller than expected.
The sides of the shoe wore down quickly, a disappointed user said.
A commenter reported that the side of the shoe got soaked easily after running on wet pavement.
Bottom line
The Adidas Pureboost RBL was a fantastic running shoe according to several users, based on favorable comments regarding its performance. There were a few who doubted the shoe’s durability and longevity. Despite some criticisms, many purchasers have concluded that the Adidas Pureboost RBL was a good investment for a neutral running shoe."
Merrell Vapor Glove 3,,91.0,93.0,3137.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.1oz , Women: 4.6oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,, Merrell Vapor Glove 4,"7 reasons to buy
The outsole provided a stable grip, a satisfied runner said.
The Merrell Vapor Glove 3 was a lightweight and flexible shoe that enabled a relaxed run, according to a wearer.
Many users enjoyed the shoe’s minimal weight.
The Glove 3 is a comfortable shoe with sufficient ground sensitivity, a buyer
Some consumers thought the Vapor Glove 3 was an affordable shoe.
One runner was amazed at how the shoe improved their running gait.
A couple of purchasers mentioned that the third version of the Vapor Glove brought better arch support compared to its previous generations.
6 reasons not to buy
Several users reported the shoe’s upper and outsole separating after just a few uses.
The midfoot area has an inaccurate fit, a runner stated.
The upper mesh started to deteriorate within a few months of usage, according to few disappointed wearers.
Some runners found the shoe to be too stiff.
One buyer felt the toe box was small, and that it gave the foot cramps.
The outsole of the Vapor Glove quickly wore out, a consumer said.
Bottom line
The Merrell Vapor Glove 3, an affordable running shoe option, found itself in a unique situation, where the positive and negative feedback had come from the same people. The shoe was praised for being a comfortable minimalist shoe that had practical features and superb performance, yet it was also criticized – by the same users – for its durability. Overall, the Vapor Glove 3 was a good shoe, but many runners think it is not a worthy purchase because of its short lifespan."
Altra Lone Peak 4.0,,92.0,87.0,554.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,, Altra Lone Peak 4.5,"8 reasons to buy
Many people commented that the upper unit of the Altra Lone Peak 4.0 was sturdy and secure.
The toe box received praise for having a roomy construction that welcomed natural toe-splay.
The outsole design of this running shoe was lauded for being helpful with movement over uneven terrains.
Most consumers were happy with the longevity of this product’s components; they stated that the elements resisted wear-and-tear while also evoking excellent quality.
The midsole unit was appreciated by runners because it was reactive but not flimsy.
Most users didn’t notice the weight of this shoe at all; they felt that it was suitably light for all-day use.
A majority of those who have tested this shoe claimed that the sizing scheme followed their regular anticipations.
The width profiles of the men’s and women’s versions were appreciated because they suitably housed feet that have medium and low volumes.
5 reasons not to buy
A few people stated that the lacing system caused the tongue unit to pinch the skin, resulting in hot spots and chafing.
Some testers weren’t happy with the design and color schemes; they claimed that the aesthetics looked outdated.
A couple of purchasers felt that the sole unit of the Lone Peak 4.0 was a bit heavy.
The back end of the collar has a curve that rubbed against the heel irritatingly, several runners complained.
The upper seemed like a sponge to a couple of runners; the fabric apparently tended to take in liquid and not let it dry off.
Bottom line
Many people were happy with the Altra Lone Peak 4.0. They were ecstatic because of this trail companion’s durable construction, precise outsole traction capacity, and lightweight build. Yet the part that got the bulk of the praise was the broad design of the forefoot section; people felt that it permitted the foot to relax and assume a natural position during the run. But there were complaints about the irritating upper aspect, as well as the water-magnet of an upper.
The Altra Lone Peak 4.0 is a product meant for trail running enthusiasts and those who have neutral running gaits."
Saucony Mad River TR,,92.0,90.0,142.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Some people claim that for a trail running shoe, the Saucony Mad River TR is light enough for all-day wear.
The platform is deemed sufficiently flexible by a few testers who like the natural movement of the foot to be encouraged.
Several consumers have stated that the trail-ready outsole of this Saucony running shoe isn’t too aggressive to remove efficacy on flat surfaces.
A couple of runners wrote that the underfoot cushioning system is able to provide comfort throughout the running session.
The one-piece opening of the Mad River TR is lauded by those who welcome a quick in-and-out experience when wearing a shoe.
The choice of wide and close-fitting lacing methods on the roof of the upper is praised by those who like some customization for the fit-adjustment.
2 reasons not to buy
A tester has complained that the platform isn’t as supportive as advertised, that the underfoot experience is flat.
The sidewall-like raised portions of the midsole are criticized for putting some pressure against the skin of the foot.
Bottom line
The overall feedback for the Saucony Mad River TR has been positive. People are generally happy with what this trail running shoe has to offer. The lightweight build and the versatile outsole construction are highlighted as the elements that elevated this product to the realm of agreeable user-friendliness. Also, the slip-on structure apparently worked with the nonrestrictive lacing system to properly keep the foot in place.
Fans of neutral running shoes that are for the unpredictable terrains are the target market of the Saucony Mad River TR."
Xero Shoes Prio,,99.0,95.0,1700.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 7.4oz , Women: 6.4oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Numerous critics and consumers loved the roominess of the Prio’s toe box.
This Xero Shoes was adored by droves of wearers for its shocking lightness.
Dozens of owners hailed the Prio as an amazingly comfortable shoe.
Several users were impressed with the way they were able to feel very much connected to the ground in this footgear.
The shoe having a zero drop was greatly appreciated by professional bloggers.
Some testers called the footwear’s heel support excellently reassuring.
This running shoe didn’t disappoint experts in terms of flexibility.
A few reviewers were overwhelmed with the stickiness of the gear’s outsole.
3 reasons not to buy
Based on a number reports, the Xero Shoes Prio runs small.
Footwear pundits wouldn’t have criticized the shoe had its overall design been slightly more appealing.
A seasoned reviewer wasn’t happy to discover the outsole’s inability to shed mud effectively.
Bottom line
If the only quality wearers need in a shoe is a spacious toe box, they will not be disappointed getting the Prio. The good news is, the running shoe offers so much more than forefoot space. Indeed, among other things, it also provides tons of comfort in its superbly lightweight confines. That said, the shoe might not live up to the expectations of runners who value sizing precision in their gear. All in all, the Xero Shoes Prio delivers a promising performance—especially once its confusing fit has been successfully worked out."
Vivobarefoot Primus Knit,,84.0,88.0,6.0,,, Road, Neutral,,, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Several consumers have considered the Vivobarefoot Primus Knit a comfortable product for their daily activities.
The forefoot section of this road running shoe is praised for being wide enough to accommodate natural toe splay.
Some testers claim that the upper unit is able to provide a sock-like fit that is light and flexible.
The stylish construction of the silhouette has allowed people to wear this running shoe for a variety of purposes.
A handful of people observe a breathable upper that prevents the foot from getting sweaty or warm.
The traction capacity of the outsole unit is appreciated by those who desire surface control when tackling urban adventures.
2 reasons not to buy
Some testers observe their toes scratching against the ceiling of the inner lining; they fear that such occurrences would cause the fabric to rip.
A few runners report that there is a need for a break-in period of a few days before becoming fully comfortable.
Bottom line
The overall feedback of people towards the Primus Knit has been positive. This Vivobarefoot running shoe is lauded for its lightweight and flexible construction. Users also benefit from a roomy toe box and a stylish design. On the other hand, the inner wall of this product has been criticized for having a low profile while the initial break-in period that several individuals report is scored.
Fans of minimalist running shoes that encourage natural movement and close-to-the-ground action are the target market of the Vivobarefoot Primus Knit."
Brooks Bedlam 2,,83.0,85.0,6.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.6oz , Women: 10.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The Brooks Bedlam 2 is comfortable, according to many runners.
A user, with flat feet, noted that it is suitable for athletic purposes. 
Some buyers appreciated the flexible upper of the shoe. 
Several consumers said that the shoe is responsive. 
The tongue helps offer a snugger fit, some wearers claimed. 
One consumer mentioned that it offers good arch support. 
Many runners appreciated the performance of GuideRails® technology.
3 reasons not to buy
Some buyers complained because the plastic ankle support is hurting their ankles.  
The upper material tends to rub against the foot causing discomfort, some users reported. 
This version is tighter compared to its predecessor, said some runners.
Bottom line
The Brooks Bedlam 2 is a stability running shoe designed to support individuals who overpronate. It is built with a support system that helps protect the knee and control excessive movements. This shoe also features energizing midsole and outsole technologies, which aim to enhance speed and comfort. It is suitable for running and casual walks. "
Adidas Adizero Prime LTD,,91.0,85.0,177.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Many people liked the lightweight build of the Adidas Adizero Prime LTD, stating that it allowed them to be on the roads for long periods.
The aesthetics of this running shoe received positive feedback; people relayed that the façade looked appealing to the eyes.
The form-fitting upper gained some fans who wanted a foot-hugging wrap that didn’t irritate the skin.
Runners felt that the garter-like opening of this shoe made it easy to slip the foot into the interior chamber.
The traction given by the outsole was appreciated; purchasers felt that the surface control was precise.
3 reasons not to buy
Several testers claimed that the Adidas Adizero Prime LTD didn’t offer proper arch support. They experienced some tendon strain after tackling long distances.
A narrow structure was felt by many; they claimed to feel some pressure on the sides and the heel.
The boost™ midsole had a tendency to sag after a few weeks of use, a few runners observed.
Bottom line
The Adidas Adizero Prime LTD was mostly well-received by those who have worn it. The lightweight build, the fresh aesthetics, the hugging cover system, and the grip-ready outsole were elements that were welcomed. But the fit profile of this neutral shoe didn’t mesh with expectations. People didn’t like that the in-shoe experience wasn’t generous enough."
Zoot Ultra Kalani 3.0,,90.0,89.0,111.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The upper is very breathable and flexible as stated in some reviews.
Compared to the older version, the Ultra Kalani 3.0 offers a more cushioned support.
Most runners applauded the Carbon Span+ technology for effortless toe-off.
The asymmetrical lacing system of this shoe that matches the shape of the foot gained good impression from several runners.
The newer version is much lighter and durable.
3 reasons not to buy
Many were disappointed by the fit of this shoe because of the materials used.
Size runs small.
Slightly priced shoe.
Bottom line
The Zoot Ultra Kalani 3.0 will never disappoint when used for long-distance runs. This version of the Ultra Kalani is much lighter with more cushioned support. This stability shoe is best used on the roads and also as a good daily trainer."
Hoka One One Carbon X,,95.0,89.0,37.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.7oz , Women: 7.2oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm, Jun 2019,,,"7 reasons to buy
The arch support of the Hoka One One Carbon X was deemed efficient by several purchasers.
Some testers reported that the toe box is wide. It made their toes spread out naturally.
A few wearers noted that the design is attractive.
Most of the users admired the comfortable feel of this running shoe. 
Some testers stated that the Hoka One One Carbon X provides better shock absorption.
The shoe is lightweight, according to those who have tried it.
It is true to size, based on some reviews.
3 reasons not to buy
One of the users said that the foot rubbed with the fabric on the right shoe. As a result, he felt a little discomfort while running.
A reviewer commented that the Hoka One One Carbon X quickly got dirty.
It is expensive, noted by some consumers.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Carbon X is a neutral running shoe that is strategically crafted for the different paved surfaces. Overall, the shoe gained the hearts of its users because of its structure, look, and performance. Though some have some minor issues, these problems were not enough to dominate the kind comments. All in all, this running shoe is an excellent choice for users who seek a comfortable and attractive running shoe. "
New Balance Fresh Foam 880 v10,,88.0,90.0,7.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The underfoot cushioning system of the New Balance 880 v10 is lauded for being able to support the foot throughout the run.
Some consumers who complain about sensitive knees and leg muscles are happy with the impact-mitigation given by the underfoot platform.
Custom orthotic inserts can acclimate well inside the foot-chamber, according to some runners.
Most users have commented that this New Balance running shoe is comfortable right out of the box.
The stretchy upper is welcomed for accommodating the foot’s range of motion and natural swelling capacity.
‘Versatile’ is a term that several purchasers have used to describe this running shoe as they’re walking or using it for work.
3 reasons not to buy
Some users have claimed that the eyestays have a tendency to crinkle the tongue and restrict the in-shoe environment.
A few people observe the toes scratching against the ceiling of the inner fabrics, causing some material damage.
The hug of the upper unit is considered restrictive by a handful of purchasers.
Bottom line
People are generally with the New Balance 880 v10 and what it has to offer. This road running shoe has a comfortable midsole configuration, a versatile build that can handle multiple activities, and a form-welcoming nature that can better the performance. Inversely, a restrictive foot-wrap and a not-so-durable forefoot section embody the negative side.
Fans of New Balance can check out the 880 v10, an update that focuses on comfort."
Skechers GOrun Focus,,91.0,,216.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.7oz , Women: 5.5oz,,,,, Skechers GOrun Focus - Athos,"6 reasons to buy
Some of the users said that the Skechers GOrun Focus is comfortable.
The majority of the purchasers are pleased with the slip-on feature of the GOrun Focus.
According to one of the testers, it has a stretchable upper.
A good number of consumers appreciated the wide toe box.
Several buyers said that it fits perfectly with them.
One of the users loved the shoe's excellent arch support.
1 reasons not to buy
Based on a review, the shoe has poor cushioning underfoot.
Bottom line
The Skechers GOrun Focus is, generally, welcomed by the majority of the consumers.  People admired its fit, comfort level, and style. Aside from its design, many users were made happy and contented because of its fantastic toe box. Though one of the buyers expressed his disappointment toward the shoe's poor cushioning, the Skechers GOrun Focus is still lauded by many because of its amazing performance on the roads."
Under Armour Charged Impulse,,95.0,90.0,206.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 6.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The lightweight structure of the Under Armour Charged Impulse is lauded by those who have tested it.
Some consumers believe that the midsole is soft enough to welcome all-day wear.
The responsive platform is appreciated by people who like a springy underfoot experience.
A handful of runners claim that the upper unit is able to support the medial and lateral sides of the foot, resulting in a steady ride.
The upper unit is deemed breathable by those who have worn this Under Armour running shoe.
Purchasers have welcomed the flexible configuration of the midsole, stating that it allows them to transition smoothly through the gait cycle.
2 reasons not to buy
A few testers believe that the upper unit isn’t as form-fitting as perceived as the fabrics and overlays tended to put some pressure on the skin of the foot.
The heel security is not efficient, according to a runner who experienced unintentional shoe removals.
Bottom line
The overall feedback of people towards the Under Armour Charged Impulse is positive. This running shoe is considered as a solid option for daily runs and all-day activities. The lightness of the build, the breathability of the upper, and the responsiveness of the midsole have become the highlights of this product. On the other hand, the upper unit is criticized for irritating the skin and for not being dutifully secure.
Fans of road running shoes that are for neutral foot pronation are the ones likely to enjoy the Charged Impulse."
,,,92.0,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 12.9oz , Women: 11.5oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,
On Cloudflyer,,88.0,85.0,306.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Stability, Men: 10oz , Women: 8.6oz, Men: 7mm , Women: 7mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The wider and more prominent sole delivers a more stable ride for the On Cloudflyer.
Inch-perfect fit and generous padding provide exceptional comfort to most runners.
Relatively light and runs much lighter.
Versatility on the road regarding distance and speed is noted by countless runners when using the Cloudflyer.
Rolling through the gait cycle is effortless, according to numerous runners.
Superb lockdown in the heel area comes as a general consensus among runners.
High-quality materials and undeniable excellence in craftsmanship ooze out of the shoe.
4 reasons not to buy
Some runners were slightly surprised by the less than ideal ground perception of the On Cloudflyer.
Durability is a feature a few runners wanted to improve.
Expensive.
Traction gets a little sloppy when used during wet conditions based on several observations.
Bottom line
The On Cloudflyer carves a nice niche in the industry because of its comfort level and Cloutec technology. Without any obvious and standard arch support technologies, the Cloudflyer allows neutrals to moderate overpronators get the most out of it. If not for the hefty price tag, this would have been a shoe that runners would be making a beeline for."
Asics GlideRide,,91.0,91.0,43.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
A lot of the testers state that the Asics GlideRide delivers a propulsive ride. 
Several reviewers laud its lightness. 
Many users commend the comfort of the shoe. 
According to some runners, the running shoe is very durable. 
The shoe allows for effortless transitions on the road, remarked a few. 
The platform has an excellent fit, expressed many buyers. 
Quite a few claim that it permits a responsive ride. 
Many athletes observe the ample support provided by the road running shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
Several are underwhelmed by the GlideRide’s stiff underfoot. 
The shoe lacks flexibility, pointed out some customers. 
Some experts note that the rockered profile of the running shoe promotes heel striking.
Bottom line
Packed with Asics’ state-of-the-art technologies, the GlideRide is perfect for road running. With its general makeup, this running shoe promises to deliver maximum performance on the road while promoting energy conservation. The technical elements implemented in the platform boast support and propulsion. "
Adidas Ultraboost Parley,,92.0,,1951.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The color schemes available for the Adidas Ultraboost Parley were lauded by many for being appealing and stylish.
This running shoe looked better in real-life than its photographic representations, according to most testers.
Several people noted that the materials used in this shoe were of premium quality.
The underfoot cushioning system felt very comfortable, based on general user feedback.
Most runners noted that the width-profile was automatically agreeable.
The environmental-friendly construction of the upper unit was genuinely appreciated by many consumers.
Some purchasers observed that the durability was top-notch; it didn’t break down quickly.
2 reasons not to buy
According to a few purchasers, the fabric on the upper was tight; it needed a break-in period of several uses.
The price for a pair of the Ultraboost Parley was considered by many to be expensive.
Bottom line
The Adidas Ultraboost Parley was welcomed by many runners. They liked its comfortable construction, its appealing looks, and its agreeable performance. Moreover, the use of recycled materials for the upper resonated well with environment-conscious individuals. Conversely, some people noted that it was initially tight while others lamented the high price."
Adidas Ultraboost PB,,87.0,86.0,6.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
A lot of users confirmed that the Adidas Ultraboost PB is very breathable. 
This running shoe offers excellent grip in all conditions, based on reviews. 
Numerous consumers mentioned that the shoe is flexible. 
Several reviewers admired the outsole’s durability. 
Many purchasers appreciated the quality of materials used in the shoe. 
Satisfied buyers lauded the good-looking design of this running partner.
3 reasons not to buy
The Adidas Ultraboost PB is heavier compared to other running shoes, said some commenters. 
Some testers reported that the shoe does not provide enough support. 
A few wearers noted that it is not as comfortable as the other Ultraboost running shoes.
Bottom line
The Adidas Ultraboost PB is a neutral running shoe that is ideal for runners with normal gaits or those who do not overpronate. It is crafted with the latest technologies from Adidas that aim to improve the running experience. This road running shoe offers stylish comfort without sacrificing performance. It is also suitable for gym sessions and casual walks."
Asics GT 1000 9,,89.0,90.0,8.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
The Asics GT 1000 9 is comfortable, according to many runners.
A lot of consumers noted that this shoe is supportive.
This running companion is durable, said some commenters.
Numerous wearers mention that it is fast and lightweight.
The upper is breathable, a couple of buyers claimed.
Many people appreciated the quality of materials used in the shoe.
One purchaser testified that the shoe offers a firm grip on paved surfaces.
This shoe is also suitable for work and gym sessions, based on reviews. 
3 reasons not to buy
The Asics GT 1000 9 requires a break-in period, said a buyer.
A few reviewers reported that the shoe is a bit narrow.
A tester reported that the shoe can be a bit slippery on wet surfaces. 
Bottom line
The Asics GT 1000 9 is a stability running shoe designed for runners and athletes who are seeking a stable ride. This shoe is crafted using advanced technologies that deliver a combination of functional style and comfort. It aims to maintain a secure and efficient ride for optimal performance. This affordable running shoe is also perfect for workouts and casual walks. "
Nike Air Zoom Wildhorse 5,,89.0,87.0,62.0,,, Trail, Neutral,,, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Apr 2019,, Nike Air Zoom Wildhorse 6,"6 reasons to buy
Most users mentioned that the Nike Air Zoom Wildhorse 5 offers a nice blend of cushioning and ground feel.
The shoe has a roomier toe-box than the previous version, noted in some reviews.
A few lauded the laced of the shoe that stayed tight all through the run.
Many runners commented that the grip of the Wildhorse 5 is excellent.
According to some reviews, the shoe is durable.
A couple of buyers said that the shoe performs both on-road and off-road surfaces.
1 reasons not to buy
A few mentioned that the Wildhorse 5 runs smaller than usual.
Bottom line
The Nike Air Zoom Wildhorse 5 is a trail running shoe designed for neutral runners. The shoe gained positive feedback from users. Some admired the shoe’s durability and grip while others are satisfied with the shoe’s roomy toe-box and cushioning. In summary, the Wildhorse 5 is indeed a successful update to the old version."
Jordan Zoom Trunner Ultimate, Jordan,90.0,90.0,6.0,$150,$120 (save 20%)," Road, Treadmill", Neutral,,,,, May 2020, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
The Jordan Zoom Trunner Ultimate is comfortable to wear, based on reviews. 
Many runners testify that this running shoe is responsive. 
The upper unit is breathable, some wearers claim. 
It is supportive, according to several consumers. 
This running partner offers a soft and bouncy feel, said some commenters. 
A lot of purchasers admire the Zoom Trunner Ultimate’s unique design.
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of testers noticed that this running shoe is hard to put on. 
A few buyers dislike the thin heel collar of the Jordan Zoom Trunner Ultimate.
Bottom line
The Jordan Zoom Trunner Ultimate is a high-performance running shoe that is ideal for runners with neutral gaits or those who supinate. Its dynamic design offers a blend of support and cushioning, making the platform suitable for conditioning runs and speed training. This shoe is recommended for consumers seeking a comfortable, breathable, and durable running companion.
 "
Brooks Levitate 3,,82.0,85.0,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.6oz , Women: 10.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Some purchasers have stated that the midsole unit is reactive and able to attenuate shock.
The grip given by the outsole unit of the Brooks Levitate 3 is welcomed by those who desire surface steadiness and slip resistance.
The aesthetics of this Brooks running shoe are appreciated because they permit casual wear.
Forward motion and energy are given by the platform, as claimed by runners.
A handful of testers have noted that the upper unit is breathable enough to permit all-day activities.
Based on a couple of reviews, the fabrics of the silhouette are able to hug the foot with relative ease.
Rearfoot security is perceived by some consumers, and they feel well-supported by the heel-hugging elements.
4 reasons not to buy
The heel part of the collar is deemed a bit irritating to the skin of the ankles.
Several consumers believe that toe-splay is limited because of the restrictive in-shoe experience.
A few people believe that the weight of this product is a bit heavier than expected.
Some runners have commented that the heel construction is too rigid.
Bottom line
The Brooks Levitate returns in its third iteration as a road running shoe with a “super springy” ride, thanks to proprietary technology and plush interior lining. The shoe’s new sock-like upper generated mixed reviews from runners, but the overall in-shoe experience of the majority is positive because of the efficient traction and cushioning."
Asics Gel DS Trainer 24,,95.0,87.0,192.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 8.7oz , Women: 7.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Asics Gel DS Trainer 25,"5 reasons to buy
Those who have tried the Asics Gel DS Trainer 24 felt that it was light enough to wear for extended periods.
The knitted textile on the upper was welcomed by those who desired a cover system that was soft and form-fitting.
Some consumers perceived some medial stability which helped in the alleviation of their tendencies to overpronate.
The color schemes of this road companion were lauded; people thought that the vibrant hues enervated the overall visual flair.
People found the outsole to be highly efficient at providing surface grip during the running session.
1 reasons not to buy
A handful of people felt that the steadying mechanisms of the midsole weren’t beneficial; they found that they weren’t as supported as they had hoped.
Bottom line
The consensus of feedback for the Asics Gel DS Trainer 24 was generally positive. People were happy because this road running shoe was able to provide them with an upper that’s light, flexible and accommodating. They were also glad because it had features that supported the underfoot and staved off mild instability. But the same steadying implements were also criticized as some consumers felt that they were flimsy and inefficient."
Hoka One One Evo Mafate,,93.0,92.0,69.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.6oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Hoka One One Evo Mafate 2,"7 reasons to buy
Several people claimed that the Hoka One One Evo Mafate was suitably lightweight for their long adventures on the trails.
The midsole unit of this running shoe was deemed comfortable and responsive.
The traction capability of the outsole was considered to be efficient by most consumers.
Some people stated that the outsole tread worked well on both trails and roads.
The toe box was wide enough for natural toe-splay, according to a handful of consumers.
Based on some reviews, the upper unit was able to wick off moisture and drain water well.
The color schemes were appreciated for being eye-catching.
1 reasons not to buy
A tester noted that the façade looked awkwardly bulky.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Evo Mafate pleased a lot of those who have tried it. They liked this neutral trail shoe’s lightweight design, its fresh looks and its effective underfoot cushioning system. They also welcomed its versatile outsole configuration. There was an isolated concern regarding the supposedly large figure, but it didn’t pull down this shoe from gaining praise."
New Balance Fresh Foam Cruz,,89.0,83.0,2646.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 7.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
A majority of runners found New Balance Fresh Foam Cruz easy to wear.
Their feet sat comfortably in the shoe during their run, customers said.
Most buyers thought that the price was affordable.
Users experienced enhanced breathability due to its knitted mesh upper during their run.
A few runners lauded the apparently responsive mid-sole as it reduced the pressure on their heels.
Some buyers appreciated the sleek design and the colors available for this model.
One customer was happy that it was efficient even when used for long periods of time.
Another user was satisfied with its light weight and the smoothness of the upper unit.
A consumer was impressed with its efficient performance during daily workouts and trainings.
2 reasons not to buy
Some of the users were dissatisfied with the shoe’s upper unit because they wrote that it wasn’t very durable.
One runner felt pain under his forefoot while wearing the New Balance Fresh Foam Cruz; he thought that the platform wasn’t very comfortable.
Bottom line
Most runners welcomed the responsive and comfortable nature of the New Balance Fresh Foam Cruz. Made for neutral road runners, it’s touted to give soft cushioning and a smooth heel-to-toe transition for a premium experience. It is available in fascinating colors, satisfying both casual and exercise needs. In short, these shoes may be safely considered as a perfect package of efficient performance as well as great looks."
Brooks Launch 7,,80.0,66.0,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
People who don’t run are happy with the Brooks Launch 7 because it allows them to properly go through their daily tasks.
The underfoot experience is lauded for being consistent and supportive.
The traction given by the outsole unit is praised by most consumers.
Breathability is a trait that purchasers have come to appreciate in this Brooks running shoe.
The lightweight nature of this product is admired by many wearers.
3 reasons not to buy
The in-shoe experience is loose for some people; they feel some wobbling when taking each step.
Some testers have stated that the collar has caused some blistering.
There is some stiffness that several runners have come to associate with unmotivated steps.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of people towards the Brooks Launch 7 has been mostly positive. This neutral running shoe is apparently versatile enough to handle activities that aren’t related to speed and sprinting. The breathable upper and traction-ready outsole are also welcomed. Inversely, the loose yet irritating in-shoe feel is criticized.
Fans of lightweight running shoes that are for the roads are welcome to try the Brooks Launch 7."
Nike Air Zoom Terra Kiger 5, Nike,85.0,89.0,37.0,,, Trail, Neutral,,, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm, Apr 2019," Normal, Wide | Normal",,"7 reasons to buy
According to most users, the Nike Air Zoom Terra Kiger 5 has great cushioning for short distance runs.
This trail shoe feels lighter and faster than the older version, said a couple of users.
Majority of the buyers were satisfied with how durable the Terra Kiger 5 is.
Several runners said that the shoe is very comfortable.
Many users noted that the traction of this running shoe is very reliable, especially on dry trail surfaces.
The 5th version of the Nike Air Zoom Terra Kiger delivers great fit from the heel to the forefoot.
A few lauded the casual look of the shoe. They said they received a lot of compliments while wearing it.
2 reasons not to buy
The shoe is slightly expensive.
A couple of users mentioned that the heel collar is too high and stiff.
Bottom line
The Nike Air Zoom Terra Kiger 5 is a lightweight trail running shoe designed for neutral pronators. It is considered by most users as a successful update to the Terra Kiger line. Positive reviews were given to the shoe’s overall design, ride quality, and comfort. Though a few were also disappointed because it is expensive and some structural elements have issues. In summary, the Terra Kiger 5 is a functional trail shoe loved by the majority."
Brooks Anthem 2,,92.0,,260.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.3oz , Women: 8.2oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Brooks Anthem 3,"7 reasons to buy
A consumer commented that walking on the Brooks Anthem 2 feels smooth.
The shoe is true to size.
According to a buyer, the Anthem 2 was not only suited for walking and running but also best for jogging.
It is lightweight, according to several reviewers.
A lot of testers said that the shoe is comfortable.
One user commented that she no longer had pain on her hip flexors and knees when she started using the shoe.
Several testers agreed that the Brooks Anthem 2 is durable.
1 reasons not to buy
One of the purchasers noted that the Anthem 2 is less cushioned when compared to other Brooks models.
Bottom line
The majority of the users claimed that the Brooks Anthem 2 is one of the most comfortable shoes they have ever worn. A lot of them admired the size and lightweight structure of the shoe. Although one of the buyers had issues with the cushioning, most of the testers still recommend the Brooks Anthem 2 when looking for a running shoe. In general, the Brooks Anthem 2 was accepted by many and is considered as a successful release from Brooks."
Asics Gel Cumulus 22,,90.0,90.0,7.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Many users mention that it’s easy to move and run when wearing the Asics Gel Cumulus 22.  
Numerous runners said that it is softer and more comfortable than its predecessors. 
A few users praise the outsole’s durability. 
This shoe is flexible, according to some consumers. 
Several commenters testify that this running partner is lightweight. 
It is supportive, based on reviews. 
The Gel® cushioning allows for soft and easy landings, said some buyers. 
A couple of purchasers mention that this shoe is well-ventilated.
2 reasons not to buy
One tester noticed that the Asics Gel Cumulus 22 is a bit narrow. 
A user found the heel construction a little irritating and impeding.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Cumulus 22 is an everyday running shoe that is built to last. It features a soft and responsive cushioning that delivers a comfortable and efficient ride. This neutral running shoe is recommended for runners and athletes seeking a flexible, lightweight, and durable training companion.
 "
Saucony Freedom 3,,90.0,89.0,6.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.4oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
The majority of the users commented that the Saucony Freedom 3 is comfortable.
Several testers agreed that the shoe is lightweight in structure
According to those who have tried it, the running footwear is well-cushioned
Based on the reviews, the shoe is stable.
The running shoe has a wide toe box, as noted by many purchasers.
The shoe is responsive, as observed by some avid fans.
The running shoe is best used for cross-training, walking as well as long and tempo running activities.
It is stylish, according to those who have bought it.
2 reasons not to buy
A reviewer said that the bending soles of the running footwear are very thin, making him feel the gravel ridges under his foot.
One tester commented that the Saucony Freedom 3's fit doesn't feel as natural during the running activity.
Bottom line
The Saucony Freedom 3 has made a lot of testers happy and contented with the materials and technologies incorporated in the running shoe. Its excellent fit, comfort level, and responsiveness add to the improved performance of the user. The components of the shoe work well with runners who are looking for a lightweight footwear that does not compromise stability and support. This running shoe is also suitable for cross-training and tempo runs."
Nike Air Zoom Streak 7,,83.0,81.0,6.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.9oz , Women: 6.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Various customers praise the responsiveness of the Nike Air Zoom Streak 7.
The running shoe has ample cushioning, claimed a few runners.
Many buyers commend the featherlight construction of the road running shoe.
Quite a few testers have observed that the shoe has a good grip on various surfaces.
The neutral running shoe has enhanced the speed of numerous athletes.
According to multiple reviewers, the shoe exhibits a reliable lockdown.
A number of purchasers appreciate the ground control enabled by the running platform.
It is highly breathable, shared some users.
4 reasons not to buy
According to several experts, the upper of the shoe lacks durability.
Some wearers have observed that the laces of the shoe easily unraveled.
A few shoppers have expressed that the shoe is too tight.
The running shoe is too expensive, reported a number of commenters.
Bottom line
A shoe that takes inspiration from the world's fastest runners, the Nike Air Zoom Streak 7 is configured to win marathons. It features a composition that's centered on delivering snappy and heightened propulsion. Perfect for runners who want a fast feel, the Nike road running shoe offers support and grip without sacrificing weight. With the Air Zoom Streak 7, marathoners can expect a robust race day performance with its perfect blend of comfort and rigidity."
Brooks Hyperion Tempo,,90.0,89.0,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.3oz , Women: 6.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Most people believe that the underfoot cushioning system of the Brooks Hyperion Tempo is supportive yet springy enough for speed.
The lightweight structure of this road running shoe is appreciated by those who like to wear shoes all day.
Breathability is a trait that is highly appreciated, according to a lot of consumers.
Based on a handful of reviews, the spacious toe box grants the toes some much-needed room for toe-splay.
The form-welcoming and motion-encouraging structure of the upper and sole are deemed agreeable for races.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people have noted that the collar tends to irritate the ankles.
The low-ceiling inner sleeve is said to irritate the skin of the forefoot, including the toes.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of runners towards the Hyperion Tempo has been positive. This Brooks running shoe is lauded because of its lightweight yet form-accommodating construction that welcomes natural motion and speed. The breathable upper and responsive midsole are highlighted. The shoe interior might not be for everyone's tastes, but the performance surely makes up for it.
Fans of performance shoes that can handle the roads and people’s speed needs can enjoy the Brooks Hyperion Tempo."
Merrell Momentous,,91.0,85.0,60.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.7oz , Women: 9.8oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Several consumers claimed that the in-shoe experience was accommodating and unrestrictive.
The traction capacity of the outsole unit was praised for being precise and dependable.
The color schemes agreed with those who liked eye-catching hues on their shoe-façades.
Most testers stated that the cushioning capacity of the midsole was pleasant and responsive.
A handful of runners liked the secure collar of the upper unit, stating that it was able to prevent in-shoe quivering or unintentional shoe removals.
2 reasons not to buy
The shoelaces felt thin and easy to break, several consumers complained.
The toe box was too tight and narrow for some wearers.
Bottom line
The majority of those who have tried the Merrell Momentous felt that it was efficient as a companion for the trails. This neutral running shoe was also hailed as comfortable and pleasant to behold. It seems that it is capable of becoming reliable and precise when it comes to doling out a balance of style and performance. On the other hand, some stated that the shoelaces were flimsy or that the sizing scheme was larger than the typical choices.
 "
Asics DynaFlyte 2,,90.0,83.0,428.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.9oz , Women: 7.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Asics DynaFlyte 4,"6 reasons to buy
Most of the reviewers loved the shoe’s well-constructed upper.
Some testers mentioned that the cushioning was great.
A handful of consumers agreed that the shoe was comfortable.
A good number of purchasers noted that the product was supportive and lightweight.
A lot of users experienced less skin irritation and blisters.
Several consumers lauded its attractive casual design.
1 reasons not to buy
According to those who have tried it, the product had limited color variations.
Bottom line
The majority of the purchasers commented that the Asics DynaFlyte 2 is a lightweight, comfortable and supportive shoe. They were satisfied with its well-constructed upper. They loved wearing the shoe not only in running and walking sessions but also on casual occasions. They agreed that its design was visually-appealing and its cushioning was excellent.  "
Adidas Duramo 9,,87.0,71.0,4061.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 8.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Adidas Duramo 6,"8 reasons to buy
A considerable number of users admired the lightweight structure of the Adidas Duramo 9.
The underfoot cushioning system of the Duramo 9 received praise from several users for being soft and responsive.
Several users lauded its capacity to be versatile for a variety of activities, including gym workouts and casual walks.
Most consumers were happy with the shoe’s price tag, stating that it’s affordable.
The Adidas Duramo 9 fits perfectly, said a few reviews.
Many runners admired its stylish, street-ready design.
According to some user reviews, the shoe has a soft cushioning; a few felt that are like walking on clouds.
A couple of runners said that the shoe is easy to put on.
3 reasons not to buy
A few users dislike the shoe’s tongue; they said it’s a bit too long and too wide.
A number of wearers find that the shoe hurts their feet, especially at the forefoot region.
The quality of the shoe's materials was below average for some buyers.
Bottom line
The Adidas Duramo 9 is a versatile running shoe with premium cushioning. The shoe gained positive feedback from most users; they were satisfied with the shoe’s versatility, comfort, and soft cushioning. Though it also gained negative comments, the shoe is still preferred by many because of its affordable price and good-looking design."
Salomon Ultra Pro,,89.0,84.0,93.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
According to some who have tried the Salomon Ultra Pro, the shoe was comfortable.
Many runners appreciated the shoe's lacing system; it was fast and easy to wear.
A lot of buyers loved its perfect fit.
One of the users said that the Salomon Ultra Pro was good looking.
The footwear was true to size, according to some reviews.
1 reasons not to buy
Several runners commented that the tongue unit was thin. It caused a little pain when running.
Bottom line
The Salomon Ultra Pro made a lot of purchasers contented and happy because of its fantastic lacing system and style. Aside from the design, they loved the shoe's fit and sizing. Although some of them have problems with the thin tongue unit, other still recommend the footwear because of the comfort it provides. Overall, The Salomon Ultra Pro is an excellent option for those who are looking for a comfortable and visually-appealing running shoe."
Adidas Terrex Agravic BOA,,96.0,91.0,62.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 7mm , Women: 7mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
The majority of the consumers commented that the Adidas Terrex Agravic Boa is comfortable.
It is stylish, based on some reviews.
The shoe is well-cushioned, according to those who have tested it.
Several buyers mentioned that the shoe is great for uneven and pack dry trails. It also handled gravel roads and pavements perfectly and excellently.
One of the purchasers loves the cable lacing technology integrated into the shoe.
Some of the consumers commented that the running shoe is lightweight.
Many users admired the durable outsole of the Adidas Terrex Agravic Boa.
A significant number of consumers appreciated its perfect fit.
The shoe provides excellent grip, as noted by many testers.
2 reasons not to buy
One of the reviewers said that the shoe's ankle cut is too low. This results in the entering of debris and rocks inside the shoe. Because of this problem, repeated stops are needed to remove and dump out the stones.
The tongue of the shoe bunches up, making for a bothersome fit, according to a couple of users.
Bottom line
Overall, the Adidas Terrex Agravic Boa has delivered what consumers expect from a trail running shoe. These expectations include the whimsical style, fit, and comfort level. A significant number of users were amazed by the outstanding performance, grip, and fantastic construction. With its quality and excellent design, most of them expressed that the Adidas Terrex Agravic Boa is a perfect partner and option in tackling challenging trails. Although one of them has a problem with the fit, others were still happy and satisfied with its incredible performance and construction."
Nike Epic Phantom React Flyknit, Nike,88.0,93.0,20.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,, May 2019," Normal | Narrow, Normal",,"6 reasons to buy
A good number of runners report that the Nike Epic Phantom React Flyknit is a comfortable running shoe, which they compared to “walking on clouds.” Others say that the comfort level of the shoe makes it ideal for everyday wear.
The Flyknit upper is exceptionally breathable and stretchable compared to those of other brands, according to a buyer.
Many users agree that the React foam is bouncy, and it contributes to a responsive ride.
A lot of wearers raved about the laceless design of the shoe and said that it is easy to wear and take off.
The Epic Phantom React Flyknit is a lightweight shoe, as claimed by numerous reviewers.
Some people say the shoe is true-to-size, while others state that it has a glove-like fit yet not restrictive.
3 reasons not to buy
The toe box of the Epic Phantom React Flyknit is too rigid, according to a runner.
Some users think there is not much arch support in this shoe when compared to other Nike running shoes.
The shoe’s pull tabs are not as durable as expected, a buyer has mentioned.
Bottom line
The number of positive feedback received by the Nike Epic Phantom React Flyknit proves that the shoe meets users’ expectations. Majority of runners are impressed with its reliable performance and functional elements that reflect high-quality craftsmanship. Some, on the other hand, are disappointed with a couple of the shoe’s structural features. Despite the criticisms, the Nike Epic Phantom React Flyknit has satisfied the market, who conclude that it is worth buying a second pair."
Asics DynaFlyte,,93.0,90.0,754.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.3oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Asics DynaFlyte 4,"7 reasons to buy
The upper unit uses high quality fabrics in order to provide a secure and comfortable coverage.
Irritation-free wearing is part of what the upper unit provides, so runners were happy with it.
Runners were appreciative of the anti-microbial and anti-moisture sock liner.
Asics offers many color schemes when it comes to their shoes and the Asics DynaFlyte is no exception.
Landing impact is handled by the comfortable and durable platform.
A very lightweight mid-sole foam offers continuous cushioning and support that’s very easy on the foot.
Durable carbon rubber in the outsole unit protects the shoe from abrasion.
1 reasons not to buy
This shoe is a bit expensive.
Bottom line
The Asics DynaFlyte is gaining momentum when it comes to the comfort and efficacy of the wearer. This neutral shoe gives responsive cushioning that’s going to feel like nothing when taken to the races or daily running sessions. A striking look certainly adds to the appeal of this running shoe."
Merrell Trail Glove 4,,93.0,93.0,1103.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.1oz , Women: 6oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,, Merrell Trail Glove 5,"7 reasons to buy
Based on some reviews, the Merrell Trail Glove 4 is more protective and stylish than the previous version.
A lot of runners said that this shoe performed well on short and long-distance trail runs.
According to some testers, the tongue unit and the laces are more comfortable and secure.
Some of the fans of the series mentioned that this version is really visually appealing.
A good number of reviewers appreciated this shoe because it fitted like a glove.
Most of the testers mentioned that the formal style of the Merrell Trail Glove 4 allowed them to wear this shoe for casual occasions.
A lot of runners agreed that the Merrell Trail Glove 4 was more flexible when compared to other shoes.
4 reasons not to buy
Some users felt some pain when they initially started wearing the shoe.
According to some testers, the mesh was very thin. It easily tore apart after only several uses.
A few runners mentioned that the shoe felt a bit loose in the ankle.
Some runners observed that the outsole had a flimsy grip on muddy trails and slimy rocks.
Bottom line
Many claimed that the Merrell Trail Glove 4 is one of the most appealing shoes that a runner could ever have. A lot of testers admired the flexibility, slip resistance, construction and durability of the shoe. Trail Runners recommended the Merrell Trail Glove 4 because of its appealing and stylish look. They also commented that the shoe performed fairly well on short and long trail running sessions, with minimal pain at the start of wearing the shoe."
Under Armour HOVR Infinite 2,,75.0,,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 10.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Several people believe that the Under Armour HOVR Infinite 2's midsole unit is able to return energy to the foot for an energized performance.
The aesthetics of this neutral running shoe is welcomed by those who like cool-looking footwear that can be used anywhere.
Breathability is an aspect that consumers have come to notice from the upper unit of this product.
The outsole unit is lauded for providing reliable traction on the ground.
Heel security is a trait that the padded upper unit is able to provide, based on a handful of reviews.
2 reasons not to buy
Some testers have reported that the forefoot section of this product has a restrictive construction that prevents natural toe-splay.
A stiff platform has been observed by several consumers; they believe it to be a detriment to natural movement and performance.
Bottom line
Generous cushioning and a comfortable wrap are elements for which the HOVR Infinite 2 model is made. The overall construction of this product focuses on encompassing support that delicately accommodates the foot. The HOVR cushioning technology aims to deliver consistent cushioning that won't lose quality over time. Still, heightened in-shoe security can mean a restrictive wrap and a made-to-be-highly-sturdy midsole can connote stiffness, so caution is advised about these elements."
New Balance Fresh Foam Arishi, New Balance,86.0,,1935.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.4oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, New Balance Fresh Foam Arishi v3,"8 reasons to buy
Most users were happy about the versatility of the shoe. These users were able to use the Fresh Foam Arishi as a running shoe and lifestyle sneaker.
Several reviewers said that the shoe felt sufficiently comfortable.
Testers raved about how affordable the shoe is on their reviews.
Some runners felt that the cushioning was soft enough.
The shoe delivered adequate grip on flat surfaces like the road, based on a number of comments from users.
A lot of testers were pleased that the shoe came in wider widths.
A majority of runners praised the stylishness of the shoe.
There were runners who said that the shoe was well ventilated.
4 reasons not to buy
Some reviews mentioned that the fit of the shoe was too narrow.
Another tester said that her feet were aching after long hours with the shoe on.
Most runners said that it did not have enough arch support and footbed
One user did not like that the shoe made her feel like she was walking on the ground.
Bottom line
The New Balance Fresh Foam Arishi is a neutral running shoe that was designed with comfort, functionality, and style in mind. Equipped with Fresh Foam cushioning and a breathable upper, it’s a great choice for those seeking an affordable performance shoe that can be doubled as a lifestyle sneaker."
Salomon Predict RA,,91.0,88.0,27.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.4oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
A significant number of consumers commented that the Salomon Predict RA is comfortable.
The majority of the users said that the running shoe is well-padded.
It provides an excellent fit, based on some reviews.
According to a purchaser who tried it, the shoe is true to size.
Several reviewers admired its excellent quality.
Based on some reviews, the shoe has a wide toe box.
1 reasons not to buy
One of the users said that the shoe is not responsive.
Bottom line
Many consumers lauded Salomon Predict RA's excellent fit and quality. Aside from its structure, they loved the technologies integrated into the shoe. Although one of the users had issues of it being unresponsive during his activity, others still recommend the footwear as a good option when looking for a trail running shoe. Overall, the Salomon Predict RA gained appreciation because of its amazing performance on different running surfaces."
Newton Gravity 8,,92.0,93.0,37.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.7oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 3mm , Women: 3mm,,, Newton Gravity 9,"6 reasons to buy
A few runners mentioned that the Newton Gravity 8 has a roomy toe box.
The shoe has improved on the support it provides to the foot, according to a reviewer.
Several purchasers agreed that the eighth Newton Gravity is lightweight.
The midsole of the Gravity 8 is smooth and responsive, wrote a tester.
A number of wearers commented that the shoe is lightweight.
One user stated that the Newton Gravity 8 had the perfect fit.
1 reasons not to buy
Many were disappointed with the Gravity 8’s lack of color options.
Bottom line
Many users praised the Gravity 8 and claimed they were satisfied with its updates; the shoe has definitely improved from its previous versions according to constant users of the series. With the shoe’s reliable support, lightweight structure, and efficient performance, both old and new customers have been impressed and said they would repurchase the Newton Gravity."
Mizuno Wave Sky 2,,94.0,89.0,894.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.8oz , Women: 10.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Mizuno Wave Sky 3,"6 reasons to buy
Some of the runners commented that the shoe was responsive.
According to those who have tried it, the footwear has excellent cushioning.
Several buyers lauded its well-constructed upper.
Based on some reviews, the Mizuno Wave Sky 2 was perfect for long and short runs and walks.
One of the purchasers admired the shoe's flexibility.
It was comfortable, a consumer noted.
2 reasons not to buy
A wearer observed that the shoe does not have aggressive lugs. As a result, the right amount of traction needed on various surfaces is not provided.
According to some users, the sock liner is a little heavy.
Bottom line
A significant number of buyers who tried the Mizuno Wave Sky 2 loved the footwear's exceptional level of responsiveness and cushioning. It has the perfect combination of comfort and flexibility that the runner needed in short and extended walking and running activities. In general, the Mizuno Wave Sky 2 gained a lot of appreciation because of its well-constructed upper, fantastic design and amazing performance."
Mizuno WaveKnit R2,,88.0,86.0,40.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Most testers felt that the Mizuno WaveKnit R2 had a lightweight build that was suitable for long-running sessions.
Many people liked the eye-catching design and colorways of this road companion.
The heel and forefoot cushioning were deemed highly effective by several running enthusiasts.
Some consumers welcomed the knitted upper, stating that it was flexible and breathable.
The flexibility of the midsole unit was lauded as it accommodated the natural movement capacity of the foot.
2 reasons not to buy
Some reviewers feel the midsole of the shoe lacks bounce.
A few users have observed that the shoe does not offer a secure fit as expected.
Bottom line
The Mizuno WaveKnit R2 was able to receive welcoming reviews from consumers who desired a road shoe that offered form-fitting support and lightweight performance. The upper unit and the midsole were elements that were focused as they apparently did what was expected of a neutral shoe. The negative comments were few, and only focused on some fit issues."
Adidas Terrex Agravic XT,,86.0,,223.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.2oz , Women: 11oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
According to a few wearers, the Adidas Terrex Agravic XT is a comfortable trail running shoe.
Some use comments highlighted that the shoe is made from premium materials and is very durable.
A few buyers liked the shoe’s design; they said it looks great.
A couple of runners mentioned that the Boost midsole is very effective in delivering consistent cushioning that is very much needed for trail running.
Several testers were satisfied with the shoe’s breathability.
One user mentioned that this Adidas running shoe requires no break-in period.
The Adidas Terrex Agravic XT has a lightweight construction, some runners said.
2 reasons not to buy
Some users disliked the excessive room of the toe box.
The grip of the outsole could be improved with additional lugs, according to a few reviewers.
Bottom line
As a trail running shoe, the Adidas Terrex Agravic XT is built to deliver a perfect balance of cushioning and durability to withstand varied terrains. It has gained the appreciation of many runners. Though there has been an issue with the fit and traction, overall, the shoe still delivers its promise. This running shoe is best for runners who are looking for a lightweight, breathable, and comfortable trail running partner."
Puma Hybrid NX, Puma,92.0,85.0,146.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.2oz , Women: 11.2oz,,,," Normal, Wide | Normal, Wide",,"6 reasons to buy
Some of the consumers say that the Puma Hybrid NX is comfortable.
Based on reviews, the shoe is stable.
According to those who have tested it, the footwear is best used for cross-training, short runs, and gym activities.
The shoe is well-cushioned, several testers commented.
It is true to size, noted by a few consumers.
The majority of the buyers love its stylish look.
1 reasons not to buy
One of the buyers said that the shoe has a narrow width. As a result, it feels too tight during the running session.
Bottom line
The majority of the consumers have found themselves happy and contented with their purchase of the Puma Hybrid NX. The shoe received a lot of praise because of its design and excellent construction. Although one of the buyers has issues with its narrow width, others were appreciative of how the shoe performed in different types of activities. With many praises about the shoe’s comfort level and cushioning, there is no doubt that they recommend the Hybrid NX to their peers because of its quality and performance."
Nike Zoom Vaporfly 4% Flyknit,,86.0,92.0,43.0,,, Road, Neutral,,, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Those who have tried the Nike Zoom Vaporfly 4% Flyknit stated that they liked using it for tempo runs and speed training sessions.
Some testers reported that the midsole unit felt comfortable and responsive.
Most runners claimed that the sizing scheme of the Zoom Vaporfly 4% Flyknit followed their expectations.
Testers appreciated the tongue-less structure of the upper unit as it provided a smooth hug.
The color schemes were eye-catching, a couple of purchasers noted.
3 reasons not to buy
For a running shoe that is designed for speed, the Zoom Vaporfly 4% is quite heavy, according to some runners.
Several people felt that the heel was a bit loose; they experienced some slippage during their initial runs.
Many reviewers have experienced the outsole coming apart from the rest of the shoe after only a short-time usage.
Bottom line
The Nike Zoom Vaporfly 4% Flyknit running shoe gained favor as a reliable racing and speed training companion for the roads. Most consumers were happy with its performance and its overall quality. They apparently felt fast and enabled while tackling their running sessions. On the other hand, some users have complained about the shoe's durability and weight, factors that they have found to be disappointing."
Salomon X-Mission 3,,92.0,88.0,1621.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Breathable coverage is provided by the 3D Mesh upper.
The Sensifit overlay system wraps around the foot in a secure but customizable way.
Runners appreciated the inclusion of the Sensiflex stretch panels, which support the foot while also encouraging flexibility.
The Quicklace system was welcomed by many runners because it made it easier for them to adjust the tightness and looseness of the fit.
Underfoot cushioning is handled well by the plush and durable full-length foam unit.
Anti-abrasion rubber with non-prominent gripping lugs make the outsole useful on both the trails and the roads.
2 reasons not to buy
A few runners noted that the toe area was a bit tight.
The ankle collar is too high, which caused cuts to the skin, said a wearer.
Bottom line
The X-Mission 3 from Salomon gives runners the grace and power to traverse many types of surfaces with ease. Durable components allow the foot to be protected from any immediate danger, and trail-optimized sections help in performing exceptionally well on unpredictable terrain. Still, it can function on the roads, making trail-to-asphalt transitions quite easy."
Asics Gel Excite 7, Asics,81.0,81.0,8.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,, Asics Gel Excite 6 Twist,"6 reasons to buy
The Asics Gel Excite 7 is comfortable to wear, based on reviews. 
Several runners claim that this cushioned shoe is perfect for long runs. 
Many wearers appreciate the breathability of this running partner. 
It is supportive, according to numerous consumers. 
This shoe feels light and fast, a few users observe. 
People admire this running shoe’s stylish design.
3 reasons not to buy
A couple of buyers noticed that the Asics Gel Excite 7 is a bit narrow.
Some testers reported that the upper material rubs against the top of the foot. 
One reviewer experiences heel slippage.
Bottom line
Created with a clean upper design, the Asics Gel Excite 7 is recommended for runners and athletes who want to keep things simple. This road running shoe works best for runners with neutral gaits or those who do not overpronate. 
The Asics Gel Excite 7 is manufactured using advanced technologies to meet the standards of running enthusiasts who are looking for comfort, flexibility, and budget-friendly option. "
Hoka One One Clifton 5,,93.0,86.0,7062.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.4oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,, Hoka One One Clifton 6,"5 reasons to buy
Many people liked the soft cushioning unit of the Hoka One One Clifton 5.
The color schemes of this model were lauded for being eye-catching.
The durability of the materials and the quality of the construction were appreciated by most testers.
Several heavyset consumers stated that the underfoot platform offered sufficient support throughout the day.
The breathable fabrics of the upper were praised because they keep maintained a cool and dry environment for the foot.
3 reasons not to buy
A few testers claimed that the softness of the midsole prevented it from giving a snappy forefoot lift.
The upper unit was deemed stiff by many consumers; they noted some skin irritation because of its unresponsiveness.
Some runners reported that the silhouette was uncomfortably narrow.
Bottom line
There was a bevy of positive remarks regarding the arrival of the Hoka One One Clifton 5. Most neutral runners were happy with its design, its durable build, and its well-ventilated upper. But the cushioning unit became a topic of contention; while some people were delighted with the soft and supportive structure of the midsole, others weren’t as welcoming because it apparently restricted the running output. Overall, the response for the Clifton 5 was middling as it’s one of Hoka’s most discussed products."
Saucony Cohesion 13,,83.0,,9.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.9oz , Women: 7.3oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Many users loved the lightweight structure of the Saucony Cohesion 13.
This shoe is comfortable, according to the reviewers. 
It is supportive, numerous consumers claimed. 
The shoe offers a soft and responsive ride, said some buyers. 
Several testers appreciated the shoe’s overall quality. 
A lot of purchasers commented that it is also suitable for work and gym sessions. 
3 reasons not to buy
The Saucony Cohesion 13 is only good for entry-level runners, said a tester. 
One wearer reported that the shoe is a bit stiff.
A couple of commenters mention that the toe box section is too wide.
Bottom line
The Saucony Cohesion 13 is a neutral running shoe that is designed for runners and athletes who need flexibility, cushioning, and versatility. It is an affordable running shoe crafted with a durable outsole material and responsive midsole foam, providing a well-protected and efficient ride. This shoe is also suitable for casual walks.
   "
Saucony Guide ISO,,89.0,87.0,427.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 9.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Saucony Guide ISO 2,"7 reasons to buy
A lot of runners commented that the shoe was supportive.
According to some reviewers, the product was comfortable.
Many testers agreed that the fit was perfect.
Several wearers were impressed with the Saucony Guide ISO's lightweight structure.
A good number of consumers said that the price was affordable.
The majority of the users were happy with the shoe's responsiveness.
One of the buyers loved its appearance.
5 reasons not to buy
Some runners observed that the sole unit was not durable.
It irked a few people that it has limited color variations.
Some of the testers felt a little pain near the top of the foot while wearing the product.
A lot of runners experienced foot numbness.
Several users had blister problems after wearing the Saucony Guide ISO.
Bottom line
The majority of the wearers agreed that the Saucony Guide ISO was supportive and comfortable. They were impressed with the product's perfect fit and lightweight structure. Although several of them experienced foot numbness, discomfort and blister problems, others still recommended the shoe because of its appearance, responsiveness and affordable price."
On Cloudventure,,89.0,85.0,167.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The On Cloudventure utilizes a 2-layer upper, which is breathable and water-resistant.
This shoe becomes more visible in low-light conditions because of its reflective strips.
Runners appreciated the inclusion of a protective toe cap, which is made from rubber and engineered mesh.
The CloudTec® is a sole unit that’s made up of 11 individual pods, which deliver impact protection and responsive cushioning.
A soft and lightweight foam gives the runner immediate cushioning to the underfoot.
The outsole has been designed to full integrate itself responsibly to the outdoor terrain, keeping the runner in control over the surfaces.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners thought that a fully waterproof upper might’ve been better when it comes to delivering sure protection against the elements.
The On Cloudventure has an expensive price.
Bottom line
The On Cloudventure is a neutral running shoe that’s great for runners who want to stay comfortable and secure when they’re tackling the trails. The outsole delivers traction, while the mid-sole ensures suitable cushioning for the foot. Breathable coverage that’s also durable is afforded to the runner. It’s a solid choice for those trail adventurers out there."
Saucony Peregrine ISO,,92.0,88.0,195.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The Saucony Peregrine ISO is a very comfortable shoe, said some runners.
Based on some comments, the shoe runs true to size.
A few mentioned that the shoe is not difficult to put on.
Many users lauded the shoe’s excellent grip on varied trail surfaces.
A couple of buyers admired the durable design of the Peregrine ISO.
Some runners admired the shoe’s wide toe box.
The Saucony Peregrine ISO has a very responsive cushioning, said some users.
2 reasons not to buy
A few users found the shoe to be too wide for their medium foot shape.
According to a few user reviews, the color of the shoe is not pleasing and they expected to see more color options.
Bottom line
Saucony is known to be a reliable brand when it comes to trail running shoes and indeed, the brand receives praises for creating the Saucony Peregrine ISO.
Most users admired the shoe’s durability, cushioning and comfortable cushioning. Though a few have issues with the color options and width, overall, the Peregrine ISO is still considered by some as a worthy investment."
Asics GT 2000 8,,92.0,86.0,153.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics GT 2000 8 Lite-Show,"6 reasons to buy
Many of the users are satisfied with the sufficient support provided by the Asics GT 2000 8. 
According to many, this stability running shoe delivers a comfortable ride. 
Several testers have complimented the shoe for allowing a secure fit. 
Because of the flex grooves furnished to the outsole of the shoe, an easier and efficient transition is achieved, several runners stated. 
The Asics GT 2000 8 guarantees a stable ride, commented several wearers. 
Many experts praise the shoe for delivering a highly responsive ride. 
2 reasons not to buy
Despite the adequate amount of foam supplied to the shoe, several reviewers noted that the shoe is still not the softest. 
A disappointed reviewer is not satisfied with the weight of the shoe; it is quite heavy. 
Bottom line
Built to uphold Asics’ signature of comfort and stability, the Asics GT 2000 8 did not disappoint. Receiving both positive and negative criticisms from different reviewers, runners, and experts, the overall reception of the shoe has been leaning towards positive. Many runners are very appreciative of the sufficient support provided by the shoe and the stable ride it supplies. Despite having some concerns with its weight, a number of users still lauded the shoe for being very responsive. Because of the good qualities of the shoe, many claim that they will surely recommend the GT 2000 8 to their peers."
Brooks Dyad 10,,81.0,85.0,327.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.6oz , Women: 10.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Brooks Dyad 11,"5 reasons to buy
Many users agreed that the Dyad 10 was a comfortable running shoe.
With a wider toe box, the Dyad 10 was easily a significant improvement from the previous version, a wearer said. Others have also favored the Dyad 10 over its predecessor regarding the forefoot fit.
One user was pleased that the tenth iteration retained the familiar cushioning and support of the earlier Dyad shoes.
The shoe helped eliminate heel pain, as experienced by a wearer. Another user has reported fewer sharp pains in the underfoot since wearing the Dyad 10.
Customers were pleased that the shoe was available in various width options.
3 reasons not to buy
A few buyers were less than happy with the limited color option of the shoe.
One user was slightly dissatisfied with the narrow tongue of the Dyad 10.
The shoelaces were too short, some reviewers said.
Bottom line
Now on its tenth version, the Brooks Dyad series has remained to wow users with its functionality and comfort. Many consumers were happy that this neutral running shoe has been improved based on the reviews of the previous version. Although some have pointed out design flaws, the Dyad 10 was easily a remarkable release by Brooks that runners found to be a valuable upgrade."
New Balance Summit KOM,,84.0,86.0,148.0,,, Trail, Neutral,,,,,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The width profiles of the New Balance Summit KOM were appreciated by a few for being adherent to expectations.
The traction capacity of this shoe’s outsole was lauded; people noted that they didn’t experience any slippage while running.
The underfoot cushioning was deemed responsive and supportive by those who have tested the shoe.
Given its performance, the shoe is reasonably-priced, according to a few users.
A few happy users found the shoe durable.
3 reasons not to buy
Some consumers lamented the stiffness of the New Balance Summit KOM’s sole unit.
Several people claimed that the forefoot section was too narrow for their tastes.
This running shoe felt heavy, according to a handful of purchasers.
Bottom line
The Summit KOM was expected to be the evolution of the roster of trail options from New Balance. In fact, many were quick to claim that it was supposed to channel the efficacy of the Leadville v3. Alas, it wasn’t meant to be because this shoe was said to have a narrow forefoot design, an unreasonably stiff and stout build, and an irritating inner sleeve. But the outsole’s gripping capability and the midsole’s responsive quality were highlighted as positive points about this trail companion."
Skechers GOrun Fast - Valor, Skechers,96.0,,167.0,$65,$50 (save 69%), Road, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 6.4oz,,, Jun 2019, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
The majority of the testers commented that the Skechers GOrun Fast - Valor is comfortable.
A significant number of purchasers said that the shoe is stylish.
Based on some reviews, the shoe was best used for running, walking, and everyday wear.
Many users loved its lightweight structure.
According to those who have bought it, the running shoe is breathable.
A good number of wearers said that it is well-cushioned.
It held and supports the foot properly, noted by a reviewer.
2 reasons not to buy
The shoe needed a break-in period, based on a review.
A purchaser commented that the shoe is not durable.
Bottom line
The shoe gained appreciation from the majority of the users; they were contented with the shoe’s design, comfort level, and breathability. Despite the negative comments, the Skechers GOrun Fast - Valor is still preferred by many because of its fantastic construction and performance on the roads. Overall, the Skechers GOrun Fast - Valor is considered by many as a versatile running shoe with excellent cushioning."
Asics Gel Quantum 360 Knit,,90.0,85.0,1058.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.6oz , Women: 10.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Quantum 360 Knit 2,"9 reasons to buy
A lot of runners have lauded the shoe on how comfortable it is.
Some testers have reported going sockless with the Quantum 360 Knit and not having any hot spots or blisters.
As noted by most testers, the stretchy knit upper molded well to the foot, giving a glove-like fit.
A lot of runners shared that the upper offered great ventilation.
The knitted upper fabric proved to be good at keeping the feet dry during runs, commented by a consumer.
Testers have stated that the cushioning material of Quantum 360 Knit delivered as promised; it did great in terms of helping protect the feet and legs from the impact generated by footfalls.
Some were pleasantly surprised by the damping technology of the Gel Quantum 360 Knit, which gave them smoother strides & takeoffs.
The outsole tread has been observed to provide good grip even on wet surfaces.
Some claimed that the upper granted good structure on the midfoot and heel cup area, which prevented foot slippage.
4 reasons not to buy
A handful of wearers has commented on how heavy the shoe was for them.
A runner had also noted that this shoe’s midsole tended to be noisy or squeaky during runs.
Some testers observed that the midfoot area was a bit narrow.
The mid-sole tended to be stiff and needed a break-in period, a couple of runners claimed.
Bottom line
The Gel Quantum 360 Knit features a seamless knit upper that afforded runners a sock-like fit and exceptional breathability. It delivers responsive and exceptional cushioning upon impact while providing strong-push offs, thanks to its signature 360 Gel Technology. While many are impressed with the quality of this shoe, there were others who felt that it is a bit heavy and narrow. Overall, it’s a good road shoe for neutral pronators who need a reliable ride for short to mid-distance runs."
Hoka One One Tracer 2,,92.0,94.0,330.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.7oz , Women: 6.7oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Many runners commented that the Hoka One One Tracer 2 was suitably lightweight.
Most testers stated that the upper unit hugged the foot like a glove, giving a secure yet agreeable coverage.
The underfoot foam unit was lauded for offering responsive cushioning.
Several purchasers noted that the sole unit didn’t have an excessive thickness, which apparently caused this shoe to look more appealing.
According to a few people, the toe-box was noticeably spacious compared to the tight one in the previous model.
The overall performance and versatility of the Tracer 2 were appreciated by
‘Comfortable’ was a word that was frequently used to describe the experience with this shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
The cushioning felt stiff, according to a tester. He thought that it didn’t accommodate the natural bending of his foot.
It was uncomfortably tight, a runner complained. It caused him to return the shoe.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Tracer 2 received positive feedback from most of those who have tested it. They liked this Hoka One One road running shoe’s performance, its versatility, and the effectiveness of its components. But there were those who had opposite experiences. For them, it did not live up to their expectation. Despite the complaints, the Tracer 2 was still a terrific neutral running companion for the majority."
Asics Roadhawk FF 2,,93.0,90.0,171.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.3oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The forefoot section of the Asics Roadhawk FF 2’s platform offered a responsive liftoff, some consumers noted.
A purchaser stated that it functioned well as a racing shoe.
The upper unit felt more breathable and supportive than the one in the first Roadhawk FF, several testers claimed.
The colorways looked appealing to those who have tried the shoe.
The forefoot section was appreciated because it had room for toe splay.
1 reasons not to buy
A few testers claimed that this shoe was weightier than the first iteration.
Bottom line
The Asics Roadhawk FF 2 was accepted by its purchasers as it was apparently able to provide a solid performance on the roads. The functionality of this product wasn’t doubted; it is actually welcomed. Racers and regular runners were happy. On the other hand, the weight was deemed a bit more substantial than the original Roadhawk FF variant."
Asics Gel Kayano 24,,93.0,89.0,4424.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 9.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 13mm,,, Asics Gel Kayano 27,"9 reasons to buy
The majority of runners felt extremely comfortable with the cushioning of the Asics Gel Kayano 24.
Many of the users were happy with the shoe’s heavy-duty performance and preferred it for long term races and marathons.
Users generally appreciated the grip of the outsole and found its support very firm, especially on the heel area.
The mid-sole unit’s shock-absorbing ability gained some fans because it apparently prevented any duress generated by the constancy of the foot-strike.
The lightweight nature of this product impressed many wearers.
The stability mechanisms present in the Kayano 24 gained positive remarks for being reliable.
Some customers were attracted to the colors available for this model, as well as its sleek and snappy design.
According to a great number of reviews, it remained true to the standard sizing schemes.
Some of the buyers were happy with its stretchy fit and the flexible nature of the upper.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners reported that the mid-sole unit didn’t make all-day wear very comfortable because it was apparently stiff unwieldy.
There were consumers who felt that the price is expensive.
A few of the materials used in the upper looked cheap, according to a consumer; he noted that the lettering had dissolved and the colors fused with the laces.
Bottom line
Many runners were satisfied with the construction of Asics Gel Kayano 24. For them, it provided an enhanced cushioned ride and high-level support. Most of its users also believed that the tremendous performance of the shoe makes it highly suitable for longer runs."
Hoka One One Hupana Flow,,93.0,91.0,10.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.9oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
Many users commented that the Hoka One One Hupana Flow excellently absorbs shock during the run.
Its attractive design was admired by a lot of testers. 
The shoe was comfortable, based on several reviews.
A good number of buyers said that the running shoe is durable.
The majority of the consumers agreed that the shoe is lightweight.
According to one of the buyers, the Hupana Flow provides good arch support.
The Hoka One One Hupana Flow is best used for gym, pavement, and walking activities as well as with orthotics or inserts.
Several purchasers said that the shoe runs true to size.
Many testers lauded its perfect fit.
2 reasons not to buy
The lack of a gusset makes the tongue slide out of place, according to a tester.
A reviewer commented that the shoe has poor sidewall and sole surface reinforcement.
Bottom line
The Hupana Flow from Hoka One One became one of the favorite running shoes of testers and purchasers. It is evident in the positive feedback of the users that they are satisfied and happy with what the shoe has to offer. Its comfort level, fit, appealing design, and the lightweight structure were admired by many of the users. Despite the issue of the colorways and sidewall reinforcement, others still lauded the shoe's performance and construction. Overall, the Hoka One One Hupana Flow was accepted by many users as a versatile running shoe that has the perfect combination of quality and performance."
Adidas Ultraboost DNA,,93.0,97.0,5.0,,, Road, Neutral,,, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The Adidas Ultraboost DNA is comfortable, based on reviews. 
Many users said that this running companion is responsive. 
Several wearers have testified that this shoe is durable. 
A couple of runners commented that the heel cup offers added support. 
People loved the elegant look of this running shoe. 
It is also suitable for gym sessions and casual walks, according to some buyers. 
The majority of the purchasers praised the overall quality and performance of this shoe. 
3 reasons not to buy
A few testers mentioned that the Adidas Ultraboost DNA is a bit tight. 
One reviewer noted that this shoe could be a bit slippery on wet pavements. 
The foot could feel slightly warm after a long period of wear, said a consumer.
Bottom line
Boasting a fashion-friendly design, the Adidas Ultraboost DNA is an everyday road running shoe that features a sleek and contemporary look. It is a high performance running shoe that works best for runners and athletes with neutral gaits. This shoe is packed with state-of-the-art technologies that help deliver lasting comfort, protection, and versatility.  "
Adidas Questar Ride,,91.0,,982.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.6oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 11mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The width profile of the Adidas Questar Ride impressed many consumers.
The weight of this running shoe was deemed lightweight by most testers.
Several people liked the price; for them, it was affordable.
Some runners noted that the general quality of the materials was reliable and sound.
The design was well-liked by a lot of those who have purchased it.
Most testers were happy with the traction-ready outsole configuration.
A few people appreciated the flexible nature of the underfoot platform; they claimed that it allowed them to toe-off more efficiently.
3 reasons not to buy
Some consumers claimed that the mesh in the forefoot section rubbed uncomfortably against the toes.
A few testers claimed that the midfoot section of the upper was too narrow.
A handful of purchasers complained that the midsole’s lack of arch support caused some discomfort to the underfoot.
Bottom line
Many people were happy with the Adidas Questar Ride. Many of them claimed that it offered lightweight comfort and performance on the roads. Moreover, they liked the agreeable price and dependable components. On the other hand, there were concerns with the neutral shoe's upper unit being irritating to the skin, as well as incidents wherein runners got inconsistent shoe-sizes for their purchased pair."
Saucony Triumph ISO 4,,90.0,87.0,408.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Saucony Triumph ISO 5,"5 reasons to buy
The Saucony Triumph ISO 4 looked appealing, based on some consumers’ responses.
Several runners mentioned that the shoe is comfortable enough even when worn for long hours.
Some users mentioned that the shoe offers a good amount of breathability even on warm running conditions. 
The shoe feels light and fast, said a few wearers.
The shoe runs true to size.
2 reasons not to buy
Several testers complained that the fit was too narrow in the forefoot and midfoot sections.
The shoe is expensive.
Bottom line
The Saucony Triumph ISO 4 received mostly negative reviews from those who have tested it. People were shocked that it gave such a stiff ride and an uncomfortably narrow in-shoe experience. They expected more out of it as it’s an update to one of the up-and-coming series of footwear that’s garnered a fan base. The restructured design was welcomed by some, but that’s just about the only positive feedback about this road shoe."
Hoka One One Speedgoat 4,,81.0,90.0,5.0,,, Trail, Neutral,,,,,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Some runners said that the Speedgoat 4 is perfect for technical terrains. 
The shoe offers great foot protection, claimed a few wearers. 
It is lightweight and fast, according to some reviewers. 
Several buyers noted that Speedgoat 4 is comfortable to wear.
Many have appreciated the cushioning system of the shoe. 
One user commented that the new lug pattern delivers better traction. 
It offers good performance in cold and wet conditions, said a purchaser. 
A consumer praised the addition of midfoot overlays. 
4 reasons not to buy
The shoe uses rigid upper materials, according to a few users. 
A couple of runners complained that the shoe is not supportive. 
This running shoe is not durable, based on some reviews. 
Some testers reported that Hoka One One Speedgoat 4 is a bit narrow.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Speedgoat 4 is a neutral running shoe that had undergone improvements to offer better performance in the toughest terrain. Its updated features are working together to deliver a more accommodating fit, responsive ride, and lightweight running experience. 
The shoe continues to take pride in providing the strength and comfort of its previous versions by giving great traction, excellent cushioning, and breathable coverage. "
Inov-8 Roclite G 275,,90.0,90.0,28.0,,," Trail, Mud", Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"10 reasons to buy
A significant number of consumers commented that the Inov-8 Roclite 275 is lightweight.
The majority of the users said that the running shoe is comfortable.
According to a purchaser who has tried it, the shoe was easy to break in.
It provides excellent traction on surfaces, based on some reviews.
Some of the testers commented that the shoe is breathable.
Several reviewers agreed that the Inov 8 Roclite 275 is durable.
A good number of consumers said that the shoe has a roomy toe box.
It is well-cushioned, according to some reviewers.
Based on reviews, the shoe is flexible.
According to those who have tested it, the running footwear is suitable for rocky and muddy terrains.
3 reasons not to buy
Some users observed that shoelaces are too thin. It needed to be double-tied to prevent loosening during the running activity.
A few wearers noted that the foot does not feel secure during the running activity.
A tester commented that the laces fall apart after several uses only.
Bottom line
Many people liked the Inov-8 Roclite 275. They accepted the features and technologies integrated into the shoe in a positive way. Moreover, the flexibility, cushioning, comfort level, and lightweight structure of this model were lauded by many users. Some purchasers complained of its thin and not durable laces but, overall, the Inov-8 Roclite 275 was admired by many because of its fantastic construction. and excellent performance on a wide variety of terrains."
Brooks Ghost 12 GTX,,92.0,97.0,93.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.4oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
A lot of reviewers say that the Brooks Ghost 12 GTX is flexible. 
It is highly durable, remarked some.
Many laud its ample cushioning. 
Several claim that it helps improve their performance.
Quite a few commend the responsiveness delivered by the shoe. 
2 reasons not to buy
One reviewer states that it feels a little too stiff. 
It causes slight discomfort, noted some. 
Bottom line
A special version to the Brooks Ghost series, the Ghost 12 GTX is hailed by many for its reliable functions. As indicated by its name, this running shoe is waterproof, allowing a maximized and safe running experience even during muddy and rainy conditions. For its price, the Brooks Ghost 12 GTX boasts long-lasting durability, flexibility, and support. "
Mizuno Wave Prophecy 8,,79.0,,196.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 14oz , Women: 13.8oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Mizuno Wave Prophecy 9,"5 reasons to buy
People noted that the cushioning system of the Mizuno Wave Prophecy 8 didn’t lose structure or level of robustness, even after many miles of running.
The durability of the materials was lauded; consumers stated that the shoe lasted long.
The general quality of this road companion was praised by those who believed that this shoe was worth every penny.
Some heavyset consumers felt that this running shoe was able to support the weights of their bodies.
A handful of people stated that the outsole unit was able to provide reliable traction.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people claimed that the midsole felt a bit too stiff.
It is expensive.
Bottom line
The general feedback for the Mizuno Wave Prophecy 8 was positive. People flocked towards this neutral shoe because they felt that it was durable. Even heavyset purchasers felt supported by the midsole unit. The outsole’s traction capacity, the overall quality of the components, and the long-lasting nature of the midsole foam also became highlights. Conversely, some testers felt that the midsole was a bit too firm for comfort.
The Mizuno Wave Prophecy 8 is a road running enthusiast’s companion, as well as a solid choice for neutral runners and those who desire unwavering underfoot support."
New Balance Fresh Foam Tempo,,81.0,77.0,8.0,,, Road,, Men: 8.5oz , Women: 6.8oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Several people have noted that the aesthetics and vibrant color schemes of the New Balance Fresh Foam Tempoheighten its overall visual aspect.
Some users have mentioned that this neutral running shoe has a lightweight build that encourages all-day use.
Breathability is a trait that is appreciated by most consumers.
Based on a handful of reviews, the gripping capability of the outsole unit is precise and agreeable.
The underfoot cushioning system of this road running shoe is welcomed because it has a slightly firm yet springy ride.
2 reasons not to buy
Some testers are claiming that the in-shoe experience is restrictive.
The multilayered external counter is criticized for putting pressure against the skin of the heel.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of people towards the New Balance Fresh Foam Tempo has been positive. This running shoe is welcomed because of its cool-looking silhouette, as well as its relatively light construction that permits extended running sessions. Conversely, the in-shoe experience is thought to be a bit restrictive and irritating to the skin of the heel.
Fans of versatile apparel for those road adventures can enjoy the Fresh Foam Tempo."
Hoka One One Bondi 5,,90.0,85.0,1377.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Hoka One One Bondi 6,"10 reasons to buy
A majority of the reviewers felt comfortable while wearing the Hoka Bondi 5.
The wide toe box should be a welcome change, particularly for those who have slightly wider feet.
The extra widths available should be even better good news for those who require more room up front.
Some runners noticed how light the shoe is despite the oversized cushioning.
A handful of reviewers really liked the lightweight and breathable upper.
Some of those who have had foot, back, or hip problems felt better when running in the Hoka One One Bondi 5.
The traction is quite good for a road shoe that it can do adequately well on light trails, according to a few.
A small number of runners mentioned their stable rides in this shoe.
Several of those who are up on their feet most of the time during work valued the shoe’s cushioning.
Outsole durability gets a boost with the addition of more rubber.
5 reasons not to buy
Some loyal fans of the Bondi did not like the stiffer midsole, which took away their pleasure during long distance runs.
A good number of Hoka fans bemoaned that it still lacks the room in the toe box despite the added space in the latest version of the Bondi.
A handful of runners observed that the meta-rocker technology felt dead in this shoe and removed the smooth transition through the gait cycle.
The price of the Bondi 5 is quite expensive.
A few runners had problems with the tongue as it caused rubbing or irritation.
Bottom line
Hoka markets the Bondi 5 as its most cushioned runner, which is quite a feat in itself as the Hoka brand is known for its oversized cushioning. The latest version of this ultra-cushioned trainer has decent arch support, more room in the forefoot, excellent ventilation, and the added benefits of an extra wide option. While some loyal fans of the Bondi are hotly divided regarding the shoe’s performance, Hoka offered upgrades that have been generally well-accepted and welcomed by runners."
Topo Athletic Phantom,,93.0,89.0,62.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.6oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
According to numerous reviewers, the Topo Athletic Phantom has enough room for natural toe splay. 
The running shoe provides a plush sensation to the foot, shared some customers.
Many users appreciate the lightness of the road running shoe. 
A few of the runners attest to the breathability of the shoe. 
The outsole configuration of the running shoe allows for flexibility, claimed a number of wearers. 
Various purchasers hail the neutral running shoe for its good lockdown and ankle security. 
The shoe has a good impact resistance, remarked some users. 
It delivers a stable performance, shared some commenters.
4 reasons not to buy
Multiple testers have stated that it's hard to run fast in the neutral running shoe.
Some runners have expressed that the midsole of the lightweight shoe is too soft. 
A number of experts have observed that the road running shoe caused foot slippage. 
Several customers are apprehensive about the stack height of the running shoe.
Bottom line
Flaunting Topo Athletic's signature roomy toe box, the Phantom offers unrestricted foot motions. Featuring an ergonomics-centric design, runners can expect an adaptive, secure fit. With its stack height, the road running shoe does not compromise when it comes to support and cushioning. With the Topo Athletic Phantom, athletes are equipped with a comfortable and responsive ride loaded in a featherlight platform."
Brooks Divide,,89.0,88.0,7.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Many runners praised the gripping performance of the Brooks Divide. 
This running partner is comfortable, according to many users. 
A wearer commented that this shoe is lighter compared to other trail running shoes. 
It is highly recommended for mixed terrain runs, based on reviews. 
Several consumers highlighted the overall quality of the shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
One disappointed user complained because the tongue of the Brooks Divide is too short. 
The extra fabric in the upper causes discomfort, said a tester.
Bottom line
Designed with an aggressive rubber outsole, the Brooks Divide equips the runners and athletes to run confidently on both paved surfaces and trails. It is crafted using durable materials and state-of-the-art technologies for excellent breathability, protection, flexibility, and comfort. This Brooks running shoe works best for neutral runners or athletes who supinate. "
Nike Air Zoom Wildhorse 6,,87.0,84.0,9.0,,," Trail, Mud", Neutral,,, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
A lot of users have testified that the Nike Air Zoom Wildhorse 6 is comfortable to wear. 
The majority of the runners highlighted the shoe’s reliable gripping performance. 
Several consumers noted that it offers better cushioning than its predecessors. 
The woven material on the heel was praised by those who have worn this shoe. 
It offers excellent performance in both wet and dry conditions, based on reviews. 
A couple of reviewers appreciated the responsive midsole of the shoe. 
Many commenters expressed that this running partner is durable.
This running shoe looks great and feels great, some runners claimed.
4 reasons not to buy
The Nike Air Zoom Wildhorse 6 is heavy, according to several runners. 
One wearer mentioned that the padding around the Achilles causes discomfort. 
The segmented rock plate doesn’t offer enough protection, said a buyer. 
A few testers mentioned that this shoe felt a bit narrow. 
Bottom line
Created to provide long-lasting comfort and protection, the Nike Zoom Wildhorse 6 is a highly durable running shoe that is suitable for off-road adventures. It incorporates an aggressive outsole, cushioned midsole, and breathable top for a comfortable and efficient ride. This trail running shoe is ideal for runners and athletes with neutral gaits or those who do not overpronate. "
Nike Downshifter 10,,90.0,90.0,7.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 9.3oz , Women: 7.9oz,,,,,,"9 reasons to buy
Several experts commend the snug fit of the Nike Downshifter 10. 
The running shoe has good lockdown, reported quite a few athletes. 
Various reviewers appreciate the versatile use of the road running shoe. 
According to many customers, the shoe is very comfortable on the foot. 
The neutral running shoe is made of highly durable components, remarked some buyers. 
Multiple testers praise the excellent grip of the running shoe. 
A number of purchasers have expressed that the Nike Downshifter is very breathable. 
It is very responsive, claimed quite a few runners. 
Some racers hail the shoe for being very lightweight.
4 reasons not to buy
According to some commenters, the footbed lacks cushioning.  
The lightweight running shoe constricts foot motions, remarked several wearers. 
A few critics have stated that the toe box is too tight. 
Numerous running sportsmen are disappointed with the shoe's insufficient rearfoot security.
Bottom line
A budget-friendly running shoe from Nike, the Downshifter is all about pronounced comfort and support. Packed with trusty components and features, this Nike running shoe is ideal for beginners. Grippy, bouncy, and secure, the neutral running shoe does not fall short when it comes to maintaining a featherlight composition. Because of its makeup, the running platform also sports a multi-purpose function, allowing wearers to engage in various activities."
,,,90.0,,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,
New Balance Nitrel v3,,89.0,87.0,463.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A lot of the runners say that the New Balance Nitrel v3 is very comfortable to wear. 
One runner states that the shoe provides a lightweight feel. 
The shoe offers versatility as it can be used for both casual and running occasions. 
A lot of the people commend the colorway of the shoe.
The Nitrel v3 offers sufficient support and stability, notes one runner. 
Several users like the overall aesthetics of the shoe.
According to some runners, the shoe is very flexible. 
3 reasons not to buy
One disappointed customer notes that this running shoe is too tight, especially on the toe area. 
A burning sensation is felt on the top area of the foot after using the shoe for too long, says one user. 
The lower portion of the shoe’s tongue gets easily twisted, especially when putting on the shoe, complains one purchaser. 
Bottom line
Overall, the New Balance Nitrel v3 has received a lot of both good and bad reviews from several people. One of the main concerns that the reviewers have is that the tongue of the shoe gets easily twisted, especially when one puts on the shoe. Additionally, there have been complaints regarding the tight fit of the shoe, especially on the toe area. However, a lot of the reviewers also like the comfort that the shoe offers. Several have also mentioned that the shoe is able to provide stability and support to the runner. The lightweight feel that the shoe gave when running is also a big plus to the buyers. According to them, the Nitrel v3 is a trail running shoe that they would surely recommend to their peers. "
New Balance Fresh Foam Arishi v2,,86.0,,1498.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, New Balance Fresh Foam Arishi v3,"5 reasons to buy
The general durability of the Fresh Foam Arishi v2 was welcomed; people didn’t experience any material breakdown or separation.
The various color schemes that were available were lauded because they made the shoe pop visually.
Purchasers were happy with the breathable upper, stating that it kept the foot as dry and ventilated as possible.
The flexibility of this running shoe was appreciated; testers noted that they were able to quickly transition through the gait without any hindrances.
The light construction of this product gained praise as it didn’t cause the runners to feel as if their movements were marred or limited.
2 reasons not to buy
Some consumers stated that the Fresh Foam unit in the midsole of the Arishi v2 wasn’t as responsive or full-bodied as the ones in other shoes that feature the tech.
Several testers lamented the lack of an arch support mechanism; they felt that the flat surface of the midsole didn’t offer much comfort or steadiness to the foot-pad.
Bottom line
While people liked the New Balance Fresh Foam Arishi v2 for what it had to offer, more than a few of them weren’t happy with some of its parts. While the lightweight construction was praised, the midsole was criticized for being unsupportive of the tendons and muscles of the underfoot. In fact, most of the complaints were about the cushioning unit as it was apparently flimsy compared to other Fresh Foam models. But the flexibility and the general durability of this road companion were highlighted as effective aspects."
Salomon Speedcross 4 GTX,,91.0,85.0,3501.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.6oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Salomon Speedcross 5 GTX,"10 reasons to buy
The durability of the Salomon Speedcross 4 GTX was lauded by many testers; they wrote that it lasted a long time, even when used frequently on the trails.
The lacing system gained some fans; runners commented that they were easy to adjust and manipulate.
Many consumers felt that the upper was able to wrap around their feet snugly, just like a glove.
For a number of testers, this shoe looked cool and modern.
The waterproof mechanism that’s present in this shoe received acclaim because runners felt that it adequately protected their feet from water.
A great number of testers commented that the sizing schemes of this shoe were able to follow their preferences.
Many purchasers were able to use this running shoe during the winter season, and they reported that it stayed efficient, even when trudging through snowy surfaces.
The cushioning system was reliable, according to those who have tried it.
A reviewer stated that the sole unit kept the foot well-cushioned, even when traversing more aggressive surfaces.
The outsole’s gripping capability didn’t disappoint those who have used the Salomon Speedcross 4 GTX.
3 reasons not to buy
Runners quickly took note of this running shoe’s expensive price.
The toe box was uncomfortably narrow, reported a tester.
It ran a bit wide for a tester, and they noted that it was the reason they did not feel a glove-like fit.
Bottom line
The response towards the Salomon Speedcross 4 GTX was mostly satisfactory. Many felt that it worked responsibly on the trails and that it was truly able to deliver reliable service, even when exposed to different types of weather conditions. The general quality of this neutral shoe didn’t disappoint the trail runners. But some had a few gripes about how their feet felt when wearing it. They also noticed the steep price tag."
Saucony Cohesion 11,,89.0,,2345.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.3oz , Women: 8.2oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Saucony Cohesion 13,"6 reasons to buy
The durability of the Saucony Cohesion 11 was lauded by many consumers.
The heel portion’s Grid Cushioning gained positive feedback for keeping the foot steady and safe from impact shock.
Many runners appreciated the rubber outsole, stating that it offered reliable traction.
This running shoe was considered by several purchasers to be suitably lightweight for daily use.
A lot of people liked the price; for them, it was affordable.
The width profiles apparently followed the expectations of most runners.
2 reasons not to buy
The color schemes of the Cohesion 11 were not as vibrant or appealing as its predecessors, a few testers complained.
A person noted that the underfoot cushioning system offered little support for running.
Bottom line
The Saucony Cohesion 11 garnered the respect of most runners who appreciated its shock-absorbing midsole, lightweight disposition, and affordable price. They also welcomed its congenial width profiles and durable construction. Conversely, several testers griped about the unappealing color schemes and unsupportive midsole."
Merrell Agility Peak Flex 3,,72.0,,21.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The Merrell Agility Peak Flex 3 is very comfortable even on long walks, said some users.
According to some reviews, the shoe offers a great level of support and stability.
Many runners agreed that the shoe fits well, from the heel to the forefoot.
Several buyers lauded the shoes durable construction.
A few wearers noticed the upper wraps the foot snugly.
The Agility Peak Flex 3 offers durable traction on varied surfaces, based on some user reviews.
Most runners lauded the shoe’s responsive cushioning.
1 reasons not to buy
It is slightly expensive.
Bottom line
The Merrell Agility Peak Flex 3 is a reliable trail running shoe designed for neutral pronators. It received positive reviews from users because of its quality design, comfortable upper and responsive cushioning. Though it is slightly expensive compared to other trail shoes, the Agility Peak Flex 3 is still a good option for those who are looking for a high-mileage running shoe."
New Balance 990 v4,,92.0,85.0,44985.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 13.6oz , Women: 11.1oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, New Balance 990 v5,"9 reasons to buy
Many of those who tried the New Balance 990 v4 appreciated the lace keeper, which is meant to secure the laces and keep the tongue in place.
Plenty number of runners noted the durable upper construction which had already been proven since its forerunner, the New Balance 990 v3.
The durability and stability of the blown rubber outsole were often mentioned by a number of buyers comparing it to the New Balance Fresh Foam 1080 v9 which also has the same make for the outsole.
A lot of runners who enjoy night runs appreciated the 3M Reflectivity safety feature of the New Balance 990 v4 giving them a sense of security when it comes to their nighttime visibility.
Medial underfoot support and durability are handled by the ENCAP midsole technology making the ride feel more cushioned and stable.
The shoe comes in all possible width sizes which makes it very appealing to a lot of potential buyers.
Many testers generally lauded the reliable durability of this series, and that praise continues with this new version.
A few reviewers also like the fact that the collar foam is dual-density making the shoe just a little bit more comfortable than its previous versions.
Though sporting a very expensive price, the 990 v4 enthralled many runners because of its high quality and long-lasting performance.
5 reasons not to buy
Most of the complaints about the New Balance 990 v4 were directed at its bulky look, which made runners’ feet look awkwardly big.
It was too stiff for some athletes who wanted to get more flexibility for their feet.
Some reviewers did not like the fact that the shoe has a moderately heavy weight.
Several buyers were not too impressed with the cushioning ability of the 990 v4 claiming they don’t feel cushioned enough especially in the heel area.
A few users mentioned that the outsole lacks traction and tends to feel slippery especially on concrete floors.
Bottom line
In general, the New Balance 990 v4 is a great stability shoe choice for a wide range of runners. And although the New Balance 990 v4 feels a bit awkwardly bulky to some users because of its design, it is still given praise for its excellent fit. This shoe is well suited for performance training, exercises and even just for your daily walks or trips to the shops."
Asics Novablast,,89.0,90.0,9.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The majority of the users mentioned that the Asics Novablast is responsive. 
Many runners testified that the shoe is comfortable to wear. 
A lot of reviewers appreciated this running partner’s roomy toe box. 
The new midsole material offers excellent cushioning, based on reviews. 
A few commenters said that this running companion offers a fast and lightweight ride. 
Some users claimed that it is suitable for both short and long runs. 
3 reasons not to buy
Several purchasers reported that shoelaces of the Asics Novablast are not durable.  
One consumer noted that it requires tighter lacing pressure to deliver a secure midfoot fit. 
A couple of testers commented that the shoe is a bit narrow.
Bottom line
Boasting a unique midsole construction, the Asics Novablast is specifically designed for neutral runners seeking a soft and responsive running experience. This road running shoe also incorporates a durable rubber outsole and breathable mesh upper, aiming to provide a comfortable and well-protected ride. It is also suitable for walking and gym sessions."
Nike Air Max Sequent 3, Nike,80.0,,780.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12oz , Women: 8oz,,,,, Nike Air Max Sequent 4.5,"5 reasons to buy
The design of the Nike Air Max Sequent 3 appealed to many consumers who wanted style and functionality in a single package.
Several testers observed that the weight was suitably light.
The underfoot cushioning system gained favor for being comfortable and responsive.
Some purchasers stated that the price was affordable.
The durability of this model was lauded; many people deemed the construction to be of high quality.
2 reasons not to buy
Some people noted that the Nike Air Max Sequent 3 was too narrow.
The platform apparently had a raised arch that caused some discomfort, according to a reviewer.
Bottom line
Many people were able to appreciate the Nike Air Max Sequent 3. They believed that this neutral running shoe delivered comfort and style in a single package. Runners and casual shoe enthusiasts alike were even appreciative of its apparently high-quality construction, as well as the relatively inexpensive price. On the other hand, there were those who thought that it was narrow while some had complaints about the construction of the underfoot platform. Nevertheless, the Sequent 3 was deemed a worthy successor to a relatively fresh yet well-regarded series."
Adidas AlphaEdge 4D,,93.0,85.0,400.0,,, Road, Neutral,,, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Majority of users like the Alphaedge 4D's midsole performance, saying that it is well balanced and delivers perfect energy return.
The shoe's Primeknit upper is much appreciated by the users for being very well perforated, making their feet feel cool even when they are running on hot weather.
A lot of users express how great the traction and grip is from the shoe's Continental Rubber outsole.
Many users have commented on how the shoe's midsole feels firm in the right places, yet other parts of it are flexible and soft where it is needed.
Most users praise the Alphaedge 4D as an outstanding running shoe with capabilities to be used for any type of running.
A lot of the runners likes the shoe's reliable grip on wet and dry surfaces.
The Adidas Alphaedge 4D's unique and appealing style is eye-catching to a lot of users.
3 reasons not to buy
A lot of wearers are not happy that the Alphaedge 4D's selling price is too expensive.
It is mentioned by a number of users that the shoe's 3D printed midsole is a bit problematic to clean when the dirt gets inside the columns.
A handful of users notes that the shoe's weight is on the heavier side for a running shoe.
Bottom line
The Adidas Alphaedge 4D is an innovative running shoe that is designed to offer the comfort and support that a runner needs. All the features and technologies that this shoe is engineered with allows it to provide wearers with the security and functionality that they need. The shoe also comes with a 3D printed Futurecraft midsole which provides a more reactive and dynamic cushioning. Overall, despite the undeniably steep price, the Adidas Alphaedge 4D is well worth the money. It is recommended by most users for its unique style aesthetic and remarkable cushioning performance."
Asics Gel Cumulus 19,,84.0,68.0,5121.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 9.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Cumulus 22,"7 reasons to buy
More than a few runners commented that the Asics Gel Cumulus 19 felt true-to-size.
A lot of testers felt that, for the number of features that they’d received from this shoe, the price was very reasonable.
The available color schemes won over the hearts of those who have tried it.
Generally, people thought that it was comfortable and efficient right out of the box.
The underfoot cushioning system staved off some foot-discomfort, several runners noted.
Runners liked the fact that this comes with different width options.
Based on user response, the traction given by the outsole was reliable.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners reported that the fit was too narrow in the forefoot section; their toes apparently got pinched together too much.
The shoelaces weren’t strong and they tore apart easily, a few users complained.
The foam mid-sole wasn’t as responsive or comfortable as expected, several purchasers noted.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Cumulus 19 gained generally positive remarks from its fans. They loved its comfortable nature, the lightweight disposition, the color schemes, and its efficient components. For them, it’s a solid option for the roads. But there were those who experienced some discrepancies with the way that it was constructed, stating that some areas weren’t very well-made."
Adidas Solar Drive 19,,91.0,78.0,73.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.2oz , Women: 9.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
A few users claim that the shoe is very comfortable. 
Some of the wearers commend the colorway of the shoe.
The shoe is very versatile as it can be used for casual occasions and long-distance running, according to various reviewers. 
A lot of the users say that the shoe is worth the price. 
Some of the runners note that the shoe is very lightweight
2 reasons not to buy
Some users complain of the feeling of constriction on foot.
The sole of the shoe is too stiff, mentioned one disappointed runner. 
Bottom line
The overall feedback of the Adidas Solar Drive 19 has been mostly positive. One of the highly noted features of the shoe is the comfort that it offers, especially for long-distance running. A lot of the runners also commended the lightweight feel that the shoe gives them. On the other hand, some users thought the shoe is stiff and that they felt constricted in their movement. "
Brooks Caldera 3,,92.0,91.0,58.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.3oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Brooks Caldera 4,"8 reasons to buy
Most users love that the Brooks Caldera 3 is lightweight and feels great on different types of trails.
Several users have mentioned the good traction of the shoe, especially on wet, steep trails.
Also liked by many runners is the excellent ventilation and fast drying technique provided by the Ariaprene mesh upper.
Often mentioned by some trail runners is the innovative water repellent feature of the Brooks Caldera 3.
Highlighted in some reviews is the responsive BioMoGo DNA cushioning gel in the midsole making the ride more comfortable and enjoyable.
Most runners like the addition of the mudguard, saying it helps provide the right amount of stretch and form to make the shoe a perfect fit.
Some runners have pointed out that the Brooks Caldera 3 transition well from the road to trail.
Also acknowledged by most buyers is the lace garage, which keeps laces secure, dry, and out of the way, providing added security to the laces.
3 reasons not to buy
A few of the Brooks Caldera 3 users mentioned that the fit of the toe-box is not wide enough.
According to some testers, the Ariaprene mesh upper is a bit temperamental when it comes to repelling water.
Also mentioned by a couple of users is that the mesh upper sometimes fails to keep the feet dry as they have noticed that they end up with wet socks after running through streams or puddles.
Bottom line
The Brooks Caldera 3 can run comfortably in all terrains and even on the steepest wet trails. It proves to be a stable and comfortable ride even as the run gets more challenging.  Although there are a handful of buyers who were not so keen about the sizing of the shoe, the Brooks Caldera 3 still proves to be a reliable neutral trail running shoe worth investing in."
,,,90.0,,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.6oz , Women: 7.7oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,
Zoot Diego,,78.0,89.0,28.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.5oz , Women: 10.8oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The breathable mess and no-sew construction made the upper of the Zoot Diego impressive, according to some testers.
The internal reinforcement provides amazing fit and support with no added weight as noted in some reviews.
Many runners were satisfied by how durable the Diego is.
The Barefit internal liner technology offers a sock-like fit.
Most runners took note of the shoe’s Progressive Forward Roll that promotes smooth and plush ride.
This features a Z-Bound technology that saves runner’s energy, reducing fatigue and stress.
3 reasons not to buy
The Zoot Diego is a moderately high-priced running shoe.
Some runners observed that the Diego is not as comfortable as expected.
This shoe is a bit heavy as noted in some reviews.
Bottom line
The Zoot Diego is running shoe that offers plenty of cushioning and impressive grip. This shoe got positive reviews regarding durability. This neutral running shoe performs best on the roads and a great daily training partner."
Salomon Speedcross 5 GTX,,91.0,,73.0,,," Mud, Trail", Neutral, Men: 12oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Several testers have noted that the Salomon Speedcross 5 GTX is able to adhere to wet and slick surfaces.
The waterproof capacity of the upper unit is welcomed by those who like to tackle wet conditions.
The single-pull lacing system is praised for providing a quick method of adjusting the fit.
Some runners consider the price of this running shoe to be reasonable.
A handful of purchasers noticed the durable and long-lasting nature of the materials.
3 reasons not to buy
A couple of consumers have stated that the sides of the collar are irritating to the ankles.
Some testers believe that the upper unit’s design restricts the natural motion and shape of the foot.
A few purchasers consider the design of the Speedcross 5 GTX as too bulky and stiff for long-term use.
Bottom line
The overall response towards the Salomon Speedcross 5 GTX has been generally encouraging. People are mostly happy with what this shoe has to offer. The highlighted positive traits include the durable construction, the effortless single-pull lacing method, and the traction on wet ground. On the other hand, the chafe-inducing collar and the stiff and bulky silhouette are criticized.
Fans of off-road shoes that are for neutral foot pronation are likely to enjoy the Speedcross 5 GTX."
Under Armour Surge SE, Under Armour,94.0,,472.0,$65,$46 (save 29%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8.9oz , Women: 7.1oz,,,," Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Normal",,"6 reasons to buy
The majority of the users said that the Under Armour Surge SE is comfortable.
According to those who have tried it, the shoe is stylish.
It is flexible, based on some reviews.
A significant number of consumers commented that the running shoe is lightweight.
Several consumers noted that the footwear is supportive.
A lot of purchasers agreed that the fit is perfect.
1 reasons not to buy
A user noted that shoe is slow to break in.
Bottom line
The Under Armour Surge SE has gained the appreciation from most of the purchasers. Overall, they are happy and satisfied with how this lightweight running shoe was constructed. The style and design of this shoe were loved by most of the users. Though one of the buyers said that the Under Armour Surge SE was slow to break in, others still recommend the shoe because of its excellent performance. According to them, this is a good option for those who are looking for a comfortable, supportive and flexible running shoe."
Under Armour Charged Bandit Trail,,90.0,,55.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.1oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
A lot of the wearers admire the lightweight construction of the Under Armour Charged Bandit Trail.
The shoe is highly durable, according to many. 
Several commend the shoe because it does not require a long break-in period.
It is super grippy, remarked a few users. 
Some runners say that the shoe is very comfortable. 
2 reasons not to buy
One purchaser expressed that the shoe felt too tight. 
A particular customer has a concern regarding the durability of the shoe’s toe cap
Bottom line
The Under Armour Charged Bandit Trail is an ideal pair for runners who are looking for a good blend of flexibility and cushioning. Packed with technical features meant to deliver a highly durable and shock-absorbing running experience, the Charged Bandit Trail will truly allow you to conquer the trails. "
Altra Duo,,82.0,92.0,262.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.9oz , Women: 5.3oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,, Altra Duo 1.5,"6 reasons to buy
The Altra Duo offered great cushioning that was consistent even during longer runs, commented a buyer.
One customer said the midsole was responsive and snappy.
A reviewer described the Duo as “the Rolls-Royce of running shoes” because of its stylish look and feel.
Many users claimed that the shoe was lightweight.
Various wear-testers mentioned an out-of-the-box comfort from the Duo.
A lot of runners were pleased with the superior breathability supplied by the mesh upper.
2 reasons not to buy
Some debris got caught in between the outsole sections, some users observed.
One wearer experienced chafing on their leg where the collar has rubbed against it.
Bottom line
Many consumers must have found in the Altra Duo what they look for in a running shoe, based on the numerous positive comments it received. The zero-drop, maximum cushion midsole has impressed runners, while many others commended the shoe’s structural elements and appearance. Although there were a few who were quick to point out some construction flaws, the majority of users have looked past them, therefore making the Altra Duo a winner running shoe."
Brooks PureGrit 8,,82.0,85.0,7.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.3oz , Women: 8.2oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Some of the reviewers have commented that the Brooks PureGrit 8 is lightweight in structure.
One of the testers said that the shoe is flexible.
It is comfortable, based on some reviews.
According to those who have tried it, the PureGrit 8 provides an excellent grip on different types of surfaces.
A purchaser observed that the shoe is best for trail running and cross-training activities.
2 reasons not to buy
A few buyers noted that the heel cup is thin. No matter how they tightly tie the laces, their heel rises out of the shoe with every step. As a result, stability issues were experienced by the users during the running session.
Several consumers agreed that Brooks poorly designed the PureGrit 8.
Bottom line
Even with some problems encountered by a few of the consumers regarding the Brooks PureGrit 8's lacing system, the shoe is still regarded as one of the best trail running shoes in the market. Testers have given positive feedback about the shoe's performance on a wide variety of terrains. Overall, it has successfully gained the hearts of the majority of the users because of its fantastic construction, flexibility, and excellent traction. Without a doubt, it has definitely met the expectations of those who are seeking a running shoe that is lightweight and comfortable."
Under Armour Charged Intake 3,,96.0,88.0,461.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 10oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Under Armour Charged Intake 4,"8 reasons to buy
A significant number of users noted that the Under Armour Charged Intake 3 is comfortable.
Several buyers commented that the shoe has a wide toe box.
The majority of the purchasers admired its lightweight structure.
One of the consumers said that he had not experienced any tight spots or blisters during and after his running activity.
Many users loved the Under Armour Charged Intake 3's perfect fit.
According to those who have tried it, the shoe has good quality.
Based on some reviews, the footwear is not only suited for running and walking but also best to wear with jeans on casual days.
The running shoe is supportive, according to several consumers.
1 reasons not to buy
One of the wearers said that the Under Armour Charged Intake 3 looked a little bulky when compared to other Under Armour shoes.
Bottom line
Designed for road running, the Under Armour Charged Intake 3 gained positive response from a lot of runners and shoe enthusiasts. The sizing and width profiles were also lauded, as well as its quality construction. Despite the issue on its bulky appearance, in general, the majority of the purchasers recommend this shoe because of its versatile design and performance on the roads."
On Cloudsurfer,,89.0,84.0,634.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 7mm , Women: 7mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
Several runners commented that wearing the On Cloudsurfer was like running in socks, but with loads of cushioning.
A runner commented that they weren’t able to feel any pressure on their ankles or knees while using this shoe for long running sessions.
Some purchasers noted that they were able to run faster and longer with this shoe.
There were testers who noticed a springy sensation with every step and they wrote that it allowed them to be more efficient when performing.
According to many users, this shoe was able to deliver a soft ride and a secure fit.
A consumer commended the responsiveness of this shoe; they felt like running on air with it.
A number of testers stated that its cushioning systems were efficient when it came to preventing discomfort or injury during the running session.
There were runners who felt that the On Cloudsurfer didn’t need a break-in period, that it was comfortable from the get-go.
The upper unit felt like a ‘natural coating’ for the foot, wrote a consumer; they didn’t experience blisters or irritation because of it.
4 reasons not to buy
A number of reviewers didn’t consider the On Cloudsurfer as a racing shoe because, for them, it was heavy.
Some runners didn’t like the laces used in this shoe; they wrote that it was too long, too thin, and difficult to adjust & secure.
The tongue was too long and it dug into the skin, according to a tester.
A consumer reported that heel section of the cushioning system collapsed after only a few uses.
Bottom line
The On Cloudsurfer was able to bring satisfaction to a lot of neutral runners. Many of them were impressed by its performance on the roads, as well as its innovative design and solid performance. Some were not as hooked because they had some complaints about it. Still, this offering from On Running was generally welcomed with enthusiasm."
Mizuno Wave Horizon 3,,81.0,69.0,198.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 12.5oz , Women: 9.8oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 10mm,,, Mizuno Wave Horizon 4,"7 reasons to buy
Most wearers mentioned the comfortable midsole of the Mizuno Wave Horizon 3.
A lot of runners found the Wave Horizon 3 to be reliable enough for daily activities.
The stability feature of the shoe was praised by several users.
Many buyers considered the shoe as lightweight.
The shoe provided an accurate fit, according to some commenters.
Some users claimed the Wave Horizon 3 did not require a break-in period.
The outsole’s tread gave sturdy and reliable traction even on wet surfaces, according to a reviewer.
1 reasons not to buy
A couple of wearers thought the Wave Horizon 3 was not a fast shoe.
Bottom line
The Wave Horizon 3 from Mizuno has effectively delivered a high-performing running shoe for overpronators, as evidenced in the positive reviews it received. The majority of its wearers praised the shoe’s comfort, versatility, and reliability, with some particularly noting the efficiency of the features. There was very few negative feedback towards the shoe; thus, it can be concluded that the Mizuno Wave Horizon 3 was a well-liked shoe that is definitely worth the purchase."
New Balance Minimus Trail 10,,89.0,89.0,32.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 7.5oz , Women: 6.4oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A lot of the runners appreciate the New Balance Minimus Trail 10 for enhancing ground connectivity; the shoe is the ideal exhibit of minimalist running shoe. 
The shoe is very comfortable to the foot, remarked several users. 
The lightweight construction of the shoe is very appreciable, stated several testers. 
Several runners commend the breathability offered by the mesh upper of this New Balance trail running shoe. 
Because of the Vibram® outsole of the Minimus Trail 10, good ground traction is achieved, expressed by many people. 
The shoe is highly flexible, stated some reviewers. 
The runners also praise the protection extended by the shoe. 
2 reasons not to buy
One buyer is dismayed with the easily worn out outsole of the Minimus Trail 10. 
Several reviewers have complained about the heel of the shoe digging into their Achilles tendon which causes some pain.
Bottom line
The New Balance Minimus Trail 10 is a minimalist shoe that is lauded by many for allowing good ground feel and control. Many have been satisfied with the overall versatility delivered by the shoe as it can be worn for different activities. The outsole of the shoe also promotes good ground traction on different terrains. 
A lot of people claim that they would surely recommend these shoes to their peers. "
Hoka One One Hupana Wool,,87.0,90.0,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 7.3oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The underfoot cushioning system of the Hoka One One Hupana Wool is lauded for being able to support heavy body weights.
Some testers believe that the aesthetics of this running shoe are appealing for both active and fashion-focused lifestyles.
Those with foot problems like plantar fasciitis claim that the supportive nature of the midsole is enough to allay any discomfort.
Some testers have expressed their appreciation for the shoelaces, stating that securing the foot is effortless and quick.
Casual shoe enthusiasts say that the price of a pair is mildly wallet-friendly.
Based on a couple of reviews, the pull tab that’s placed at the rear part of the collar is helpful when wearing or taking off the shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
The Hoka One One Hupana Wool has an upper unit that feels too hot in warm conditions, according to some consumers.
A few runners have felt the fabric of the inner sleeve rubbing uncomfortably against the skin.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of people towards the Hupana Wool has been positive. This Hoka One One running shoe is deemed efficient at delivering a reactive performance, whether during daily runs or casual walks. The supportive midsole is highlighted as a major source of comfort throughout the activity. On the other hand, the upper’s too-warm fabric and the irritating inner sleeve are criticized by some.
Fans of neutral running shoes are the target market of the Hoka One One Hupana Wool."
Salomon S-Lab Speed 2,,96.0,92.0,79.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
A significant number of users confirmed that the Salomon S-Lab Speed 2 is very durable.
Several satisfied customers mentioned that they admired the shoe’s lightweight construction.
According to some purchasers, the shoe has a great design; a few said it looks good when worn with jeans or shorts.
Most of those who tried the shoe highlighted the shoe’s reliable grip on hard grounds, rocky, and muddy trails.
A few users welcomed the new laces of the S-Lab Speed 2; they said it is easy to pull-on and pull-off.
The shoe fits like a leather glove, according to one happy user.
3 reasons not to buy
One disappointed user said that the S-Lab Speed 2 is not best for muddy trails because of the absence of the mudguard which is found in some Salomon shoes.
One user noticed that after a few miles the shoe has already started to make an annoying click sound.
Some said that the 2nd version is not as comfortable as the first Salomon S-Lab Speed, they said they developed blisters after a few miles.
Bottom line
The Salomon S-Lab Speed 2 received a mixed response from trail runners. The outsole grip really stands out, but some also pointed a few design flaws. Despite the negative criticisms, the S-Lab Speed 2 is still a good pair, especially for runners who are looking for a reliable shoe for trail running."
Brooks Glycerin 18,,84.0,94.0,5.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Many runners noted that the Brooks Glycerin 18 is comfortable to wear. 
Some consumers praised the roomy toebox of the shoe. 
A few buyers appreciated this running companion’s flexible upper unit. 
The shoe offers just the right amount of cushioning, said some commenters. 
One reviewer claimed that this running partner is responsive. 
A couple of testers mentioned that the shoe is perfect for long runs.
This running shoe is also comfortable for work, school, and other non-strenuous activities, based on reviews.
3 reasons not to buy
Several users complained that the Brooks Glycerin 18 is stiffer than its predecessors. 
It does not offer enough arch support, according to a reviewer. 
A handful of purchasers reported that the shoe is a bit narrow.
Bottom line
The Brooks Glycerin 18 is a neutral running shoe that can work for mild pronators or people who supinate. This shoe is suitable for runners and athletes who are seeking comfort, flexibility, and protection. It is equipped with advanced technologies that aim to enhance the running experience. Aside from road running, it is also suitable for gym sessions and casual walks."
Under Armour Charged Bandit 5,,91.0,80.0,209.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.1oz , Women: 7.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Under Armour Charged Bandit 5 is a great shoe with a sturdy bottom. It also lasts longer than other running shoes, a reviewer claimed. 
This shoe is perfect for walking, running, and workout sessions, according to a lot of users. Some people also mentioned that the shoe is stylish enough to be used for casual walks and regular non-strenuous activities.
A consumer expressed that this running gear provides more comfort on the heel compared to other Under Armour running shoes. It also offers great assist during start on race.
The lightweight structure of the shoe helps increase the running speed, wrote a commenter. 
Several purchasers appreciated the value of this running companion considering the quality of the components and its features. 
The shoe fits very well and very comfortable to wear for long runs and other activities, said a runner. 
A wearer mentioned that he used this shoe for over 2 months and it’s still very comfortable and good-looking. 
It can keep the foot dry even when worn for extended periods, a buyer claimed.
2 reasons not to buy
The shoe feels a bit narrow, according to a tester.
A purchaser, who brought another pair, said that the Under Armour Charged Bandit 5 has inconsistent foam cushioning feel.  
Bottom line
With its quality and value, Under Armour Charged Bandit 5 has received good reviews from people who have tried it for running, workout, and other tough activities. Customers are happy with this running shoe’s affordability, durability, and stylish structure. The optimal cushioning and lightweight construction were also praised by many consumers. Only a few consumers complained about the shoe’s inconsistent fit and in-shoe feel."
On Cloudstratus,,81.0,81.0,8.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Stability, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The width profile of the On Cloudstratus has received positive feedback from those who have worn it.
Several testers claim that the asymmetrical lacing system removed pressure from the forefoot section, thereby freeing the joints for agreeable motion.
The underfoot cushioning system feels durable and dutifully responsive, according to a handful of runners.
Based on some reviews, the performance of the platform is reliable and energizing.
The traction capacity of the outsole has gained some praise from those who welcome precise movements over the asphalt.
2 reasons not to buy
The facade of this running shoe apparently looks a bit bulky, according to several consumers.
A tester has reported that the collar of this product presents a tendency to rub against the skin uncomfortably.
Bottom line
The overall response towards the On Cloudstratus has been very positive. The focus of the praise is the upper unit and the midsole, both of which are apparently are efficient at maintaining a performance that is desirable. The width profile and the traction-ready outsole have also received approval from consumers. On the other hand, criticism is directed towards the irritating collar and the bulky silhouette.
Fans of stability running shoes and those who like to take to the roads are the ones who are likely to enjoy this performance footwear."
New Balance Fresh Foam Cruz v2 Knit, New Balance,88.0,88.0,3218.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
Most of the testers commented that the New Balance Fresh Foam Cruz v2 Knit is lightweight.
Based on several reviews, the shoe is comfortable.
It is affordable.
According to a good number of purchasers, the shoe is stylish.
A good number of consumers lauded the arch support it provides.
A lot of the reviewers observed that the shoe is well-cushioned.
Several purchasers use the shoe not only for running but also for gym workout, and walking activities.
The majority of the testers noted that the shoe is breathable.
Most of the reviewers loved its color schemes.
4 reasons not to buy
Some of the users said that the shoe is difficult to put on.
Several purchasers noted that the Fresh Foam Cruz v2 Knit is too narrow.
Based on some reviews, the shoe is not durable.
One of the users commented that the Fresh Foam Cruz v2 Knit did not provide enough grip on wet surfaces.
Bottom line
The New Balance Fresh Foam Cruz v2 Knit is a road running shoe designed to deliver comfort and style. Users loved how supportive and cushioned the shoe is. It gained some negative feedback but overall, the shoe is still worth a try. It is a good option for those who are looking for affordable shoes with a fantastic performance on the roads."
Brooks Ghost 11,,94.0,91.0,4358.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Brooks Ghost 12,"10 reasons to buy
The Brooks Ghost 11 had a nice cushion that enabled an excellent transition with adequate bounce, according to an impressed user.
Several wearers commended the shoe for its roomy interiors.
The shoe is very accommodating towards heel strikers, some runners observed.
The shoe’s minimal weight allowed for an effortless and comfortable run, a number of users commented.
An athlete commended the Ghost 11 for being the most comfortable daily running shoe they have used. Another wearer said it gave the best arch support among other neutral running shoes.
The shoe felt softer and more flexible compared to its previous versions, said a reviewer.
The adequate cushioning of the midsole prevented foot pain and muscle stiffness, according to a wearer.
One buyer compared wearing the shoe to “wrapping the foot in a cloud.”
The Brooks Ghost 11 is suitable for both walking and running, a user claimed.
A consumer expressed that the Ghost 11 is highly recommendable to any runner with knee issues.
3 reasons not to buy
One reviewer attributed the shoe’s bulky and uncomfortable feel to its high heel-to-toe drop.
The shoelaces are a bit short, a user supposed.
The mesh upper does not look like a durable as it claims, a doubtful buyer stated.
Bottom line
Many users have found themselves considering buying the Brooks Ghost 11 for a second or third time, while others were very expressive of their satisfaction as they switched from a different shoe – that’s how great they believe it is. With many praises about the shoe’s features and functionality, it is no surprise that wearers would regard the Ghost 11 as one of the best running shoes on the market."
Reebok Flashfilm, Reebok,90.0,,791.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.4oz , Women: 8oz,,,, Normal | Normal, Reebok Flashfilm 2.0,"7 reasons to buy
The majority of the runners commented that the Reebok Flashfilm is comfortable.
It fits true to size, according to those who have tried it.
A significant number of users said that it is a good-looking shoe.
A lot of testers admires its lightweight structure.
Based on some reviews, the shoe is flexible.
A good number of buyers noted that the footwear is breathable.
Several consumers agreed that the shoe is best for running, walking, exercising, and everyday wear.
2 reasons not to buy
One of the buyers commented that the tongue unit of the shoe is attached to one side. As a result, a little pain is felt by the buyer.
A tester said that the shoe does not provide enough arch support.
Bottom line
Plenty of users are amazed by the design and performance of the Reebok Flashfilm. Aside from its design, they love the shoe's flexibility and with how comfortable it is. Despite issues on the tongue unit and arch support, others are still happy because of its quality design. Overall, the majority of the buyers considered the Flashfilm as a worthy investment."
Xero Shoes HFS,,99.0,90.0,238.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.8oz , Women: 5.8oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
The majority of the reviewers were overwhelmed with Xero Shoes HFS' comfort level.
A significant number of wearers said that the shoe is breathable.
According to those who have bought it, the running footwear has a good amount of cushioning.
Many buyers loved its excellent traction.
As noted by a lot of consumers, the shoe is lightweight.
It is supportive, based on several reviews.
According to many testers, the shoe is best used for walking, weight lifting, doing errands, and running.
Dozens of owners commented that the shoe is stylish and great-looking.
4 reasons not to buy
Some purchasers observed that the Xero Shoes HFS is not durable. The upper material quickly tears apart after several uses only.
Based on a review, the shoe feels tight.
According to those who have tried it, the shoe lacks hard eyelets that make it difficult to tighten the laces.
A user commented that the tongue attaches to the running shoe are not smooth to touch.
Bottom line
The majority of the consumers definitely welcomed the Zero Shoes HFS because of its functionality and versatility. Many of them were satisfied and happy with the comfort level, cushioning, and breathability that the shoe offered. That said, the HFS met the expectations of the avid fans that value the quality of the Xero Shoes running shoes. In general, many of the buyers found this shoe a perfect partner in their goal of achieving a better and improved running performance."
Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 36 Shield,,79.0,87.0,15.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11oz , Women: 9.2oz,,,,,,"8 reasons to buy
A number of reviewers hail the secure fit of the Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 36 Shield.
It is very comfortable when worn, shared several purchasers.
According to some customers, the shoe does not require a break-in period.
The running shoe effectively wicks away moisture, claimed multiple runners.
Numerous buyers praise the ample cushioning of the shoe.
Quite a few commend the support of the trail running shoe.
It has good multi-surface traction, observed various runners.
Some athletes have noted that the shoe has sufficient lockdown.
4 reasons not to buy
The outsole composition of the trail shoe is bulky, expressed some testers.
One commenter is disappointed because the shoe is too tight.
Some shoppers state that the running shoe lacks durability.
The neutral running shoe is too rigid, remarked a number of wearers.
Bottom line
Perfect for all weather conditions, the Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 36 Shield does not settle for less when it comes to surface adherence. With an outsole engineered specifically for wet routes, nothing is more perfect than a water-repellent upper as a supplementary component. With such makeup, runners can expect a slippage-free, breathable running experience. With the Air Zoom Pegasus 36, support, comfort, and durability are highlighted."
Inov-8 TerraUltra G 260,,84.0,86.0,7.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Some of the runners loved the Inov-8 TerraUltra G 260's wide toe box.
The excellent grip that the shoe provides was admired by many users.
It was durable, according to several buyers.
The footwear was best to use in dry and wet rocks and grass as well as muddy trails and dusty paths.
Based on some reviews, the Inov-8 TerraUltra G 260 was flexible.
Several testers appreciated its lightweight structure.
It was comfortable, according to one of the users.
It was noted by a handful of consumers that the shoe was responsive.
2 reasons not to buy
A handful of testers said that the Inov-8 TerraUltra G 260 was expensive.
The heel cup area was quite deep, commented by one of the consumers.
Bottom line
A lot of reviewers was happy and amazed with the Inov-8 TerraUltra G 260. They were satisfied with the grip and comfort that the shoe provides. Aside from its excellent traction, they also appreciated the footwear's lightweight structure. Several of them have issues with its heel cup and price, but others still lauded its performance on wet and dry surfaces, rocks and grasses. Overall, the Inov-8 TerraUltra G 260 is recommended by many because of its versatility and durability. The footwear is an excellent option for those who want to take their running experience to the next level."
Under Armour HOVR Phantom RN,,88.0,90.0,7.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Some of the users commented that the Under Armour HOVR Phantom RN provides a perfect fit.
Most of the reviewers said that the shoe is comfortable.
According to those who have tried it, the running shoe is best used for road running, outdoor training, and gym workout.
It is responsive, based on a review.
The running footwear is lightweight in structure, according to those who have bought it.
The Under Armour HOVR Phantom RN is supportive, noted by a purchaser.
It provides excellent grip on muddy, rocky and grassy surfaces, observed by some testers.
3 reasons not to buy
One of the consumers said that the fabric mesh used in making the shoe wears out easily.
The shoe does not perform well when running on the treadmill.
Based on a  review, the insole of the shoe starts to tear quickly after several uses only.
Bottom line
  The Under Armour HOVR Phantom RN is a neutral running shoe that is engineered to tackle different paved surfaces. With the technologies and features integrated into it, excellent fit, comfort, and responsiveness are experienced by the user. This road running shoe is crafted with materials that provide support, making an enjoyable and efficient ride possible. Besides running, this footwear is suitable for gym workout and outdoor training as well."
Asics Gel Kenun Knit,,80.0,,69.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.4oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The cushioning system of the Asics Gel Kenun Knit was deemed comfortable and responsive.
Most consumers noted that the visual aspect of this shoe was impressive.
The width profiles were considered by many to be agreeable.
Several people used this shoe for casual purposes, and they felt that it stayed efficient.
The shock-attenuating midsole was admired by most consumers.
4 reasons not to buy
Some consumers felt that the arch of this running shoe was too high that it disturbed the quality of the step.
Some discomfort was felt by some testers upon initially wearing the Asics Gel Kenun
The colors and the fabric near the toe area frayed easily, a purchaser observed.
There were several complaints about the seamless opening being hard to stretch; they found it a challenge to put on the shoe.
Bottom line
The response for the Asics Gel Kenun Knit was mixed. Most consumers were happy that the cushioning was responsive, but others felt that the midfoot was awkwardly raised. And while the façade seemed pleasing to the eyes, it apparently wore off quickly. In conclusion, the quality of this neutral road shoe was in contention as it really divided those who appreciated what it had to offer from those who had various concerns with it."
New Balance Fresh Foam Kaymin TRL,,87.0,,97.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Many people felt that the cushioning system that’s present in the New Balance Fresh Foam Kaymin TRL offered comfortable strides.
The grip capability of the outsole worked well, according to most consumers.
Some runners noted that the tread-design functioned well on muddy terrain while satisfactorily staving off any mud or rock retention.
The general durability of this shoe’s materials was lauded by a lot of purchasers.
The option to get this shoe in a wider variant was welcomed by those who had wide foot-dimensions.
Several runners liked that this trail companion had a lightweight build.
Some people thought that the smooth construction of the façade offered a confident visual flair.
2 reasons not to buy
According to a tester, the thin tongue unit tended to work against the lacing system, bunching up and causing some hot spots that are detrimental to the skin.
The overlays peeled off after a few weeks of use, several people complained.
Bottom line
The New Balance Fresh Foam Kaymin TRL was generally well-received by those who appreciated trail running. The traction capacity of the outsole was lauded, as well as the lightweight construction. Moreover, the cushioning system was deemed efficient at keeping the foot comfortable. On the other hand, some testers didn’t appreciate the poor durability while one person detested the thin tongue unit."
Asics GT 1000 8,,85.0,70.0,265.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 9.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics GT 1000 9,"6 reasons to buy
The aesthetics of the Asics GT 1000 8 are lauded by those who have tested it.
Some testers believe that this product is suitably lightweight, considering that it is a stability running shoe.
Many consumers welcome the stability mechanisms that are present in the platform, stating that these elements responsibly guided the stride.
The upper is considered by many to be breathable and able to maintain a cool and dry ride.
A handful of purchasers consider the outsole to be highly capable of doling out traction on dry and wet surfaces.
The robust cushioning and stable underfoot experience apparently permit people to tackle all-day activities with ease.
3 reasons not to buy
The forefoot section of the platform is a bit stiff and unresponsive, according to a few testers.
Based on a couple of user reviews, the shoelaces are too short to fully customize the fit.
The foot tended to slip towards the front of the shoe, according to a few runners.
Bottom line
The overall reaction towards the GT 1000 8 has been mostly positive. A majority of the consumers who have tested this Asics running shoe are convinced that its components are helpful for their daily activities. The highlighted parts of the silhouette include the reliable stability mechanisms, the well-ventilated facade, and the all-day comfort. The negatives tackle the flimsy in-shoe lockdown and the unresponsive forefoot section of the midsole.
Fans of road running shoes that are for overpronated foot motion are the target market of the Asics GT 1000 8."
Adidas Solar Glide 19,,83.0,89.0,16.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Adidas Solar Glide 3,"5 reasons to buy
Some reviewers say that the Adidas Solar Glide 19 is the most comfortable neutral running shoe they have ever worn. 
Runners state that the shoe is highly durable because of its full-length Continental™ Stretchweb outsole. 
The shoe leaves the foot feeling fresh despite the humid weather because of its engineered mesh upper, according to some commenters.
There are no rough abrasion points on the Solar Glide 19’s edges, as reported by a purchaser. 
The shoe provides a lightweight feel to the foot, says several runners. 
3 reasons not to buy
One runner notes that the Adidas Solar Glide is not suitable for long-distance running as the shoe causes heel slippage. 
The shoe lacks breathability, mentions one user. 
The shoe does not provide enough support when running, says one runner. 
Bottom line
The general consensus for the Adidas Solar Glide 19 is a mix of good and bad reviews. A lot of the runners really like the durability that is offered by the shoe. They also like the lightweight feel that the shoe offers. On the other side, there are some complaints with regards to the heel slippage that has happened to some of the users when they used the shoe for long-distance running. Overall, the Adidas Solar Glide 19 might not be the best shoe for long-distance running but can be a good companion for mid-distance running activities. "
Under Armour SpeedForm Intake 2,,90.0,,409.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The lightweight nature of the Under Armour SpeedForm Intake 2 was well-liked by most testers.
Several consumers lauded the form-fitting nature of the upper unit.
The width profiles were considered to be adherent to expectations.
The traction capacity of this running shoe’s outsole was lauded; some runners claimed that it held onto the ground with ease.
A handful of purchasers appreciated the elastic heel portion of the façade, stating that it kept the foot in place.
2 reasons not to buy
The lateral section of the interior sleeve rubbed uncomfortably against the small toe, several people commented.
A few testers claimed that the heel section of the sole unit felt narrow.
Bottom line
The Under Armour SpeedForm Intake 2 generally received positive reviews from those who have tested it. This neutral road shoe was lauded for providing a contoured wrap and a freeing performance. But a few people believed that the inner portion of the upper was uncomfortable while others felt that the back part of the platform didn’t align with the dimensions of the heel."
Hoka One One Hupana Flow Wool, Hoka One One,85.0,,10.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 7.7oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Several wearers mentioned that the Hoka One One Hupana Flow Wool is comfortable for workouts and casual walks. 
Consumers appreciated the lightweight construction of the shoe. 
The outsole unit of the shoe is very flexible, as mentioned in some reviews. 
Some purchasers expressed that the shoe is capable of keeping the foot warm when it’s cold out. 
A number of buyers appreciated the convenience brought by the shoe’s no-tie elastic laces. 
Many commenters welcomed the smooth wool upper of this running shoe. 
3 reasons not to buy
The upper unit of the Hoka One One Hupana Flow Wool is not strong enough to limit extra movements, said a user. 
A few runners reported that the shoe lacks breathability. 
Hupana Flow Wool does not offer enough stability when running, according to a couple of reviewers.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Hupana Flow Wool received a mixed response from the consumers who have tried it. There are people who like this shoe a lot, saying that it is comfortable but there are also those who feel that the shoe does not provide enough stability. Thus, it could be said that the Hupana Flow Wool is an average neutral running shoe but worth a try. "
Vibram FiveFingers V-Run,,90.0,85.0,1117.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 4.8oz , Women: 4.8oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Many runners applauded the lightweight construction of the Vibram FiveFingers V-Run.
This shoe is highly breathable as mentioned in some reviews.
The V-Run is available in different color options.
It gives an impressive fit.
This shoe is reliable when used on extremely cold conditions.
2 reasons not to buy
The sole wears out quickly based on some reviews.
This shoe is slightly expensive.
Bottom line
The Vibram FiveFingers V-Run provides a combination of support, durability and better ground contact. Several users admired the shoe's performance on the road, and despite being slightly expensive, a lot still recommend the shoe. The V-Run is equipped with the necessary technologies to surely perform well even on extremely low temperatures. "
Adidas Asweego,,87.0,,407.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 11mm , Women: 11mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
People liked the color schemes of the Adidas Asweego, stating the understated and typical hues were ultimately endearing to the eyes.
Consumers stated that the façade wrapped the foot in a non-irritating manner.
Most purchasers commented that the price was affordable.
The quality of this shoe was welcomed as people felt that the materials were durable and dependable.
The midsole unit of this running shoe gained some fans for being comfortable and reactive to natural gait cycle.
People stated that the traction capacity of the outsole was reliable; they didn’t experience any slippage when using this shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
A few testers felt that the lack of a traditionally separate tongue unit made the in-shoe fit a bit tight.
Some runners noted a bit of looseness when they wore one in their usual size; they recommended getting a pair that’s half-a-size to a full size small to achieve adequate in-shoe 
A couple of purchasers complained that the fabric resting against the bridge of the foot caused some chafing, thus diminishing the overall comfort.
Bottom line
The general response for the Asweego was positive. People liked the capacity of this Adidas running shoe to provide comfort and security to the foot. The eye-catching color schemes and the nice-fitting upper were highlighted, as well as the bouncy yet comfortable underfoot platform. On the other hand, the width profiles and in-shoe experience were detested for not following some consumers’ expectations.
The Adidas Asweego is an addition to the global roster of road running shoes. It is also a product meant for neutral pronators and those who desire versatility and style in one package."
Salomon Sense Ride,,90.0,90.0,314.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Salomon Sense Ride 3,"9 reasons to buy
A lot of runners agreed that the Salomon Sense Ride worked well on hiking, running and walking activities.
Many testers commented that the Salomon Sense Ride has many color options from which to choose.
The shoe had an affordable price, according to most of those who have tried it.
Some users noted that the outsole provided enough traction for short and long-distance running sessions.
According to some consumers, the upper area dried quickly.
A good number of buyers said that the shoe was breathable and comfortable.
A lot of reviewers agreed that the Salomon Sense Ride was durable and lightweight.
Some users commented that the dense toe bumper was protective.
Many buyers loved the visually-appealing design of this running shoe.
1 reasons not to buy
One of the reviewers commented that the Salomon Sense Ride did not work well on extremely rocky terrains.
Bottom line
Many runners loved the Salomon Sense Ride. They agreed that it was lightweight, durable, breathable and comfortable. They commented that the shoe worked reasonably well on any hiking, walking and running activities. Some runners said that it was not best for rocky terrains but others still recommended the Salomon Sense Ride because of the right amount of traction it provided for long and short-distance running sessions."
Salomon Trailster,,95.0,10.0,1099.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Salomon Trailster 2,"8 reasons to buy
A notable number of Salomon Trailster wearers were impressed with the shoe's excellent grip even when running downhill at full speed.
Mentioned by most runners was that the Trailster provides ample cushioning for the very technical trails they run with lots of rocks and tree roots.
Also noted by wearers is how well put together this running shoe is.
According to a lot of users, the Trailster is a great lightweight shoe that offers flexibility and feel to the ground beneath while running.
A handful of users also liked the shoe as they say it had a very comfortable footbed, and after the first few miles, their feet were feeling at home in the shoe.
The Salomon Trailster is also easy to clean when necessary, which made quite many wearers happy.
A couple of runners particularly appreciated the shoe's thick ankle cushioning which helped a lot with their stability in running various types of terrain.
Majority of those who have purchased the Trailster agree that the shoe is a great value for money.
3 reasons not to buy
The shoe's toe box was also noted by several wearers to be narrow and shallow, causing a few serious blisters on their feet.
One user had an issue with the shoelaces saying it was very slippery and untied easily.
Most trail runners thought that the shoe could be better if it had some reflective element to it for night trail runs.
Bottom line
The Salomon Trailster is a trail running shoe that has excellent workmanship and good grip for running in demanding terrain conditions.  Also designed for heel-strikers, the shoes are known to be lightweight and breathable to help make sure the feet feel comfortable during an extended run. Even with some reviews of the Trailster having a narrow toe box, we can conclude that we are talking about a trail shoe that, for a very economical price, will not disappoint those who take their first strides in the world of trail."
Zoot Ultra Kiawe 2.0,,90.0,93.0,43.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.4oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
This shoe feels comfortable with or without socks, according to some reviews.
Many applauded the lightweight and comfortable construction of the Ultra Kiawe 2.0.
This shoe offers a smooth ride with impressive traction all throughout the every stride, according to several reviewers.
The BareFit internal liner that gives sock-like fit gained positive feedbacks from runners.
The ZVA technology of the Zoot Ultra Kiawe 2.0 offers dynamic shock absorption based on a handful of reviews.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners felt that this shoe is too firm.
Limited color options.
Bottom line
Experience a great fitting and performance feel while running on this Zoot Ultra Kiawe 2.0. The lightweight and overall construction of this shoe helps the runner surpass the demands on a race day. Expect an ultimate performance from this neutral running shoe."
New Balance 890 v7, New Balance,88.0,89.0,84.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.2oz , Women: 5.6oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,, New Balance 890 v8,"6 reasons to buy
A lot of testers said that the New Balance 890 v7 was comfortable.
According to those who have tried it, the shoe has excellent quality.
The majority of the consumers commented that the footwear was lightweight.
It was breathable, based on a review.
One of the users agreed that the shoe is best used for speed work or race day.
A reviewer admired the responsiveness of the shoe.
1 reasons not to buy
One of the users said that the insoles ride up the ankle area after a few miles of usage. Once it started, it continued until a half mile and needs to be adjusted back to its original position.
Bottom line
Many users were appreciative of the New Balance 890 v7. This running shoe received a lot of praise for its lightweight structure and comfort level. Although one user had an issue with the shoe's insole, others were still satisfied with its excellent construction and breathability. Overall, most of the shoe-enthusiasts who have tried the New Balance 890 v7 were happy with its quality and performance."
Saucony Cohesion 12,,91.0,80.0,1573.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.3oz , Women: 7.7oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Saucony Cohesion 13,"5 reasons to buy
The price of the Saucony Cohesion 12 was considered by many consumers to be very affordable.
Some testers considered the weight of this running shoe to be light enough for all-day use.
The 12th version of the Saucony Cohesion was lauded for being efficient during exercise sessions in the gym.
Prescription orthotic inserts went inside the foot-chamber effortlessly, several people observed.
The upper unit felt cool as it had open pores than welcomed air into the interior chamber, some users observed.
3 reasons not to buy
Some testers noted that the color schemes of the physical product were a bit different than what was shown on the online pictures.
There was less wiggle room in the toe box than the previous version, a few people stated.
A purchaser claimed that the in-shoe experience was a bit wider than the usual, stating that the upper didn’t secure the foot correctly.
Bottom line
The Saucony Cohesion 12 was able to receive mostly positive reviews from those who have tested it. People were generally happy with this running shoe’s performance and its specifications. The upper was deemed breathable, the weight was thought to be reasonably light, and the price was deliberated as very consumer-friendly. On the other hand, some consumers criticized the tight toe-box while others claimed that the overall in-shoe feel was a bit loose. Also, the color schemes apparently didn’t match those from the online photos."
Salomon S-Lab Sense 7 SG,,91.0,95.0,18.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 7.2oz , Women: 7.2oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Salomon S-Lab Sense 8 SG,"6 reasons to buy
Some users admired the Salomon S-Lab Sense 7 SG because of its lightweight construction.
According to some user reviews, the shoe offers an impressive grip on varied trail surfaces.
The shoe delivers long-lasting comfort, said a few wearers.
A couple of runners said the shoe is durable.
Several buyers mentioned that the upper keeps the foot warm on cold running conditions.
The shoe delivers a decent underfoot cushioning, noted in some user comments.
2 reasons not to buy
It is expensive.
The forefoot fits narrow, a few users commented.
Bottom line
The Salomon S-Lab Sense 7 SG is a lightweight trail shoe designed for neutral runners. It is admired by most users because of its weight, grippy outsole, and durable design. A few were unhappy because of the tight forefoot and expensive price, but these issues are not enough to overshadow the good ones. The S-Lab Sence 7 SG is a good option for those who are looking for a comfortable, light and fast trail running shoe."
Asics Gel Kayano 27,,83.0,,13.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 13mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Numerous reviewers hail the glove-like fit of the Asics Gel Kayano 27. 
According to various runners, the shoe provides ample stability. 
There is enough room for natural toe splay, commended several users. 
The road running shoe is very comfortable, stated a few purchasers. 
Some wearers have observed that the platform is very bouncy. 
For some commenters, the shoe is highly durable. 
It allows for smooth transitions, lauded multiple customers.
3 reasons not to buy
The running shoe has a tight midfoot wrap, expressed a few racers. 
A number of buyers have observed that the shoe is rather bulky. 
There is too much exterior reinforcement, shared a couple of critics.
Bottom line
Promising to supply sufficient support to the running contender, the Gel Kayano 27 from Asics features an advanced cushioning system. The stability shoe, with its integrated technologies and componentry, yields optimal comfort and performance, making it an ideal running platform for runners participating in both competitive and non-competitive activities. With the flexibility it offers, the natural roll of the foot is encouraged."
Merrell Vapor Glove 4 3D,,89.0,,165.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 6.9oz , Women: 5oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The Merrell Vapor Glove 4 3D’s foot-like shape has garnered numerous positive responses from different users. 
One of the features that received overwhelming approval from the testers and experts was the comfort that the shoe offers.  
Some of the reviewers praise the shoe’s versatility; it can be worn for everyday wear and as a workout companion. 
The shoe’s durability is lauded by several runners.
A lot of the runners highly appreciate the sufficient protection provided by the shoe. 
One customer has noted the improvement on the shoe’s upper, which is now made of 3D knit. 
The flexibility that is promoted by the shoe is admired by a few users. 
4 reasons not to buy
One runner complains that the Vapor Glove 4 3D has caused some blisters on foot. 
A reviewer has mentioned that the Hyperlock™ thermoplastic polyurethane (TPU) heel counter was too stiff. 
When the shoe is tightened, the blood flow around the ankle is constricted, according to some wearers.
The laces of the Vapor Glove 4 3D are too long, and they easily unravel, a few users remarked.
Bottom line
A lot of people have said that the Merrell Vapor Glove 4 3D is the most comfortable trail running shoe they ever have worn. The credit is all due to the highly-praised 3D knit upper of the shoe. Several testers and experts have reported that this minimalist running shoe is highly durable to the extent that one runner used it for a marathon. The vegan-friendly quality of the Merrell Vapor Glove 4 3D is an added plus to a lot of people. 
Although there have been issues raised by a few users around the shoe lacing system, the overall reception of the shoe has been highly positive. Some wearers claim that they will surely get another pair of the Merrell Vapor Glove 4 3D. "
Salomon Supercross GTX,,94.0,86.0,56.0,,," Mud, Trail", Neutral, Men: 12oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The pattern of lugs on the outsole of the Salomon Supercross GTX is welcomed by consumers because of the capacity to clamp onto the irregular surfaces of the great outdoors.
Several testers are happy with the security and precise fit adjustment capacity of the shoelaces.
Those with high arches (underpronators) feel that the midsole unit is able to support the foot properly throughout the running session.
According to some runners, the midsole unit has enough responsiveness for all-day wear.
A handful of consumers have noted that the waterproof feature of the upper unit is a solid implementation for wet conditions.
The inner sleeve of this running shoe is deemed non-irritating and smooth.
2 reasons not to buy
Some users have expressed concern that the outsole unit is not as grippy on slick surfaces.
Based on a couple of reviews, the forefoot section as a tendency to bunch the toes together, thus causing discomfort.
Bottom line
The overall feedback of people for the Salomon Supercross GTX has been positive. This Salomon trail running shoe apparently has the capacity to deliver efficient performance on the unpredictable trails. The midsole unit, in particular, is highlighted for having a responsive nature that encourages all-day wear. On the other hand, the wet-traction of the outsole is deemed questionable.
Fans of trail running shoes and options from Salomon are the target market of the Salomon Supercross GTX."
Asics HyperGel SAI,,87.0,93.0,52.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"4 reasons to buy
The designed and color schemes of the Asics HyperGel SAI were lauded by its purchasers.
The underfoot cushioning system received appreciation for being responsive and springy.
A few users mentioned that the shoe is comfortable.
Some wearers lauded the outsole durability of the HyperGel SAI.
3 reasons not to buy
Several people complained that the Asics HyperGel SAI was too big, even when sizing down from their regular choices.
Most of those who have tested this shoe felt that it was too narrow.
It was difficult to wear this shoe, according to a few people.
Bottom line
The Asics HyperGel SAI wasn’t very well-received. While people thought that this road shoe had a midsole that was reactive and a façade that was visually appealing, they didn’t react well to the rest of its aspects. The upper unit was criticized for not being breathable and adaptive to the shape of the foot. The sizing scheme and width profiles were also held negative regard."
Salomon XA Elevate,,91.0,91.0,93.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
The XA Elevate was more responsive compared to some of Salomon’s other shoes, said a customer.
The shoe displayed outstanding performance on technical trails, according to an amazed runner.
The Profeel Film gave a good impression of the trail while it offered forefoot protection, a user relayed.
One reviewer stated the shoe reduced their ankle instability.
Several wearers felt great support from the XA Elevate.
Many users commended the outsole for its fantastic grip while remaining flexible.
The Quicklace™ feature was very convenient, a lot of runners mentioned.
Purchasers agreed that the shoe was versatile as it easily handled both rocky trails and soft ground.
4 reasons not to buy
A runner was dismayed that the cushioning was not as plush as they expected.
One user experienced issues with the outsole while running on wet rock.
A couple of reviewers anticipated the Vibe technology in the shoe and were thus dissatisfied when it was not.
The tongue did not hold its place and kept on moving around, said a customer.
Bottom line
The Salomon XA Elevate gathered mixed reviews from consumers, but mostly geared towards the positive side. Compliments were relayed about the shoe’s structural elements that worked excellently, while some admired the competent features as a trail runner. Although there were some disappointments regarding missing tech, these criticisms did not reflect the shoe’s performance. In summary, many users thought the shoe was a worthy investment, with some even asserting that it is a “must-have.”"
Altra Escalante 1.5,,93.0,88.0,340.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.9oz , Women: 6.5oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,, Altra Escalante 2.0,"10 reasons to buy
Some runners who purchased the Altra Escalante 1.5 said that it was comfortable to wear.
Several consumers noted that this Altra running shoe has excellent cushioning
The footwear was true to size, according to some reviews.
A few purchasers admired the color combination of the shoe. They said that the color schemes are compatible with most running apparels.
A significant number of testers agreed that the Altra Escalante 1.5 was perfect for walking and jogging.
Many runners mentioned that the Escalante 1.5 has a super fit; it also provides the ankle a secure feeling.
A couple of buyers lauded the sufficient support the shoe has provide.
More than a handful said that the shoe is lightweight.
The upper has a breathable coverage and some testers liked it.
Some purchasers noticed that the Escalante 1.5 has a more structured upper compared to the previous version.
2 reasons not to buy
One purchaser said the fabric on the upper part of the shoe was too stretched. As a result, it made the grip on the foot not secured during exercise and running session.
According to a few reviews, the sole wears off quicker than expected.
Bottom line
The majority of the testers admired the shoe's performance in jogging and walking activities. They noted how the shoe was comfortable to the foot especially when in motion. Though one of the buyers was not satisfied because of the fitting, others still recommend the footwear because of its design and color combination. Overall, the shoe was accepted by many because of its sizing, style, and performance. The Altra Escalante 1.5 is an excellent option for those who are looking for a comfortable and well-cushioned running shoe."
Hoka One One Akasa, Hoka One One,94.0,,236.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Most of the users commented that the Hoka One One Akasa has a comfortable upper.
The shoe is responsive according to those who have tried it.
A lot of users admired its springy ride.
This running shoe is supportive, based on some reviews.
The Hoka One One Akasa is a versatile running shoe; some users also used it for walking and gym training.
Several purchasers loved the footwear's attractive design.
The lightweight structure was appreciated by some of the buyers.
2 reasons not to buy
A tester commented that the heel cup is too stiff.
One of the reviewers said that the footwear has poor heel cushioning. As a result, he experienced a little pain in the ankle bone during the activity.
Bottom line
The majority of the buyers were pleased and satisfied with the Hoka One One Akasa's visually-appealing design, responsiveness, and versatility.  Though some have issues with the stiff heel cup and poor heel cushioning, others still recommend the shoe because of its lightweight structure. All in all, the Hoka One One Akasa is accepted by many but it still has room for improvement."
New Balance Fresh Foam Zante Solas, New Balance,87.0,87.0,37.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 5.3oz , Women: 4.4oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm, Dec 2018,,,"5 reasons to buy
The New Balance Fresh Foam Zante Solas is a very comfortable shoe, according to several customers. One user, in particular, said it almost felt like a sock against the skin.
Various buyers agreed that the shoe is excellent for everyday wear.
One user mentioned that the Zante Solas had a stylish appearance.
The shoe is perfect for indoor workouts and training, aside from running, said a customer.
The shoe was described to be as light as a feather by a reviewer.
2 reasons not to buy
The fit of the Zante Solas is quite narrow around the forefoot, a couple of reviewers stated.
The material around the collar makes the skin itch when the shoe is worn without a sock, one user commented.
Bottom line
When it comes to comfort level, the New Balance Fresh Foam Zante Solas stays on top of things, based on how consumers viewed its versatility and ease of wear. Some found issues regarding fit and construction. In addition, there were not enough comments to conclude that functionality is beyond the basic level. Overall, for a simple, no-frills running shoe, the Fresh Foam Zante Solas met the expectations of runners."
La Sportiva Wildcat 2.0 GTX,,90.0,88.0,52.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 14.1oz , Women: 11.6oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
It features a one-piece mesh upper for added comfort and excellent adaptability, according to a few reviews.
Majority of the runners applauded the sturdy construction of the La Sportiva Wildcat 2.0 GTX.
Most runners were impressed by the grip of this shoe when used in snowy and icy terrain.
The waterproof membrane really works impressively as noted in some reviews.
True to size.
4 reasons not to buy
The Wildcat 2.0 GTX has a narrow construction and not ideal for runners with wider foot.
Some runners observed that underfoot cushioning needs improvement.
A slightly expensive shoe.
Few runners found this shoe a bit heavy.
Bottom line
The La Sportiva Wildcat 2.0 GTX is a waterproof trail running shoe that is very reliable when used in snowy surface. The updated version provides enhanced stability, cushioning and comfort. It is a great partner for daily running activity. Given the positive and negative comments from the users, the Wildcat 2.0 GTX still needs a few improvements."
On Cloudventure Peak,,91.0,90.0,153.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The customers mentioned that the cushioning of the On Cloudventure Peak was remarkably good.
A few users commented that this shoe needed no break-in time and could be used straight for marathons right out of the box.
A runner ‘loved’ the protection given by the shoe on rocks and against impact loads.
The purchasers highly appreciated the overall look of the Cloudventure Peak by calling it a pair of ‘most gorgeously designed shoes’.
The runners experienced zero blisters while running in these shoes.
The wearers were happy with the snug fit of the shoe.
Some individuals mentioned that the shoe performed exceedingly well on loose or wet surfaces owing to its excellent traction.
1 reasons not to buy
A few customers had issues with the sizing of the shoe.
Bottom line
The On Cloudventure Peak, owing to its unparalleled professional attributes, has managed to outperform its competitors in the market and establish a large number of fans. The shoe has stylish looks, sturdy build, excellent grip and remarkable durability. The majority recommended that the shoe, being perfect, should make no further changes in its current design for its future models."
La Sportiva Bushido II,,91.0,92.0,70.0,,, Trail, Stability, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Several consumers agreed that the La Sportiva Bushido II is comfortable.
Many users loved the good amount of traction it provides on the trails.
It is responsive, according to some buyers.
Based on a review, the La Sportiva Bushido II is best for rocky trails.
According to those who have tried it, the shoe is flexible.
A few mentioned that the shoe is durable.
1 reasons not to buy
Some of the wearers commented that the shoe has a narrow toe box.
Bottom line
With the release of the La Sportiva Bushido II, many users were made happy and satisfied because of its magnificent structure and construction. They also appreciate how comfortable the shoe is. Despite having issues on the narrow toe box, others still commended the shoe as an excellent choice when seeking a fantastic partner in tackling the trails. All in all, the La Sportiva Bushido II has earned the respect of many buyers because of its versatility and functionality."
Nike Renew Ride,,85.0,,7.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 8.4oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The flexibility of the Nike Renew Ride is welcomed by consumers who like to take advantage of natural foot motion.
The cushioning unit is welcomed because it is able to mitigate impact shock and lead the foot through the gait cycle.
In-shoe security through the multilayered overlays is deemed agreeable.
The reflective element at the front of the shoe is appreciated for its significance to safety.
People have stated that the upper unit of this Nike running shoe is suitably breathable.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people believe that the in-shoe experience of the Nike Renew Ride is a bit restrictive.
The insole apparently has a tendency to scratch against the bottom of the foot, based on a handful of reviews.
Bottom line
The Nike Renew Ride aims to deliver quick and effortless steps because of its flexible construction. The form-welcoming nature of the upper and the breathable fabrics that come with it are tasked with furthering comfort and potential for all-day use. Runners can enjoy a running session that feels confident with this road running shoe as a companion."
New Balance Fresh Foam Crag Trail,,84.0,,260.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Several purchasers have lauded the appealing color schemes of the New Balance Fresh Foam Crag Trail.
The price of this trail running shoe is praised for being wallet-friendly.
Most consumers raise their thumbs in affirmation of the relatively lightweight structure of this New Balance running shoe.
Some say that the underfoot platform is able to steady the foot and maintain balance on uneven terrains.
The traction capacity of the outsole is acknowledged by people who like agreeable surface control.
The general durability of the materials is considered dependable and adherent to expectations.
3 reasons not to buy
Several testers claim that the New Balance Fresh Foam Crag Trail is hard to put on because of the one-piece opening.
The lack of a tongue unit has been lamented by some runners because it made the in-shoe experience a bit tight.
A few people have reported a tendency of the upper’s fabrics to rub uncomfortably against the skin of the foot.
Bottom line
The response towards the Fresh Foam Crag Trail has been mixed to positive. People report that this New Balance trail running shoe is versatile and attractive. Aside from the looks, the underfoot platform and the outsole are also highlighted as the elements that help with this product’s effectiveness and consumer appeal. On the other hand, the one-piece opening has become the source of ire because of its restrictive build and not-so-stretchy design.
Fans of off-road performance shoes are the ones to enjoy the New Balance Fresh Foam Crag Trail."
Hoka One One Evo Speedgoat,,93.0,97.0,8.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.3oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A lot of people say that this trail running shoe's outsole has good traction and grip on different surfaces. 
Several users say that the Evo Speedgoat is very comfortable for trail running. 
A lot of runners appreciate the lightweight feel of the shoe. 
The Evo Speedgoat is highly durable according to a number of wearers. 
A lot of the purchasers like the overall aesthetics of the shoe. 
One runner says that the shoe is able to enhance speed when running. 
The shoe offers roomier insole experience and breathability, several runners claim.
2 reasons not to buy
The Evo Speedgoat tends to be very noisy, especially on wood floor or concrete, says one runner. 
The shoe is tight on the toe box, complained some runners. 
Bottom line
The consensus of the reviewers on the Hoka One One Evo Speedgoat is highly positive. A lot of users appreciate the comfort it gives. The good grip of the shoe on surfaces was lauded by many. Although there were some complaints on the shoe’s narrow toe box, the users were still very satisfied with the aesthetics and lightweight feel that the shoe offers. Some even claim that it is the best trail running shoe. "
Asics Gel Flux 5,,87.0,80.0,435.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.2oz , Women: 9.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The cushioning systems that are present in the Asics Gel Flux 5 were appreciated by those who have tested it.
Most consumers considered this running shoe to be right to size.
The color schemes were lauded because it made the façade more eye-catching.
The weight of this product was considered to be suitably light.
Most purchasers noted that the upper and the sole unit were able to support the shape and motion of the foot.
2 reasons not to buy
Some testers claimed that the Gel Flux 5 required an initial break-in period of a few uses before becoming comfortable.
The durability of the shoe has been disappointing to some, especially when compared to the previous version of the Gel Flux.
Bottom line
Most runners were happy with the performance of the Asics Gel Flux 5. Some of them welcomed the supportive upper and midsole, while others fawned about its eye-catching design. Moreover, this neutral road shoe was deemed lightweight. On the other hand, there were complaints about a need for a break-in period, as well as problems on durability."
Nike Renew Rival,,77.0,55.0,267.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
People were generally happy with the aesthetics of the Nike Renew Rival; they noted that the colors were eye-catching.
Many runners thought that the upper unit offered suitable support.
The majority of consumers believed that the sizing scheme of this running shoe accommodated their expectations.
The cushioning capability of the midsole unit was trusted by those who have tested it.
According to some purchasers, this shoe didn’t need a break-in period; it was agreeable from the start.
The slip-on design made the Renew Rival effortless to put on.
1 reasons not to buy
Some rare instances yielded a few disgruntled consumers who didn’t like the underfoot experience of the Nike Renew Rival.
Bottom line
The Nike Renew Rival received many positive remarks from consumers. They considered this road running companion to be a reliable option during quick running sessions and urban adventures. It’s as though they welcomed it primarily as a part of their fashion apparel. There were complaints about the midsole being a bit uncomfortable, but such claims were uncommon."
Saucony Shadow 6000,,92.0,81.0,296.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 12.9oz , Women: 10.8oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
A suede upper with leather overlays improved the overall durability of the material while giving off a distinctly cool look, according to a large number of runners.
Most reviewers appreciated the padded collar and tongue, which enhanced the comfort of the skin and generally offered a snug fit.
The Ethylene vinyl acetate mid-sole is a reliable mid-sole material that gives responsive underfoot cushioning and springiness with each step.
The Triangular Lugs on the outsole unit lets the Shadow 6000 take hold of dry and wet surfaces.
This running shoe has an affordable price.
4 reasons not to buy
There were runners who felt that the Shadow 600 needed a waterproofing mechanic to fully provide a seamless experience during all types of weather conditions.
Some reviewers noted that it looked too bulky and that it felt too stiff.
Its weight is heavy.
Others felt that it was a bit tight in the forefoot area.
Bottom line
The Shadow 6000 from Saucony is a robust running shoe that offers a lot of service to runners who need stability, comfort and durable protection. It is a daily shoe that athletes can use for mid-tempo trainings. Given all the positive praised from users, the Shadow 6000 is indeed an above-average running partner."
Under Armour Charged Escape 3,,95.0,,293.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The upper of the Under Armour Charged Escape 3 is praised for being secure and form-fitting.
Several testers report that the midfoot area of the platform is able to provide support for the arch.
A handful of purchasers believe that the midsole unit offers a ride that is similar to walking on clouds.
The durability of the materials is confirmed by some users who have worn this running shoe for extended periods.
Some people say that the weight of this product is relatively light and suitable for all-day use.
The aesthetics of this product are welcomed by casual shoe enthusiasts and those with active lifestyles.
3 reasons not to buy
A few consumers claim that the in-shoe experience is a bit stifling.
Some testers report that the Under Armour Charged Escape 3 needed a break-in period to be fully comfortable.
A number of purchasers were disappointed with the pricing of the shoe.
Bottom line
The overall reaction towards the Charged Escape 3 has been positive. People are mostly happy with what this Under Armour running shoe has to offer. The highlights include the upper’s accommodating construction, the midsole’s reactive and cloud-like experience, and the versatile configuration of the aesthetics. On the other hand, the warm in-shoe hug and the required break-in period became areas of criticism.
Fans of neutral running shoes ideal for the roads are the ones who are likely to enjoy the Under Armour Charged Escape 3."
New Balance 860 v6,,92.0,85.0,163.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.7oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, New Balance 860 v10,"5 reasons to buy
Offers nice aesthetics with cool highlights and bright colors.
A comfortable running shoe that keeps the runners' feet dry and cool while running, according to several testers.
The upper mesh of the New Balance 860 v6 perfectly molds the foot that result in a snug-like fit.
With the presence of the ABZORB crash pad, a higher-density EVA foam and ACTEVA lite, this road running shoe provides great shock-absorbing features.
Some runners love the 6th version of the New Balance 860 for long mileage.
3 reasons not to buy
The New Balance 860 v6 is a bulky running shoe, which may not look good in runners who have slender feet.
A couple of runners experience having blisters with this shoe during their first few uses.
According to many runners, they had issues with the shoe's sizing.
Bottom line
The New Balance 860 v6 is a stability running shoe that casual runners can consider, especially those with moderate overpronation. Though it received positive and negative comments, some users still considered the shoe as a worthy investment. This shoe is designed for terrains such as roads and works extremely well as a sturdy training partner."
Salomon Sonic RA Max 2,,84.0,91.0,9.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Many users noticed the durability of the outsole of the Salomon Sonic RA Max 2.
A couple of runners appreciated the responsive performance of the midsole.
The toe box felt adequately roomy, according to some reviewers.
A lot of runners were satisfied with the shoe’s performance on long-distance runs.
Several reviewers claimed the Sonic RA Max 2 was comfortable right out of the box.
3 reasons not to buy
Some wearers did not like that the Sonic RA Max 2 runs smaller than the standard sizing scheme.
The tongue of the shoe was a bit too high for the liking of some buyers.
A few users commented that the cushioning is not soft as expected of a maximalist running shoe.
Bottom line
The Salomon Sonic RA Max 2 was generally well-regarded by its users. Positive comments surround the shoe’s reliability, especially with the functions of the sole unit. Many runners felt the shoe performed outstandingly and claimed that they see themselves using the shoe for long-time. Although some of its structural details were criticized, the Salomon Sonic RA Max 2 is still considered a successful release."
Adidas Solar Drive,,90.0,79.0,804.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,, Adidas Solar Drive 19,"5 reasons to buy
Some consumers felt that the Adidas Solar Drive had an affordable price.
The midsole unit received positive feedback for being highly bouncy and ready to attenuate impact.
The general durability of this running shoe’s materials was lauded; people commented that it remained new-looking throughout their runs.
Some reviewers noted that the grip-capacity of the outsole was precise and reliable.
The reflective detailing added some visual flair to the façade, a few testers noted.
3 reasons not to buy
A few people felt that the upper unit of the Adidas Solar Drive needed to be more breathable.
Some testers claimed that the in-shoe experience was too spacious for proper foot security.
The overlays on the eyelets made the upper a bit stiff, a reviewer complained.
Bottom line
The Adidas Solar Drive was well-received by those who have tried it, though with some caveats. The positive side revolves around a responsive and comfortable midsole, a high-quality build that speaks volumes on durability, and a generally agreeable performance on the roads. The negative parts of the feedback involved a stuffy upper construction, a too-spacious inner chamber, and an eyelet-reinforcing overlay that apparently made the silhouette a bit stiff."
Salomon S-Lab Sense 7,,86.0,84.0,7.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 7.2oz , Women: 7.2oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Salomon S-Lab Sense 8,"5 reasons to buy
People who have tried the Salomon S-Lab Sense 7 liked the appealing design and color scheme.
Some testers claimed that the outsole had a balanced design that worked well on pavements.
The weight of this trail companion was considered to be suitably light for extended
The fit was deemed snug yet secure enough to accommodate the natural shape and motion of the foot.
The general durability of this shoe’s materials was appreciated; runners claimed that the components didn’t break down quickly.
2 reasons not to buy
Some testers lamented the flimsiness of the protective toe cap, stating that it wasn’t efficient at staving off abrasive trail debris and surfaces.
The inner sleeve rubbed uncomfortably against the skin of the ankles, a consumer complained.
Bottom line
The Salomon S-Lab Sense 7 trail running shoe gained mostly positive remarks from those who have tested it. This product’s build and looks were considered to be high-tier. The lightweight nature and the stable outsole configuration were also highlighted as performance-driving elements. On the other hand, some complaints were directed to the lack of a generous, protective toe cap and an irritating inner sleeve."
Brooks Beast 18,,89.0,86.0,1015.0,,, Road, Motion control,,,,,,, Brooks Beast '20,"8 reasons to buy
Many people felt that the sizing scheme of the Brooks Beast 18 adhered to their expectations.
Some consumers liked that the underfoot cushioning system of this running shoe alleviated any soreness to the ankles and leg.
Several testers considered the year 2018 version of the series to be more comfortable than the Brooks 16.
The stability features were welcomed by overpronators who wanted to be fully steady throughout their running sessions.
A handful of purchasers liked the spacious toe box and the more accommodating instep design.
According to some runners, the quality and design of this model made it an accommodating choice for both running and walking.
Many avid wearers who suffer from discomfort every time they go for a run due plantar fasciitis have found the Brooks 18’s midsole support and cushioning very helpful in alleviating the pain.
Most users have noted that even with long term use, the BioMoGo midsole cushioning technology is still able to retain the comfortable feeling when the shoe is first worn.
4 reasons not to buy
According to a disgruntled consumer, his feet felt exhausted because the cushioning in the Beast 18 was thinner than the previous version. He also claimed that the stability mechanisms were flimsy.
A few people commented that the weight of this running shoe was heavy.
The color schemes were deemed by several runners to be bland and uninteresting.
A narrow width was observed by some testers.
Bottom line
Many people were happy with the Brooks Beast 18. They embraced its comfortable construction, the stability mechanisms, the roomy toe-box, and the quality materials. For them, this road shoe was a step up from its predecessor, the year 2016 iteration. On the other hand, an isolated incident saw a person complain of the inefficient stability mechanisms as well as insubstantial cushioning. Also, some people thought negatively about its weight, colorways, and width profile."
Adidas Terrex Two,,86.0,,33.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9.3oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Some of the users say that the Adidas Terrex Two provides a good fit.
A lot of buyers love the shoe's comfort level.
A handful of reviewers commented that the Terrex Two is elegant and stylish.
According to those who have bought it, the running shoe is true to size.
Based on the reviews, the footwear is lightweight in structure.
It is breathable, noted by several purchasers.
A good number of testers commented that the shoe is durable.
One of the testers said that the Adidas Terrex Two provides excellent traction.
2 reasons not to buy
One of the users said that the Adidas Terrex Two is not waterproof.
A reviewer observed that the anti-slip feature of the shoe is not functioning well.
Bottom line
The Adidas Terrex Two has offered what users expect from a neutral road running shoe. These things include the comfort level, design, and fit. The majority of the testers were amazed by the outstanding performance and quality delivered by the footwear. With its appealing look and lightweight structure, almost all of them agree that the Adidas Terrex Two is a perfect partner in tackling different paved surfaces. Although some have issues with its waterproof and anti-slip features, others still recommend the shoe for those who want to improve and excel in their running activities."
Hoka One One Arahi 4,,84.0,86.0,8.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.6oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The midsole unit of the Hoka One One Arahi 4 is welcomed because it is able to support the foot responsibly.
Some consumers have noted that the midsole unit is bouncy enough to encourage the potential of the step.
The aesthetics of this product are lauded; the visuals are deemed highly appealing.
Several purchasers believe that the upper unit is breathable enough to enable all-day wear.
The lightweight structure of this running shoe is welcomed by a lot of runners.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people have experienced the foot sliding towards the front of the interior chamber.
A couple of testers believe that the stability mechanisms present in this model are not enough for responsible pronation correction.
Bottom line
The overall reactions of people towards the Hoka One One Arahi 4 have been positive. They like the breathability of the upper unit, as well as the supportive yet bouncy construction of the underfoot platform. The stability mechanisms are deemed inconsistent because some have felt that they weren’t enough to fully correct overpronation.
Fans of road running shoes that aim to stabilize the gait are the target market of the Arahi 4."
Puma Carson 2 X Knit, Puma,92.0,,181.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7oz , Women: 6oz,,,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
People generally liked the lightweight construction of the Puma Carson 2 X Knit.
The underfoot cushioning was lauded for being able to provide support and comfort.
Those who have tested this running shoe liked the variety of color schemes that were available.
The price was considered to be very affordable.
Some users welcomed the flexibility of the sole unit, emphasizing that it allowed them to move more naturally.
The one-piece opening was welcomed by several testers; they stated that it evoked a smooth, slip-on feel.
3 reasons not to buy
The sole unit started to fall apart after only a few months of intermittent use, several consumers complained.
A few purchasers claimed that this shoe didn’t have enough arch support.
Some people felt that the sole unit was too thin for all-day use.
Bottom line
The Puma Carson 2 X Knit was well-liked by many of those who have tested it. This neutral shoe’s cool looks, flexible platform, and slip-on construction were lauded for making the performance as convenient as possible. The low price also gained positive feedback. On the other hand, some detractors were unhappy with the apparently flimsy build, width some claiming that the sole unit was easy-to-break."
Adidas Solar Glide ST 19,,77.0,81.0,22.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Several consumers claim that the Adidas Solar Glide ST 19 has a durable build that lasts a long time.
The visual aspect of the Adidas Solar Glide ST 19 is praised for being versatile enough to handle active and fashion-forward lifestyles.
The traction capacity of the outsole is welcomed by those who desire consistent surface control when running.
Most users report that the weight of this Adidas running shoe is suitably light for everyday use.
‘Comfortable’ is a word that many have used to describe their time wearing the Solar Glide ST 19.
Some have noted that the underfoot cushioning is able to properly support the underside of the foot.
2 reasons not to buy
Some people claim that the heel part of the upper unit has a tendency to rub against the skin uncomfortably.
A few consumers have observed the midsole unit losing structure after only a few weeks of use.
Bottom line
The overall reaction for the Adidas Solar Glide ST 19 has been mostly positive. A lot of people believe that this running shoe has the capacity to deliver confident and energized performances. The aesthetics are also welcomed by those who appreciate stylishness in a package that’s intended for athleticism. On the other hand, the irritating heel fabrics and the quick-to-wear midsole are criticized.
Fans of road running shoes that cater to the overpronation of the foot are the target market of the Adidas Solar Glide ST 19."
Nike Zoom Fly Flyknit,,93.0,88.0,191.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 8.4oz , Women: 7.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Many people stated that the midsole unit of the Nike Zoom Fly Flyknit was highly responsive to their movements.
The carbon fiber plate integrated into the midsole gained some fans as it apparently helped in making each step as springy as possible.
The Flyknit upper was considered by most consumers as one of the best cover systems in the market because it secured the foot in a lightweight and breathable wrap.
Several runners were happy that this shoe accommodated their sizing expectations.
Purchasers have lauded the aesthetics of the Nike Zoom Fly Flyknit, stating that its looks were visually striking.
This shoe just felt fast, according to more than a handful of users.
4 reasons not to buy
Some people complained that the outsole unit already started to wear off after only a few uses.
Several individuals noted that this shoe’s profile was heavy for their tastes, emphasizing that it didn’t allow them to wear it for very long.
The removable nature of the insole caused it to shift around irritatingly, a few testers observed.
The collar tended to rub against the ankles, causing discomfort, according to some consumers.
Bottom line
The Nike Zoom Fly Flyknit offered a lot when it comes to responsive performance on the roads. People were generally happy with the touted younger brother of the Vaporfly 4%. They welcomed the fresh looks, the fast heel-to-transitions, the high-quality midsole, and the breathable Flyknit upper. On the other hand, there were those who complained that the weight of this road shoe was more substantial than they anticipated; others weren’t happy with the easy-to-wear-off outsole and the way the collar chafed the ankles irritatingly."
Asics Gel Quantum 360 4,,90.0,,441.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.8oz , Women: 10.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Quantum 360 5,"7 reasons to buy
The updated upper, especially the lace system, of the Gel Quantum 360 4 was well-appreciated by some users.
One wearer felt the shoe was more durable compared to the previous version.
The shoe was perfect for running in cold weather because of the thicker upper material, said a runner.
The cushioning of the shoe helped with the sore spots on foot, according to a commenter.
The Gel cushioning was more comfortable than ever before, mentioned a reviewer.
Some users appreciated the trendy design of the shoe.
The Gel Quantum 360 4 was a reasonably priced shoe, wrote a buyer.
2 reasons not to buy
The shoe fitted poorly and was uncomfortable, a tester experienced.
The seam that ran down the side of the shoe was too tight and squished the little toe, one user complained.
Bottom line
The Gel Quantum 360 4 was a running shoe that was well-praised for its comfortable cushioning and reliable performance. Users were quick to recognize and appreciate updates presented by Asics in this latest version. Despite some negative comments about the fit and construction, the Gel Quantum 360 4 was a successful step forward in the evolution of the shoe series.
   "
Adidas Ultraboost ST,,92.0,82.0,841.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The proprietary Boost midsole delivers premium and resilient cushioning from the first stride all the way to the last.
It offers great support and stability without putting too much weight.
Many runners agree with the exceptional outsole durability.
The Primeknit upper hugs the foot very well and is very durable as well as remarked by a good number of users.
A couple of testers noted the Ultraboost ST’s plush comfort.
Some runners value the shoe’s ability to hold up well as a daily trainer or as a marathon option.
3 reasons not to buy
The Adidas Ultraboost ST is slightly heavy.
The shoe's high price tag is disliked by many.
Based on the observation of a handful of runners, the Adidas Ultraboost ST’s large heel tab looks way out of place.
Bottom line
Adidas added stability and support features to what it calls as the “greatest shoe” ever. The Ultraboost ST combines premium cushioning in a very stable ride. As can be expected, the arch support is superb for slight to moderate overpronators that piling on the miles will be very enjoyable."
Reebok Floatride Run Fast,,93.0,92.0,105.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.9oz , Women: 5.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Reebok Floatride Run Fast 2,"5 reasons to buy
Several people reported that the Reebok Floatride Run Fast was obliging as a shoe for speed training.
The lightweight construction of this running companion was lauded by many of its testers.
The underfoot experience was soft yet responsive, some consumers stated.
A handful of runners felt that the price of this road shoe was on par with the quality of its materials; it’s not too cheap, but it’s not hot on the wallet.
The width and the sizing scheme were aspects of this product that were thought to adequately follow expectations.
3 reasons not to buy
A tester complained of in-shoe wobbling and unsteadiness while wearing the Reebok Floatride Run Fast.
A few people observed some wear on the outsole after only about a hundred miles of using it.
The yellow accents on the upper didn’t agree well with several of its purchasers.
Bottom line
The people who have tried on the Reebok Floatride Run Fast were generally happy with what they were able to experience. This road shoe apparently offered effective performances on the roads. The lightweight build and the soft midsole construction were also given praise by neutral pronators. On the other hand, there were gripes about the upper being unsecured and the outsole peeling off after some time."
Merrell Bare Access Flex,,81.0,84.0,1440.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.4oz , Women: 5.4oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,, Merrell Bare Access Flex 2,"6 reasons to buy
The Bare Access Flex was an excellent choice for running on mixed trails because of its relaxed fit and sleek construction, according to a reviewer.
Many runners praised the outsole’s performance in wet environments.
Several users noted that the shoe was lightweight and was very comfortable to use on short-distance runs.
The midsole was quite responsive and delivered a lot of feedback, stated a tester.
There were some who thought that the toe box was nicely shaped; not too wide but also not restrictive.
The shoe fared well on the technical trails even without a sock, a user wrote.
5 reasons not to buy
A reviewer mentioned that this running shoe did not perform well on tempo runs.
The fabric of the upper has worn out after a brief time, a lot of users observed.
Few runners commented that the Bare Access Flex offered less support compared to its predecessor.
Some consumers observed squeaking sounds while walking and running in the shoe.
A couple of buyers said the arch support was a little too aggressive for a neutral shoe.
Bottom line
The Merrell Bare Access Flex is an attractive shoe that has excelled in the criteria of comfort and support. Some runners thought poorly of its durability, while others praised the shoe’s versatility amidst different running conditions. Given its performance on the road, the Bare Access Flex is a good option for runners who are looking for an affordable and reliable neutral shoe. "
Brooks Transcend 5,,90.0,83.0,275.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 9.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Brooks Transcend 7,"8 reasons to buy
One of the buyers felt no heel pain while wearing the shoe.
A lot of testers admired the stability it provided.
Some purchasers mentioned that the shoe was comfortable.
According to those who have tried it, the Brooks Transcend 5 was supportive.
The majority of the consumers noted that the shoe has excellent quality.
The Brooks Transcend 5 has a fantastic look, according to many buyers.
The shoe has a roomy toe box, based on observations.
A good number of testers agreed that the shoe was lightweight.
3 reasons not to buy
Some of the users said that the cushioning was stiff.
Several testers commented that they took several runs to break in.
According to some buyers, the upper area was unresponsive.
Bottom line
The Brooks Transcend 5 has made many purchasers contented and happy because of its attractive look and roomy toe box. Aside from the design, this brooks running shoe also delivers the right amount of support and comfort. While other wearers have issues with its stiff cushioning, others still recommend the shoe because of its quality. Overall, the Brooks Transcend 5 is an excellent choice for those who are looking for a comfortable yet lightweight stability shoe."
The North Face Ultra 110 GTX,,86.0,86.0,243.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 14.9oz , Women: 14.9oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The UltrATAC™ outsole easily gripped unstable trails, a reviewer wrote.
The upper was successful in keeping the foot dry even on snowy days, according to a wearer.
Many runners were amazed at the comfort delivered by the cushioning.
The midsole gave ample arch support, a customer remarked.
A buyer praised the outsole for its sturdiness even on rough trails.
Runs true to size.
5 reasons not to buy
Some users thought the Ultra 110 GTX was heavy.
The fit was a little tight around the toe box, a couple of wearers observed.
The shoe was too stiff, said a customer.
One buyer commented that the tongue rubbed against the foot uncomfortably.
The shoe was squeaking with each step, expressed a dismayed user.
Bottom line
The North Face Ultra 110 GTX has received mixed reviews from consumers, with the positive and negative feedback almost in equal numbers. On the one hand, the Ultra 110 GTX has efficient and impressive features that were able to wow its users. On the other hand, some were disappointed by the shoe’s construction and fit. Overall, this shoe could be considered as an average trail runner, but areas for improvement are apparent."
Merrell Bare Access Flex 2,,88.0,,102.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7oz , Women: 5.6oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Many users admired the lightweight built of the Merrell Bare Access Flex 2.
This road running shoe is very affordable.
Several users were happy with how comfortable the shoe is.
A few buyers lauded the stylish design of the shoe. They said it looks nice and appealing.
Some satisfied wearers commented that the shoe is well-made.
A significant number of runners said the Bare Access Flex 2 offers excellent arch support.
According to some user reviews, aside from running, the shoe is also comfortable and reliable enough for long walks.
A couple of users noted that the outsole design of the shoe is durable and grippy enough for both road and light trail surfaces.
1 reasons not to buy
Some users were unhappy with the toe-box. They said it is way too large for their feet.
Bottom line
The Merrell Bare Access Flex 2 received positive comments from the majority of the users. They admired the shoe’s feather-like feel, impressive ground contact, and its durable construction. Though some found the toe-box to be too wide for them, it still does not affect the positive rating the shoe received.
This neutral road running shoe is a good option for those who are looking for a running partner that has minimal cushioning yet durable and flexible enough to provide a more natural experience."
Nike Air Max 2015,,87.0,77.0,400.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 13.2oz , Women: 11oz,,,,, Nike Air Max 2017,"7 reasons to buy
The seamless construction and a plush inner sleeve take the runner for miles and miles of comfort in the Air Max 2015.
One of the best-looking shoes in the market, according to most runners.
There is a noticeable smoothness in the transition, based on several reviews.
It is significantly lighter than the previous model.
A good number mentioned that the midfoot wrap is better than the earlier version of the Air Max.
Reflective materials in the logos for low-light running.
The 2015 version of the Air Max has gender-specific flex grooves.
3 reasons not to buy
Nike’s most expensive shoe.
Durability is not enough considering the price range, as mentioned in many comments.
Traction could certainly be a lot better noted a handful.
Bottom line
The iconic Air Max line remains to be a yardstick in the 2015 model where great aesthetic appeal and decent performance go. Nike never fails to stretch the boundaries between performance and lifestyle, particularly in this model. While it is undeniably a great-looking shoe, it offers decent cushioning and responsiveness only. The arch support is moderate with a less than average traction. It lacks the performance of a shoe carrying a $200 price tag."
Asics FuzeTora,,87.0,,52.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7oz , Women: 5.7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
People liked the lightweight build of the Asics FuzeTora.
The design of this running shoe was thought to be similar to casual sneakers; most consumers liked wearing it casually.
The underfoot cushioning system was appreciated for offering a feeling of stepping on clouds.
Some testers claimed that the slip-on design made for a comfortable on-and-off experience.
The sizing scheme adhered to expectations, based on consumer feedback.
1 reasons not to buy
A few testers claimed that the inner walls of the Asics FuzeTora tended to rub irritatingly against the skin of the foot.
Bottom line
The Asics FuzeTora came to the market with a well-mannered salvo, with people welcoming its street-ready design and seamless construction. Neutral pronators also loved the soft cushioning system and the lightweight nature of the materials. A trickling of complaints was directed at the uncomfortable inner lining of the upper, but they’re not too deal-breaking."
Under Armour Charged Pursuit 2, Under Armour,85.0,,8.0,,, Road,, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The people who have tested the Under Armour Charged Pursuit 2 believe that the aesthetics are highly appealing.
The lightweight structure of this road running shoe is welcomed by those who don’t want motion and speed to be curtailed.
Many consumers have noted that the price of this product is affordable.
‘Comfortable’ is a word that a lot of testers have used to describe the underfoot experience.
The outsole traction is deemed as dependable and confidence-giving.
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of testers have experienced a wobbly in-shoe experience, stating that the upper isn’t as secure as expected.
A person has complained that the upper isn’t capable of breathing well.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of people towards the Under Armour Charged Pursuit 2 has been largely positive. This neutral running shoe is welcomed because of its wallet-friendly price, the grip of the outsole, and the comfortable midsole unit. Inversely, the in-shoe feel is considered not-so-secure while breathability is deemed inconsistent.
Fans of Under Armour running shoes for the roads can have fun with the Charged Pursuit 2."
Altra Viho,,89.0,91.0,9.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
People have appreciated the Altra Viho’s natural foot-shaped toe box design. 
Many purchasers have praised the overall quality of the shoe. 
This running partner is comfortable, based on reviews. 
Several commenters have lauded this shoe’s cushioning performance. 
A few runners have highlighted the shoe’s lightweight structure. 
The outsole unit is durable, said some wearers. 
This running companion is responsive, a user observed. 
Consumers are happy that the price for a pair of Altra Viho is affordable.
3 reasons not to buy
A tester mentioned that the Altra Viho looks too bulky. 
One buyer complained due to uneven sole issues. 
This running shoe is too narrow, according to some commenters.
Bottom line
The Altra Viho is a daily running shoe that is designed to keep the runner comfortable on every step of the run. It is a neutral running shoe that is manufactured using quality materials that deliver durability, flexibility, and breathability. This budget-friendly running shoe is suitable for running on paved surfaces. The Altra Viho is also a perfect running partner or training option for runners of all levels. "
On Cloud Terry,,83.0,90.0,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.3oz , Women: 6.5oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Majority of users found the On Cloud Terry to be the most comfortable running shoe they have ever worn.
A couple of runners said that the shoe reduced their leg and foot pains. Another mentioned the Cloud Terry helped relieve their plantar fascia.
Some users agreed the shoe was worth the price.
A number of commenters were pleased with the springy midsole of the On Cloud Terry.
Several wearers claimed the shoe was versatile. Others commended the shoe’s performance in various situations, including indoor and outdoor workouts.
The Cloud Terry was outstanding on long-distance runs, according to a few runners.
Many buyers appreciated the design of the On Cloud Terry.
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of users complained that the upper became deformed after just a few uses.
The Cloud Terry runs a bit tighter compared to other On running shoes, said a reviewer.
Bottom line
The On Cloud Terry was thought about to be a fantastic running shoe according to many buyers. Its comfort level and affordability were winning aspects to a lot of consumers. In addition, many reviewers gave positive feedback about their fit and feel experiences with the shoe. There were a few criticisms about the shoe’s sizing and durability, but, overall, the On Cloud Terry was able to give its users a satisfying running encounter."
Under Armour HOVR Velociti 2,,88.0,87.0,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Many runners consider the Under Armour HOVR Velociti 2 to be a comfortable running shoe. Others emphasize that it did not require a break-in period.
The upper of the shoe encases the foot snugly while still providing ample toe room, according to several wearers.
The HOVR foam midsole is responsive, as stated by various users.
A number of reviewers have experienced a snug heel fit with the shoe.
Users are pleased with the outsole because of its fantastic traction and reliable tread, especially on slushy roads or rain-slicked pavements.
The midsole of the shoe is neither too soft nor too firm; it is just the right amount of support and plushness, many reviewers have written.
2 reasons not to buy
The HOVR Velociti 2 is a bit heavy compared to other running shoes that claim to be “lightweight,” according to some buyers.
A few users find that the sole unit does not offer much underfoot protection.
Bottom line
The Under Armour HOVR Velociti 2 has received a significant number of positive reviews. Users are particularly happy with the shoe’s comfort level, as well as the functionalities of its elements. Many are also satisfied with the fit and feel that the shoe delivers. Meanwhile, some were not content with the weight and protective degree of the HOVR Velociti 2. Overall, the shoe emerges to be a recommendable running gear with comfortable cushioning and dependable features."
Asics GT 4000,,88.0,84.0,45.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
One reviewer said that the toe box provided ample room.
Several users were pleased with the cushioning of the Asics GT 4000, notably in the forefoot area.
A buyer specifically praised the lacing system of the shoe as it offered a secure fit that is not too restrictive.
Many were impressed with the responsiveness of the GT 4000. One runner, in particular, claimed the ride felt like that of a neutral shoe.
Some wearers noted the lightness of the shoe.
Most overpronators claimed the Asics GT 4000 has excellent stability features.
1 reasons not to buy
The shoe seemed to lack any sense of style, a disappointed buyer wrote.
Bottom line
Despite being a newcomer in the stability running shoe category, the Asics GT 4000 has successfully won the votes of runners through their efficient features and excellent construction. Majority of reviewers have taken notice of their improved performance thanks to the various shoe technologies of the shoe, particularly in the midsole. Aside from features, the construction of the GT 4000 has also been applauded, making this shoe an all-around win."
Adidas Sensebounce+,,82.0,,23.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 13oz , Women: 13oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The cushioning system of the Adidas Sensebounce+ is hailed as a reliable partner for extended running sessions and speed training sessions.
Consumers who have seen this road running shoe are happy with its overall visual design.
The versatility of this product’s construction has been praised by those who like to use it for activities other than running.
Some heavyset runners claim that the midsole is able to carry the weights of their bodies with ease.
The breathability of the upper unit is appreciated by those who like a cover system that doesn’t feel stifling.
In-shoe security has been thought of as precise and accommodating; testers don’t feel any wobbliness while wearing the Adidas Sensebounce+.
2 reasons not to buy
The roof of the forefoot section is deemed a bit low for some; the fabrics apparently had a tendency to rub against the foot uncomfortably.
A tester has complained about the outsole not being too grippy on wet ground.
Bottom line
The overall feedback for the Sensebounce+ has been moderately positive. Some consumers feel as if this Adidas running shoe is perfect for their daily needs. Casual shoe enthusiasts have even lauded its capacity to take them through tasks that aren’t connected to athletics. The high-quality cushioning system and breathable upper have become the highlights of this product. On the other hand, the low-roofed forefoot and the slippery-on-wet-ground outsole have been criticized.
Fans of neutral running shoes that are for the asphalt and other flat surfaces are the target market of the Adidas Sensebounce+."
Asics Gel Scram 4, Asics,90.0,,352.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 8.3oz,,,," Normal | Normal, Wide", Asics Gel Scram 5,"8 reasons to buy
The outsole of the Gel Scram 4 provided excellent grip on the trails, according to a commenter.
The shoe did outstandingly on steep, technical surfaces, as experienced by a buyer.
The Gel Scram 4 gave a long-lasting comfort, some wearers mentioned.
One reviewer wrote that there was “great workmanship in the design” of the shoe.
Many users shared they had bought more pairs because of how satisfied they were with the shoe’s performance.
The subtle colorways available were appreciated by the customers.
The Gel Scram 4 was surprisingly lightweight, considering it was a trail shoe, a commenter remarked.
A reviewer stated that the shoe felt firmer and more stable compared to other trail runners.
2 reasons not to buy
The fit was still too small even with the Extra Wide option, a buyer complained.
One user was upset that the outsole came apart after only two days.
Bottom line
The majority of the buyers claimed that the Asics Gel Scram 4 was, overall, a decent upgrade. The shoe delivered a firm structure, a supportive platform, and a comfortable fit, all of which made users feel they were wearing a top-of-the-line running shoe. The satisfaction of consumers is clear evidence that the Gel Scram 4 was a good buy."
New Balance Fresh Foam Arishi Trail,,79.0,,8.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Several consumers have stated that the weight of the New Balance Fresh Foam Arishi Trail is suitably light for long-term use.
The aesthetics of this trail running shoe are welcomed by those who like cool-looking trail apparel.
The cushioning system is welcomed because of its apparently supportive nature.
Some purchasers have stated that the outsole unit is able to deliver reliable traction on a variety of surfaces.
According to some users, the upper has protective elements that shield against sharp objects and irregular surfaces.
2 reasons not to buy
A few consumers have mentioned that the forefoot section has a tendency to uncomfortably bunch the toes together.
The collar irritatingly rubs against the ankles, based on a couple of reviews.
Bottom line
The overall reaction towards the Fresh Foam Arishi Trail has been mostly positive, though some significant issues might mar its capacity to maintain its pedigree. This trail version of the original Arishi retains its comfort and versatility level while equipping it with elements to handle the terrains.
Fans of New Balance running shoes can enjoy this trail-optimized offering of the Fresh Foam Arishi line."
Salomon XA Pro 3D CS WP,,90.0,89.0,499.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 15.6oz , Women: 12.6oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"10 reasons to buy
Many of the reviewers swear by the awesome comfort of the XA Pro 3D CS WP.
It has excellent traction, based on the comments of several hikers and runners.
The Sensifit overlays provide exceptional midfoot hold.
According to several users, these are very well-made shoes.
The QuickLace system offers ease and convenience in getting the right fit.
Offers more color options than past versions of the XA Pro 3D series.
A significant number of reviewers mentioned that the arch support is superb.
The durability of the XA Pro 3D CS WP is first-rate, as reported by several runners.
The lugs are self-cleaning, based on the experience of some runners.
A handful of runners really liked the shoe’s capacity to keep their feet warm during winter.
5 reasons not to buy
It is too stiff for some runners.
It runs a little small and narrow, as noted by more than a few runners.
The shoe is very heavy for a handful of runners.
A good number of runners noted that the shoe made a crunching sound that irritated them.
Several runners complained that the speed laces have a very short lifespan.
Bottom line
The CS WP is the ClimaShield and Waterproof version of the XA Pro 3D. It uses the CS technology to keep the feet warm for winter forays on the most challenging trails. The shoe is extremely stable, highly-durable, and built for the serious pounding at slow to moderate speeds."
361 Degrees Sensation 4,,82.0,84.0,8.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The majority of the users said that the 361 Degrees Sensation 4 is comfortable. 
This running shoe is lightweight, several runners claimed. 
Many buyers appreciated the soft cushioning of the shoe. 
Some wearers noted that the tongue helps offer a snug in-shoe feel. 
It is supportive, according to a couple of consumers. 
Several purchasers mentioned that it is also good for casual walks. 
People appreciated the shoe’s breathability. 
2 reasons not to buy
A lot of consumers mentioned that the shoe is a bit narrow. 
The shoe lacks flexibility, according to a user. 
Bottom line
The 361 Degrees Sensation 4 is a road running shoe designed to provide support for runners who overpronate. It utilizes technologies that deliver enhanced stability and comfort to improve the running experience. The shoe also features a stylish design, making it perfect not only for running but also for casual walks. "
Skechers GOrun Vortex,,93.0,,115.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 10.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Skechers GOrun Vortex - Storm,"7 reasons to buy
Utilizes a two-mesh fabric that is woven together for a stronger upper.
The GORun Vortex has a comfortable fit that many reviewers welcomed.
This running shoe continues the Skechers trend of offering many color choices.
The medium width of this shoe accommodates many shoe types without making it feel too tight or loose.
The durability of the shoe is impressive.
Runners who have tried this have sensed a more responsive underfoot cushioning because of the features present in it.
The Skechers Vortex has a moderate weight.
3 reasons not to buy
There were reviewers who felt uncomfortable with the flat arch of this shoe.
There were those who complained about it not being consistent with its length, which seemed to run large.
The mid-sole is directly exposed to the ground and the protective outsole layer isn’t placed in crucial areas where abrasion is usually found.
Bottom line
The Skechers GORun Vortex is a running shoe that anyone can wear because of its prime features that enhance performance and overall comfort. Though it received mixed reviews from the users, it is still safe to say that the GORun Vortex is a good shoe. This neutral running shoe is great for daily trainings and other athletic activities."
Topo Athletic ST-3,,88.0,85.0,15.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.3oz , Women: 6.1oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Quite a few runners laud the lightness of the Topo Athletic ST-3. 
The road running shoe is packed with flexibility, commended some wearers. 
Several commenters praise the durability of the running shoe. 
According to many buyers, the neutral running shoe has enough room for natural toe splay. 
It has sufficient cushioning, shard multiple testers. 
The shoe protects the foot from impact, observed various customers. 
A number of purchasers claim that the running shoe heightens speed. 
3 reasons not to buy
The neutral running shoe rubs on the Achilles, remarked some experts.
A few of the athletes have noticed that the heel fit is too tight. 
The road running shoe lacks breathability, expressed some users.
Bottom line
The Topo Athletic ST-3 is a minimalist running shoe that offers unparalleled lightness and ultra-flex. Sporting a low profile, the road running shoe is perfect for runners who want more ground feel and a barely-there platform. Since it is engineered for multi-function use, the neutral shoe is best used in both running and workout. Comprised of Topo Athletic's signature wide toe box, the shoe delivers comfort and unrestrained foot motions."
Adidas Terrex Two Parley,,81.0,85.0,18.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Several people claim that the forefoot section of the Adidas Terrex Two Parley is wide enough to welcome natural toe-splay.
A handful of consumers have noticed that the fabrics of the upper unit are smooth enough to prevent irritation.
The outsole unit of this trail running shoe is praised for having a grippy construction that adheres properly to the ground.
The aesthetics have been lauded by those who desire a trail companion that is appealing to the eyes.
Runners are happy with the environment-friendliness of the Parley Ocean Plastic™ yarns that are used for the upper unit.
The midsole unit is deemed sufficiently light and reactive for daily use.
2 reasons not to buy
Some users complain of pressure points near the instep, a phenomenon that is attributed to the thin fabric and its lack of padding.
The rear portion of the facade is wrinkly and not very secure, according to a few testers
Bottom line
The overall feedback for the Terrex Two Parley has been positive. This Adidas trail running shoe is praised for its eye-catching looks, the lightweight construction, and the exceptional traction. The use of recycled plastic-based yarns for the upper is also commended. On the other hand, the thin instep construction and the flimsy heel security have become the points of criticism.
Fans of neutral running shoes that are for the trails are the target market of the Adidas Terrex Two Parley."
Adidas Terrex Two BOA,,86.0,85.0,36.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Several consumers have expressed their appreciation for the Adidas Terrex Two Boa’s capacity to deliver traction on slick surfaces.
The forefoot section of this trail running shoe is praised for having a spacious profile that accommodates natural toe-splay.
Some testers believe that the midsole thickness is generous enough to maintain a consistently supportive and welcoming ride.
The Boa® lacing system presents a quick and effortless means of securing the fit, according to a handful of runners.
According to several of those who have tested this Adidas trail running shoe, the upper unit is able to keep the foot cool and dry.
The protective nature of the outsole rubber, midsole foam, and printed overlay system is lauded by off-road adventurers.
2 reasons not to buy
A few consumers claim that the upper unit generally has too much room that the foot becomes a wobbly mess throughout the run.
Based on a couple of reviews, the tongue unit of the Adidas Terrex Two Boa has a tendency to rub irritatingly against the skin of the foot.
Bottom line
The overall feedback of people towards the Adidas Terrex Two Boa has been welcoming. Those who have tested it are mostly happy with what it had to offer. This product paints a picture of efficient performance on tricky terrains. Also, it can apparently function well on slippery topography. The negative points cover the not-so-secure upper and the irritating tongue unit.
Fans of neutral running shoes that specialize in doling out confident movements on the off-road paths are the target market of the Terrex Two Boa."
The North Face Surge Highgate, The North Face,83.0,,9.0,$90,$54 (save 40%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 7.7oz,,,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
People are happy with the aesthetics of The North Face Surge Highgate.
Most user reviews have reported that the sizing scheme is able to accommodate their usual preferences.
The upper unit is praised for being flexible and stretchy enough.
The spaced-out and minimalist ghillie lacing system is considered form-welcoming and non-irritating to the foot.
Some testers have noted that the breathability of the upper unit is a compelling trait.
The cushioning system of this running shoe from The North Face is deemed reactive and flexible.
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of reviews tackled the quick-to-tear fabrics of the upper unit.
Some of the stitch-reinforcements of the collar and bridge of this shoe quickly lost structure and tautness, according to a tester.
Bottom line
The overall feedback of people towards The North Face Surge Highgate has been positive. This running shoe possesses a laudable design that is versatile enough to handle all sorts of activities. Additionally, the Surge Highgate also highlights its capability to handle various terrains.
Fans of neutral running shoes that are for the asphalt are the target market of The North Face Surge Highgate."
New Balance FuelCell,,90.0,78.0,272.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,, New Balance FuelCell TC,"6 reasons to buy
Most runners said the FuelCell is comfortable to wear.
The shoe delivered a firm and steady ride, as reported by some testers.
It felt lighter than expected and was relaxing on the foot, according to one reviewer.
A few users commented that the shoe provided the right amount of traction and was durable enough for daily use.
A couple of users said the shoe fit nicely and had no discomfort during wear.
One runner observed their legs moved quicker and had less fatigue with the shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
The upper fabric was misaligned and it blocked the lacing holes, as observed by one buyer.
Another user experienced pain in their heel while wearing the shoe.
The sole had separated and cracked after one month of usage, one buyer wrote.
Bottom line
The New Balance FuelCell is a neutral running shoe that is suitable for road running. With its commendable comfort level and weight, runners will have no time adjusting to wearing this shoe. The FuelCell’s technology gives features that enable the foot to be ready to run anytime."
La Sportiva Mutant,,92.0,84.0,86.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The upper of this shoe is made up of breathable, abrasion-resistant mesh with an integrated gaiter.
The Mutant features the SpyralTongue technology, which provides quick fitting and protection against mud and stones while running.
The hazards of the trials are kept at bay by reliable anti-debris mechanisms in the upper and sole unit.
The mid-sole delivers efficient cushioning and heel stability.
The AT Grip Spike feature that offers impressive grip while running on soft and muddy surfaces gained positive feedback from runners.
Some runners took note of the reliable and durable construction of the Mutant especially on technical trails.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners found the Mutant a little stiffer.
Its price is slightly expensive.
There were testers who noted that the toe section of the shoe was a bit narrow.
Bottom line
The La Sportiva Mutant is an aggressive trail running shoe that’s versatile and stable. It’s ideal for off-road trails, racing and mountain running. With the stability, protection and impressive grip of this shoe, this shoe will not disappoint even if used in different types of terrain."
New Balance Summit Unknown,,87.0,87.0,154.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.6oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, New Balance Summit Unknown v2,"5 reasons to buy
The sizing scheme of the New Balance Summit Unknown worked well with the expectations of many testers.
Several consumers noted that the upper unit was sufficiently breathable.
Those who have tried it greatly appreciated the lightweight nature of this running shoe.
The traction capacity of the outsole tread was deemed reliable. People also stated that it even handled technical trails with ease.
The upper unit was able to drain water well, a reviewer noted.
3 reasons not to buy
The tongue unit tended to deviate from its regular position, so several users had to cut anchor points on it to allow the laces to loop through them.
A tester felt that the width was a bit narrow.
According to a reviewer, the thin insole tended to slide forward and bunch up against the toe box.
Bottom line
People were mostly happy with the performance of the New Balance Summit Unknown. They welcomed its breathable and quick-draining upper unit, the sure traction of the semi-aggressive outsole, and the lightweight construction. Conversely, some runners were taken aback by the deviating tongue unit while others didn’t appreciate width profiles. Overall, this neutral trail shoe is divisive, but it’s still got its fair share of appreciation."
Adidas Pureboost,,92.0,85.0,639.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The word ‘comfortable’ was used frequently to describe the experience of wearing the Adidas Pure Boost.
Its lightweight nature received positive remarks from consumers.
The design appealed to runners; for them, it was stylish and modern.
Several purchasers noted that this shoe worked well not only for running, but also for gym exercises.
The rope-style shoelaces properly helped in securing the foot, some consumers reported.
Runners appreciated the general durability of the Adidas Pure Boost’s materials and components.
Many users felt that this road-companion was true-to-size.
3 reasons not to buy
The outsole wore off quickly, according to some of those who have purchased the Adidas Pure Boost.
A disgruntled consumer reported that the fabric that connected the upper to the midsole tore apart easily.
The folded tongue design caused some discomfort to the skin, according to several runners. They felt as though the portions that were doubled over had hot spots that prevented a well-actuated performance.
Bottom line
Many of those who have tried the Adidas Pure Boost proved to be happy with its performance. People appreciated the efficacy of its components, noting that it was comfortable, stylish and true-to-size. The secure upper and responsive midsole were also given praise. There were a few detractors who panned the lifespan of its parts while others lamented its apparently irritating uniquely configured tongue unit. But for the most part, this road running shoe was considered a success."
Asics Patriot 10,,89.0,85.0,1440.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.5oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Several runners thought that the Asics Gel Patriot 10 was a comfortable running shoe. Others claimed that wearing the shoe felt like “running on clouds.”
A reviewer said the shoe helped reduce the pain on their foot and knee.
The Gel Patriot 10 was lightweight, according to a number of users. Some also noted how the shoe contributed to their speed.
Many buyers commented about the shoe’s excellent design, while others were pleased that the colors go well with many outfits.
Some customers appreciated the Gel Patriot 10’s affordable price.
One user mentioned the shoe’s efficacy on many types of surfaces.
2 reasons not to buy
Despite the correct fit, the shoe kept rubbing uncomfortably against the right side of the foot, a wearer relayed.
One runner said it provided less arch support compared to the previous version.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Patriot 10 has excellently delivered function and comfort through its various technologies that proved efficient to users. This Asics running shoe was an excellent update that many runners were able to appreciate, especially to those who are familiar to the Patriot series."
Brooks Cascadia 14 GTX,,81.0,90.0,19.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.2oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Many buyers agreed that the Brooks Cascadia 14 GTX is perfect for running and day hikes. 
Some runners commented that the shoe kept their feet in great shape even after running several miles. 
The incredible gripping ability of the outsole was appreciated by many consumers. 
Brooks Cascadia 14 GTX was flexible, lightweight, and comfortable according to many reviewers. 
The footwear is tough enough for stepping on rocks and roots, according to one tester. 
A few consumers noted that in terms of durability, the shoe is worth their money. 
Several users were happy that the price of the Cascadia 14 GTX was affordable compared to other road running shoes. 
3 reasons not to buy
A couple of purchasers expressed that the Brooks Cascadia 14 GTX feels to narrow for them. 
According to a user, who does mostly trail running, the previous versions are better in terms of stability. 
A consumer mentioned that the shoe makes a lot of noise while walking. 
Bottom line
The Brooks Cascadia 14 GTX is appreciated by many runners. They were impressed with the running shoe’s affordability, flexibility, and lightweight structure. Although some consumers were dissatisfied with the fit and stability, others still recommended the shoe for its durability and quality. Many testers also expressed their desire to buy Brooks Cascadia 14 GTX for a second time."
Mizuno Wave Shadow 3,,95.0,88.0,29.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.4oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The testers have welcomed the lightweight structure of the Mizuno Wave Shadow 3, stating that it allows them to run for extended periods.
Consumers believe that the midsole unit has a reactive construction that encourages energized steps.
The upper unit is lauded for providing a cloth-like wrap that is not irritating to the skin of the foot.
A couple of runners have welcomed the appealing color schemes that are available for the Wave Shadow 3.
This Mizuno running shoe has a price that is deemed affordable by some purchasers.
The general quality of the materials is deemed robust and reliable.
2 reasons not to buy
A few testers have complained about the low ceiling of the forefoot section, causing some irritation on the skin.
The upper unit’s textile is quick to tear apart, according to a consumer.
Bottom line
Neutral, pronated foot motion is the target gait progression of the Mizuno Wave Shadow 3.  The responsive midsole and the accommodating in-shoe feel are elements that people say contribute to the performance of those with regular strides. Also, the quality of the materials and the price are appreciated. On the other hand, the low-volume forefoot and the flimsy textile of the upper are criticized.
The Wave Shadow 3 is a road running shoe that is meant for daily speed training sessions and urban adventures."
,,,95.0,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.6oz , Women: 8.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,
Nike Flex Experience 4, Nike,96.0,,40998.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.1oz , Women: 6.7oz, Men: 7mm , Women: 7mm,,, Nike Flex Experience RN 7,"7 reasons to buy
The Nike Flex Experience 4 is naturally very flexible.
It is very light.
Comfort comes in spades as observed by a large number of runners.
Stylistically viable for casual wear according to some reviews.
The Flex Experience 4 holds up well to punishment on the road based on several comments.
The snug and sock-like fit appealed to almost everyone who used the shoe.
The Nike Experience 4 handles different distances with ease.
2 reasons not to buy
A most common observation is how narrow the Nike Flex Experience 4 is.
Slight wear and tear signs began showing earlier than expected in the shoes of some runners.
Bottom line
The Nike Flex Experience 4 mixes the minimalist approach with some traditional features. It offers plenty of natural movement while support and cushioning are good enough. The ultra-flexible nature of the shoe will work best for those with sufficient support in their arches."
Hoka One One Speedgoat 3 Waterproof,,89.0,,163.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.4oz , Women: 9.6oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
A significant number of runners admired the durable design of the Hoka One One Speedgoat 3 Waterproof.
Many happy users mentioned that this shoe has ride quality of the legendary Speedgoat.
According to some buyers, the shoe provides reliable traction on varied surfaces.
The Speedgoat 3 Waterproof is comfortable, said some reviews.
Based on some user comments, the shoe offers an adequate level of support.
3 reasons not to buy
The shoe is expensive.
A few users mentioned that this waterproof shoe is not effective enough in keeping the feet completely dry.
Some runners found the forefoot to be too narrow for their foot shape.
Bottom line
The waterproof version of the Speedgoat 3 received mixed reviews from various users. Positive reviews mention about the shoe’s durability, comfort, and excellent ride quality while the negative ones were about the shoe’s sizing and waterproof upper. In summary, the shoe still needs some improvement but it still a good option for those who are looking for durable trail running shoe."
Brooks Ravenna 11,,78.0,,7.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.4oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Some comments have emphasized that the non-bulky stability feature offers support without being too cumbersome.
Breathability is an aspect that runners appreciate with the Brooks Ravenna 11.
This stability running shoe is welcomed because it doesn’t have a bulky look.
The collar of the Ravenna 11 is lauded for effectively securing the heel and keeping it from wobbling.
The gripping capacity of the outsole is welcomed by those who have tested this running shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of testers believe that the ends of the GuideRails® support system are digging into the arch.
The midfoot part of the upper restricts the shape and motion of the foot, based on some comments.
Bottom line
People are mostly happy with what the Ravenna 11 has to offer. This running shoe is deemed efficient at delivering steadiness for overpronators. The outsole traction and breathable upper are highlighted as accommodating elements. For daily, speedy runs, the Ravenna 11 guarantees an efficient performance and a responsive ride.
Still, fans of road running shoes that are meant for the correction of pronation are likely to gravitate towards the Brooks Ravenna 11."
Adidas Solar Ride,,85.0,70.0,154.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 11.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Those who have tested the Adidas Solar Ride stated that they liked the design, indicating that the appealing looks generated positive comments from passersby.
The durability of the materials was lauded by consumers who wanted a long-lasting shoe.
People commended the traction capacity of the outsole unit of this running shoe.
Several runners praised the price, noting that the affordability was approachable to all.
According to a couple of reviewers, the heel part of the upper was able to secure the foot correctly.
1 reasons not to buy
Some runners considered the fit to be a bit narrower than the usual.
Bottom line
The response towards the Adidas Solar Ride was mainly positive. People who have tried this neutral running shoe were happy because it was well-made. The outsole’s traction capacity, the façade’s appealing design and the secureness of the heel were the highlights of the user feedback. On the other hand, the fit was a bit narrow for several purchasers.
The Adidas Solar Ride is a road companion for neutral runners and those who desire heel stability."
Zoot Solana 2, Zoot,84.0,87.0,39.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 7.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Zoot’s enviable expertise in making shoes for sockless running shines with the Solana 2.
Comfort is greatly received from this model, according to most runners.
Transitions are smoother and effortless, based on the comments of a couple of testers.
Some runners really like the responsive cushioning of this shoe.
It has an affordable price.
A common observation from several runners is the shoe’s adequate traction on different surfaces, including light trails.
It is very flexible.
2 reasons not to buy
The biggest issue from several runners is the Solana 2’s tight toe box.
A few runners also wished for better arch support coming from this shoe.
Bottom line
The Zoot Solana 2 excels in many ways, notably due to its award-winning performance and quality. Despite a few issues regarding arch support and toe box, a majority of the runners really loved the way the shoe delivers tons of comfort, plush cushioning, and flexibility without compromising the shoe’s weight."
New Balance Fresh Foam Cruz SockFit, New Balance,81.0,,367.0,$100,$60 (save 40%), Road, Neutral,,, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Several users admired the New Balance Fresh Foam Cruz Sockfit because it is very comfortable to run in.
A few lauded the SockFit design because it molds to the natural shape of the foot.
According to a few user reviews, the heel hugs the foot securely and comfortably.
Some purchasers admired the colors and street-ready design of the Fresh Foam Cruz SockFit.
The shoe is affordable.
The Fresh Foam Cruz Sockfit runs true to size, said most user reviews.
2 reasons not to buy
One user mentioned that the tongue causes irritation.
A few said that it fits wider than usual.
Bottom line
The New Balance Fresh Foam Cruz SockFit is a neutral running shoe designed for road running. Generally, the shoe gained positive response from users because of its lightweight and comfortable design. The Fresh Foam Sockfit is one of the affordable running shoes in the market today that can also double as a sneaker. In summary, this shoe is considered as a successful release."
,,,95.0,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,
Altra Timp 1.5,,97.0,93.0,271.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,, Altra Timp 2,"6 reasons to buy
Most trail runners admired the amount of cushioning that Altra Timp 1.5 provides; they also said it gives them more spring when running.
The shoe is comfortable, according to some user reviews.
According to some comments, the Timp 1.5 has a very durable outer sole.
Several wearers lauded the shoe’s performance and overall fit; some said this version is better than the original.
A couple of purchasers mentioned that they love the shoe’s roomy toe box.
As a trail running shoe, the Altra Timp 1.5 has a reasonable price tag.
2 reasons not to buy
A few have issues with the colors; they said it's not attractive.
One user was annoyed because he needs to re-tighten the laces every hour.
Bottom line
Designed to tackle the tough trail surfaces, the Altra Timp 1.5, generally, gained positive feedback from its users. Some admired the shoe’s cushioning, grip, and overall fit, but there are also a few who are unhappy with its colors and lacing system. Based on its performance, trail runners found the Timp 1.5 a worthy investment."
New Balance Fresh Foam 1080 v10,,82.0,88.0,5.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A lot of runners mentioned that the Fresh Foam 1080 v10 is comfortable. 
The shoe is durable, based on some reviews. 
It is lightweight, according to some commenters. 
Numerous purchasers noted that it is well-cushioned. 
The shoe offers good support, reported some testers. 
One buyer mentioned that it is perfect for long runs. 
Several people love the flexible midsole of this running shoe. 
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of users experienced foot pain and blisters while running in the shoe. 
The shoe is a bit tight and constricting, said a few consumers.
Bottom line
The New Balance Fresh Foam 1080 v10 is a highly cushioned neutral running shoe that received significant updates, making it lightweight and flexible. Though there were a few consumers who experienced pain and discomfort, the majority of the consumers have recommended this everyday running shoe for its cushioning quality, lightweight structure, and durability. "
Salomon Sense Pro Max,,90.0,86.0,68.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Several purchasers admired the apparent durable nature of the Salomon Sense Pro Max.
Most of the runners were highly appreciative of the shoe’s reliable grip on varied terrains.
The roomy toe-box gained positive feedback from several users.
Some of the wearers lauded the long-lasting cushioning of the Sense Pro Max, stating that it’s very useful for long-distance runs.
The Salomon Sense Pro Max was used by some users as their daily casual shoe and they felt that it was still efficient.
More than a few noted the comfortable feel of the shoe.
According to a few wearers with slightly-wide foot shapes, this running shoe offered a great fit.
A few testers admired the lightweight construction of the shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
The shoe is a bit expensive, said a few reviewers.
One user mentioned that he was disappointed by the lacing system because it did not work as expected.
According to a couple of wearers, the mud or dirt got easily stuck between the tread, particularly in the heel area.
Bottom line
The majority of the users lauded the overall performance of the Salomon Sense Pro Max. They generally said that the shoe truly provides the reliable grip, durable cushioning, and efficient foot protection that are needed for a better trail running experience. The comfort, durability, and its lightweight construction are additional features of the shoe that made some users satisfied.  Given the shoe’s long-lasting cushioning, this shoe is indeed a good partner for long-distance runs."
New Balance 870 v5,,74.0,80.0,10.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.6oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
A lot of the users admire how lightweight the New Balance 870 v5 is. 
The shoe has helped prevent overpronation of the foot by providing enough support, a few runners noted.  
Some of the testers have claimed that this stability running shoe is the most comfortable to run in. 
The upper of the shoe, which is made out of engineered knit, provides enough breathability, some testers and experts remarked. 
Several runners have praised the shoe’s ground-contact ethylene-vinyl acetate (EVA) outsole with rubber pods that provided zero slips when running. 
A lot of the wearers praise the shoe’s versatility; it can be worn for everyday wear and as a workout supplement. 
2 reasons not to buy
One of the runners says that the 870 v5 caused some pain on the foot. 
A few testers have stated that the shoe did not have sufficient cushioning making the shoe too firm. 
Bottom line
The New Balance 870 v5 yielded a lot of positive reviews from several runners, testers, and experts. A lot of them highly appreciate the support that the shoe provides. Most of the comments are also focused on the shoe’s ability to prevent overpronation because of the support it provides. There have been positive responses regarding the shoe’s lightweight construction, which helps runners conserve energy in the long run. Overall, there are minimal updates made to shoe such as its engineered knit upper and ground-contact EVA outsole, but when all of its standard components are combined, a highly responsive and comfortable stability shoe is created.
 "
Reebok EnergyLux 2, Reebok,86.0,,41.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
The visual aspect of the Reebok EnergyLux 2 is considered eye-catching by those who have bought it.
The shock absorption element of this product’s midsole unit is lauded by most consumers.
Some testers have mentioned that the raised sidewalls of the midsole are able to steady the foot and keep it at the center of the shoe.
A couple of runners claim that this Reebok running shoe has a lightweight structure that’s great for all-day wear.
The upper unit is praised because it is breathable enough to maintain a dry in-shoe wrap.
The padding inside the upper’s sleeve is apparently able to prevent wobbling throughout the run.
2 reasons not to buy
The material that is used for the inner sleeve is deemed by a few consumers as irritating to the skin.
Some lamented the lack of rubber to protect the midsole from the abrasive surfaces; they saw some early signs of wear on the ground-contact foam.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of people towards the Reebok EnergyLux 2 has been positive. This road running shoe is thought of as a solid choice for extended runs, as well as several activities that go beyond running. Moreover, the various parts of this product are highlighted as helpful and form-accommodating accoutrements. On the other hand, the absence of outsole rubber and the apparently irritating inner lining make up the brunt of the complaints.
Fans of neutral running shoes and those who enjoy urban adventures are the target market of the EnergyLux 2."
Puma Hybrid Rocket Runner, Puma,90.0,,236.0,$120,$75 (save 38%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
The traction capacity of the outsole unit was appreciated by the testers.
The underfoot cushioning system of the Puma Hybrid Rocket Runner was considered to be responsive.
People generally liked the aesthetics of this running shoe.
The width profiles were welcomed as they apparently adhered to expectations.
Consumers lauded the overall durability of this product’s materials, stating that the components lasted long.
1 reasons not to buy
Traction wasn’t very reliable on slippery or dusty surfaces, according to a tester.
Bottom line
The Puma Hybrid Rocket Runner was a surprise for many because they didn’t expect functionality to reign supreme in a fashionable silhouette.  But this road companion offered precisely that, and runners welcomed it with open arms. The durable build and the useful materials were also highlighted. And though the traction wasn’t apparently top-notch on slick surfaces, it didn’t deter the shoe enthusiasts."
Inov-8 Trail Talon 250,,84.0,82.0,35.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Reviewers commented that the Inov-8 Trail Talon 250 was suitably lightweight on the trails.
The outsole configuration enabled this running shoe to take on dry trail surfaces with ease, one tester noted.
Traction on wet surfaces was also agreeable for many runners.
Users wrote that the toe-box was not too narrow, that it allowed the toes to splay naturally for comfort and balance.
One running blogger wrote that this feather-light running shoe was fast and that it was a joy to run in.
A professional runner was very positive about the Trail Talon 250, saying that the breathable coverage was top-notch, the tread pattern was efficient, and the forefoot area was well-protected.
A reviewer pointed out that this running shoe had less cushioning than its sister shoe, the Trail Talon 275, but it was still very comfortable on all runs.
1 reasons not to buy
A runner noticed that it was able to perform well on shorter runs because it had a low drop and lesser cushioning than the Trail Talon 275, but it’s not for long off-road adventures.
Bottom line
The Inov-8 Trail Talon 250 was widely praised for its lightweight disposition, its efficient outsole, and comfortable design. Many said that it helped them achieve great performances on the trails. Though one runner noted that it didn’t stay comfortable when taken on longer runs, it still performed admirably as a reliable off-road running shoe."
La Sportiva Akyra,,93.0,85.0,165.0,,, Trail, Stability, Men: 11.6oz , Women: 9.8oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
According to some testers, the La Sportiva Akyra is one of the most protective trail running shoes they have ever worn.
A lot of runners agreed that they stayed comfortable even after long sessions of running.
Most of the testers mentioned that the shoe performed well on technical terrains.
Some runners commented that the shoe fitted well from the midpoint to the heel.
Many testers confirmed that the shoe provided excellent support on mud-covered trails, soft snow, and wet rocks.
According to many users, the La Sportiva Akyra is able to offer more protection compared to other running shoes.
4 reasons not to buy
A few testers said that the shoe rubbed the back of the foot and that such an occurrence made it difficult for them to continue running uphill.
Some runners mentioned that the shoe is a little bit heavy.
A lot of users observed that the lugs on the outsole held and collected mud very easily. This added more weight to the shoe.
This shoe is not responsive to running on technical downhills, according to some runners.
Bottom line
A lot of users agreed that the La Sportiva Akyra is a rugged, yet very protective and comfortable footwear. It performed well on different tough running environments. Some runners said that the durable lug outsole of this shoe led them responsibly through the unpredictable terrains. They mentioned that this shoe was best used for hiking, walking and running, but was not responsive on technical downhills."
Saucony Hurricane ISO 5,,92.0,83.0,139.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 10.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Comfort: Many runners hail the comfortable cushioning of the Saucony Hurricane ISO 5.
Stability: Several wearers have observed that the running shoe maximizes arch support. 
Toe box: There is enough room for natural toe splay, commended a couple of reviewers.  
Fit: According to multiple purchasers, the shoe has a lockdown wrap around the foot. 
Grip: The running shoe has a good surface grip, reported a few users.
Durable: Quite a few customers state that this Saucony running shoe does not easily wear out even after several uses.
3 reasons not to buy
Weight: A number of commenters notice that the running platform is a tad heavy. 
Breathability: Several critics have pointed out that the shoe does not have sufficient in-shoe ventilation.
Responsiveness: The midsole is not so responsive, stated a few testers.
Bottom line
The construction of the Saucony Hurricane ISO 5 banks on the design principle of having a good balance between stability and cushioning. Packed with Saucony's top-of-the-line technical features, this stability running shoe sports pronounced support and heightened energy return. Equipped with superb upper composition, the shoe implements reduction of excess movements. With its price, the Hurricane ISO 5 excels in providing comfort, strength, and multi-surface use."
Mizuno Wave Rider 22,,92.0,85.0,716.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Mizuno Wave Rider 23,"6 reasons to buy
People were generally happy with the aesthetics of the Mizuno Wave Rider 22, stating that the colors and design were visually appealing.
The underfoot cushioning system was considered to be very comfortable, some consumers noted.
The width profiles of both the men and women’s versions accommodated medium-sized feet, based on a handful of reviews.
Several purchasers commented that the general durability of the components was dependable.
The gripping capability of the outsole was sure and precise, according to a couple of runners.
A lot of reviewers agree the Wave Rider 22 is a supportive shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
The toe box of the Wave Rider 22 is not roomy enough for some of its users.
A couple of wearers feel the shoe is bulky, especially because of the puffy-looking collar.
The overlays on the upper tended to press into the fabric and cause irritation to the foot, some testers reported.
Bottom line
The Mizuno Wave Rider 22 was well-received. This update to the long-running series of neutral shoes was deemed worthy of the Rider name, mainly when it came to its general quality and efficacy on the roads. People loved the visual design, the agreeable fit profile, and the sturdy build of this footwear. Inversely, some structural elements of the shoe were criticized for its weight, small toe box, and uncomfortable overlays. Overall, the Wave Rider 22 is deemed to be a remarkable running shoe with reliable functionalities."
New Balance 890 v8,,91.0,98.0,7.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 8.9oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Several users are satisfied with the comfort that the New Balance 890 v8 provides. 
A few runners appreciate the shoe’s firm and responsive midsole. 
It feels light and fast, according to a couple of commenters. 
Some wearers have testified that this running shoe is breathable. 
Many reviewers like the simple yet stylish design of this running partner.
2 reasons not to buy
One tester dislikes that the New Balance 890 v8 feels heavier and bulkier than its predecessors. 
A buyer complains about the inflexible sole of the shoe.
Bottom line
The New Balance 890 v8 is a neutral running shoe that works best for runners and athletes with normal gaits. This road running shoe is an excellent choice for consumers seeking a healthy combination of comfort, stability, and lightness. It is ideal for daily training and workout sessions. Also, the FuelCell 890v8’s minimalistic yet stylish design makes the platform suitable for casual wear."
Asics DynaFlyte 3,,91.0,87.0,167.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.1oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Asics DynaFlyte 4,"6 reasons to buy
Several consumers liked that the Asics DynaFlyte 3 was built to be durable.
A handful of testers claimed that this running shoe was suitably lightweight for all-day use.
The underfoot cushioning was considered by some to be very bouncy.
The design and color schemes were lauded for being eye-catching.
Consumers generally considered the fit to be agreeable.
The sizing scheme was deliberated as true to expectations.
1 reasons not to buy
A few consumers thought that the colorways were too vibrant for their tastes.
Bottom line
The Asics DynaFlyte 3 was a recipient of generally positive feedback from consumers and shoe enthusiasts. People mostly welcomed this road shoe’s durable construction, lightweight design, and responsive underfoot cushioning. Moreover, they liked the width and size profiles. The color schemes were apparently in a love-it-or-hate-it situation, so it depends on the wearer if the visual aspect is accommodating or not."
Adidas Adizero Adios 5,,83.0,82.0,9.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Several consumers have reported that the forefoot section of the Adidas Adizero Adios 5 is springy enough.
The lightweight configuration of this running shoe permits all-day wear, according to reviewers.
The midsole foam is regarded as supportive by long-distance runners.
Some testers admire the aesthetics of this shoe, stating that it looks appealing for a racing option.
The surface traction given by the AdiWear and Continental™ rubber outsole layers is welcomed by purchasers.
2 reasons not to buy
Some have noted that the faded look of the Adidas stripes on the sides is unappealing.
The price is thought of as a bit expensive by a few runners.
Bottom line
The overall reaction towards the Adizero Adios 5 has been positive. This men and women’s Adidas running shoe is considered a worthy addition to the long-running for-competition roster. The lightweight build, the reactive and supportive midsole, and the traction-ready outsole are highlighted elements.
Neutral running shoe enthusiasts are welcomed to test the Adidas Adizero Adios 5 for their various activities, including races and marathons."
Asics Gel Sonoma 3,,86.0,80.0,1115.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 8.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Asics Gel Sonoma 5,"8 reasons to buy
The Asics Gel Sonoma 3 looked visually appealing, a number of consumers noted.
Several testers commented that the general durability of this iteration was worthy of their trust.
There were reviewers who thought that it had an affordable price.
This version felt more comfortable than the previous one, stated several purchasers.
Those with wider feet were happy that this shoe was available in a wide width variety.
Many consumers were able to wear it on various surfaces—even on the roads—and they reported no problems during the experience.
A runner praised the outsole unit of the Gel Sonoma 3, stating that it gave reliable traction.
This shoe ran true-to-size, reported some satisfied testers.
3 reasons not to buy
A runner complained that the sides of the collar tended to rub against the back of the Achilles tendon, causing some discomfort.
The forefoot section was a bit narrow for some testers; they felt the upper fabric rub against their toes.
A purchaser reported that the laces tended to loosen up and that they didn’t stay tight during the running session.
Bottom line
Many of those who have tried out the Asics Gel Sonoma 3 were satisfied with its performance. For them, this neutral trail running shoe was able to give them comfort in a durable and versatile package. Some even thought that it was a step up over the previous version. Conversely, there were a few runners who complained about some of the shoe's fit specifications, such as the collar and the lacing system."
Altra Duo 1.5,,79.0,83.0,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.1oz , Women: 6.8oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The breathability of the Altra Duo 1.5’s upper unit is praised by those who like a well-ventilated ride.
Some testers feel that the shoelaces are long and stretchy enough to accommodate small and significant adjustments to the fit.
The toe box is praised by purchasers; they report that it is spacious and able to boost the quality of the toe-off.
According to a handful of consumers, the midsole foam is able to responsibly attenuate the impact forces generated by the foot-strike.
The flexibility of this product is lauded by Altra fans.
The traction capacity of the outsole is considered reliable and precise.
5 reasons not to buy
Several testers have detested the design of this product, stating that the look isn’t too appealing to the eyes.
A couple of users report that the thin tongue unit has a tendency to bunch up and cause irritation.
The edges of the collar are deemed sources of scratches against the ankles and heel.
A break-in period of several uses is apparently needed before achieving full-comfort, based on some reviews.
According to a few runners, the upper unit near the forefoot is quick to separate from the sole piece.
Bottom line
The reviews for the Altra Duo 1.5 have been divisive. There are people who like this shoe a lot, saying that it is a comfortable and well-made product. But there are also those who feel that it is not as described. The upper unit, in particular, is a highlighted area because while some say that the fabrics and design are accommodating, others complained that they’re only sources of skin irritation.
The Altra Duo 1.5 is intended for neutral pronators who like to take to the roads."
Under Armour Toccoa, Under Armour,89.0,,1317.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Many users agreed that the Under Armour Toccoa was a stylish and comfortable shoe.
The fit was secure yet unrestrictive, one wearer noted.
The tread pattern on the outsole worked well on rocky trails, according to a reviewer.
A user remarked that the upper material looked and felt durable.
One runner said the shoe did not require a break-in period as it was comfortable starting from the first use.
The leather upper felt bizarre at first, but it later proved to be a viable material for a trail running shoe, commented a customer.
6 reasons not to buy
The shoe was very wide and ill-fitting, according to a customer.
One buyer complained that the shoe was not flexible and that it felt cheap.
The outsole did not grip on smooth surfaces, a reviewer said.
One user did not like that the insole was not removable.
Some people complained that the laces were frequently coming undone.
Many testers disapproved of this running shoe’s narrow toe box.
Bottom line
Though its structure was far from unique, the Under Armour Toccoa proved to be an excellent neutral running shoe for the trails. The majority of its users were impressed with the various design elements and performance. The Toccoa did have its fair share of criticism, especially regarding fit and feel aspects."
Asics GT 2000 6,,87.0,86.0,2110.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics GT 2000 8 Lite-Show,"6 reasons to buy
The Asics GT 2000 6 provided excellent support for overpronation, said some
One wearer liked how the shoe was lighter than its predecessor.
The shoe supported the arches precisely, stated a buyer.
A reviewer mentioned that the midsole gave a well-balanced ride.
Some customers were happy that the shoe was available in various width profiles.
The heel grip was ultra-secure, according to an impressed user.
4 reasons not to buy
The mesh upper started ripping within less than a month of use, a disappointed user said. Another buyer commented that the upper’s stitches tore and stretched easily. Others seemed to agree that the upper has little durability.
There was excessive friction against the ball of the foot, no matter what socks are worn, experienced one wearer.
Not as stable as the earlier releases of GT 2000, according to a consumer.
A user felt that the forefoot area was quite narrow and that it hindered adequate air circulation.
Bottom line
Although the Asics GT 2000 6 received mixed reviews, the negative feedback seemed to have more weight than the positive. Users were pleased with the practical arch support and the balanced cushioning. However, there were various complaints about the shoe’s quality and durability. Likewise, many users thought it was not as comfortable as the previous version. Overall, it was an acceptable running shoe but still needed some improvements."
New Balance 860 v10,,85.0,89.0,7.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.8oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The New Balance 860 v10 has a performance that is considered by most users to be speedy and efficient.
People who have concerns with overpronated foot motion are happy with the supportive mechanisms of this stability running shoe.
The cushioning system is welcomed by those who like a responsive underfoot experience.
Several consumers claim that the in-shoe chamber is roomy enough to welcome custom orthotic inserts that aim for heightened stability.
The various colorways are well-liked because they allow for aesthetic flairs to be included in the athletic lifestyle.
Runners believe that this New Balance running shoe has durable materials.
3 reasons not to buy
Some consumers have deemed the heel part of the upper unit as too firm for comfort and accommodating security.
Several testers state that the fabrics of the forefoot section have a tendency to scratch the skin of the toes.
According to a few runners, the inner lining isn’t smooth; apparently, it irritates the sides and the ankles.
Bottom line
The overall feedback of people for the New Balance 860 v10 has been mostly positive. This update to the well-known series of running shoes is considered durable, reactive to movements, and ready to address problems with pronation. On the other hand, the heel part of the silhouette has been criticized for being a bit too restrictive, while the inner sleeve is lamented for scratching against the outline of the foot.
Fans of road running shoes that are devised to stabilize the foot and its movements on the ground are the target market of the New Balance 860 v10."
Nike Air Max Torch 4, Nike,87.0,88.0,6.0,,," Trail, Road", Neutral,,,,,,,,"9 reasons to buy
Many runners praise the lightweight composition of the Nike Air Max Torch 4. 
The running shoe has versatile use, commended several reviewers. 
According to various buyers, the neutral running shoe permits natural toe splay. 
For some purchasers, the shoe is very comfortable. 
The upper firmly holds the foot in place, praised quite a few athletes. 
It has reliable traction, lauded various commenters. 
Multiple wearers claim that the running shoe is easy to break-in. 
The trail running shoe delivers good impact protection, observed some testers. 
A number of experts hail the flexibility of the shoe.
4 reasons not to buy
The running shoe lacks breathability, expressed a few customers. 
It has insufficient support in the heel, observed various critics. 
According to some racers, the trail running shoe is not suitable for long-distance running.
A few commentators have reported that the shoe causes pain on the foot.
Bottom line
Touted as a light trail running shoe, the Nike Air Max Torch 4 sports quality features ready to beat the competition. Packed with Nike's innovative midsole components, the running shoe offers premium support and lockdown. Because it is engineered with top-notch technologies, the neutral runner does not sacrifice weight. With the Nike Air Torch 4, athletes are geared for comfort, protection, and superior grip on any type of terrain."
New Balance Fresh Foam Cruz v2 Sport,,88.0,,232.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.6oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Several people commended the comfortable cushioning system of the New Balance Fresh Foam Cruz v2 Sport.
The colorways that come with this running shoe gained positive feedback because they were apparently eye-catching.
Some consumers felt that the mesh upper offered adequate breathability and lightweight support.
Most testers noted that the sizing schemes and width profiles were able to follow their expectations.
The flexibility of the Foam Cruz v2 Sport’s upper and platform was lauded.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people claimed that the plastic saddle on the upper tended to put pressure on the foot, causing some irritation.
The sole unit slipped on damp surfaces, a couple of consumers reported.
Bottom line
The response toward the New Balance Fresh Foam Cruz v2 Sport was mostly positive. People liked that this neutral shoe gave an agreeable performance on the roads. Moreover, the weight, aesthetics, and materials were deemed notable, as well. On the contrary, some testers didn’t like the saddle on the upper while others shied away from the slippery outer pad."
Nike Free RN Flyknit 3.0,,79.0,82.0,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 6oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Those who have tested the Nike Free RN Flyknit 3.0 felt that the minimalistic design complemented the notion of having freedom of movement.
A consumer commented that the underfoot cushioning was able to support the foot without becoming too unwieldy.
The slip-on design was well-liked, especially since it allows the foot to settle into the foot-compartment with ease.
The stretchy upper unit didn’t hinder the natural bending or swelling capacity of the foot when running, according to reviews.
This lightweight construction of this Nike running shoe became a highlight for those who have tried it.
2 reasons not to buy
The removable insole tended to slip towards the front of the interior chamber, some users complained.
A couple of people reported that the inner sleeve rubbed against the foot uncomfortably.
Bottom line
The Nike Free RN Flyknit 3.0 was able to receive positive responses from those who have gotten the chance to wear it and experience its features. This neutral running shoe was well-liked for its flexible construction, agreeable cushioning quality, and lightweight components. The minimalistic style was also given due praise by fans of non-bulky performance footwear. On the other hand, several consumers weren’t happy with the harshly shifting removable insole and the apparently irritating interior sleeve.
Road running enthusiasts and fans of low-mileage sprints are the target audience of the Nike Free RN Flyknit 3.0."
Altra Lone Peak 4.0 Mid Mesh,,86.0,,148.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 12.3oz , Women: 10.3oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Based on some user reviews, the Altra Lone Peak 4.0 Mid Mesh feels comfortable even after long hours of standing and walking.
The shoe offers a good level of underfoot protection, said a few users.
Several wearers admired the mid-cut design of the shoe because it gives them ankle support.
A few noticed that it is as breathable as the previous version.
A couple of runners lauded the shoe's amazing grip on muddy and wet running surfaces.
Many purchasers admired the upper of the shoe because it keeps the shoe dry and warm.
3 reasons not to buy
The shoe is slightly expensive.
According to a few users, the shoe runs smaller than usual.
A few mentioned that it feels heavy.
Bottom line
The Lone Peak 4.0 Mid Mesh is a durable neutral running shoe from Altra. Designed for off-road running, the shoe features a good balance of comfort, underfoot protection, and impressive grip. The shoe has also been used by some buyers for hiking. Though some people have issues with price, sizing and weight, overall, the shoe has proven to be a successful release. "
Saucony Peregrine 10 GTX,,87.0,,14.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.2oz , Women: 9.9oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
A significant number of testers commented that the Saucony Peregrine 10 GTX has an excellent cushioning.
A few purchasers mentioned that the shoe is breathable.
Its wide toe box is loved by many wearers.
Some reviewers said that the running footwear is true to size.
According to those who have tested it, the Peregrine 10 GTX is a great-looking shoe.
Several runners agreed that the shoe has excellent traction.
The shoe is best used for muddy, snowy, and wet trails and surfaces, based on reviews.
One of the users said that the running footwear is suitable for winter running.
2 reasons not to buy
A buyer commented that the Saucony Peregrine 10 GTX feels a little bit hard during landing.
Based on a review, the flat black laces look and function better when replaced with an oval-shaped lace.
Bottom line
The Saucony Peregrine 10 GTX undeniably captured the hearts of its target audience and avid fans. With the outsole area that provides excellent traction and the upper unit that offers breathability, many agreed that it is indeed a great-performing shoe. The quality of its materials, technologies, and features made the majority of the buyers happy, satisfied, and amazed."
Puma Speed 500,,90.0,,36.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
The majority of the wearers commented that the Puma Speed 500 is comfortable to wear.
Some of the users mentioned that the running shoe is lightweight.
One of the consumers said that the running footwear is breathable.
According to those who have tried it, the shoe is flexible.
Based on reviews, the Puma Speed 500 is supportive.
As noted by some buyers, the shoe is stylish.
Several purchasers love how the shoe perfectly hugs the foot.
It is best used for jogging, running, walking and gym workouts, agreed by some users.
2 reasons not to buy
A wearer commented that the Puma Speed 500 has a narrow toe box.
As noted by a consumer, the sock-like upper of the shoe rubs on the back of the heel area.
Bottom line
The Puma Speed 500 was loved and appreciated by the majority of its testers. The shoe’s flexibility, lightweight structure, and comfort level become its most reliable features. With the positive feedback of a good number of users, the shoe's outsole, midsole, and upper construction are proven and tested to be excellent. With that said, many people agreed that the shoe release in the market is successful in making them happy and satisfied."
Under Armour Micro G Pursuit, Under Armour,84.0,63.0,4518.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.7oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,," Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Normal, Wide",,"6 reasons to buy
Many consumers loved the fact that there was a wide-width option.
The mesh material on the upper was appreciated because it conformed nicely to the shape and movement capacity of the foot.
Several testers appreciated the flexibility of the underfoot platform.
The cushioning system gave adequate support and shock dispersion, some runners noted.
Most of the people who have tried the Under Armour Micro G Pursuit were happy with its design and color schemes.
The weight of this running shoe was deemed sufficiently light for all-day wear.
2 reasons not to buy
The fabric near the toe area ripped apart after only a few uses, a purchaser complained.
A few runners observed that the colorways of the actual product didn’t match the photos on the website.
Bottom line
People were generally happy with the Under Armour Micro G Pursuit. They welcomed its appealing silhouette, its multiple width options, its flexible underfoot platform, and the comfortable midsole. It’s perceived as an agreeable neutral shoe for the roads. Contrariwise, the durability of the upper was considered questionable, and the color schemes were deliberated as misleading."
Merrell Mag-9,,63.0,,10.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 16.2oz , Women: 13.8oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The traction capacity of the Merrell Mag-9’s outsole unit is considered efficient and precise in its purpose.
Some testers have expressed their appreciation for the roomy forefoot section of this running shoe which encouraged natural toe-splay.
Several exercise enthusiasts believe that the weight of this shoe is suitably light for all-day use.
The foam piece that serves as the midsole unit is lauded for cradling the foot properly.
The general durability of the materials is lauded by those who have tested this road running shoe.
According to a couple of comments, the aesthetics and color schemes are eye-catching.
4 reasons not to buy
A handful of testers claim that the one-piece opening of the upper unit is too small for the foot to effortlessly enter the inner chamber.
The midfoot section of this product is blamed by some for limiting natural movement.
Based on several reviews, the inner sleeve has caused some irritation on the skin of the foot.
The cutout that serves as the edge of the slip-on collar is deemed by some as uncomfortable.
Bottom line
The overall feedback of people towards the Merrell Mag-9 is diverse. While the positive points, like the efficient outsole traction and the spacious forefoot design, embody greatness and comfort, the negative points overshadow the potential. The highlighted flaws of this product include the too-small and irritating slip-on opening and the limiting midfoot construction.
People who appreciate neutral running shoes that can assist them through speed training sessions and gym exercises are the target market of the Merrell Mag-9."
Skechers GOrun Fast, Skechers,93.0,,416.0,$55,$50 (save 96%), Road, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 6.4oz,,,," Narrow, Normal | Narrow, Normal",,"5 reasons to buy
Several runners commented that the shoe was comfortable.
According to those who have tested it, the footwear was stylish.
Based on some reviews, the Skechers GOrun Fast is best for running, walking and casual wear because of its structure and design.
It was durable, noted by the majority of the buyers.
Some of the consumers admired the responsive sole of the footwear.
2 reasons not to buy
The shoe may be ideal for workouts but not for high-intensity workouts, according to several runners.
The midsole has very poor cushioning, according to a couple of commenters.
Bottom line
Overall, the Skechers Gorun Fast has made a lot of buyers happy and contented because of the comfort it gives. Aside from its stylish design, the shoe's responsiveness made a lot of users recommend it to a friend for them to buy and use. Although several of them have issues on the cushioning, others still think that the shoe is an excellent choice for those who are after comfort, well-ventilated design, and excellent quality."
Under Armour Charged Bandit 3,,90.0,88.0,1031.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.1oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Under Armour Charged Bandit 4,"5 reasons to buy
Many users said that the upper material was lightweight and extremely breathable.
The shoe provided a secure fit and a great overall foot support, according to some runners.
A majority of buyers commented that the shoe was comfortable.
Several users were satisfied that the color options available were pleasing to the eyes.
The lightweight nature and the agreeable heel cushioning received positive feedback.
3 reasons not to buy
Several reviewers thought the midsole was lacking in arch support.
There was not enough traction on wet trails, as observed by some runners.
Several buyers agreed that the toe box is narrow and uncomfortable.
Bottom line
Made from a lightweight and breathable material, the Charged Bandit 3 is a comfortable running shoe that is recommended for both beginners and seasoned runners. It aims to deliver a consistent performance no matter the distance. While some may not be satisfied by the traction and support it offers, most users will find this a reliable option."
Newton Fate 5,,87.0,95.0,19.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.6oz , Women: 7.2oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,, Newton Fate 6,"7 reasons to buy
The Newton Fate 5 is very comfortable and is suitable for everyday wear, according to many users.
Several runners note that the Fate 5 produces a fast performance. One user, in particular, said that running in the shoe is like “climbing on a race car.”
A number of wearers were satisfied with the shoe’s roomy toe box, which they say is accommodating to the metatarsals.
A couple of testers reported an improvement in their biomechanics while using the Fate 5.
Some reviewers detail that the Newton Fate 5 is even lighter than they had expected.
The sole unit promotes a smooth ride, a buyer wrote.
One athlete praised the Newton Fate 5 for improving their best running time.
2 reasons not to buy
The Fate 5 had broken down after only a couple of weeks of usage, according to a couple of purchasers.
One runner mentioned that small stones get stuck between the outsole’s tread pattern.
Bottom line
Many runners consider the Newton Fate 5 as an outstanding running shoe with features that are efficient and reliable. The positive reviews of the shoe focus on its ride, comfortability, and weight. Some even claim that the shoe contributes to their personal records. In contrast, users criticize the shoe’s durability and design, although these only comprise a small number. Overall, the Newton Fate 5 pass runners’ expectations of performance, which they conclude is worthy of its price tag."
Hoka One One Cavu 2, Hoka One One,80.0,75.0,25.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.2oz , Women: 5.9oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,, Hoka One One Cavu 3,"4 reasons to buy
One of the testers said that the Hoka One One Cavu 2 is responsive.
According to those who have tried it, the shoe has a lightweight structure.
Some users appreciated its well-cushioned construction.
The footwear is also comfortable enough for long walks, based on a few reviews.
3 reasons not to buy
A user commented that he felt a little pain in the ankle area during the running activity.
One of the buyers said that the shoe is not durable
According to a tester, the midsole feels stiff.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Cavu 2 made some of the wearers satisfied and happy because of its responsiveness. They admired the shoe's performance not only on running but also on walking activities. Although some of the users had issues with its stiff midsole and pain in the ankle area, others still recommend the footwear because of its well-cushioned construction. Overall, the Hoka One One gained the hearts of the consumers because of its excellent performance and responsiveness."
Adidas 4D Run 1.0,,91.0,91.0,44.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The majority of users like the Adidas 4D Run 1.0 for its 4D midsole performance.
A lot of the runners mention the shoe’s extremely comfortable feel.
The shoe is very springy and offers great energy return said some users.
Many wearers are in awe of the shoes’ futuristic aesthetics.
Some users note that the shoe is well-cushioned yet still supportive.
Most users say that the Adidas 4D Run 1.0 is a versatile shoe that can be worn from road runs to casual wear.
2 reasons not to buy
It is mentioned by a few users that the 4D Run 1.0 is on the expensive price range.
A handful of users note that the shoe's weight is on the heavier side.
Bottom line
For someone looking for a versatile and eye-catching Adidas running shoe, look no further. The Adidas 4D Run 1.0 is not only packed with the most advanced shoe technologies, but it also stands out from the crowd thanks to its unique colorways. This neutral running shoe is a third-year celebratory release for the Adidas' 4D technology. The 4D Run 1.0 does come at the higher end of pricing, but considering the combination of optimum performance and innovation that the shoe delivers, the price is somewhat justified."
Saucony Xodus 10,,90.0,94.0,9.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.7oz , Women: 10.5oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The majority of the consumers have commented that the Saucony Xodus 10 is lightweight.
Many users appreciate its responsiveness.
According to those who have tested it, the shoe is flexible.
Several wearers said that the running shoe is grippy.
One of the testers observed that the laces stayed tied during the running session.
The attractive look of the shoe was loved by a good number of purchasers.
The shoe is best used for both trail and road running activities, based on the reviews.
3 reasons not to buy
Most of the buyers commented that the Xodus 10 is expensive.
A few purchasers said that the shoe has limited colorways.
Some testers noted that the shoe does not accommodate those with a wider foot.
Bottom line
The Saucony Xodus 10 equips every user with a mindset to tackle the trails with ease and confidence. This neutral running shoe is crafted with features and technologies that ensure comfort and flexibility. It is an excellent option for those who are looking for a responsive trail running shoe that can also perform well on different paved surfaces. With the materials incorporated in crafting the footwear, the majority of the users are sure to excel in their running activities."
Nike Revolution 4,,94.0,88.0,4650.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 7.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Nike Revolution 5,"9 reasons to buy
People were happy that the price for a pair of the Nike Revolution 4 was affordable.
A lot of consumers liked the cool design of the Nike Revolution 4, stating that pleasing to the eyes.
Several testers welcomed the availability of wide widths, with some praising the ability to choose became accommodating.
Most of those who have tested this neutral shoe agreed that the sizing scheme followed their expectations.
The underfoot platform suitably flexed with each step, according to many runners.
The upper unit kept the foot ventilated, based on a slew of reviews.
Several people sometimes wore this running shoe without socks, and they reported no instance of hot spots or skin irritation.
The variety of color schemes was lauded by consumers; they welcomed the vibrant hues and the option to choose from many alternatives.
Consumers liked the lightweight nature of the Nike Revolution 4’s materials; they didn’t feel weighed down by platform or the upper.
3 reasons not to buy
The sides of the shoe’s upper developed a hole after only a few uses, several testers claimed.
A few purchasers observed that the forefoot section was a bit tight.
A couple of people stated that the colors of the product that they received didn’t match the visual representation in the web pages.
Bottom line
The Nike Revolution 4 received overwhelmingly positive reviews from shoe enthusiasts everywhere. This road-companion was loved for its appealing aesthetics, flexible underfoot experience, and well-ventilated upper. The price was also praised as it didn’t break the bank. On the other hand, there were a few complaints about the durability of the upper. Furthermore, a tight-fitting front section turned off some consumers as others lamented a not-so-accurate-from-the-pictures color scheme."
Asics MetaRacer,,92.0,95.0,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.7oz , Women: 5.5oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Multiple testers attest to the comfort of the Asics MetaRacer. 
Quite a few runners commend the snug wrap of the running shoe. 
It allows for more ground control, observed several wearers. 
The road running shoe enhances speed, expressed a number of athletes. 
Some racers appreciate the breathability of the neutral running platform. 
Quite a few experts state that the running shoe has a superb grip.
Various commentators laud the springy ride delivered by the shoe. 
The neutral running shoe has a good lockdown, admired many analysts.
4 reasons not to buy
One of the commenters claims that the running shoe is quite bulky. 
According to a number of marathoners, the shoe has insufficient cushioning. 
Some critics are skeptical about the road running platform's durability. 
A few running competitors declare that the hole in the toe cap makes the foot cold during winter runs.
Bottom line
Touted as the most advanced Asics running shoe to date, the Asics MetaRacer is built for runners wanting to up their pace. With this carbon-plated neutral running shoe, athletes are geared with maximum spring, propulsion, and security. Sporting a very minimalist design, the road running shoe does not compromise when it comes to grip and comfort. Because of its simple yet effective design, wearers are able to have better ground feel and control."
Adidas Terrex Agravic,,91.0,84.0,181.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 7mm , Women: 7mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Many runners generally liked the color schemes of the Adidas Terrex Agravic.
The upper unit’s strong fabric lasted long, according to some of those who have reviewed it.
The toe bumper gained some recognition because it was able to protect the foot well.
There were those who felt the responsive ‘pop’ of the mid-sole unit, stating that it helped in improving each step.
The outsole was sticky enough to cling onto different surfaces, wrote many purchasers.
A reviewer reported that the Adidas Terrex Agravic was able to run surprisingly well at moderate to slower speeds.
The general durability of this running shoe was praised by many runners.
A tester wrote that they remained comfortable even when transitioning from the trails to the roads.
3 reasons not to buy
The thin laces caused a bit of premature unraveling and looseness of the fit, noted a tester.
A reviewer wrote that the padding in the heel and collar was a bit thin, nearly causing their feet to wobble and come off of the shoe unceremoniously.
Some consumers noticed its weight, which, for them, was a tad heavy.
Bottom line
A lot of consumers were pleased with the performance of the Adidas Terrex Agravic. For them, this trail companion was able to deliver on its purpose. It kept them running confidently on technical terrain. They were even able to transition well from the trails to the pavement. Conversely, its weight didn’t sit well with several runners, and there were some who had concerns with a few of its upper components. But this neutral shoe was efficient, according to many."
Asics Gel Kumo Lyte,,75.0,,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11oz , Women: 9oz,,,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The Asics Gel Kumo Lyte is supportive, some users claimed. 
Many runners testified that this running partner is comfortable. 
Several reviewers admired the overall quality of the shoe. 
It is an excellent everyday running shoe, said some commenters. 
This shoe is also suitable for workouts and casual walks.
2 reasons not to buy
The Asics Gel Kumo Lyte is a bit narrow, according to a couple of buyers. 
A user complained that the narrow forefoot causes a lot of pain.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Kumo Lyte is a neutral running shoe intended for runners who do not overpronate. It incorporates a lightweight midsole for long-lasting comfort and breathable top for continuous airflow. It helps runners and athletes achieve optimal performance."
Altra Provision 3.5,,87.0,,973.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,, Altra Provision 4.0,"5 reasons to buy
Some testers noted that the Altra Provision 3.5 felt lighter than its predecessor, the Provision 3.0.
The stability mechanisms of this running shoe were lauded for being able to suitable correct overpronation.
The general quality of this shoe’s materials was lauded by consumers.
Several runners liked the color schemes and the sporty design.
A natural toe splay was appreciated due to the presence of a roomy toe box.
2 reasons not to buy
The colors of the inner sleeve tended to bleed out, according to several consumers. They noted some discoloration to their socks whenever they took the shoe off.
A few testers disliked the medial stability unit because it could apparently be felt under the forefoot.
Bottom line
The Altra Provision 3.5 received mostly positive reviews from consumers. They liked this road shoe’s supportive platform, its high-quality build, and its fresh color schemes. Moreover, some of them felt that it was lighter than the previous iteration. Conversely, several complaints arose regarding the bleeding tint of the interior sleeve and the unwieldy medial support system."
,,,66.0,,,," Mud, Trail", Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,
New Balance Fresh Foam Arishi Sport,,88.0,,697.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.7oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The consumers who have tested the New Balance Fresh Foam Arishi Sport felt that it looked visually appealing.
The underfoot cushioning system sufficiently supported the foot when doing gym-related exercises, according to some reviewers.
Purchasers felt the air entering the interior chamber, maintaining a cool and dry interior for the foot.
The lightweight build of this road companion gained favor; runners deemed it able to keep the foot supported for long periods.
A couple of people noted that the flexible platform permitted a precisely energized and well-rounded transition from the heel to the toe.
2 reasons not to buy
A lot of testers appealed that the wide-width options for the New Balance Fresh Foam Arishi Sport were narrower than expected.
The front part of the upper unit tore apart after only a few uses, some users observed.
Bottom line
Many consumers had positive things to say about the New Balance Fresh Foam Arishi Sport, particularly with its welcoming aesthetics, well-ventilated upper unit, and a flexible underfoot cushioning unit. But there were prominent complaints about the width profiles, which apparently didn’t agree with the preferences and expectations of many runners. The durability of the upper was also disliked as it apparently tore off quickly."
,,,95.0,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,
Skechers GOrun Ride 7,,94.0,92.0,258.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.3oz , Women: 7.3oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"10 reasons to buy
A good number of buyers noticed that the Skechers GOrun Ride 7 was a versatile running shoe.
According to several runners, the shoe has an excellent lacing system.
A few purchasers lauded its responsiveness.
A lot of testers said that the shoe was comfortable.
Many purchasers commented that the Skechers GOrun Ride 7 has an excellent cushioning.
Various consumers said that the shoe was stylish.
A good number of testers said that the shoe was breathable.
The majority of the reviewers agreed that the shoe has a well-constructed knit upper.
The length of the shoe was lightweight, based on observations.
The Skechers GOrun Ride 7 have many color options to choose from.
2 reasons not to buy
Based on some reviews, the shoe was expensive.
Several buyers said that the Skechers GOrun Ride 7 runs small.
Bottom line
Overall, the Skechers GOrun Ride 7 has made a lot of purchasers happy and contented because of its design and performance. Aside from its construction, the shoe also provides the right amount of cushioning that is needed on a wide variety of paved surfaces. Although several of them have issues with its price and size, others still recommend the Skechers GOrun Ride 7 because of its quality. It is a good option for those who are looking for a breathable, comfortable, responsive and versatile running shoe."
Saucony Peregrine 10,,88.0,89.0,8.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 9.3oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Some people believe that the Saucony Peregrine 10 is a relatively lightweight running shoe for all-day use.
Several consumers believe that the outsole unit isn't too aggressive; they claim to be able to use this shoe on the roads.
The surface grip given by the rubber external pad is welcomed by most testers.
The forefoot section of the inner chamber is appreciated because it is wide enough to welcome natural toe-splay.
A handful of testers are happy that the midsole is able to support the foot throughout the running session.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people are observing a bit of stiffness when it comes to the midsole unit; apparently, they couldn't move through the gait cycle freely because of it.
A couple of testers are claiming that the in-shoe experience is a bit stifling; all-day use can supposedly be achieved, though the foot won't be able to breathe well.
Bottom line
Confidence and sureness of movement on the trails are the elements that govern the existence of the Peregrine 10 from Saucony. This model boasts a relatively lightweight construction, a trail-optimized external pad that can be deemed suitable on flat paths, and an accommodating in-shoe wrap that secures the foot in place. Still, caution is advised as there have been reports of an unusually stiff midsole unit and a not-too-breathable coverage."
Mizuno Wave Rider WaveKnit 3,,81.0,88.0,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The Mizuno Wave Rider WaveKnit 3 is supportive, some runners claimed. 
Some reviewers mentioned that this shoe is lightweight. 
According to some users, the Wave Rider WaveKnit 3 is comfortable. 
A couple of buyers highlighted the shoe’s overall durability. 
Several wearers noted that it offers excellent cushioning.
One purchaser said that the shoe provides a firm grip.
2 reasons not to buy
A few runners reported the Mizuno Wave Rider WaveKnit 3 is a bit narrow. 
The shoe could feel slightly warm after a long period of wear, said a consumer.
Bottom line
Created to enhance the performance of runners, the Mizuno Wave Rider WaveKnit 3 is designed to provide a comfortable and efficient running experience. It is suitable for runners and athletes who are seeking flexibility, breathability, and protection. This everyday running shoe is also ideal for walking and workout sessions."
Altra Lone Peak 4.0 RSM,,89.0,88.0,130.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"10 reasons to buy
Some runners were happy with how durable the Altra Lone Peak 4.0 RSM is.
According to some buyers, the shoe offers reliable grip on varied terrains.
Several users mentioned that the Lone Peak 4.0 RSM offers an excellent fit.
A couple of runners admired the shoe’s design and colors.
The waterproof material works great, said some happy customers.
A few noted that this trail shoe required no break-in period.
The design of the shoe offers a stable ride on uneven surfaces, said some user reviews.
Many purchasers commented that the shoe runs true to size.
The shoe has a wide toe-box, according to a few users.
The Altra Lone Peak 4.0 RSM feels great when walking and running, based on some user comments.
1 reasons not to buy
One user expressed disappointments with the shoe’s tongue that rubs his foot uncomfortably.
Bottom line
Based on overwhelmingly positive feedback for the Altra Lone Peak 4.0 RSM, there is no doubt that this is one of the well-liked running shoes from Altra. Runners are generally happy with the shoe’s performance, design, fit, and feel. Others even mentioned that they are willing to buy another pair when they need to. In summary, users considered the shoe as an excellent product with great value for money."
Asics Gel Kenun MX,,82.0,,270.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.2oz , Women: 9.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The aesthetics of the Asics Gel Kenun MX were lauded by those who have tried it.
The underfoot experience was deemed adequately responsive, several consumers stated.
Most users were happy with the lightweight build of this running shoe.
The uncluttered look of the façade was appreciated by those who didn’t like a bulky-looking shoe.
Some runners liked the quality of the materials, stating that the components were durable.
2 reasons not to buy
A lot of testers claimed that the medium-width option was narrow.
The midsole wasn’t supportive enough to handle running sessions, some people claimed.
Bottom line
Based on the original Asics Gel Kenun, the Gel Kenun MX is a running shoe that many liked, but with caveats. Some testers felt that the cushioning system was comfortable, while others didn’t recommend it for running. Casual shoe enthusiasts welcomed its vibrant designs while performance-focused individuals reported that it’s too narrow. Overall, this road companion for the neutral pronator garnered average feedback."
Reebok Floatride Run Fast 2, Reebok,87.0,86.0,7.0,,, Road,, Men: 7.6oz , Women: 6.2oz, Men: 11mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The upper unit of the Reebok Floatride Run Fast 2 is considered extremely breathable.
Several people believe that this road running shoe is light enough to be used throughout the entire day.
Consumers have mentioned that the shoe is versatile.
The midsole foam of this model is lauded for being responsive and flexible.
The sidewall construction of the midsole apparently helps to maintain the balance of the foot.
2 reasons not to buy
A few testers have noted that the forefoot section of this product is a bit restrictive.
The front part of the upper unit’s fabric has exhibited some tears, based on a few reviews.
Bottom line
Those who desire a running companion that doesn’t limit natural movement can have fun with the Floatride Run Fast 2. This update seeks to enable the foot through its stretchy upper, flexible midsole, and traction-ready outsole. Caution is advised as there have been reports of a restrictive forefoot section and a not-so-durable upper."
Altra Solstice,,88.0,82.0,467.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.9oz , Women: 5.3oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Many runners appreciated the zero-drop design of the Solstice. Some commented that it has helped relieve their back pain.
A lot of wearers liked the FootShape™ feature of the shoe as it encouraged a natural toe splay, primarily by people who have bunions.
One customer remarked that the Solstice was one of Altra’s most attractive shoes to be released. Others also admired the shoe’s simple yet stylish appearance.
Several users agreed that the shoe was lightweight.
The Solstice enabled a comfortable run because of the well-ventilated upper construction, according to a couple of buyers.
2 reasons not to buy
The shoe was a little too snug around the midfoot, a user expressed.
The included sock liner was inefficient in providing underfoot cushioning, said a buyer.
Bottom line
As a new running shoe on the market, the Altra Solstice has done an excellent job of making its mark on consumers. Numerous reviews praised the shoe for its functional features and comfortable ride. Although some users have reported issues regarding fit, it did not seem to be the case for the majority. Overall, the Solstice has scored high – in performance, appearance, and comfort."
Hoka One One Cavu,,91.0,83.0,3779.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.2oz , Women: 6.6oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Hoka One One Cavu 3,"9 reasons to buy
The Hoka One One Cavu was extremely comfortable on cement and asphalt, said a reviewer. Others echoed this opinion by saying it was comfortable right out of the box.
Many users described the shoe as lightweight.
The upper wraps the foot fantastically, a runner expressed. Another mentioned that it felt like a slipper.
Some buyers praised the snug support that came from the heel collar.
The shoe performed well on speed work, slope runs, and sprints, a user remarked.
One runner experienced consistent cushioning no matter the distance.
A number of wearers were amazed at how the shoe remedied their plantar fasciitis.
The shoe helped relieve knee pain that was previously present during running, according to a purchaser. Others also reported a decrease in similar body pains with the Cavu, which were usually caused by wearing the wrong footwear.
The dual-density midsole brought terrific back comfort, according to a customer.
3 reasons not to buy
A few buyers thought that the shoe ran big.
The collar rubbed excessively against the ankle, a user observed.
A wearer complained that the fit of the pair they bought was different from one another.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Cavu is a newcomer in road running yet it has won over many consumers, based on the considerable number of compliments it received. The shoe’s fit, comfort level, and performance were all appreciated as well. The very minimal criticism was only towards some of the structural components. Overall, the Cavu has been regarded by the majority as a shoe that is worth giving a try."
Adidas Solar Boost,,93.0,88.0,1446.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.6oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Adidas Solar Boost 19,"5 reasons to buy
The Adidas Solar Boost offered a snappy ride, wrote a reviewer.
The boost™ midsole supplied added bounce and encouraged a quicker pace, mentioned a runner. Others said it provided a cushioning that was more accommodating than expected.
A user claimed that the outsole had a broad heel that enhanced ground feel.
Various commenters agreed the shoe possessed a stylish appearance that was suitable for casual wear.
The upper was praised by several users, citing remarks such as “breathable,” “comfortable,” and “lightweight.”
2 reasons not to buy
Many buyers thought the Adidas Solar Boost was expensive.
One wearer complained the arch support was missing from the shoe.
Bottom line
The Adidas Solar Boost delivered what runners would expect from a road running shoe: comfortable, responsive, and efficient. Many users were satisfied with the performance brought about by the shoe, and they found a bonus in its trendy look. Despite the high price point and other relative criticisms, the Solar Boost seems to have proven that it enables a fantastic running adventure."
361 Degrees Meraki,,85.0,88.0,26.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,, 361 Degrees Meraki 2,"5 reasons to buy
The 361 Degrees Meraki was considered by its testers as a suitably lightweight shoe for any activity.
Several purchasers left that the toe box was broad enough for natural toe-splay.
The cushioning system was perceived to be a comfortable platform for the foot.
Some runners commended the durability of the midsole, emphasizing that the responsiveness of the foam remained agreeable even after long running sessions.
A couple of reviewers claimed that the transition between the heel and the toe while wearing the Meraki was smooth and proficient.
2 reasons not to buy
Some testers alleged that the foam midsole was too firm.
The limited amount of colorways was lamented.
Bottom line
The 361 Degrees Meraki was well-received by reviewers and consumers. They were happy with this neutral shoe’s performance, emphasizing the efficacy of the underfoot platform, the lightness of the profile, and the durability of its components. Conversely, there were issues regarding the midsole’s litheness, as well as a lack of color schemes."
Under Armour Threadborne Blur,,86.0,,114.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.2oz , Women: 6.7oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Most users praised the shoe for being comfortable.
Many appreciated the design’s versatility. Plenty of testers were able to use their pair for different activities, not just running.
Some runners mentioned that the upper material felt light and airy.
A few reviewers expressed that the Under Armour Threadborne Blur was suitable for short and fast runs, or speed workouts.
A small number of users commended the responsiveness of the cushioning.
Some testers thought that the shoe was of good value for money.
Most agreed that the measurement is true to size.
Plenty of reviewers said that there was enough room in the toe box.
5 reasons not to buy
One reviewer mentioned that the material the tongue was made out of felt like a wrinkled piece of paper. It was uncomfortable.
A few users complained that they had to pry small pebbles from the gaps in between the wavy indentions on the outsole.
One runner noticed that the outsole was beginning to peel off after using the shoe for only two weeks.
A good number of runners felt like the support the shoe delivered wasn’t enough for long distance running.
One reviewer experienced blistering on the bottom of his Achilles heel because the notch touching this part was firmer.
Bottom line
The Under Armour Threadborne Blur is a neutral running road shoe that many were impressed by because of its versatile design. Reviewers were able to use the shoe in activities other than running – working out, walking in the park, etc. Runners, on the other hand, felt that they worked best when used for short runs or tempo workouts. However, a few users hinted that the quality might not be that good. Nevertheless, the shoe still proved to be a good option for those searching for a reliable running shoe that can double as a lifestyle sneaker."
Brooks Anthem 3,,88.0,,67.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
People have stated that the Brooks Anthem 3 has a lightweight build that accommodates all-day use.
‘Comfortable’ is a term that is used to describe this neutral running shoe.
The price of this product is considered affordable.
Some users have claimed that the in-shoe experience is enough to secure the foot without limiting its movements.
Breathability is a trait that people have come to appreciate from the upper unit of the Anthem 3.
2 reasons not to buy
A few testers have experienced some holes developing from the forefoot section of the upper unit.
Several individuals are noting that the cushioning system of this product is not as supportive as expected.
Bottom line
Runners who are desiring a wallet-friendly option for their daily activities can enjoy the Anthem 3 from Brooks. This product utilizes a breathable upper unit and a cushioned underfoot system for an agreeable time on the roads. Those who have neutral foot pronation are also the target market of this offering."
Puma Carson 2, Puma,84.0,63.0,1334.0,$60,$50 (save 17%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
Many users were happy with the shoe’s affordability and decent quality.
It provided the perfect amount of arch support for neutral pronators, as mentioned by a purchaser.
It was comfortable enough to wear even for daily use, stated a consumer.
The midsole delivered well, and running felt like stepping on the clouds, wrote a reviewer.
One user commented about the shoe’s considerable ankle support.
Several wearers found the upper to be very breathable and snug on foot.
The cushioning was found to be plush and not at all bulky or substantial.
4 reasons not to buy
A user commented that the shoe was too stiff and not as durable as expected.
The fit is a bit tight and uncomfortable, according to a wearer.
The shoe felt flimsy and unable to support running or any similar physical activities, a buyer complained.
The outsole was criticized because it lost all its grip in less than a month of use.
Bottom line
With its uncomplicated and no-nonsense design, the Puma Carson 2 was a winner for most of its users. They were happy with its simple features and their capacity to deliver a performance expected from a brand they trust. It touted to satisfy the needs of an everyday runner who isn’t looking for extravagant wear."
Asics Alpine XT,,86.0,88.0,445.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Several people noted that the traction given by the Asics Alpine XT on dirt or rocky surfaces was reliable.
The underfoot cushioning unit was deemed by many to be comfortable.
Some consumers reported that this shoe accommodated their regular sizing expectations.
The platform kept the foot balanced and steady throughout the run, according to a handful of trail running enthusiasts.
The design and the color schemes were deemed appealing to the eyes.
3 reasons not to buy
A few consumers noted that the outsole didn’t work well on wet surfaces; their feet felt unstable in such conditions.
The forefoot section was a bit narrow, some testers claimed.
A couple of runners noted that the platform was a bit too close to the ground to be comfortable.
Bottom line
The Asics Alpine XT garnered a following of outdoor adventurers who liked its looks and its functional components. The traction-ready outsole and comfortable underfoot cushioning were fan-favorites. On the other hand, there were complaints about this neutral shoe’s stability on wet surfaces, as well as its narrow frame."
Under Armour HOVR Sonic 2,,97.0,93.0,531.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Under Armour HOVR Sonic 3,"6 reasons to buy
Various users were delighted with the connectivity feature of the Under Armour HOVR Sonic 2. Some were pleased with its user-friendly interface.
A runner said the shoe was comfortable right out of the box. Others agreed by saying it did not require a break-in period.
A lot of wearers were happy with the design of the shoe.
The upper of the HOVR Sonic 2 provided good airflow and was significantly breathable, according to a user.
The Under Armour HOVR Sonic 2 gave good value for money, many purchasers stated.
The cushioning of the HOVR made it feel like running on air, a customer reported.
4 reasons not to buy
One reviewer wrote that the sizing was not accurate for the HOVR Sonic 2.
A few buyers were disappointed that the shoe had limited width options.
The shoe had a tighter fit compared to the previous version, some wearers claimed.
It was slightly heavier than other Under Armour shoes, said a runner.
Bottom line
Based on the number of positive feedback it received, runners have enjoyed wearing the Under Armour HOVR Sonic 2. The shoe’s unique features while still being affordable was beneficial for a lot of buyers as well. Although it seems this model still has improvements to do with regard to fit and sizing, the majority of the users have expressed their satisfaction with their purchase of the Under Armour HOVR Sonic 2."
On Cloud Waterproof,,90.0,82.0,102.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Many users appreciated the waterproof characteristic of the shoe.
A wearer observed that the Cloud Waterproof was more comfortable than other On running shoes.
A perfect shoe for all types of weather, stated a runner.
The midsole felt like running on clouds, a reviewer expressed.
One commenter wrote that the shoe was lighter and less bulky than the Cloudventure Waterproof.
1 reasons not to buy
The shoe was a bit noisy when used for walking around, a user observed.
Bottom line
A lot of runners have found the Cloud Waterproof to be a combination of functionality and comfort, which they liked. With the addition of the On membrane, many users were pleased that their running experience has been enhanced. Overall, the Cloud Waterproof has managed to impress the majority of its users with its reliable features and comfortable structure."
Under Armour HOVR Guardian,,88.0,84.0,14.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.5oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Under Armour HOVR Guardian 2,"5 reasons to buy
The Under Armour HOVR Guardian was a comfortable running shoe, according to those who have tried it.
Based on some reviews, the fit was perfect.
The shoe was well-cushioned, noted by several testers.
A few mentioned that they’ve been using the shoe not only for running but also on gym workout and long walks.
It provided excellent arch support, commented by a user.
2 reasons not to buy
One consumer said that the colorways were not appealing and attractive.
The Achilles area is too tight and causes pain when the shoe is worn, according to some users.
Bottom line
The Under Armour HOVR Guardian is a road running shoe designed for overpronators. Based on the user reviews, the shoe made a lot of users happy and satisfied. According to them, the fit, cushioning, and comfort are the best attributes of this shoe. Although some of them have complained about the size and color options, others still recommend the footwear for those who are looking for cushioning and extra structure."
Topo Athletic Zephyr,,90.0,93.0,10.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The Topo Athletic Zephyr is lightweight, many users claimed. 
This shoe is comfortable, most runners agreed. 
A few buyers mentioned that it offers excellent arch support.
Many users appreciated its wide toe box. 
It offers just the right amount of cushioning, according to some testers. 
A couple of reviewers praised the shoe’s flexibility.
3 reasons not to buy
One commenter dislikes its narrow midfoot section. 
A few purchasers reported that it makes a lot of noise while running.
A runner noted the lack of padding in the heel area.
Bottom line
The Topo Athletic Zephyr is a highly cushioned running shoe that works best for runners with neutral gaits. It features state-of-the-art technologies, aiming to deliver a blend of durability, flexibility, and comfort. It is also suitable for walking, gym sessions, and casual walks."
Nike Zoom Fly SP, Nike,94.0,96.0,807.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,, May 2018,,,"5 reasons to buy
The minimal weight of the Nike Zoom Fly SP made it fantastic to wear during race days, several runners stated. Others found the shoe to perform excellently on short and slow runs.
The Lunarlon midsole was very responsive, a reviewer said.
The various technologies in the shoe were all groundbreaking, according to a content customer.
A couple of wearers remarked that the translucent upper was lighter than the Flyknit material.
A lot of users said the Zoom Fly SP was one of the most comfortable shoes they have ever worn.
3 reasons not to buy
A few testers commented that the shoe ran small.
The material that goes over the toes felt odd and uncomfortable, a user observed.
The shoelaces came undone easily, even with triple-knot ties, according to a wearer.
Bottom line
Many users were very pleased with the Nike Zoom Fly SP. Some have even gone to mention that they hoped to find the shoe’s technologies in other future productions from the brand. Others also expressed their satisfaction by saying they wanted a trail-running version of the shoe. Although there were negative comments about sizing, with the majority of praises it received, it is easy to see that the Zoom Fly SP was a successful release."
Asics Roadblast,,89.0,88.0,5.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 8.7oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Comfort: The majority of the users confirm that the Asics Roadblast offers a snug fit.
Weight: This running partner feels light on foot, said some runners. 
Cushioning: Multiple consumers highlighted the shoe's responsive midsole.
Breathability: The upper material is praised by numerous testers for keeping the foot dry and cool for an extended period.  
Flexibility: Many wearers appreciate the Roadblast's flexible outsole. 
Support: A lot of purchasers agree that the upper helps minimize unnecessary foot movements. 
Grip: The outsole works well on various paved surfaces, a few buyers think. 
2 reasons not to buy
Fit: A handful of wearers report that the Asics Roadblast feels a bit tight.
Upper: One commenter mentions that the upper material rubs on top of the foot, causing discomfort. 
Bottom line
Built to deliver a gender-specific fit, the Asics Roadblast provides a comfortable and snug in-shoe feel. It is equipped with a durable outsole, responsive midsole, and breathable upper that are ideal for everyday runs and regular training sessions. This shoe works best for neutral runners or those who do not overpronate.
 "
Topo Athletic MT-3,,79.0,85.0,16.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 3mm , Women: 3mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
People have commented that they appreciate the tread pattern on the outsole, also emphasizing that it is reliable on both wet and dry topography.
Some consumers mention that the toe box is wide enough to welcome the natural splaying of the toes.
The versatility of the MT-3 has been welcomed by those who like transitioning from the trails to the roads without changing shoes.
Runners are happy with the cushioning system of this Topo Athletic running shoe, noting that the comfort that they receive is consistent.
Running in wet conditions remains a confident and viable activity because of the quick-to-drain upper unit, as some testers have remarked.
1 reasons not to buy
A couple of testers claim that the collar of this shoe didn’t secure the ankles as well as expected.
Bottom line
The overall reaction towards the Topo Athletic MT-3 has been mostly positive. Those who have tried this product laud its highly agreeable outsole configuration for being efficient on both wet and dry ground. The well-draining upper and responsive midsole have also been highlighted. On the other hand, some have not agreed with the in-shoe feel, determining that the ankle security isn’t as robust as anticipated.
Neutral pronators who appreciate the rugged performance of trail running shoes are the ones who are welcome to use the Topo Athletic MT-3."
Puma Speed Orbiter,,84.0,90.0,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Many claim that the Puma Speed Orbiter delivers stability. 
Several laud its shock-attenuating properties. 
It has plush cushioning, stated a number of purchasers.
According to some experts, it has a sock-like wrap; it is highly comfortable. 
The shoe is highly responsive, commented a few. 
It provides grippy traction, claimed some athletes.
2 reasons not to buy
Weight may be a hindrance to some runners, especially for long-distance runs.
Some find the shoe too chunky. 
Bottom line
The Puma Speed Orbiter is a reliable runner that promotes a supportive and propulsive ride. Packed with essential and top-of-the-line features, it is one for comfort and responsiveness. Adhering to the brand’s design principle, the Speed Orbiter from Puma is configured for durability and style. "
Nike Air Max 2017,,86.0,70.0,1228.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.9oz , Women: 11.9oz, Men: 13mm , Women: 13mm, Nov 2016,,,"11 reasons to buy
The Nike Air Max 2017 solidifies the line’s tradition of mixing performance and lifestyle with its cool, sophisticated looks and solid performance on track.
It is extremely comfortable, according to several reviewers.
It comes in different color combinations.
The shoe has sufficient reflectivity for low-visibility running.
A few runners noted that it has better quality than the 2016 edition.
The cushioning absorbs shock well, based on the experience of several users.
It is great for all day wear, as a running shoe or as a casual footwear.
More than a few mentioned that is several times better than the past model.
The 2017 version of the Air Max showed little sign of wear after being extensively used on the road, as noticed by a small number of runners.
Some avid fans of the series agreed that the quality and construction of the latest version of the Air Max are a notch better than the predecessor.
It works well as a gym shoe, according to some reviewers.
6 reasons not to buy
The $190 price tag is too tough to swallow.
It is a bit smaller than before.
It is also slightly narrower than the 2016 version.
The new tongue, which is attached, caused a little too much snugness or tightness even if the laces are adjusted, based on the reviews of several runners.
A small number of runners found the cushioning too hard.
Some very loyal fans of the Air Max felt that the air bag design is long overdue for a change as it could really improve the line’s performance as a running shoe.
Bottom line
Nike is steadfast in its aim of blending performance and lifestyle with every release of the Air Max series. The 2017 Nike Air Max is no different as it thrives on its ability to match superior comfort, adequate arch support, and insane looks. Although the price won’t allow everyone to own a pair, this should be one of those shoes that people will be itching to get their hands on."
Asics Gel Nimbus 19,,83.0,77.0,5035.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 12mm,,, Asics Gel Nimbus 22,"10 reasons to buy
A significant number of reviewers were impressed by the comfortable ride of the Nimbus 19.
Several loyal Gel Nimbus fans remarked that the latest version of this line offers its trademark cushioning and stability.
More than a couple of heavier runners appreciated the support and cushioning of this shoe.
Asics introduces its innovative FlyteFoam midsole technology in the 19th edition of the Gel Nimbus for better protection and responsiveness in an ultra-light foam.
The shoe is substantially lighter than the earlier model.
The gender-specific cushioning works to the distinctive advantage for both gender versions.
There are already several color options to choose from.
A handful of runners consider the shoe as very worth its price.
The shoe does not require any break-in period, according to a few runners.
Reflective elements for low-visibility running.
3 reasons not to buy
A good number of Asics Gel Nimbus fans were very disappointed that the new version is very tight around the toe box.
A handful of runners noted how small and narrow, the latest iteration of the Nimbus is.
A handful of runners were very disappointed by the shoe’s outsole durability.
Bottom line
Asics’ flagship neutral shoe gets a ton of changes in the Nimbus 19. The shoe continues to be very well-cushioned with an added emphasis in midsole protection and responsiveness. Most of the reviewers were generally impressed by the comfortable feel, good arch support, the drastic drop in weight, and bang for the value price. It remains to be one of the shoes that runners are very excited about from Asics as the year opens—and with sufficient reason to be."
Hoka One One Bondi Leather,,88.0,,126.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.9oz , Women: 10.1oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Several consumers noted that the Hoka One One Bondi Leather was a comfortable companion for the roads.
The midsole components responsibly cushioned the foot, based on general user feedback.
A tester noted that the support given to the arch was agreeable.
The forefoot area was broad enough to welcome natural toe-splay, stated several runners.
The durability of this running shoe was mostly lauded; it was deemed to last long.
5 reasons not to buy
Some runners reported that it was too narrow in the forefoot and heel.
The base of the platform was too chunky, a person complained. It apparently tended to catch on the edge of stairs.
The inserts were thinner and flimsier than other options in the Bondi line, according to a few purchasers.
Based on specific reviews, the Bondi Leather looked awkwardly bulky.
According to some purchasers, the interior chamber felt too warm, especially in hot conditions.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Bondi Leather received mixed reviews from consumers. On the one hand, many people appreciated this neutral running shoe’s comfortable underfoot experience, its roomy toe box, and its durable construction; conversely, there were several complaints about its apparently inconsistent design and inefficient components."
Asics Jolt 2,,89.0,,665.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Jolt,"7 reasons to buy
Many runners have welcomed the price of the Asics Jolt 2.
The lightweight structure of this running shoe is highlighted by wearers.
Some consumers claim that the cushioning system is able to properly support their strides.
According to several testers, the upper unit has breathability that ensures a cool and dry hug at all times.
‘Comfortable’ is a word that has been used to describe the cover system and the underfoot experience.
The traction of the outsole unit has received praise for being reliable.
Several people believe that the in-shoe lining is softer and less irritating than the previous iteration’s.
2 reasons not to buy
The ceiling of the mesh upper has a tendency to rub irritatingly against the skin of the foot, based on several reviews.
Some runners report that the outsole has worn down after only a few weeks of use.
Bottom line
The overall reaction towards the Jolt 2 has been mostly positive. People welcome this Asics running shoe, with its lightweight construction, affordable price, and breathable silhouette. The comfort given by the midsole has also been enjoyed by daily runners. On the other hand, the irritating inner fabrics and the quickly-wearing rubber on the external pad have been criticized.
Fans of neutral running shoes that are optimized for even surfaces are the ones who are likely to enjoy the Asics Jolt 2."
Adidas Solar Glide,,90.0,85.0,919.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Adidas Solar Glide 3,"7 reasons to buy
The design and color schemes of the Adidas Solar Glide were lauded by those who have tried it.
Many people felt that the size options followed their expectations.
The width profiles suitably accommodated consumers who had medium foot-dimensions.
The underfoot cushioning was appreciated for being responsive and comfortable.
Several runners noted that the lightweight nature of this running shoe ensured a speedy performance.
The general quality of the materials was considered to be dependable.
A couple of reviewers appreciated the outsole unit’s capacity to hold onto the surfaces.
2 reasons not to buy
According to a tester, some friction could be felt on the eyelets of the shoe whenever the laces were tightened.
A purchaser claimed that it was slightly larger than what he expected.
Bottom line
The Adidas Solar Glide was mainly well-received by those who have tested it. People were happy with the aesthetics of this neutral shoe, as well as its lightweight build and quality materials. Contrariwise, there were some minor qualms about material rubbing while a single complaint was directed to the inconsistent sizing."
Brooks Anthem,,88.0,,445.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.4oz , Women: 7.3oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Brooks Anthem 3,"7 reasons to buy
A lot of runners were amazed that the Brooks Anthem was adequately plush without being heavy or unresponsive.
This running shoe delivered excellent ankle support, according to a user.
Several wearers were happy with the roomy toe box.
It was very lightweight and comfortable to run in, as commented by a couple of buyers.
One runner observed a natural stride, and no shin-splits, with the Brooks Anthem.
Many users agreed that it worked well as a neutral running shoe because it just brought the right amount of arch support.
Some buyers expressed that the minimal design gave a classy appearance that looked better than the usual athletic shoes.
3 reasons not to buy
It felt less cushioned than the other neutral shoes offered by Brooks, according to a runner.
One tester said that the shoe felt bulky and heavy while being worn.
A commenter wrote that the toe area has already come apart within only a month of wear.
Bottom line
Many of the users were impressed with how the Brooks Anthem brought comfort and steady performance to their running sessions. However, some of the wearers have doubts about the shoe’s durability and structure. Despite the mixed review, several users would still recommend the shoe because of its affordable prove and performance."
Salomon S-Lab Ultra 2,,87.0,89.0,41.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 10.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The heel counter and collar have gained fans for being elements that responsibly hold the foot in place.
The cushioning system is lauded by those who appreciate an underfoot experience that is responsive and comfortable.
Several testers claim that the outsole unit has a reliable traction capacity that agreed with wet and dry surfaces.
A handful of runners welcome the spacious toe box; they feel that it can accommodate the natural splaying of the toes.
Most purchasers love the breathability of the upper unit, stating that the cover system doesn’t feel stuff or restricting.
The ability of the upper to drain water is welcomed by those who like to tread on wet paths.
3 reasons not to buy
A few people have stated that the Salomon S-Lab Ultra 2 has a bulky construction that makes it unstable on unpredictable terrains.
The mesh near the forefoot section has developed tears, some consumers noted.
The traction on slippery surfaces is inconsistent, based on a few reviews.
Bottom line
The overall reaction towards the Salomon S-Lab Ultra 2 has been positive. The runners who are able to enjoy the performance of this trail running shoe emphasized the secure wrap, the reactive midsole unit, the outsole that is traction-ready, and the breathable fabrics. On the other hand, the durability of the upper unit’s fibers and the bulky look do not enjoy a welcoming atmosphere from testers.
Fans of neutral running shoes that are for the unpredictable outdoor topographies are the ones who are likely to enjoy the Salomon S-Lab Ultra 2."
Topo Athletic Terraventure 2,,93.0,92.0,57.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 8.2oz, Men: 3mm , Women: 3mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The forefoot section of the Topo Athletic Terraventure 2 was lauded by consumers for being wide enough to accommodate natural toe-splay.
Some testers commented that the outsole unit was able to provide reliable traction over rocky and muddy surfaces.
People felt that the sizing scheme of this running shoe followed their usual preferences.
The firm midsole unit was considered by several purchasers to be an excellent platform for rough topography.
Mud was able to slough off quickly because of the evenly-spaced gripping lugs, a handful of people reported.
According to a couple of runners, the heel section of the upper held the foot sufficiently, preventing any accidental shoe removals.
1 reasons not to buy
A few people noted that they were able to notice the weight of this shoe, stating that it was heavier than their usual fare.
Bottom line
People rained praise on the Topo Athletic Terraventure 2. This trail companion worked well for them. They welcomed its spacious toe box, its grip-ready outsole unit, the confident performance on rocky and soft surfaces, and the accommodating sizing schemes. It’s apparently a step up from its predecessor. The noticeable aspect that didn’t sit well with some consumers was its weight as it apparently dragged the foot. Still, the sequestered concern wasn’t a deal-breaker as shoe enthusiasts still flocked to this product for their off-road adventures."
Nike Free RN Flyknit 2018,,94.0,89.0,650.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.5oz , Women: 5.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
A lot of runners said that the shoe was breathable.
Many users agreed that the Nike Free RN Flyknit 2018 was comfortable to wear.
Many runners commented that it has excellent cushioning.
A good number of purchasers loved the stylish design of the shoe.
According to some runners, it was supportive.
Many reviewers said that the Tri-Star pattern of the shoe was fantastic.
Most of the testers commented that the Nike Free RN Flyknit 2018 was lightweight.
Users were happy because of its perfect fit.
The shoe was flexible, according to some reviews.
3 reasons not to buy
Based on reviews, the Nike Free RN Flyknit 2018 runs small.
One of the users said that his foot was sliding forward during his running sessions.
The shoe was expensive, according to some purchasers.
Bottom line
Overall, many runners were satisfied and happy with the Nike Free RN Flyknit 2018's design and lightweight structure. Aside from its design and construction, they lauded the few changes that were made from the previous models. Although some runners have issues with its size and price, others still recommended the Nike Free Flyknit 2018 because of its quality and cushioning. It's the best option for those who are looking for a versatile running shoe."
Asics Gel Nimbus 21 Lite-Show,,91.0,,84.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 9.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 13mm,,,,"4 reasons to buy
A few runners lauded the wide toe-box of the Asics Gel Nimbus 21 Lite-Show. They said it gives there toes enough wiggle room.
According to some buyers, this running shoe has a good fit, from the heel to the forefoot section.
It is a great supportive shoe, said a few reviewers.
A couple of users mentioned that they are using the shoe not only for running but also for gym training.
4 reasons not to buy
The shoe is expensive.
One user said that the shoe is not as durable as expected.
The Nimbus 21 Lite-Show feels heavy, said a few disappointed users.
Several users observed that the shoe lacks the necessary underfoot cushioning, especially in the heel area.
Bottom line
The Lite-Show version of the Asics Gel Nimbus 21 received mixed reviews from users. Some were highly satisfied because it fits well and versatile enough to be used on gym workouts. However, others are disappointed because it is expensive, not durable and offers less cushioning than the previous version. In summary, this road running shoe needs more improvement to fully capture the approval of the majority."
Adidas Adizero Boston 9,,82.0,,16.0,,, Road,, Men: 8.5oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Some people have noted that the Adidas Adizero Boston 9 has a lightweight build that permits quick transitions through the gait cycle.
The minimalist upper unit is appealing to the eyes of most runners.
This Adidas running shoe remains comfortable as a partner for extended runs and all-day speed training sessions.
Consumers have stated that surface control is an aspect that is responsibly delivered by the outsole unit.
Underfoot cushioning is a blend of lightweight support and responsiveness, based on a handful of comments.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people claim that the shoelaces have a tendency to snap apart quickly.
Based on a couple of reviews, the in-shoe experience is wobbly and not so secure.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of people towards the Adidas Adizero Boston 9 has been positive, though some caveats are apparently present. The good elements of this running shoe are said to include the uncluttered upper, the traction-ready outsole, and the reactive midsole, while not-so-secure lacing implementation and wobbly in-shoe experience cover the negatives.
Fans of long-distance running shoes are the target market of the Adizero Boston 9."
New Balance Fresh Foam Cruz v2 Sport,,88.0,,232.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.6oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Several people commended the comfortable cushioning system of the New Balance Fresh Foam Cruz v2 Sport.
The colorways that come with this running shoe gained positive feedback because they were apparently eye-catching.
Some consumers felt that the mesh upper offered adequate breathability and lightweight support.
Most testers noted that the sizing schemes and width profiles were able to follow their expectations.
The flexibility of the Foam Cruz v2 Sport’s upper and platform was lauded.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people claimed that the plastic saddle on the upper tended to put pressure on the foot, causing some irritation.
The sole unit slipped on damp surfaces, a couple of consumers reported.
Bottom line
The response toward the New Balance Fresh Foam Cruz v2 Sport was mostly positive. People liked that this neutral shoe gave an agreeable performance on the roads. Moreover, the weight, aesthetics, and materials were deemed notable, as well. On the contrary, some testers didn’t like the saddle on the upper while others shied away from the slippery outer pad."
New Balance Fresh Foam Arishi v3,,81.0,,54.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 8.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Most of the users appreciate the comfort that the New Balance Fresh Foam Arishi v3 provides. 
This shoe offers adequate support, according to some runners. 
Several wearers praise this running partner's lightweight structure. 
A couple of commenters confirm that it is breathable. 
Numerous consumers also recommended this shoe for work and casual walks. 
People love the stylish design of the Fresh Foam Arishi v3. 
2 reasons not to buy
The New Balance Fresh Foam Arishi v3 seems to run a little narrow, a few testers observed. 
Some buyers said that this running companion does not provide enough cushioning. 
Bottom line
The New Balance Fresh Foam Arishi v3 is a lightweight running shoe that aims to provide an efficient and ultra-cushioned ride. This neutral running shoe is suitable for runners seeking for comfort, protection, and flexibility. It is ideal for walking, running, and workout sessions. "
Under Armour Charged Pursuit 2, Under Armour,85.0,,8.0,,, Road,, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The people who have tested the Under Armour Charged Pursuit 2 believe that the aesthetics are highly appealing.
The lightweight structure of this road running shoe is welcomed by those who don’t want motion and speed to be curtailed.
Many consumers have noted that the price of this product is affordable.
‘Comfortable’ is a word that a lot of testers have used to describe the underfoot experience.
The outsole traction is deemed as dependable and confidence-giving.
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of testers have experienced a wobbly in-shoe experience, stating that the upper isn’t as secure as expected.
A person has complained that the upper isn’t capable of breathing well.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of people towards the Under Armour Charged Pursuit 2 has been largely positive. This neutral running shoe is welcomed because of its wallet-friendly price, the grip of the outsole, and the comfortable midsole unit. Inversely, the in-shoe feel is considered not-so-secure while breathability is deemed inconsistent.
Fans of Under Armour running shoes for the roads can have fun with the Charged Pursuit 2."
New Balance 840 v3,,89.0,,748.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.6oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, New Balance 840 v4,"5 reasons to buy
The amazing comfort is what the majority of runners are impressed with about the New Balance 840 v3.
The roomy toe box accommodates runners with slightly wide feet.
A large portion of satisfied users also point out the shoe’s exceptional cushioning as one of its best assets.
There are no stability issues despite the 12mm heel differential as some runners have noted.
The heel has a very comfortable and snug feel that most of the runners really appreciate.
5 reasons not to buy
The New Balance 840 v3 is a bit stiffer than several runners would have preferred.
The fit slightly suffers for those who have narrow forefoot.
Runners who expected more than sufficient flexibility for a well-cushioned shoe were a bit disappointed.
The most common knock against the 840 v3 based on online reviews is the poor quality of materials being used.
High price tag.
Bottom line
The New Balance 840 v3 is engineered to provide superior comfort and cushioning for runners who love to pile on the miles. The arch support is good enough for neutral runners to enjoy. It is a running shoe that is every inch patterned after traditional shoes, especially the heel height, heel offset, cushioning, and weight."
Hoka One One Clifton 1,,95.0,90.0,203.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.7oz , Women: 6.6oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"10 reasons to buy
Many runners mentioned that the Hoka One One Clifton 1 is the best Hoka shoe they have ever worn.
A lot of runners admired the shoe’s lightweight design.
Many users appreciated the breathable coverage of the Hoka Clifton 1.
Runners with wide forefoot admired the shoe’s wide toe box; they said it gives enough room for toe splay.
A significant number of runners remarked that the cushioning of this road running shoe is very comfortable.
According to some satisfied runners, the Clifton 1 has a very responsive cushioning.
Several testers highlighted the shoe’s responsive cushioning.
The shoe runs true-to-size, said some wearers.
Some users mentioned that the running shoe is great for half and full marathons.
A few who got the shoe agreed that buying it is getting value out of their money.
3 reasons not to buy
A few narrow-footed runners were disappointed because of the shoe’s sloppy forefoot fit.
Some runners were unhappy with the shoe’s flimsy tongue unit.
The insole of the Hoka One One Clifton 1 is too thin and keeps on sliding around, according to some purchasers.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Clifton 1 managed to get high marks from runners. Many users positively accepted the shocking come back of the first ever Clifton running shoe. It received few criticisms, but the users believe there is still room for improvement for the Clifton 1. Overall, as a lot of people considered the Hoka One One Clifton 1 as the best Hoka running shoe of all time."
Adidas Edge Flex,,89.0,,64.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
The lightweight construction of Adidas Edge Flex helps increase the running speed, a couple of reviewers observed. 
People were happy that the price of this Adidas running shoe is affordable. 
A few purchasers welcomed the wide width of this shoe. 
Many users agreed that the Adidas Edge Flex running shoe is very comfortable to wear. 
This running companion offers excellent arch support, according to a satisfied user. 
Several buyers noted that the shoe has a flexible and durable outsole. 
A lot of wearers said that the Adidas Edge Flex shoe was good-looking and stylish.
The shoe provides good support and can securely hold the foot in place while running, a number of testers commented. 
The shoe is very responsive, some runners claimed. 
2 reasons not to buy
A user complained that the forefoot section of Adidas Edge Flex was a bit wide and uncomfortable. 
One buyer reported that every time he takes off the shoe the insole comes out and it makes him uncomfortable. 
Bottom line
The Adidas Edge Flex offered a lot when it comes to responsiveness. People were greatly happy with the shoe's lightweight construction and durability. Also, its outstanding performance made it a worthwhile choice for most runners looking for affordable, comfortable and flexible running shoes. Only a few testers complained about the shoe’s wide forefoot and uncomfortable insoles. 
 "
Merrell Bare Access Flex 2,,88.0,,102.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7oz , Women: 5.6oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Many users admired the lightweight built of the Merrell Bare Access Flex 2.
This road running shoe is very affordable.
Several users were happy with how comfortable the shoe is.
A few buyers lauded the stylish design of the shoe. They said it looks nice and appealing.
Some satisfied wearers commented that the shoe is well-made.
A significant number of runners said the Bare Access Flex 2 offers excellent arch support.
According to some user reviews, aside from running, the shoe is also comfortable and reliable enough for long walks.
A couple of users noted that the outsole design of the shoe is durable and grippy enough for both road and light trail surfaces.
1 reasons not to buy
Some users were unhappy with the toe-box. They said it is way too large for their feet.
Bottom line
The Merrell Bare Access Flex 2 received positive comments from the majority of the users. They admired the shoe’s feather-like feel, impressive ground contact, and its durable construction. Though some found the toe-box to be too wide for them, it still does not affect the positive rating the shoe received.
This neutral road running shoe is a good option for those who are looking for a running partner that has minimal cushioning yet durable and flexible enough to provide a more natural experience."
Asics Gel Torrance 2,,85.0,,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 9.2oz,,,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The underfoot cushioning system that is present in this road running shoe is considered responsive by most purchasers.
People have stated that the flexibility of the platform is a welcome aspect that encourages speedy steps.
The traction given by the outsole unit is treated by many runners as efficient.
Purchasers have commended the price of the Asics Gel Torrance 2, stating that it is affordable.
Several users have noted that breathability is an aspect that can easily be appreciated from this shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
Some users have noted that the inner sleeve near the forefoot section has a tendency to irritate the skin of the foot.
For several consumers, the fit of the in-shoe chamber is a bit loose.
Bottom line
Asics continues to churn out cheap running shoes that anyone can enjoy, especially neophytes who are just getting into running as an activity that they can apply to their daily lives. The straightforward design of the Asics Gel Torrance 2 allows the wearer to get into the activity with ease. Neutral pronators and casual shoe enthusiasts are also the target market for this product."
New Balance Fresh Foam Crag v2, New Balance,77.0,,6.0,,, Trail, Neutral,,,,,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The Fresh Foam midsole unit of the New Balance Fresh Foam Crag v2 is praised for being responsive and comfortable.
The durability of the materials is praised by those who appreciate long-lasting shoes.
A few testers believe that the outsole is efficient on both the trails and flat surfaces.
The classic ‘90s look of the facade is appealing to those who appreciate the nostalgia.
Breathability is a trait that is nicely perceived, based on a couple of reviews.
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of testers believe that the in-shoe wrap is restrictive because of the presence of too many overlays.
The facade looks bulky, according to a consumer.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of people towards the New Balance Fresh Foam Crag v2 has been positive. This trail running shoe is praised for its nostalgic design, the traction-ready outsole, and the comfortable midsole. The shoe captures the best of style and function and puts them together for an off-road runner that is soft, light, and efficient."
Altra Viho,,89.0,91.0,9.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
People have appreciated the Altra Viho’s natural foot-shaped toe box design. 
Many purchasers have praised the overall quality of the shoe. 
This running partner is comfortable, based on reviews. 
Several commenters have lauded this shoe’s cushioning performance. 
A few runners have highlighted the shoe’s lightweight structure. 
The outsole unit is durable, said some wearers. 
This running companion is responsive, a user observed. 
Consumers are happy that the price for a pair of Altra Viho is affordable.
3 reasons not to buy
A tester mentioned that the Altra Viho looks too bulky. 
One buyer complained due to uneven sole issues. 
This running shoe is too narrow, according to some commenters.
Bottom line
The Altra Viho is a daily running shoe that is designed to keep the runner comfortable on every step of the run. It is a neutral running shoe that is manufactured using quality materials that deliver durability, flexibility, and breathability. This budget-friendly running shoe is suitable for running on paved surfaces. The Altra Viho is also a perfect running partner or training option for runners of all levels. "
Salomon Speedcross 3,,94.0,87.0,4248.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 11mm , Women: 11mm,,, Salomon Speedcross 5,"9 reasons to buy
Many runners loved the look and design of the 3rd version of the Salomon Speedcross.
The upper unit felt snug, but it didn’t strangle the foot; according the several testers, the fit was adequate.
It didn’t look bulky or overwhelming, which satisfied numerous trail runners.
The quick lacing system received a lot of praise because it allowed runners to adjust the fit quickly and easily.
Some consumers noted that the upper fabrics were able to stave off moisture satisfactorily.
The trail-optimized tread of the outsole unit provided reasonable grip on a variety of surfaces, according to trail runners.
The durability of this running shoe was commended by those who wrote that it stayed intact even after many off-road adventures.
Many reviewers wrote that the underfoot cushioning system of this version was reliable.
This shoe felt lightweight to a lot of consumers.
3 reasons not to buy
Sections of the upper unit started to peel off, according to a tester; they wrote that it placed doubts when it comes to its overall durability.
The lacing system broke apart, reported a runner; they also added that putting on a new set of laces was difficult when it came to the Speedcross 3.
It felt narrow for a few runners.
Bottom line
The Salomon Speedcross 3 performed well, according to the comments of many runners. This trail shoe was able to take many testers on adventures and contests and they felt comfortable and secure while wearing it. They welcomed its trail-specific features because it allowed them to traverse different types of topography with ease. Contrarily, a few didn’t think that it was very durable and some felt that it was tight."
Under Armour HOVR Guardian,,88.0,84.0,14.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.5oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Under Armour HOVR Guardian 2,"5 reasons to buy
The Under Armour HOVR Guardian was a comfortable running shoe, according to those who have tried it.
Based on some reviews, the fit was perfect.
The shoe was well-cushioned, noted by several testers.
A few mentioned that they’ve been using the shoe not only for running but also on gym workout and long walks.
It provided excellent arch support, commented by a user.
2 reasons not to buy
One consumer said that the colorways were not appealing and attractive.
The Achilles area is too tight and causes pain when the shoe is worn, according to some users.
Bottom line
The Under Armour HOVR Guardian is a road running shoe designed for overpronators. Based on the user reviews, the shoe made a lot of users happy and satisfied. According to them, the fit, cushioning, and comfort are the best attributes of this shoe. Although some of them have complained about the size and color options, others still recommend the footwear for those who are looking for cushioning and extra structure."
Salomon XA Pro 3D CS WP,,90.0,89.0,499.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 15.6oz , Women: 12.6oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"10 reasons to buy
Many of the reviewers swear by the awesome comfort of the XA Pro 3D CS WP.
It has excellent traction, based on the comments of several hikers and runners.
The Sensifit overlays provide exceptional midfoot hold.
According to several users, these are very well-made shoes.
The QuickLace system offers ease and convenience in getting the right fit.
Offers more color options than past versions of the XA Pro 3D series.
A significant number of reviewers mentioned that the arch support is superb.
The durability of the XA Pro 3D CS WP is first-rate, as reported by several runners.
The lugs are self-cleaning, based on the experience of some runners.
A handful of runners really liked the shoe’s capacity to keep their feet warm during winter.
5 reasons not to buy
It is too stiff for some runners.
It runs a little small and narrow, as noted by more than a few runners.
The shoe is very heavy for a handful of runners.
A good number of runners noted that the shoe made a crunching sound that irritated them.
Several runners complained that the speed laces have a very short lifespan.
Bottom line
The CS WP is the ClimaShield and Waterproof version of the XA Pro 3D. It uses the CS technology to keep the feet warm for winter forays on the most challenging trails. The shoe is extremely stable, highly-durable, and built for the serious pounding at slow to moderate speeds."
Hoka One One Hupana Slip,,96.0,,82.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Majority of users like the fact that the Hoka One One Hupana Slip is remarkably comfortable straight out of the box.
A couple of users appreciate the shoe on its excellent support for their plantar fasciitis.
Most of the wearers like that the Hupana Slip is a great slip on and go kind of shoe.
A number of users commend the shoe for its breathability, keeping their feet healthy.
Some wearers say that even after hours of long-wearing the Hupana Slip, their feet do not feel fatigued at all.
Several wearers like the shoe for its clean lines and simple design.
2 reasons not to buy
Some users wish that there were more color choices for the Hupana Slip.
One user has mentioned that the shoe has high arches that did not suit his feet.
Bottom line
Designed for intense training runs to light home workouts, the Hoka One One Hupana Slip is very versatile for such types of activities. It is a neutral running shoe the same as with the popular Hoka One One Bondi 6 that can offer a reassuring performance while remaining light and nimble. With its versatility, comfortable fit, and minimalist design, any runner will want to consider copping the Hupana Slip as their work to play running shoes."
La Sportiva Akasha,,92.0,84.0,265.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.6oz , Women: 9.8oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
As mentioned in some reviews, the outsole of the La Sportiva Akasha delivers reliable traction on rough surfaces.
The shoe is durable, according to a few user reviews.
Many were satisfied with how flexible the Akasha is.
According to a few buyers, the shoe is very comfortable.
The upper is breathable enough to keep the foot cool and dry.
2 reasons not to buy
The men’s version is a bit heavy.
The Akasha is an expensive shoe.
Bottom line
The La Sportiva Akasha is a trail running shoe that is equipped with the necessary technologies that help runners tackle the toughest terrain effortlessly. It delivers enough amount of cushioning, protection and durability for long distance trail running. Despite being expensive, several users would still recommend the shoe to runners of all levels."
Brooks Ghost 10,,95.0,90.0,3099.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Brooks Ghost 12,"8 reasons to buy
Some users appreciated the Brooks Ghost 10’s high-performance construction.
A lot of testers with foot issues were happy that the shoe did not cause foot pain.
There were people who recognized the above average shock absorbing capacity of the midsole.
A majority of users stated that the shoe felt very comfortable.
Based on a number of reviews, the sole unit felt sturdy yet comfortable and less bulky.
Some narrated that they felt like they were running on clouds or air with the shoe on.
Most runners mentioned that the shoe felt like it was well made.
Reviewers appreciated the inclusion of a shoelace holder at the top of the tongue.
6 reasons not to buy
One person observed the sole unit coming loose after only wearing it four times.
Some reviewers reported that the underfoot platform was too low to the ground and that the quality of cushioning was sacrificed.
Someone was unhappy about not getting enough arch support from the shoe.
Another tester noticed that the sides and top of the shoe were starting to deteriorate after merely two weeks of use.
There was a reviewer who revealed that the shoe did not have an effective grip on wet surfaces.
A few runners said that the quality of the shoe is poor.
Bottom line
The Brooks Ghost 10 is a neutral running shoe that delivers both comfort and performance. It’s an ideal shoe for light training, tempo road running, long runs, and everyday use. Possessing minor yet significant updates from its predecessor, it brings runners a more cushioned, smoother, and adaptive ride."
Nike Epic React Flyknit,,92.0,88.0,1024.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 8.4oz , Women: 6.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Nike Epic React Flyknit 2,"9 reasons to buy
The Nike Epic React Flyknit was a comfortable shoe right out of the box, several users exclaimed. Other runners expressed how comfortable the shoe is: some compared it to running on pillows and clouds, while another voiced comfort even on the knees.
The outsole was surprisingly durable, wrote a commenter.
The lightweight disposition helped increase running speed, a couple of reviewers observed.
A lot of wearers said that the Epic React Flyknit was a good-looking shoe.
Some runners were pleased with how responsive the midsole was.
One tester liked that the Flyknit upper was snug and structured.
There was just the right amount of cushioning: not too soft and not too firm, explained a reviewer.
The shoe allowed natural movement, even during fast-paced activities, commended a buyer.
The Epic React Flyknit was an excellent shoe for up-tempo days and speedy runs, a reviewer claimed.
8 reasons not to buy
The shoe had a narrow fit, according to a couple of purchasers.
Several customers experienced a weird popping noise from the shoe that was quite bothersome.
Not much support for midfoot strikers, a disappointed user stated.
Although lightweight, the shoe’s structure made it look bulky, a reviewer thought.
Some users disliked that the shoe required a break-in period.
A bit tight around the forefoot, according to numerous customers.
The Epic React Flyknit did not have a lot of grip on indoor surfaces, said a runner.
The heel counter was too rigid, especially during the first few wears, a wearer mentioned.
Bottom line
The Nike Epic React Flyknit seemed to be a successful release, but not quite. Although many runners praised the shoe’s comfort level, durability, and weight, there were some who were dissatisfied with the fit and support. In terms of performance, the shoe received both raves and rants. Thus, it could be said that the Epic React Flyknit is an average running shoe; not perfect, but worth a try and worth the investment."
Adidas Galaxy 4, Adidas,89.0,,1985.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Those who have tested the Adidas Galaxy 4 claimed that the upper unit breathed properly and kept their feet dry.
Most consumers lauded the material used for the midsole unit, stating that it was bouncy enough to enable lively steps.
‘Comfortable’ was a word that was frequently used to describe the underfoot experience of this Adidas running shoe.
The width profile worked well for consumers who have low-to-medium foot volumes.
Pricewise, the Galaxy 4 was considered to be very affordable.
Several people appreciated the lightweight configuration of this shoe, noting that they were able to wear it for an entire day.
2 reasons not to buy
Some consumers complained that the forefoot overlay quickly separated from the silhouette after merely a few uses.
The mesh that was used for the upper unit was loose and flimsy, several testers observed.
Bottom line
The cheap yet effective Adidas Galaxy 4 was well-liked by those who have tested it. People felt that the cushioning and the lightweight structure helped their performances and the quality of their runs. The breathability was also highlighted as a contributor to a cool and dry running session. However, there was quite a bevy of complaints about the construction of the upper, which apparently wasn’t robust or long-lasting.
The Adidas Galaxy 4 is a road running shoe that’s made for those who have neutral pronation."
Brooks Caldera 4,,90.0,91.0,8.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Some consumers have mentioned that the shoelaces of the Brooks Caldera 4are able to stay tied, even during intense activities.
This trail running shoe offers steady foot-to-surface control on the irregular terrains, based on a handful of reviews.
According to several testers, the upper unit has breathability that is noticeable and accommodating.
The stack height of the underfoot platform is welcomed because it is not too thick nor detrimental to the balance of the foot.
Traction is an aspect of this Brooks running shoe that people appreciate and trust.
2 reasons not to buy
A few testers have noted that the lateral side of the forefoot rubs the side of the toes.
Some people have stated that the toe box could benefit from an anti-abrasion bumper that is more substantial than the overlay that is present.
Bottom line
The Brooks Caldera 4 is a running shoe that is welcomed by those who have tested it. The design and construction of this product are appreciated because they apparently build on the aspects of the previous versions, particularly the Caldera 3 model. The foot-to-platform balance and in-shoe security are highlighted. Inversely, the irritating in-shoe sleeve and the limited toe protection are criticized.
Fans of off-road performance shoes can enjoy the Brooks Caldera 4.
 "
New Balance Minimus 10 v1,,87.0,82.0,1247.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 7.5oz , Women: 6.4oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"10 reasons to buy
Some reviewers loved its lightweight structure.
Many wearers mentioned that the New Balance Minimus 10 v1 was one of the most supportive shoes they have ever worn.
Some of the purchasers agreed that the shoe has a durable outsole.
A good number of wearers commented that the cushioning was great.
The New Balance Minimus 10 v1 was comfortable, according to many runners.
Several testers loved its flexibility.
Many consumers noted that the shoe was breathable.
The majority of the buyers noted that the shoe provided enough stability.
Based on some reviews, the New Balance Minimus 10 v1 was stylish.
A handful of testers said that the shoe was great for walking, mountain biking, kayaking, hiking, running and casual occasions.
5 reasons not to buy
Some users commented that the shoe is not recommended for high-impact movements.
Based on observations, the New Balance Minimus 10 v1 runs small.
According to runners who have tried it, the upper mesh ripped easily after several uses only.
The shoe has a narrow toe box, noted by some of the users.
A lot of runners wished to have other color options available.
Bottom line
With the fantastic stability, support and fit that the The New Balance Minimus 10 v1 provides, a lot of users were made satisfied and happy. Aside from its well-constructed structure, the shoe also offers the right amount of comfort, style, and traction when used in various trails. While others have issues with the toe box and size, others still lauded the shoe because of its versatility and performance. Overall, the New Balance Minimus 10 v1 is an excellent choice for those who are looking for a breathable, comfortable and durable running shoe."
New Balance Fresh Foam Cruz v2 Nubuck,,81.0,,572.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Most users liked that the New Balance Fresh Foam Cruz v2 Nubuck is very lightweight when worn.
A few consumers mentioned that the shoe has a good spring in every step.
Several people commented on the efficiency of the outsole when it comes to grip.
A few of the reviewers much like the breathability of the shoe's knit upper material.
The Fresh Foam Cruz v2 Nubuck’s design and range of color choices gained positive feedbacks from a lot of buyers.
2 reasons not to buy
Some users find the shoe’s toe-box runs too narrow for their foot width.
According to several wearers, they wanted to feel more arch support on the New Balance Fresh Foam Cruz v2 Nubuck.
Bottom line
The New Balance Fresh Foam Cruz v2 Nubuck is a running shoe that merges both components of style and comfort.  This shoe is made for neutral runners and is often chosen as so for providing a plush and springy ride in every step.  The shoe’s Fresh Foam cushioning technology which can also be found in New Balance Fresh Foam 1080 v9, offers a flexible run but with less impact which makes the ride more enjoyable.  The lightweight knitted upper and its cleat-like design were also noticed a lot by users as these features maximize comfort and functionality.  A few purchasers have reviewed the shoe as being too narrow, yet this does not overshadow the excellent construction of the New Balance Fresh Foam Cruz v2 Nubuck.  In general, the Fresh Foam Cruz v2 Nubuck is a functional, lifestyle running shoe that offers steady support which is great for daily urban runs or even for everyday wear."
Topo Athletic MTN Racer,,87.0,88.0,16.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.3oz , Women: 7.7oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The Topo Athletic MTN Racer is significantly lighter than other running shoes from the brand, according to some reviewers.
The outsole has been praised by many wearers because of its incredible traction on wet rocks and mud surfaces. 
Some users find the MTN Racer to promote a fast speed during runs. Additionally, other runners noticed a snappy ride even on sloped mountain trails.
The shoe is lightweight but still well-cushioned, several buyers mentioned.
The upper is effective in keeping dirt out, as stated by several runners. Also, the upper is praised for its quick-drying capability.
Many wearers agree that the firm cushioning of the midsole justifies the lack of a rock plate.
The shoe has less bulk compared to other trail running shoes, which makes for an easy break-in period, as reported by various runners.
3 reasons not to buy
Some users have felt the upper material to shrink when drenched with water.
The shoelaces get untied easily, according to a few wearers.
A number of reviewers claim that the firm midsole of the MTN Racer provides low-level protection from sharp rocks and other rough elements of the trail.
Bottom line
The MTN Racer from Topo Athletic proves itself to be a worthy purchase, with a name that is fitting for how it performs. The shoe effectively delivers outstanding ride on the trail with the help of its features that reflect comfort and functionality. In contrast, some buyers criticize a few of the shoe’s structural elements that contribute to their bothersome running experience. Overall, the Topo Athletic MTN Racer is not perfect, but considerably good, and definitely a fantastic companion for the trails."
New Balance 1500 v6,,90.0,90.0,9.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 8.6oz , Women: 6.5oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Many purchasers noted that the New Balance 1500 v6 is comfortable. 
The shoe fits true to size, based on some reviews. 
A couple of buyers said the shoe is lightweight.
Some users mentioned that it offers a better fit than its predecessor. 
A wearer is pleased with the stability provided by the shoe. 
Several consumers commented that it is also good for casual walks. 
People liked the stylish design of the shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
A tester reported that the shoe’s outsole is not supportive enough.
It is comfortable but not good for racing, said a runner.
Bottom line
New Balance 1500 v6 is a road racing flat designed to help the runners achieve their optimal performance goals. The shoe features a race day-inspired designed and advanced technologies that provide quicker rebound and support for long-distance running."
Reebok Floatride Run Panthea,,90.0,89.0,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 7.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
People are commenting that the Reebok Floatride Run Panthea offers a lightweight ride that accommodates all-day wear.
The aesthetics of this product are considered suitable for performance and casual use.
The cushioning system of this Reebok running shoe is appreciated by consumers because it is able to responsibly attenuate impact shock.
Some users believe that the roomy in-shoe experience can accommodate custom inserts that can help with the attainment of extra comfort.
Breathability is an aspect that runners have noticed from the Reebok Floatride Run Panthea’s upper unit.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people have noted that the midfoot portion of the inner sleeve has a tendency to irritate the skin.
The forefoot section is a bit restrictive, based on a couple of reviews.
Bottom line
The Reebok Floatride Run Panthea aims to provide runners with an in-shoe experience that enables the natural progression of the gait. The lightweight upper unit considers itself as a form-welcoming accoutrement that also delivers breathability. Below is a midsole unit that offers a blend of underfoot steadiness, impact protection, and energized liftoffs. Fans of road running shoes that are for neutral foot pronation can enjoy the Floatride Run Panthea."
New Balance Fresh Foam Roav Tee Shirt,,83.0,,9.0,,, Road,, Men: 10oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The underfoot cushioning system of the New Balance Fresh Foam Roav Tee Shirt is considered responsive and springy.
Impact protection is a midsole trait that people have come to appreciate in this road running shoe.
People have mentioned that the weight of this product is suitably light for all-day use.
The traction given by the external pad is said to be precise and reliable.
A handful of purchasers are happy with the general durability of the materials.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners have mentioned that the opening of the upper unit is a bit too small for a smooth wearing experience.
Several consumers are claiming that the collar isn’t effective when it comes to locking the heel inside the foot-chamber.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of people towards the Fresh Foam Roav Tee Shirt has been mostly positive. This New Balance running shoe is welcomed because of its responsive midsole technology, the confidence-giving outsole , and the overall sturdy construction. Inversely, the frugal opening of the upper and the not-so-secure collar are criticized.
Fans of performance shoes that can handle the roads can enjoy the New Balance Fresh Foam Roav Tee Shirt."
Skechers Max Cushioning Elite,,92.0,,275.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 11.5oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Most consumers believe that the cushioning system of the Skechers Max Cushioning Elite is highly supportive.
Several consumers have noted that the underfoot platform is able to alleviate tendonitis.
Some users believe that this running shoe is versatile enough to handle activities like gym exercises and walking.
Breathability is an aspect of this product that is considered highly noticeable.
The padded heel section locks the foot in place responsibly, based on a handful of reviews.
2 reasons not to buy
A few users are claiming that the cushioning unit is quick to sag, even after only a few uses.
The outsole tread wears off quickly, according to some consumers; the result is apparently a diminished traction capacity.
Bottom line
The overall reaction towards the Max Cushioning Elite has been positive. People are generally happy with this Skechers running shoe because it is apparently versatile and its cushioning system is highly lucrative. On the other hand, the durability of the midsole and outsole is criticized.
Fans of neutral running shoes with max cushioning capacities can enjoy the Skechers Max Cushioning Elite and what it has to offer."
Altra Escalante,,95.0,90.0,637.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.2oz , Women: 6.4oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,, Altra Escalante 2.0,"9 reasons to buy
Almost every customer welcomed the optimum cushioning given by the Altra Escalante.
The runners liked how soft the shoe’s upper felt against their skin.
Many users were impressed with the deliberate build of the shoe, as well as its durability.
 A few runners commented on the straightforward construction of the upper unit; it apparently offered excellent comfort at a low weight-profile.
Some admired the wide toe-box since it prevented uncomfortable rubbing of the forefoot against the shoe.
For most users, the shoe fits true to size.
One of the runners commented how well the outsole performed on the asphalt.
A few users described their experience with this running shoe as being ‘springy in the most amazing way’.
The Escalante managed to convert a good number of devotees of other brands to Altra.
4 reasons not to buy
A runner mentioned how the pair started to cause blisters after 200 miles.
Several consumers reported that the toe-box height was very low and that the tops of their toes rubbed against the upper fabric.
One purchaser complained that he felt ‘major knee and ankle pains’ after running in the Escalante.
A number of people felt that the sizing was bigger than what they were used to.
Bottom line
A good number of consumers were happy with the Altra Escalante. Many of them praised the cushioning system, its apparently soft upper unit and its general durability. But there were those who complained about the inconsistent sizing scheme, as well as the discomfort that they felt from using this shoe. Overall, the response for this running shoe was mixed-to-positive."
Brooks Levitate 3 LE,,82.0,,6.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.6oz , Women: 11.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Most testers believe that the Brooks Levitate 3 LE offers noticeable breathability for all-day running.
The underfoot experience is considered highly responsive and supportive, particularly during extended runs.
Some consumers have noted that the shoe's materials are durable.
The aesthetics of this neutral running shoe are welcomed by those who desire functionality and stylishness in one package.
‘Comfortable’ is a word that people have used to describe each step taken with this product support the foot.
2 reasons not to buy
For some testers, the collar is not able to secure the foot properly; they experienced some in-shoe slippage.
The stretchy collar rubs against the skin of the ankles and heel uncomfortably, according to several consumers.
Bottom line
The limited-edition iteration of the Brooks Levitate brings style and performance together as it provides top-notch energy return in a sleek-looking unit. This running shoe makes use of Brooks' tried and tested technologies for maximum comfort and protection throughout the run. Additionally, the shoe's design contributes to an efficient and energized running performance.
Fans of road running shoes that are stylish yet performance ready are the ones who are likely to have fun with the Levitate 3 LE."
Vivobarefoot Primus Trail FG, Vivobarefoot,79.0,85.0,37.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 7oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Most users mentioned in their reviews that the Vivobarefoot Primus Trail FG was highly comfortable.
Several customers said that this footwear had a good quality.
A few users said that the shoe’s drainage properties were excellent; they wore it confidently, even in the most challenging conditions.
Some runners pointed out that the footwear had an efficient lacing system.
A purchaser liked the overall look and design of the shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
A few runners had issues with the sizing of the Vivobarefoot Primus Trail FG.
An individual mentioned that there wasn’t enough flexibility to allow for smooth transitioning from heel to toe.
Bottom line
The Vivibarefoot Primus Trail, a minimalist shoe, has gained a competitive edge in the market owing to its high comfortability, better adaptive properties, and stylish looks. The shoe also offers a very efficient drainage system. Though the shoe has a few minor issues, overall, the shoe is still recommended to neutral runners."
Newton Motion 8,,84.0,,17.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 3mm , Women: 3mm,,, Newton Motion 9,"6 reasons to buy
People who have tried the Newton Motion 8 stated that it was suitably lightweight.
Some testers claimed that their running outputs were energized adequately because of the responsible construction of this running shoe.
The stability mechanisms in the midsole were praised; consumers felt that irregular pronation was averted corrected.
The tongue unit was appreciated by a few runners for being able to cushion the bridge of the foot.
Some consumers felt the upper adequately welcoming air into the foot-chamber, thus ensuring a breezy in-shoe experience.
Runners liked the color schemes of the Newton Motion 8, stating that the hues were eye-catching.
2 reasons not to buy
Several users say the Motion 8 could do better with more arch support.
The shoes are a little on the expensive side for a road running shoe, said some users.
Bottom line
The Newton Motion 8 was well-received. The runners were happy with this stability running shoe’s capacity to keep their feet comfortable and secure. The anti-pronation mechanisms were also praised because they were able to neutralize irregular running gaits. On the other hand, several people felt that the sizing scheme didn’t accommodate their choices and that they had to size down to achieve a pleasant fit.
The Newton Motion 8 is an addition to the global family of stability running shoes. It is meant for overpronators and those who desire a stable yet flexible ride."
Vibram FiveFingers KSO EVO,,88.0,85.0,2616.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 4.1oz , Women: 3.5oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The shoe is very light and offers great ground feel based on some reviews.
The upper of the KSO EVO is very breathable and flexible, as noted in some runners’ reviews.
It features the XS TREK technology that provides traction, stability, comfort and durability.
It has a quick lacing system.
The shoe is available in an affordable price.
3 reasons not to buy
Based on some reviews, the sole is too thin and not durable.
Some were complaining that the toes were too tight.
Fabric wears off quickly, said some runners.
Bottom line
The Vibram FiveFingers KSO EVO offers a combination of impressive ground feel and protection. It gives runners an enhanced running experience with impressive grip and flexibility. This minimalist shoe is best for runners who are looking for an affordable and lightweight road running partner."
Salomon Speedcross 3,,94.0,87.0,4248.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 11mm , Women: 11mm,,, Salomon Speedcross 5,"9 reasons to buy
Many runners loved the look and design of the 3rd version of the Salomon Speedcross.
The upper unit felt snug, but it didn’t strangle the foot; according the several testers, the fit was adequate.
It didn’t look bulky or overwhelming, which satisfied numerous trail runners.
The quick lacing system received a lot of praise because it allowed runners to adjust the fit quickly and easily.
Some consumers noted that the upper fabrics were able to stave off moisture satisfactorily.
The trail-optimized tread of the outsole unit provided reasonable grip on a variety of surfaces, according to trail runners.
The durability of this running shoe was commended by those who wrote that it stayed intact even after many off-road adventures.
Many reviewers wrote that the underfoot cushioning system of this version was reliable.
This shoe felt lightweight to a lot of consumers.
3 reasons not to buy
Sections of the upper unit started to peel off, according to a tester; they wrote that it placed doubts when it comes to its overall durability.
The lacing system broke apart, reported a runner; they also added that putting on a new set of laces was difficult when it came to the Speedcross 3.
It felt narrow for a few runners.
Bottom line
The Salomon Speedcross 3 performed well, according to the comments of many runners. This trail shoe was able to take many testers on adventures and contests and they felt comfortable and secure while wearing it. They welcomed its trail-specific features because it allowed them to traverse different types of topography with ease. Contrarily, a few didn’t think that it was very durable and some felt that it was tight."
Asics Tartheredge,,77.0,,6.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.5oz , Women: 8.5oz,,,,,,"6 reasons to buy
A handful of consumers maintain that the underfoot platform of the Asics Tartheredge is comfortable enough for running and walking.
The cushioning unit of this running shoe offers a ride similar to standing on clouds, according to numerous wearers.
Some testers believe that this product has a lightweight construction that allows them to enjoy extended running sessions.
The durability of this Asics running shoe is appreciated by those who have tried it.
A few people have stated that the silhouette of this product is visually endearing, making it a solid choice for many kinds of activities.
The breathability of the upper is praised by runners.
2 reasons not to buy
The midfoot part of the Asics Tartheredge’s midsole is deemed a bit flat and unsupportive of the arch, some users claim.
The durability of the shoe is questionable to a few reviewers.
Bottom line
The overall feedback of people towards the Asics Tartheredge has been positive. This road running shoe is welcomed because of its breathable upper, the eye-catching design, the versatile construction, and the generally durable materials. On the other hand, the midsole has been criticized for not providing a supportive ride, while some were doubtful of the durability. It is a reliable option for neutral runners that need little to no midfoot support.
 "
,,,93.0,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 11.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,
,,,88.0,,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,, 361 Degrees Sensation 4,
La Sportiva Akasha,,92.0,84.0,265.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.6oz , Women: 9.8oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
As mentioned in some reviews, the outsole of the La Sportiva Akasha delivers reliable traction on rough surfaces.
The shoe is durable, according to a few user reviews.
Many were satisfied with how flexible the Akasha is.
According to a few buyers, the shoe is very comfortable.
The upper is breathable enough to keep the foot cool and dry.
2 reasons not to buy
The men’s version is a bit heavy.
The Akasha is an expensive shoe.
Bottom line
The La Sportiva Akasha is a trail running shoe that is equipped with the necessary technologies that help runners tackle the toughest terrain effortlessly. It delivers enough amount of cushioning, protection and durability for long distance trail running. Despite being expensive, several users would still recommend the shoe to runners of all levels."
Skechers GOrun 7,,74.0,81.0,9.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 6.5oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Skechers GOrun 7+,"5 reasons to buy
Several consumers are happy with the lightweight construction of the Skechers GOrun 7.
The slip-on construction of the upper unit is welcomed because it makes wearing this road running shoe a quick affair.
The slightly rockered structure of the underfoot platform is appreciated because it encourages natural motion and speedy heel-to-toe transitions.
Flexibility is a trait that runners have come to laud as an integral part of the performance given by the GOrun 7.
The traction given by the outsole unit of this performance product is adored by road runners, and they stated that they are able to move confidently because of it.
2 reasons not to buy
Some users don't recommend using this product for gym exercises like weightlifting as its platform doesn't apparently encourage lateral steadiness.
A few people believe that the midfoot and forefoot sections of the in-shoe chamber are a bit too restrictive.
Bottom line
Taking over the reins held by the GOrun 6 model, the GOrun 7 from Skechers aims to improve performance through heightened in-shoe security and an emphasis on attaining a smooth stride. A one-piece opening with pull tabs on the front and back fo the collar encourages quick and effortless donning and doffing. Also, focusing on a supportive yet lightweight and flexible ride contributes to an agreeable time on the roads."
Nike Air Zoom Winflo 6 Shield,,82.0,,6.0,,, Road, Neutral,,, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Several consumers believe that the Nike Air Zoom Winflo 6 Shield is a lightweight companion for extended running sessions.
The underfoot cushioning system is praised for being comfortable and reactive to movements.
The water-repellent upper unit is welcomed by those who like to stay protected from wetness.
Some have observed the outsole unit of this Nike running shoe offering precise and confident traction over the surfaces.
The price tag is considered wallet-friendly by several purchasers.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people have claimed that this product has an in-shoe feel that is a bit stuffy.
A couple of users have apparently experienced some slippage when traversing wet ground.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of people towards the Nike Air Zoom Winflo 6 Shield has been positive. The elements that contribute to the efficacy of this road running shoe are said to include the water-resistant upper, the lightweight build, and the reactive underfoot experience. Inversely, the not-so-breathable cover system and the inconsistent traction garnered ire.
Fans of neutral running shoes that have versatile configurations may enjoy the Zoom Winflo 6 Shield."
Brooks Caldera 4,,90.0,91.0,8.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Some consumers have mentioned that the shoelaces of the Brooks Caldera 4are able to stay tied, even during intense activities.
This trail running shoe offers steady foot-to-surface control on the irregular terrains, based on a handful of reviews.
According to several testers, the upper unit has breathability that is noticeable and accommodating.
The stack height of the underfoot platform is welcomed because it is not too thick nor detrimental to the balance of the foot.
Traction is an aspect of this Brooks running shoe that people appreciate and trust.
2 reasons not to buy
A few testers have noted that the lateral side of the forefoot rubs the side of the toes.
Some people have stated that the toe box could benefit from an anti-abrasion bumper that is more substantial than the overlay that is present.
Bottom line
The Brooks Caldera 4 is a running shoe that is welcomed by those who have tested it. The design and construction of this product are appreciated because they apparently build on the aspects of the previous versions, particularly the Caldera 3 model. The foot-to-platform balance and in-shoe security are highlighted. Inversely, the irritating in-shoe sleeve and the limited toe protection are criticized.
Fans of off-road performance shoes can enjoy the Brooks Caldera 4.
 "
Under Armour Charged Bandit 4, Under Armour,87.0,,165.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
People liked the aesthetics of the Under Armour Charged Bandit 4, stating that it was appealing to the eyes.
The width profiles were lauded for being able to meet the expectations of most consumers.
Many purchasers have considered the underfoot experience to be dutifully comfortable.
Most testers claimed that the weight of this running shoe was pleasantly light.
The cushioning system was appreciated for alleviating strained tendons and muscles during an all-day activity.
In-shoe wobbling wasn’t an issue because of the padded collar, a handful of runners stated.
3 reasons not to buy
Some purchasers claimed that the upper unit broke down quickly.
Several users think the toe box is tight.
Areas of the outsole have come apart after only a few uses, according to some wearers.
Bottom line
The Under Armour Charged Bandit 4 was mostly well-received by those who have tested it. Many neutral pronators were happy with its underfoot cushioning system, as well as its supportive upper unit. The lightweight build of this road companion was also given praise. On the other hand, the durability of the façade and the outsole were doubted. Overall, the Charged Bandit 4 remains to be a fantastic running shoe that fits the legacy of a dependable shoe series."
Asics Gel Kinsei OG, Asics,78.0,80.0,15.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,, Aug 2019,,,"6 reasons to buy
The majority of the users said that the running shoe has an impressive cushioning.
Some of the consumers noted that the shoe provides excellent support.
Based on some reviews, the shoe has a roomy toe box.
Many testers loved its fantastic fit.
According to those who have tried it, the running shoe is best used for workouts and walks.
Several purchasers appreciated the beautiful color combination of the Asics Gel Kinsei OG.
2 reasons not to buy
One of the users commented that the leather in the shoe makes it feel so stiff.
Some wearers felt the upper is less comfortable, especially when compared to previous versions of the series.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Kinsei OG is considered by most of the testers to be an agreeable pair of road running shoes. A lot of them were happy and contented with the way the shoe looks and performs. Aside from its style and performance, they love the fit and cushioning. Overall, the majority of the users agreed that the shoe exceeded their expectations. Although some buyers did not feel comfortable, others still left positive feedback with regards to the shoe's excellent construction, performance, and design."
New Balance Minimus 10 v1,,87.0,82.0,1247.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 7.5oz , Women: 6.4oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"10 reasons to buy
Some reviewers loved its lightweight structure.
Many wearers mentioned that the New Balance Minimus 10 v1 was one of the most supportive shoes they have ever worn.
Some of the purchasers agreed that the shoe has a durable outsole.
A good number of wearers commented that the cushioning was great.
The New Balance Minimus 10 v1 was comfortable, according to many runners.
Several testers loved its flexibility.
Many consumers noted that the shoe was breathable.
The majority of the buyers noted that the shoe provided enough stability.
Based on some reviews, the New Balance Minimus 10 v1 was stylish.
A handful of testers said that the shoe was great for walking, mountain biking, kayaking, hiking, running and casual occasions.
5 reasons not to buy
Some users commented that the shoe is not recommended for high-impact movements.
Based on observations, the New Balance Minimus 10 v1 runs small.
According to runners who have tried it, the upper mesh ripped easily after several uses only.
The shoe has a narrow toe box, noted by some of the users.
A lot of runners wished to have other color options available.
Bottom line
With the fantastic stability, support and fit that the The New Balance Minimus 10 v1 provides, a lot of users were made satisfied and happy. Aside from its well-constructed structure, the shoe also offers the right amount of comfort, style, and traction when used in various trails. While others have issues with the toe box and size, others still lauded the shoe because of its versatility and performance. Overall, the New Balance Minimus 10 v1 is an excellent choice for those who are looking for a breathable, comfortable and durable running shoe."
Nike Zoom Fly,,93.0,89.0,288.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 8.7oz , Women: 6.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Nike Zoom Fly 3,"10 reasons to buy
Many users commented that the Nike Zoom Fly offered fast and efficient performances on the road.
A lot of consumers liked the cushioning system of this running shoe, stating that it offered generous cushioning throughout their runs.
Most runners were very satisfied with the sock-like fit of the upper unit, emphasizing that the coverage was smooth and non-irritating.
The reviewers were happy about the lightweight nature of the components as they apparently improved the efficiency of their gaits.
A few users commended the high-quality construction of this shoe since it held up well against abrasion and other aberrations, even after many miles of running.
Several runners commented that the midsole was responsive yet plush and that the mixture of those elements led them to feel well-supported.
The aesthetics of this product were lauded for being street-ready and colorful.
A majority of consumers stated that they were comfortable wearing this running shoe during long races like a half-Marathon or a full Marathon.
A marathon-runner mentioned that after running in the Nike Zoom Fly, he felt no leg fatigue or any ache whatsoever.
The traction capacity of the outsole unit was welcomed by several testers who stated that it allowed them to swerve and halt with precision and grace.
4 reasons not to buy
A few testers returned their shoes back since they found the forefoot to be too roomy and loose.
Several people mentioned that little rocks had the tendency to get trapped in the outsole tread, causing some discomfort and unbalanced performance.
Another tester thought that the shoe was not durable enough; he reported that the sole unit started to wear off after only several miles of running.
Some individuals thought that the Nike Zoom Fly’s original price was a tad expensive.
Bottom line
With its fast and efficient performance, sleek and stylish looks, and plush yet responsive cushioning, the Nike Zoom Fly outperformed its many competitors in the market and certainly raised the bar for running shoes from across all brand. Also, its outstanding features apparently made it a worthwhile choice for most runners looking for a durable pair of neutral road running shoes to accompany them during their activities on the asphalt. On the other hand, the looseness of the forefoot section, the rock-magnet outsole, the easily erased rubber, and the high price were elements that didn’t gel with several consumers."
Salomon S-Lab XA Alpine 2,,98.0,98.0,29.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 13.2oz , Women: 13.2oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
 A significant number of wearers commented that the shoe was comfortable.
The majority of the runners said that the Salomon S-Lab XA Alpine 2 was breathable.
A good number of buyers agreed that it provided excellent traction on a variety of surfaces.
Some of the purchasers admired its secure lacing system.
According to those who have tried it, the shoe has a well-constructed upper.
Several buyers loved its flexibility.
Based on some reviews, the Salomon S-Lab XA Alpine 2 was best for running, walking and climbing activities.
The shoe is true to size.
A handful of consumers observed that sand and rocks do not enter the shoe easily during the running session.
1 reasons not to buy
Some of the users commented that the shoe was expensive.
Bottom line
A significant number of purchasers agreed that the Salomon S-Lab XA Alpine 2 was comfortable and breathable. They were satisfied with the shoe's structure and design. Although several of them have issues with its price, others still appreciate the shoe because of its well-constructed upper. Overall, a lot of the wearers are contented and happy because of the Salomon S-Lab XA Alpine 2's excellent design and construction."
New Balance Fresh Foam Roav Knit,,78.0,,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
According to various consumers, the New Balance Fresh Foam Roav Knit is very comfortable to wear. 
This running shoe provides great support, several users mentioned. 
A lot of wearers were impressed with the New Balance Fresh Foam Roav Knit's lightweight structure.
Some purchasers expressed that the shoe is not only perfect for running and workout sessions but also casual wear.  
Great shoe for people with a normal or wide foot, a tester commented. 
This affordable running gear is lightweight, stylish, and worth every dollar, as written by a commenter. 
The upper unit of Fresh Foam Roav Knit gained favor for being flexible and breathable. 
Many consumers commented that it has a good cushioning ability.
2 reasons not to buy
A buyer, who has a narrow foot, commented that the shoe is too wide for her because it is made with an inner cleat lining.  
The tongue folds up and presses into the top of the foot if you tighten the laces, said a few consumers. 
Bottom line
Many people appreciated the New Balance Fresh Foam Roav Knit. It was able to receive good reviews from runners who have tried it. They were happy with this running gear’s affordable price and stylish design. People also like the lightweight structure and cushioning system of this shoe, while some testers who have shared their disappointment toward the shoe’s construction. Overall, many still recommended the New Balance Fresh Foam Roav Knit because of its flexibility and breathability.
 "
Topo Athletic MTN Racer,,87.0,88.0,16.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.3oz , Women: 7.7oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The Topo Athletic MTN Racer is significantly lighter than other running shoes from the brand, according to some reviewers.
The outsole has been praised by many wearers because of its incredible traction on wet rocks and mud surfaces. 
Some users find the MTN Racer to promote a fast speed during runs. Additionally, other runners noticed a snappy ride even on sloped mountain trails.
The shoe is lightweight but still well-cushioned, several buyers mentioned.
The upper is effective in keeping dirt out, as stated by several runners. Also, the upper is praised for its quick-drying capability.
Many wearers agree that the firm cushioning of the midsole justifies the lack of a rock plate.
The shoe has less bulk compared to other trail running shoes, which makes for an easy break-in period, as reported by various runners.
3 reasons not to buy
Some users have felt the upper material to shrink when drenched with water.
The shoelaces get untied easily, according to a few wearers.
A number of reviewers claim that the firm midsole of the MTN Racer provides low-level protection from sharp rocks and other rough elements of the trail.
Bottom line
The MTN Racer from Topo Athletic proves itself to be a worthy purchase, with a name that is fitting for how it performs. The shoe effectively delivers outstanding ride on the trail with the help of its features that reflect comfort and functionality. In contrast, some buyers criticize a few of the shoe’s structural elements that contribute to their bothersome running experience. Overall, the Topo Athletic MTN Racer is not perfect, but considerably good, and definitely a fantastic companion for the trails."
Adidas Terrex Speed LD,,90.0,,221.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The people who have tested the Adidas Terrex Speed LD commented that the aesthetics were visually appealing.
Consumers noted that the grip capacity of the outsole was reliable.
Based on a handful of reviews, the price for a pair of these Adidas running shoes was affordable.
The width profiles for both the men and women’s versions were considered to be adherent to expectations.
Runners liked the durability of this product’s materials, stating that the parts made the whole as long-lasting as possible.
Purchasers noticed the lightweight construction of the Terrex Speed LD.
2 reasons not to buy
According to some testers, the forefoot section of the upper unit had hot spots that caused blistering.
A few runners complained that the midsole wasn’t very supportive of the arch, stating that the foam sagged over time.
Bottom line
The Adidas Terrex Speed LD was able to receive positive feedback from those who have tested it. Most of the positive reviews focused on the durability of the components, the wallet-friendly price, and the sufficient traction capability of the outsole. On the other hand, the negative responses tackled the forefoot section’s skin-rubbing construction and the apparently unsupportive midsole foam.
Consumers who like to take to the trails and those who have neutral pronation are the ones who are likely to benefit from the Terrex Speed LD."
New Balance Fresh Foam Roav Tee Shirt,,83.0,,9.0,,, Road,, Men: 10oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The underfoot cushioning system of the New Balance Fresh Foam Roav Tee Shirt is considered responsive and springy.
Impact protection is a midsole trait that people have come to appreciate in this road running shoe.
People have mentioned that the weight of this product is suitably light for all-day use.
The traction given by the external pad is said to be precise and reliable.
A handful of purchasers are happy with the general durability of the materials.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners have mentioned that the opening of the upper unit is a bit too small for a smooth wearing experience.
Several consumers are claiming that the collar isn’t effective when it comes to locking the heel inside the foot-chamber.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of people towards the Fresh Foam Roav Tee Shirt has been mostly positive. This New Balance running shoe is welcomed because of its responsive midsole technology, the confidence-giving outsole , and the overall sturdy construction. Inversely, the frugal opening of the upper and the not-so-secure collar are criticized.
Fans of performance shoes that can handle the roads can enjoy the New Balance Fresh Foam Roav Tee Shirt."
New Balance FuelCore Coast v4, New Balance,82.0,70.0,1670.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.2oz , Women: 6.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,," Narrow, Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Normal, Wide",,"5 reasons to buy
Runners liked the lightweight build of the New Balance FuelCore Coast v4.
The width profiles of this model were lauded for being adherent to expectations.
The price was considered to be affordable.
People generally liked the aesthetics of this road companion.
The underfoot cushioning was considered to be responsive and comfortable.
2 reasons not to buy
The laces of this running shoe apparently ripped through the fabric after only a few weeks of use, some people claimed.
According to a consumer, the upper was too stretchy to keep the foot in place and prevent in-shoe wobbling.
Bottom line
Most testers were happy with the performance of the New Balance FuelCore Coast v4. For them, this road shoe was able to provide appealing aesthetics in a functional package. The lightness of the materials, the correctness of the fit, and the responsiveness of the midsole were highlighted. On the other hand, some runners didn’t like the upper unit because it was either too stretchy or was easy to rip."
Zoot Ultra TT 7.0,,88.0,,110.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.5oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Many runners applauded the durable construction of the Zoot Ultra TT 7.0.
It features BareFit internal liner technology for a sock-like fit.
The Ultra TT 7.0 features a top loaded Z-Bound technology that provides a responsive feel.
Some were impressed by the shoe’s quick lacing system for easy-on and off.
It has a TriDry system that keeps the feet dry all the time.
This shoe has a light weight construction perfect for racing.
3 reasons not to buy
Some comments mentioned that the lace needs improvement.
A moderately priced shoe.
Limited color options.
Bottom line
Runners who are looking a racing partner can’t go wrong with the Zoot Ultra TT 7.0. It features a lightweight and comfortable construction. The technologies used provide responsive and fast ride. This shoe is made for road running and long-distant races."
Altra Timp 2,,84.0,89.0,8.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 8.7oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Several people have mentioned that the heel lockdown of the Altra Timp 2's upper unit is reliable.
Some testers have called this iteration a suitably lightweight running shoe that can be used daily.
The traction capacity of this product's outsole unit is said to be superb and reliable.
The toe box is dutifully spacious, according to a handful of runners.
Users have lauded the general durability of the materials.
2 reasons not to buy
Some people have mentioned that the ceiling of the forefoot section of the Timp 2 is restricting the outline of the instep.
The inner sleeve is scratching the skin of the foot, according to more than a handful of consumers.
Bottom line
The Altra Timp 2 is a sleek update to an up-and-coming trail-optimized series, and it aims to be a solid choice for those who desire efficacy on the trails. The outsole traction and general durability have been highlighted as elements that allow confident steps through unpredictable topographies. Caution is advised to those who have high-volume feet as the in-shoe experience can apparently be a bit restrictive."
Adidas Edge XT,,85.0,,6.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The modern and sneaker-like design of the Adidas Edge XT is lauded by those who appreciate trendy performance shoe-designs.
The cushioning system is deemed comfortable and responsive.
The grip of the outsole unit is welcomed by those who desire precise surface control.
Breathability is an aspect that people are apparently getting from the upper unit of this Adidas running shoe.
Several testers are happy with the non-irritating inner sleeve of the upper unit.
2 reasons not to buy
A few consumers have claimed that this shoe requires a break-in period of a few uses before the materials can fully acclimatize to the foot.
Some testers believe that the toe box has a tendency to bunch the toes together uncomfortably.
Bottom line
The Adidas Edge XT strives to become a versatile option for those who like to take to the roads. The casual shoe-construction of the facade mimics the enduring stylishness of modern sneakers while the one-piece opening employs extra seamless support that the runner can enjoy. Cushioning and steadiness are the focus of the foam-and-TPU-bar combo of the midsole unit."
New Balance 860 v8,,94.0,86.0,461.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.5oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, New Balance 860 v10,"6 reasons to buy
The color schemes available for the New Balance 860 v8 were lauded for being trendy and agreeable to the eyes.
Most consumers noted that the available widths accommodated their preferences.
Several users stated that the stability mechanisms worked well when it came to delivering a stable ride for overpronators.
A few people welcomed the toe box, as it was wide enough to accept natural toe-splay.
Some heavyset testers noted that the underfoot cushioning system was steady and comfortable enough to alleviate knee issues.
It’s true to size, according to a lot of runners.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners observed that this running shoe looked big and felt heftier than the previous iteration.
A few purchasers reported that the underfoot platform was awkwardly stiff.
Bottom line
The New Balance 860 v8 received overwhelmingly positive response from runners. They welcomed its appealing design, its comfortable construction, and its stable underfoot experience. Even stout individuals found the experience very agreeable because they remained steady and well-supported on the ground. This road shoe was lauded because of its efficacy. A few complaints arose, but they weren’t very detrimental to the image of this excellent update."
Salomon Sonic RA 2,,85.0,92.0,20.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Most users liked that the Salomon Sonic RA 2 is lightweight and comfortable on multiple surfaces like road, urban park trails, and treadmill.
Often mentioned by most runners was how well the Sonic RA 2 performed well in varying distances.
Also applauded by several users was the excellent ankle support provided by the shoe.
Some wearers appreciate that the Sonic RA 2 did not require any “breaking in” as they were just able to wear it without any issues straight from the box.
The shoe’s good cushioning which puts less stress on the knees also impressed most of its users.
2 reasons not to buy
Noted by few users was that the tongue sometimes slips down and bunches up at the end near the toes while they were running causing some disturbance to the feet
One reviewer of the Sonic RA 2 mentioned that the neoprene along the top edge of the shoe tends to be tight which makes it prone to irritation caused by rubbing.
Bottom line
This 2nd version of the Salomon Sonic RA was liked by most of its wearers as it is known to deliver a right combination of comfort and performance. The shoe’s well balanced cushioning and responsiveness guarantees runners a stable ride that will keep them going mile after mile. Despite the few negatory comments from users about the shoe’s tongue and not so fine-tuned lining at the heel, the Sonic RA 2 still holds its own when it comes to running performance and comfort, making it a suitable shoe for everyday running and fitness training."
Saucony Freedom ISO,,89.0,87.0,382.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Saucony Freedom ISO 2,"11 reasons to buy
The Saucony Freedom ISO is super comfortable, according to many of the reviewers.
The new ISOfit upper wraps the foot in a sock-like fit with enough support.
The new Everun midsole delivers a responsive and smooth ride.
More than a few runners loved the aesthetic appeal of the Freedom ISO.
It is quite light, based on the comments of a handful of runners.
Some runners loved the close to the ground feel without compromising protection against the elements.
A handful has used it for a variety of distance runs and tempo sessions.
Several runners expressed how nicely cushioned the Freedom ISO is.
Some runners felt the need to go fast in this shoe.
A good number of users got compliments while wearing the shoe.
The durability is fantastic, particularly the new outsole.
4 reasons not to buy
The price tag is quite steep.
A handful felt that making turns or quick movements was not precise due to the lack of upper support.
More than a few runners noted that it runs a bit small.
A few users noticed that it is a little narrow.
Bottom line
Saucony ups the ante where their midsole cushioning is concerned by introducing a full-length Everun foam in the Saucony Freedom ISO. By giving this shoe its latest in midsole technology, runners can get a more responsive and consistent cushioning in this shoe. Also, the new ISO upper offers a minimalist feel that should bring a more glove-like upper fit. At a rather wallet-thinning price, runners can get a reliable, light, fast, good-looking, and dynamic shoe with tons of comfort and decent arch support."
Under Armour HOVR Machina,,88.0,86.0,10.0,,, Road,, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 8.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The responsiveness of the Under Armour HOVR Machina’s midsole unit is welcomed by those who like energized steps.
‘Comfortable’ is a term that people have used to describe the underfoot experience.
Breathability is a trait of the upper unit that has been noticed by many consumers.
The Bluetooth chip that is part of the silhouette’s design is welcomed by those who like to track their progress when using this neutral running shoe.
According to most purchasers, the traction given by the external pad is reliable and confidence-giving.
The platform is able to support the arch nicely, based on a handful of reviews.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners have noted that the inner sleeve has caused some blistering on the skin of the foot.
A too-snug in-shoe wrap is observed by a few testers; it is apparently hard for the foot to relax in the interior compartment.
Bottom line
The overall feedback towards the Under Armour HOVR Machina has been positive. People are mostly happy because this product is efficient at doling out efficient performance. The underfoot platform is highlighted because it is apparently comfortable and versatile. Conversely, a tight and irritating wrap has been noted by some.
Fans of performance shoes that are efficient on the roads can have fun with the HOVR Machina."
Saucony Kinvara 9,,92.0,90.0,491.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.5oz , Women: 6.5oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Saucony Kinvara 11,"9 reasons to buy
A lot of wearers commented that the shoe was very responsive.
According to some testers, the Saucony Kinvara 9 was supportive.
The shoe has an affordable price, according to some purchasers.
Many reviewers noted that it fitted like a glove upon wearing the shoe.
Several wearers were impressed with the Saucony Kinvara 9's lightweight structure.
The majority of the testers said that the upper construction was flexible.
A handful of buyers reported that the shoe was breathable.
Some of the consumers loved its wide toe box.
The shoe was stylish, noted by many buyers.
2 reasons not to buy
One of the runners commented that the Saucony Kinvara 9 was uncomfortable. He felt a little tightness in the arch and midfoot area.
Several users noted that the shoe has limited color options.
Bottom line
The Saucony Kinvara 9 was lauded enough by a handful of buyers who have tried it. Many of them appreciated the feeling of comfort and lightness it provided after every running session. Aside from its fantastic structure, users gave recognition to the shoes’ cushioning system, breathability, and responsiveness. Although some wearers have experienced a little pain in the arch and midfoot area, others still recommended the shoe because of its versatility. Overall, the Saucony Kinvara 9 has made a lot of users happy and contented because of its reasonable price, great-looking design, excellent construction, and amazing performance on the roads."
Asics Noosa FF,,88.0,89.0,540.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.9oz , Women: 7.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Noosa FF 2,"9 reasons to buy
The cushioning maintained by FlyteFoam exceeded expectations of the customers; they were very happy with high comfort level provided by the shoe.
Most customers appreciated the light weight of the shoes; the shoes did not tire their feet even during long runs.
A few users described their experience of running in Noosa FF as ‘fast’. The shoe enabled them to cover longer than usual distances without getting the expected-level-of tired.
A few runners considered the shoe ideal for both the long-distance running and the short-distance sprints.
The users admired its breathable mesh upper; a customer mentioned how these shoes kept his feet cool even in the tropical heat.
Another runner mentioned that it functioned well as a casual shoe.
A user praised the softness and responsive lift given by the sole unit.
A runner thought that the shoes were easy were put on; this feature saved his time.
A customer liked the color schemes of the shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
A few customers thought the shoes were a bit expensive.
A customer found it difficult to trust the thin mesh cloth across the toe section; he described the material as flimsy and insubstantial.
A runner thought the toe box was a little narrow for his feet.
Bottom line
Asics Noosa FF is a light and comfortable neutral running shoe which, owing to its highly breathable mesh upper, ensures instant coolness in the long runs even during summers. While it may be a little costly for some customers, its overall package and durability make it a wise choice for most runners."
Saucony Guide 13 TR,,85.0,,7.0,,, Trail, Stability, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 9.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
People who have issues with the muscles and/or tendons of the underfoot are happy with the stability mechanisms of this trail partner.
The traction given by the outsole unit of the Saucony Guide 13 TR has been praised by outdoor running aficionados.
Breathability is a trait that has been appreciated by consumers.
The general durability of this Saucony running shoe is confirmed and appreciated by those who have tested it.
Based on a couple of reviews, comfort and wobble-prevention are afforded by the padding in the collar and tongue piece.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people believe that a break-in period is needed before this product could fully acclimate itself to the shape and motion of the foot.
A stiffness is felt by some runners; they claim that some flexibility could energize the run.
Bottom line
Trail runners can rejoice because the Saucony Guide 13 TR is there to lead them through the outdoor paths with ease and comfort. The trail-optimized outsole of this product can be suitable for overpronators who would like to tackle the relatively unsteady topography of the trails. It has a secure and durable construction to help with the perception of comfort and security."
, Puma,,,,$75,$35 (save 53%), Road, Neutral,,,,,," Normal | Normal, Wide",,
Asics Amplica,,81.0,,262.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 6.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Many people liked the lightweight construction of the Asics Amplica; they felt that they could run all day with this shoe.
The aesthetics of this running shoe were lauded by its testers, especially those who wanted style and functionality in one package.
The general durability of the components was considered by some testers to be dependable.
More than a handful of consumers welcomed the soft internal sleeve of this product, stating that they didn’t feel any hot spots or risk of blistering.
The price was met with praise. A lot of runners liked that the Amplica was affordable.
2 reasons not to buy
Most purchasers noted that the fit was narrow; this caveat became a trait that caused distaste.
The overlays easily separated from the upper, according to several disgruntled runners.
Bottom line
Those who have tried the Asics Amplica had some compliments reserved for its performance and build, but they also had their share of complaints. This road shoe’s lightweight nature and affordable price were positive aspects, but they were overshadowed by the fact that most users were unhappy with the fit. ‘Narrow’ was a word that was used to describe the in-shoe experience. Also, the durability of the components had fragmented feedback, with some people considering the product to be well-made and others lamenting an ugly overlay separation."
Asics EvoRide,,90.0,90.0,6.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 9.1oz , Women: 7.7oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Some runners are claiming that the EvoRide from Asics is a suitably lightweight option for their daily activities.
Heavyset shoe enthusiasts believe that the midsole unit is able to support the weights of their bodies.
Natural motion is a trait that people have come to appreciate from the platform's intentionally rockered construction.
The general durability of the materials is lauded by testers who welcome well-made performance shoes.
Several purchasers are saying that the Asics EvoRide has an upper unit that is breathable enough for all-day comfort.
2 reasons not to buy
A few consumers believe that the forefoot section of this product has a slightly restrictive construction.
A couple of people have reported some instability because of the rockered midsole shape.
Bottom line
The Asics EvoRide aims to smoothen the gait by having a rockered platform design that greatly affects the forefoot lift. Cushioning is still a highlight, though propulsion is also given attention. A breathable and uncluttered upper is part of the overall design, as is a traction-ready outsole. Care is advised to those who aren't used to a rockered midsole shape as it can become a source of unsteadiness."
Salomon XA Pro 3D V8,,89.0,87.0,7.0,,," Mud, Trail", Stability, Men: 12oz , Women: 10.6oz, Men: 11mm , Women: 11mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The Salomon XA Pro 3D V8 is supportive, based on reviews. 
Many purchasers have testified that it is comfortable to wear. 
A lot of runners confirm that the collar and tongue feature generous padding.
This shoe offers a strong grip on icy and muddy surfaces, said a few wearers.
People like that it is easy to put on and off. 
Several users said that it is perfect for trail running, hiking and other strenuous activities.
2 reasons not to buy
A few buyers have noted that the Salomon XA Pro 3D V8 is bulky and clunky. 
This shoe feels a little stiff, according to a couple of consumers.
Bottom line
The Salomon XA Pro 3D, now in its 8th iteration, is a trail running shoe that is suitable for neutral runners and mild pronators. It is a great option for runners and athletes seeking a durable, comfortable, and supportive running companion. This shoe offers reliable protection and traction that help the user stay in control on any trail."
Merrell Trail Glove 5 Leather,,85.0,,7.0,,, Trail, Neutral,,,,,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Durability: Numerous users say that the Merrell Trail Glove 5 Leather is hard-wearing.
Comfort: It offers a snug fit, according to multiple consumers. 
Versatility: Many runners testify that this shoe performs well on a variety of trails.
Toe box: The roomy forefoot gained favor from several wearers.
Style: The leather upper is also suitable for casual walks. 
2 reasons not to buy
Firmness: A few runners, who prefer plush comfort, mention that it doesn’t provide enough cushioning and underfoot protection.
Support: This running shoe is not supportive, according to a couple of testers.
Bottom line
The Merrell Trail Glove 5 Leather is a minimalist running shoe designed to make the runner faster and more sure-footed on any trail. It incorporates highly durable materials that aim to provide excellent protection and lasting comfort. This trail running shoe is recommended for neutral runners or those who do not overpronate."
Adidas Questar Trail,,89.0,,516.0,,, Trail, Neutral,,,,,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Several runners agreed that the Adidas Questar Trail delivered a great fit from the heel to the forefoot.
Many buyers were happy with the shoe’s stylish design and great color options.
A few users highlighted the shoe’s breathable foot coverage.
According to a few wearers, the Questar Trail is a comfortable running shoe to wear on running activities and gym sessions.
The shoe has an affordable price.
2 reasons not to buy
One disappointed buyer said the shoe has cheap stitching that causes discomfort while running.
The Questar Trail is nor durable; one runner said it starts ripping off after a month of use.
Bottom line
The Adidas Questar Trail is a running shoe designed for versatile trail runners. The shoe features a breathable upper and reliable outsole. The shoe has received several positive feedback but there are also some who expressed disappointments. Overall, the Questar Trail is not the best running shoe, but it is a good option for runners who are looking for cheap running shoes."
Salomon XA Elevate GTX,,84.0,,97.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The waterproof nature of the Salomon XA Elevate GTX’s upper unit was lauded by its purchasers.
Several testers noted that this running shoe felt lightweight, even though it was meant for the trails.
The underfoot platform remained steady when on uneven terrain, according to several consumers.
Based on a majority of reviewers, the outsole was able to grip the surfaces with ease.
Many people liked the color schemes of the Salomon XA Elevate GTX.
1 reasons not to buy
The forefoot section of the upper rubbed uncomfortably against the big toe, a tester complained.
Bottom line
The Salomon XA Elevate GTX received mostly positive reviews from its purchasers. For them, this trail companion was reliable and high-performing, with its traction-ready outsole and its waterproof cover system. There was a complaint about the interior of the shoe rubbing against the toe, but it’s an isolated incident."
Xero Shoes TerraFlex,,91.0,94.0,179.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.6oz , Women: 8.2oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Footgear experts were astonished by the TerraFlex’s superior surface traction.
This shoe racked truckloads of praises from numerous sources for being fantastically comfortable.
Professional reviewers were deeply impressed with the shoe’s spacious enough toe box.
Its extreme lightness left many owners in awe.
Several wearers swore by the short break-in period of this shoe.
The TerraFlex mesmerized footwear critics with its Xero-drop sole. Its non-elevated heel helped them pull off maneuvers with little-to-no constraints.
A couple of testers commended the footwear’s outstanding flexibility.
2 reasons not to buy
Some users thought the stitching of the shoe was done poorly because it looks cheap and comes undone easily.
Less than a handful of consumers found an issue with the shoe’s fat laces. One of them thought that they were too bulky to tie easily.
Bottom line
Xero Shoes designers should be applauded for successfully making the TerraFlex monumentally comfortable and light. They also deserve a pat on the back by giving the shoe a remarkably grippy outsole and a satisfyingly roomy forefoot space. However, they probably overlooked the gear’s overall sizing as people lambasted it for running small. Nevertheless, those who have the time and patience to get the TerraFlex in the right size are bound to experience the expansive outdoors with great freedom."
Reebok Floatride Run 2.0, Reebok,79.0,78.0,7.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,," Normal | Normal, Wide",,"6 reasons to buy
The upper unit of the Reebok Floatride Run 2.0 is considered suitably breathable for all-day wear.
A welcome change is said to come in the form of a protruding front collar that cushions the end part of the lower leg.
The lacing system’s broader coverage of the bridge of the foot is appreciated.
The gripping ability of the external pad is praised; the redesigned traction nodes apparently adhere well to the ground.
Comfort is perceived through the midsole unit’s foam technology.
The contemporary design of the silhouette is deemed versatile enough to be enjoyed in a variety of activities.
2 reasons not to buy
A few testers claim that the edges of the materials used for the collar design are irritating to the skin.
The fabric on the heel collar is said by users to easily tear apart.
Bottom line
The Reebok Floatride Run 2.0 is an update that is received well. The feedback echoes that of its predecessor, the original Floatride Run model, especially since they’re nearly similar in many ways. But the redesigned outsole and updated upper configuration are highlighted as effective elements that bolster the performance. On the other hand, the flimsy durability of the fabrics and the irritating collar are criticized.
Fans of neutral running shoes that blend performance and stylistic flair are the target market of the Reebok Floatride Run 2.0."
New Balance Fresh Foam 1080 v8,,91.0,85.0,3523.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, New Balance Fresh Foam 1080 v10,"6 reasons to buy
One customer remarked that the cushioning of the New Balance Fresh Foam 1080 v8 was the most comfortable they have ever worn.
Another stated that the shoe was reliable and durable enough for marathon running.
A runner said the mesh in the toe box expanded and adjusted well to their wide forefoot.
The midsole was firm and supportive, according to a wearer.
The wide forefoot enabled a steady ride and efficient transition, observed a runner.
Many customers were happy with the various width options of the Fresh Foam 1080 v8.
3 reasons not to buy
A reviewer mentioned that the Fresh Foam 1080 v8 was a heavy shoe.
Although supportive and comfortable, the midsole did not seem as responsive as it claimed, a couple of disappointed users said.
Some buyers thought the shoe was expensive.
Bottom line
Although there were many positive reviews, it is worth noting that the negative comments received by the New Balance Fresh Foam 1080 v8 were likewise significant. Users have praised the shoe’s comfortable cushioning and flexible fit. On the other hand, there were criticisms regarding the midsole technology, as well as the price and weight. In summary, this shoe was neither a hit nor a miss, and a compatible fit would be relative to the wearer."
Puma Carson 2 Nature Knit, Puma,90.0,,205.0,,, Road, Neutral,,, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Some testers noted that the upper unit of the Puma Carson 2 Nature Knit offered a comfortable wrap.
The lightweight nature of this running shoe was welcomed by its purchasers.
The underfoot cushioning unit gained the favor of most consumers because it offered a comfortable ride.
Most of those who have tried on the Carson 2 Nature Knit liked its design and color schemes.
Flexibility is a trait of this product that the consumers welcomed.
2 reasons not to buy
Several testers claimed that the width profile and sizing scheme of the Carson 2 Nature Knit were inconsistent.
The interior sleeve tore apart after only a few uses, a runner complained.
Bottom line
Most consumers were happy with the Puma Carson 2 Nature Knit. They liked this neutral shoe’s agreeable upper construction, its lightweight build, its flexible underfoot platform, and the appealing design. On the other hand, the measurements used for this neutral shoe were deemed by some to be unreliable."
Nike Odyssey React,,91.0,87.0,430.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.6oz , Women: 6.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"10 reasons to buy
Many runners appreciated the color schemes of the Nike Odyssey React.
The lightweight nature of this running shoe allowed consumers an unencumbered experience on the roads.
‘Comfortable’ was a word that was prominently used to describe this product.
Most testers liked the React midsole’s capacity to cushion the foot responsibly.
Several purchasers welcomed the energy-return that’s delivered by the midsole foam.
The neoprene tongue was well-liked by many because it didn’t cause any irritation to the skin.
The price was agreeable for a shoe that features relatively new technology, some people commented.
A handful of testers liked the traction capacity of the rubber bottom, stating that it was efficient.
The addition of more rubber in the critical sections of the outsole was famously praised by users and reviewers alike.
Several reviewers liked that this model functioned well as a performance companion and as a casual choice of apparel.
4 reasons not to buy
A consumer claimed that the Odyssey React’s upper unit crinkled easily, causing its material to look and feel cheap.
The narrow toe-box turned off those who had wide feet.
The outsole rubber wore off quickly when used on treadmills, a few testers observed.
Some people lamented the more prominent profile of this model, even directly comparing it to its sibling, the Epic React model.
Bottom line
Many people were positive about the arrival of the Nike Odyssey React. They welcomed this road shoe’s more budget-friendly price, the pretty design and the comfortable underfoot platform. Moreover, they were happy with the light build. On the other hand, some purchasers weren’t pleased with the cheap-looking upper while others lamented the tight toe box and flimsy outsole construction."
Saucony Clarion, Saucony,83.0,,37.0,,, Road, Stability,,, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
Many users admired the lightweight design of the Saucony Clarion.
A couple of users admired the elastic laces of the shoe that stay tied throughout the run.
According to most user reviews, the shoe runs true to size and width.
Several runners agreed that the Clarion is a very comfortable running shoe.
A few wearers admired the stylish look and appealing color of this stability shoe.
Some happy buyers lauded the tongue design of the shoe; since it is stitched on the sides, it stays in place while running. 
The Saucony Clarion is an affordable stability shoe.
1 reasons not to buy
A few disappointed users mentioned that the shoe lacks the necessary support.
Bottom line
The Clarion is the new addition to the Saucony stability shoe line. Impressively, it received positive comments from users because of its street-ready look, lightweight design, and comfort level. Though a few mentioned that it lacks stability and support, it is still considered by some as a wonderful running shoe. 
Designed for the road, the Clarion is a good option for those who are looking for a lightweight and affordable stability shoe."
Asics Gecko XT,,82.0,72.0,159.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The protective plate that’s placed between the midsole and outsole was esteemed by those who have tried the Asics Gecko XT.
Some people thought that the design of this model was smooth and clean.
Several consumers have considered the weight to be light and agreeable for long-running sessions.
The vibrant color schemes gained positive feedback.
The underfoot cushioning system was appreciated for being comfortable and responsive.
3 reasons not to buy
This running shoe didn’t shed water as well as other trail-specific options, some testers noted.
Several consumers observed that the toe box was uncomfortably narrow and that the instep was too low.
The external sole unit exuded an irritating squeaking noise when on smooth floors such as tiles, a couple of testers noted.
Bottom line
Many people were appreciative of the Asics Gecko XT and what it has to offer. They welcomed this neutral trail shoe’s clean construction, its relatively lightweight nature, and its appealing design. Most of the testers were also happy with the cushioning system. But some had their concerns, particularly the narrow fit and the water-retaining interior chamber."
Skechers GOrun Max Cushioning Premier,,76.0,,9.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.1oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Several testers claim that the Skechers GOrun Max Cushioning Premier is an accommodating choice for daily running sessions.
The max cushioning capacity of the midsole unit is lauded by those who welcome an underfoot experience that is generous.
The versatility of this running shoe is appreciated because people are able to wear it for activities other than running.
A handful of purchasers have expressed their joy because the forefoot section has a roomy construction that permits natural toe-splay.
Most reviews tackle the upper unit and its efficiently breathable textiles.
Those who have underfoot concerns such as cramps and tendinitis have felt the midsole delivering comfort throughout the activity.
3 reasons not to buy
A couple of runners believe that the Skechers GOrun Max Cushioning Premier needs a break-in period of a few uses before being fully comfortable.
The outsole wore out quickly, according to a pair of consumers.
A tester has lamented the apparently too-high arch structure of this road running shoe, stating that the midfoot feels uncomfortable because of it.
Bottom line
The overall feedback of people towards the GOrun Max Cushioning Premier has been positive. This Skechers running shoe is deemed highly welcoming of the natural performance of the foot. Comfort and injury alleviation are also traits that can be effortlessly observed when wearing this product. On the other hand, the need for a break-in period, the quick-to-wear-out external pad, and the too-high arch are criticized.
Fans of neutral running shoes that offer maximum underfoot support are the target market of the Skechers GOrun Max Cushioning Premier."
Altra Lone Peak 4.5,,82.0,81.0,7.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 8.7oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The upper unit of the Altra Lone Peak 4.5 feels like a glove around the foot, according to some runners.
Several purchasers have lauded the durable construction of this running shoe.
Some users consider the outsole unit a reliable source of traction, even on soft ground conditions.
The underfoot experience is welcomed by runners who desire responsive cushioning and a bit of stiffness that complements the hardness of the trails.
Toe-splay is a trait that the forefoot section is able to deliver, based on a handful of reviews.
A lightweight ride is appreciated by those who have tested this product.
3 reasons not to buy
More than a handful of consumers have reported that the in-shoe experience of this running shoe is a bit restrictive.
According to some testers, the heel collar has a tendency to rub against the skin fo the foot irritatingly.
The tongue unit is said to have a tendency to slide to the sides of the upper, causing irritation.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of people towards the Lone Peak 4.5 has been positive. People largely welcome this update because of its efficient traction capacity and responsible midsole configuration. However, some have noted that the in-shoe experience is a bit restrictive, thus making them miss the immediate predecessor.
Fans of shoes that are for the trails and for neutral pronation can enjoy the Lone Peak 4.5 from Altra."
Asics Gel Excite 6 SP,,88.0,,188.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.6oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Several runners find the Asics Gel Excite 6 SP to be supportive to their high arches.
The comfort level of the shoe is well-liked by many users. Some have said the shoe does not require a break-in period, while others claim the Gel Excite 6 SP is the most comfortable they have worn.
The colorways of the Gel Excite 6 SP is appreciated by many buyers. Others describe it as perfect for summer.
A lot of wearers agree that the shoe is true-to-size and that it fits precisely.
The shoe is lightweight yet still stable and supportive enough, according to some commenters.
One reviewer has reported that the Gel Excite 6 SP as having a wider toe box compared to other running shoes.
A number of users are pleased that their custom orthotics fit well in the shoe.
The Gel Excite 6 SP is durable enough, even when worn every day, according to a buyer.
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of runners have thought that the underfoot cushioning of the Gel Excite 6 SP feels too rigid and rough. Additionally, one wearer claims the shoe causes hot spots on the bottom of the foot.
One user complains that the shoe gave them blisters on the ankle because of poor structuring in the collar.
Bottom line
The good reviews outnumber the bad in the Asics Gel Excite 6 SP. The shoe has been praised by many for its comfort, style, support, and fit. It has also been considered a win in the durability aspect. However, it received low ratings as a few structural elements have caused bad running experiences. The Asics Gel Excite 6 SP is comfortable maybe not to everyone, but many still find the shoe to be adequately functional; overall, it remains to be an average running shoe suitable for daily use."
Nike Air Zoom Terra Kiger 6,,85.0,81.0,7.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
People are generally impressed with the Nike Air Zoom Terra Kiger 6’s lightweight structure. 
This version offers a snugger fit compared to its predecessors, based on reviews. 
A couple of wearers confirmed that this shoe is durable. 
Many buyers have testified that it offers a firm grip on dry surfaces.
The improved upper is breathable, according to a couple of users.
It is supportive, several commenters claimed.
The majority of the runners appreciated the shoe’s overall design.
3 reasons not to buy
Some testers reported that the grip of the Nike Terra Kiger 6 on wet surfaces is questionable.  
A few consumers said that not much was changed in this shoe from last year’s version.
Several purchasers noted that it does not give an extremely protective feel when running on super rocky and technical trails.
Bottom line
The Nike Zoom Terra Kiger 6 is a highly durable trail running shoe designed for walking or running on wet and rocky trails. This lightweight running shoe is crafted with up-to-date materials that aim to deliver a fast and comfortable ride even on uneven surfaces. It is a stylish shoe that is suitable for runners with neutral gaits or those who do not overpronate.
 "
Asics Gel Quantum 180,,84.0,,297.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.4oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Quantum 180 4,"6 reasons to buy
Uses Rearfoot Gel Cushioning in the heel for proven shock absorption and cushioning features.
The Quantum 180 has premium cushioning with very noticeable spring to it based on the reviews online.
6 color variations to suit the fashion styles of everyone.
Comfort comes second to none as agreed by a large number of users.
Several runners gave a favorable verdict to how the upper hugs the foot in comfort and support.
Moving through the gait cycle as effortless is a common observation for a couple of other users.
4 reasons not to buy
The Gel Quantum 180 is expensive.
Some feel that the shoe is heavy.
Traction becomes a little tricky when it gets wet, remarked a few testers.
The heel is a bit wide, which frustrated some runners.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Quantum 180 is a reliable neutral running shoe for the roads. Even if the shoe is expensive, it delivers superb cushioning, comfort, and support at the cost of extra grams. It offers nice arch support and is suited best for runners looking for a workhorse of a training partner."
Adidas Alphabounce,,88.0,84.0,1101.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 9.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Adidas Alphabounce+,"6 reasons to buy
A new mesh technology is used for the upper unit and it’s sure to be comfortable and flexible.
Runner generally welcomed the comfortable nature of the inner textile, which kept their feet free from irritation.
The appealing color schemes that are available for this model were lauded by the testers.
The BOUNCE™ is a mid-sole cushioning technology that is able to support the foot well and then launch it back up.
The multipurpose design of the Adidas AlphaBounce allows runners to wear it for many activities, even sports.
This shoe features a reasonable price, in light of its high quality construction.
1 reasons not to buy
A few runners noticed that it didn’t have much ankle support, which could lead to discomfort during longer runs.
Bottom line
The Adidas AlphaBounce is a solid choice when it comes to running and casual walking. It’s a neutral running shoe that could function well even when it comes to sports. It brings reliable cushioning that’s springy and flexible. Even the upper is flexible and soft, yet it is able to cover the foot securely."
Asics Gel Kayano 25 OBI,,75.0,,37.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.5oz , Women: 9.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 13mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The design of the Asics Gel Kayano 25 OBI was lauded by many consumers; they thought that it looked unique.
The straps on the upper were welcomed by purchasers who claimed that it helped in keeping the foot in place.
Some of those who have tried this running shoe liked the support given against overpronation.
The cushioning capacity of the midsole was well-received.
The outsole unit’s traction-ready design appealed to many runners.
4 reasons not to buy
The forefoot section was a bit tight, several testers noted.
The upper unit didn’t prove to be as breathable as the original Kayano 25 model’s fabrics, a couple of users stated.
Some shoe enthusiasts felt that the price for a pair was high.
There were complaints about the arch support being insubstantial.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Kayano 25 OBI was mostly embraced with open arms by those who have tested it. For many, this road shoe offered stylish looks in a functional frame. But the feedback for the stability mechanisms was split; while some people liked the pronation control, others lamented that it wasn’t too efficient. And while the upper looked visually endearing, it apparently didn’t breathe well."
Saucony Peregrine 10 ST,,90.0,90.0,7.0,,," Mud, Trail, Snow",, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 9.9oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The relatively lightweight construction of the Saucony Peregrine 10 ST has been lauded by most users.
The traction capacity of the outsole unit of this trail running shoe is appreciated by those who like to travel on the sloppy ground.
Some consumers have noted that the general sturdiness of the construction has allowed them to be more confident on the trails.
According to several runners, the water-resistant upper is effective at staving off mild splashes.
Underfoot support is a trait that has been welcomed by most testers.
2 reasons not to buy
The forefoot section is criticized by a few people for restricting natural toe-splay.
The water-resistant upper is a bit too stifling for some users.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of people towards the Peregrine 10 ST has been mostly positive. This Saucony running shoe is believed to be an efficient option for wet outdoor environments. The soft surfaces of muddy paths are apparently of no consequence for the optimized outsole while dampness is averted by the water-resistant upper.
Fans of performance footwear that can handle slippery geography can have fun with the Saucony Peregrine 10 ST."
Adidas Galaxy 4, Adidas,89.0,,1985.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Those who have tested the Adidas Galaxy 4 claimed that the upper unit breathed properly and kept their feet dry.
Most consumers lauded the material used for the midsole unit, stating that it was bouncy enough to enable lively steps.
‘Comfortable’ was a word that was frequently used to describe the underfoot experience of this Adidas running shoe.
The width profile worked well for consumers who have low-to-medium foot volumes.
Pricewise, the Galaxy 4 was considered to be very affordable.
Several people appreciated the lightweight configuration of this shoe, noting that they were able to wear it for an entire day.
2 reasons not to buy
Some consumers complained that the forefoot overlay quickly separated from the silhouette after merely a few uses.
The mesh that was used for the upper unit was loose and flimsy, several testers observed.
Bottom line
The cheap yet effective Adidas Galaxy 4 was well-liked by those who have tested it. People felt that the cushioning and the lightweight structure helped their performances and the quality of their runs. The breathability was also highlighted as a contributor to a cool and dry running session. However, there was quite a bevy of complaints about the construction of the upper, which apparently wasn’t robust or long-lasting.
The Adidas Galaxy 4 is a road running shoe that’s made for those who have neutral pronation."
Hoka One One Speedgoat 4 GTX,,88.0,91.0,8.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Rain and snow are apparently no match for the waterproof upper of the Hoka One One Speedgoat 4 GTX.
According to some purchasers, the silhouette retains breathability in light of the GORE-TEX® membrane that lines the fabrics.
Some consumers have claimed that the outsole unit is able to provide responsible traction over dry and wet ground.
The underfoot platform offers comfort and support throughout the running session, based on a handful of reviews.
Most testers agree that the materials of this running shoe are durable enough to accommodate many runs.
Several people with problems concerning their shins and the tendons of the underside of their feet are claiming that the midsole is able to alleviate discomfort.
Based on a handful of reviews, this product can manage recreational use like casual strolls through the urban landscape.
2 reasons not to buy
Several consumers believe that the in-shoe experience is a bit cramped; the toes don’t have enough space for natural splaying.
A couple of people have stated that the platform is a bit stiff for long-term comfort.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of people towards the Speedgoat 4 GTX has been welcoming. People are generally positive about what this shoe has to offer. The waterproof yet breathable upper has been lauded, as is the outsole unit’s traction capacity. However, a stiff and cramped experience has also been felt.
Fans of neutral running shoes that are meant for the off-road paths are the ones likely to have fun with this Hoka One One product.
 "
Reebok Trideca 200, Reebok,86.0,85.0,6.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,, Aug 2019, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
A couple of runners noted that the midsole unit of Reebok Trideca 200 is responsive enough to energize the foot. Some of them also expressed their desire to buy another pair of this running companion. 
Many consumers admired the eye-catching color schemes of this running shoe.
Several commenters were happy because of this shoe’s perfect fit. 
Numerous purchasers consider the Reebok Trideca 200 to be comfortable running shoe. 
The stylish design of this Reebok running shoe is perfect for short-distance races and casual walks. 
Some buyers appreciated the value of this running shoe considering the quality of the materials used and its features. 
The Reebok Trideca 200 is very supportive and worth the price, according to a satisfied user.
3 reasons not to buy
The shoelaces of Reebok Trideca 200 makes the foot look big, reported by a tester. 
One reviewer commented that the shoe doesn’t provide enough cushioning. 
A few of those who have tried this running shoe complained that the forefoot area felt a bit narrow. 
Bottom line
Many consumers have found themselves considering buying the Reebok Trideca 200 running shoe for a second time. Although there were a few disappointed users because of its narrow forefoot section and insufficient cushioning, others still recommended the shoe for its stylish design, responsiveness, and quality. People also lauded the Reebok Trideca 200’s midsole for being comfortable and supportive."
New Balance 1260 v7,,87.0,85.0,781.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.8oz , Women: 9.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, New Balance 1260 v4,"6 reasons to buy
The customers appreciated the ‘perfect amount of cushion’ in the New Balance 1260 v7.
Some wearers liked the snug fit of the shoe.
The reviewers mentioned that the shoe looked much better in person as compared to the photos.
The individuals admired how the foot would not slide inside the shoe while running.
The runners were happy with the lightweight, ‘glove-like’ fit of the shoe since it enabled them to do extra miles without getting tired.
A runner lauded the firmness provided by the shoe in the heel section resulting in a better landing experience.
3 reasons not to buy
A few runners found its toe-box to be a bit narrower compared to other New Balance shoes.
A customer thought that the color choices for this running shoe were a bit too bright and ‘childish’.
A purchaser thought that the New Balance 1260 v7 was a little ‘pricey’.
Bottom line
With its sleek design, stylish looks and sturdy build, the New Balance 1260 v7 is a stability running shoe that has managed to capture the interest of many professional individuals in the running community. The shoe performs exceedingly well on the rugged trails, challenging slopes and wet surfaces and maintains its original condition and good health for much longer durations of time.  "
Newton Fate,,94.0,84.0,155.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.4oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,, Newton Fate 6,"5 reasons to buy
Upper construction is breathable and keeps the foot dry, cool and comfortable.
The Fate features the 5-lug P.O.P 2 platform for a more responsive underfoot feel.
The Newton Fate uses the super high abrasion rubber compound outsole which is durable according to reviews.
Some were happy with the comfortable fit of this shoe.
Many liked the design of the Newton Fate.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners noticed that this shoe does not have the needed cushioning and support for long runs.
Some parts of the shoe wear out quickly as mentioned in some reviews.
The Fate is slightly expensive.
Bottom line
The Newton Fate is a neutral running shoe that offers a fantastic running experience. With the technologies featured, this shoe will not disappoint when used for daily training and short off-trail runs. The Fate gained positive and negative comments, but overall, the performance of the shoe is really impressive."
Mizuno WaveKnit C1, Mizuno,88.0,91.0,5.0,$180,$120 (save 33%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
The majority of the consumers noted that the Mizuno WaveKnit C1 is comfortable.
Some buyers love the shoe's awesome knit upper construction.
Some reviewers appreciated that the shoe hugs the foot well during the running session.
A purchaser admires the stability it provides throughout his activities.
According to those who have tried it, the shoe is well-cushioned.
As noted in the reviews, the WaveKnit C1 is best used for cross-training, walking, and running activities.
2 reasons not to buy
One of the users observed that the tongue unit is too high when compared to other shoes.
A tester commented that the shoe is too heavy for running activities.
Bottom line
In general, a significant number of consumers welcomed the Mizuno WaveKnit C1. They agreed that the shoe provides a more comfortable running experience. The materials utilized in crafting the shoe are designed to offer a more secure and stable fit. The majority of the users consider this attractive shoe as an excellent choice in completing different running and walking activities."
,,,87.0,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,
Salomon Sonic 3 Accelerate,,88.0,94.0,9.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.9oz , Women: 6.8oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The majority of the users agreed that the Salomon Sonic 3 Accelerate is fast and lightweight. 
Many consumers commented that the shoe is comfortable to wear. 
A couple of runners claimed that it offers excellent traction in all conditions. 
This running shoe is supportive, some wearers observed. 
It is breathable, according to a lot of reviewers. 
Several commenters appreciated the responsive midsole of the shoe. 
People admired the clean yet stylish design of this running partner.
3 reasons not to buy
A few buyers reported that the Salomon Sonic 3 Accelerate is a little constricting. 
Some testers noted that the top of the heel collar is made of flimsy thin fabric. 
A handful of purchasers said that the midsole is too firm.
Bottom line
Constructed with a lightweight structure, the Salomon Sonic 3 Accelerate is designed to provide a comfortable, responsive, and efficient ride. It is a neutral running shoe that is intended for running on various paved surfaces. This running companion is also suitable for walking, gym sessions, and casual walks."
Topo Athletic Hydroventure 2,,89.0,93.0,5.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 3mm , Women: 3mm,,,,"4 reasons to buy
Most wearers liked that the Athletic Hydroadventure 2 has a very functional waterproof upper.
Some runners appreciated the breathability feature of the shoe.
The Topo Athletic Hydroventure 2 offers good stability support which was liked by most users.
The shoe is durable.
2 reasons not to buy
Noted by a few users was that the Hydroadventure 2’s upper is somewhat stiff due to the waterproofing feature.
It is a bit expensive.
Bottom line
The Topo Athletic Hydroventure 2 is a good option for all types of seasons runs because of it also being a waterproof running shoe.  It offers excellent performance on varied terrains that one would wish to run.  It features a gaiter attachment which makes the Hydroventure 2 one of the best choices if wet conditions are expected.  Although a few feedback about its pricing and upper are negative, the Topo Athletic Hydroventure 2 is still a neutral running shoe that is preferred by trail runners because of its versatility and functionality on all types of terrains and weather."
On Cloudventure Waterproof,,84.0,80.0,122.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Many runners appreciated the waterproof mechanism of this running shoe, stating that their feet stayed cool and dry, even when traversing wet surfaces.
A tester happily commented that the toe box of the On Cloudventure Waterproof was spacious enough to accommodate natural toe-splaying.
A reviewer wrote that they were able to adapt quickly to the shoe, emphasizing that its performance was excellent.
The shoelaces received some recognition from some purchasers; they wrote that they were smooth and easy to adjust.
Several runners were happy that the sole unit was flexible and accommodating.
According to a consumer, the modest black color scheme of this model made it suitable even for non-running occasions.
‘Comfortable’ was a word that testers used as a means to describe their time with this running shoe.
It felt surprisingly lightweight, according to a purchaser.
1 reasons not to buy
A runner observed that the upper unit of the On Cloudventure Waterproof didn’t feel as breathable as advertised.
Bottom line
The On Cloudventure Waterproof was able to gain the good graces of those who have tried it. According to them, this trail shoe’s components were efficient and it didn’t hinder their performance in any way. One was even able to use it casually. It’s a solid running companion, based on consumer feedback."
Mizuno Wave Prophecy 7,,84.0,,551.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.9oz , Women: 10.5oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Mizuno Wave Prophecy 9,"7 reasons to buy
A lot of runners said that the Mizuno Wave Prophecy 7 was best for walking, running, and cross-training.
The shoe was comfortable, based on some reviews.
Many testers commented that it was supportive.
Some reviewers said that the shoe has no breaking in needed.
A handful of buyers were impressed with the shoe's great-looking design.
According to several wearers, the Mizuno Wave Prophecy 7 was lightweight.
The majority of the buyers agreed that the shoe quickly adapted to all their running needs.
4 reasons not to buy
The shoe was expensive, according to some purchasers.
Several testers observed that the grooves in the outsole quickly collected tiny rocks as they run.
The Mizuno Wave Prophecy 7 was a little bit narrow for some users.
One of the wearers said that the shoe ripped-off easily after several uses only.
Bottom line
In general, the Mizuno Wave Prophecy 7 has made a lot of users satisfied because of its performance and design. Aside from its excellent construction, the shoe also provides the right amount of support that is needed on different paved surfaces. Although some of them have problems with the shoe's price and size, others still recommend the Mizuno Wave Prophecy 7 because of its versatility. It is an excellent option for those who are looking for a comfortable and quality running shoe."
Nike Downshifter 7,,94.0,87.0,1895.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Nike Downshifter 10,"9 reasons to buy
A majority of the testers commented on how comfortable the underfoot experience of the Nike Downshifter 7 was during their runs.
The lightweight configuration of this running shoe gained fans who felt that it permitted them to effortlessly wear it all day.
The trademark Nike swoosh is much appreciated by many consumers because it apparently gave the shoe that classic Nike look.
The minimalist design allowed testers to use the shoe for activities other than running, like walking and circuit training.
People liked the variety of color schemes that were available for this running shoe, stating that the options were pleasing to the eyes.
Several users recognized the value of the shoe considering its build and features.
The price of the Nike Downshifter 7 was affordable, and people flocked to this shoe because of it.
Almost every consumer stated that the Nike Downshifter 7 had a sizing scheme that followed their preferences.
The width profile was welcomed for being snug yet unrestrictive.
3 reasons not to buy
A few of those who have tested the Nike Downshifter 7 expressed how narrow the shoe felt despite getting the shoe in their usual width.
A good number of reviews noted that this running shoe did not provide decent traction on wet surfaces.
Several users stated that the shoes are more for casual wear or light exercise, and not so much for running long distances or extreme training.
Bottom line
The Nike Downshifter 7 road running shoe was welcomed by a lot of shoe enthusiasts and novice runners. They were happy with this product’s affordable price and quality construction. The sizing scheme and width options were also given praise as they apparently adhered to people’s expectations. It accommodated the foot adequately and kept it comfortable, based on user feedback. On the other hand, some individuals felt that the in-shoe fit was narrow, that the wet-surface grip was dodgy, and that the overall construction wasn’t intended for hardcore workouts and runs."
Brooks Revel,,95.0,92.0,2111.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 11mm , Women: 11mm,,, Brooks Revel 3,"8 reasons to buy
Some users commented that the Brooks Revel’s cushioning was soft and bouncy.
A lot of users appreciated the minimalist design and agreeable feel of the shoe.
One user said that even though he has flat feet, he did not feel any pain when using this shoe.
Another tester appreciated the extra padding that she felt in the heel area.
A few runners said that the toe box had enough room for toe-splay.
The shoe felt lightweight, based on a couple of reviews.
Many users said that they were satisfied when they used the shoe for longer runs.
The majority of reviews were glad to mention the shoe fitting true to size.
5 reasons not to buy
One tester was disappointed to see that some parts of the shoe showed wear after only using it a few times.
Another tester said that the back of the shoe felt tighter than other Brooks shoe models.
Some runners did not recommend the shoe for speed training. One user, in particular, said that it lacked the forward propelling sensation he needed.
One user narrated that he saw an exposed bent wire on the left heel of the shoe only after two weeks of usage.
A tester said that the arch of the shoe did not feel like it was in the right place.
Bottom line
The Brooks Revel is a neutral running road shoe that blends performance and style seamlessly. It is ideal for light workouts, short hikes, and everyday use. On top of that, those interested in a pair will be able to sport the shoe as a lifestyle sneaker because of its modern and subdued design."
Brooks Glycerin 16,,93.0,91.0,1136.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Brooks Glycerin 18,"8 reasons to buy
A significant number of purchasers described the Brooks Glycerin 16 as a “very comfortable’ running shoe.
Many people noted that the shoe feels true to size.
A lot of testers welcomed the shoe’s new upper; they mentioned that it looks nice and stylish.
Several purchased loved the lightweight design of the Glycerin 16.
Those who have tried the shoe admired the upper unit’s breathable coverage.
The shoe needs no break-in period, said some happy runners.
Some users have taken note of the shoe’s sock-like fit and stretchy upper.
More than a handful of users mentioned that the cushioning of the shoe is great for long-distance running.
2 reasons not to buy
The Brooks Glycerin 16 is slightly expensive.
A few users found the cushioning to be too soft for their liking.
Bottom line
The 16th iteration of the Brooks Glycerin gained overwhelming positive feedback from its users, with special notes on its responsive cushioning, stylish design, and overall fit. Many attested to its impressive performance, but others found the price a bit pricey. Overall, the Brooks Glycerin 16 is indeed a fantastic road shoe for neutral runners."
New Balance Fresh Foam Roav City Grit, New Balance,83.0,,7.0,,, Road,, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 9.6oz,,,," Normal, Wide | Normal, Wide",,"5 reasons to buy
The underfoot cushioning unit of the New Balance Fresh Foam Roav City Grit is hailed as a comfortable piece of technology.
The color schemes of this neutral running shoe are welcomed by those who appreciate cool-looking apparel.
Breathability is a trait that people have come to consider as a highly agreeable aspect of this product.
The price of the Roav City Grit is lauded as affordable and reachable to the majority.
According to most users, surface traction is sufficiently provided by the outsole unit.
2 reasons not to buy
Some users have noted that the forefoot section restricts natural toe-splay.
The inner sleeve has a tendency to irritate the skin, based on a handful of reviews.
Bottom line
The Fresh Foam Roav City Grit has been well-received. Runners are mostly happy with this New Balance running shoe because it has a comfortable midsole, pleasing aesthetics, and a capacity to be versatile. On the other hand, the restrictive forefoot and irritating inner sleeve have become points of criticism.
Fans of products from New Balance can enjoy this offering that’s optimized for the roads."
On Cloud Beam,,83.0,91.0,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.7oz , Women: 7.1oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The upper unit is so lightweight that it feels like a glove, several testers have commented.
The durability of the On Cloud Beam’s components has received positive feedback from runners.
Some consumers say that the lightweight configuration of this On running shoe has allowed them to wear it for extended periods.
A couple of users praise the unique midsole unit, stating that the comfort and the responsiveness are traits that are common to it.
‘Versatile’ is a word that has been used to describe the Cloud Beam; people say that it functions well as a performance shoe and as a part of fashion apparel.
1 reasons not to buy
Some testers feel that the original price of the On Cloud Beam is a bit expensive.
Bottom line
The overall reaction towards the On Cloud Beam has been greatly positive. People love this running shoe, particularly its contemporary looks. The blend of functionality and style is received well. Moreover, the lightweight structure and responsive midsole have become highlights. On the other hand, some have noted that the slightly costly price tag left a lot to be desired.
Neutral runners and fans of road running are the target audience of the On Cloud Beam."
Asics Gel Cumulus 18,,84.0,81.0,3216.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 9.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Cumulus 22,"9 reasons to buy
A large number of reviewers valued the comfortable ride of the Gel Cumulus 18.
The price is around the average of well-cushioned, neutral trainers.
It has 5 color options.
Several runners loved the way the cushioning softens the impact.
The arch support is reliable without being too aggressive, according to a handful of runners.
It is very breathable, based on the observations of some users.
A few noticed that the cushioning does not compromise the Asics Cumulus 18’s flexibility.
Ground feedback is perceptible despite the excellent cushioning, as noted by more than a couple of runners.
Several runners with foot pain and under pronators found something that can alleviate their discomfort in the Gel Cumulus 18.
6 reasons not to buy
Many were frustrated by the narrow toe box of this version compared to the last model.
More than a few had durability issues in the upper, particularly near the toes.
The heel and forefoot are narrow while the height of the toe box is not what it used to be, as reported by a large majority of runners.
Even the extra widths are just too narrow and tight, based on a good number of observations from loyal Cumulus fans.
Several runners noted that the 18th version of the Cumulus runs smaller than the past model.
More than a couple of runners needed time to break-in this shoe.
Bottom line
The Cumulus series is one of Asics’ most popular neutral trainers. In the 18th edition of this line, it continues to be a reliable training partner that can usually take on middle distance to high-mileage runs. It has superb arch support, tons of comfort, and can easily provide the needs of both entry level and seasoned runners. The reasonable price is only one more reason why this series continues to horde fans with every release."
Adidas Alphabounce Instinct,,96.0,94.0,526.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.1oz , Women: 10oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Some runners commented that the footwear was comfortable.
According to those who have tried it, the Adidas AlphaBpunce Instinct is perfect for walking, running, jumping and gym activities.
A good number of the testers loved its eye-catching design.
It was durable, according to a handful of buyers.
Several reviewers said that the shoe was stylish.
4 reasons not to buy
According to a consumer, he felt a little pain after a few hours of running.
Based on some reviews, the back part of the shoe was bulky.
It was expensive, commented by several consumers.
The Adidas AlphaBounce Instinct does not provide enough grip on wet surfaces.
Bottom line
Overall, the majority of the runners speak highly of the Adidas AlphaBounce Instinct's great and unique design. Aside from its style, they admired the shoe's outstanding fit and durability. Although some of them have concerns with regards to its price and grip on wet surfaces, others still recommend the footwear because of its visually-appealing design, performance, and versatility."
Adidas Tracerocker,,92.0,79.0,1046.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Runners were generally appreciative of the Adidas Tracerocker’s design and aesthetics.
Many felt that it was comfortable to their feet.
One of the positive comments was the runners’ appreciation of the lightweight nature of this shoe.
It felt true-to-size, a majority of testers wrote.
The traction capability of the outsole was efficient, according to those who have tried it.
The general quality of this running shoe received positive feedback; for runners, it was well-made.
Consumers stated that the Tracerocker was durable and capable of lasting a long time.
Purchasers felt that the price of this shoe was affordable.
4 reasons not to buy
After only a few weeks of use, a tester noticed a popping noise with every step and it annoyed him.
A few runners complained that the fit was too narrow.
The mid-sole unit felt a bit rigid, according to a disgruntled consumer.
Some reviewers reported that the cushioning wasn’t very soft or responsive, so it caused some discomfort during long running sessions.
Bottom line
The general feedback for the Adidas Tracerocker was positive. A lot of runners appreciated this neutral running shoe and what it had to offer. Its capacity to handle the trails was admired by many. But some of its features didn’t work well for a number of those who have tried it. There were some issues with its mid-sole and its fit."
New Balance 993,,83.0,87.0,6.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 13.7oz , Women: 13.7oz,,,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The general sturdiness of the New Balance 993 is welcomed by many running shoe enthusiasts.
Many runners believe that the quality of the cushioning is robust and dependable, even during extended runs.
The supportive natures of the upper unit and platform are welcomed by those who have shin and knee concerns.
Heavyset purchasers believe that the midsole is able to adapt well to the weights of their bodies.
What is apparently appreciated is the capacity of the New Balance 993 to work well during exercise, running sessions, and strolls.
The outsole unit has a traction capacity that is reliable and robust, based on several reviews.
Some of the purchasers who have already bought this shoe years ago say that it’s worth the price as it still functions as intended, even after a long time.
2 reasons not to buy
Some testers have observed the outsole rubber peeling off from the midsole like a cheap layer.
Several consumers believe that this product is too bulky for all-day use.
Bottom line
A classic New Balance running shoe returns with the 993. This running footwear is welcomed as a worthy update to one of the kings of athletic wear in the ‘90s, the 990. The well-made silhouette, the highly supportive midsole, and the versatility of the design are highlighted. The superior cushioning provided by the 993 makes it highly ideal for all-day running.
Fans of road running shoes with classic looks can find enjoyment with the New Balance 993."
Asics Roadhawk FF,,90.0,90.0,328.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.6oz , Women: 6.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Asics Roadhawk FF 2,"5 reasons to buy
The customers were very happy with the excellent cushioning of the Asics Roadhawk FF.
The runners highlighted how the snug fit of the upper prevented sliding inside the shoe.
According to the wearers, the shoe’s light weight increased their efficiency during running.
The purchasers found the price of the Roadhawk FF very reasonable.
A runner considered using this shoe for an upcoming marathon owing to its great all-round features.
1 reasons not to buy
Some users were dissatisfied with the narrow toe-box of the Asics Roadhawk FF.
Bottom line
The Asics Roadhawk FF has certainly earned a good number of followers owing to its affordable price and agreeable build. They also lauded the lightweight nature of this road shoe, as well as its comfortable cushioning and other efficient features. However, there were those who felt very restricted because of its apparently narrow forefoot section."
Reebok Forever Floatride Energy,,91.0,93.0,97.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.6oz , Women: 9.6oz,,,,, Reebok Forever Floatride Energy 2,"7 reasons to buy
Some users appreciate the Reebok Forever Floatride Energy's adaptability to any running speed.
According to some runners who tried the Forever Floatride Energy, the midsole gives a highly responsive energy return.
One of the topmost advantages the shoe has is its simple design.
Another famous remark from most of the runners is the excellent traction it provides during the activity.  
A vast majority of buyers have positive reactions to its breathable upper. 
Numerous consumers highly appreciate its affordable price.
A good number of reviewers have commented that the shoe's outsole area is durable.
3 reasons not to buy
Most of the users have criticized the short length of the laces. 
One of the buyers discussed that the tongue is a bit narrow, which makes it slide a little bit. As a result, it gives a stiff feeling while running.
One of the frequent observations is the collar being comparably higher than other running shoes which may come as a bit of an issue for some buyers.
Bottom line
The Reebok Forever Floatride Energy is an everyday training and running shoe that is perfect for any pace. Overall, the ideal combination of a breathable upper, a responsive midsole, and a durable and tractive outsole was accepted by many. There are some minor but observable downsides to this shoe, which include the shoelaces being too short and the slightly narrow tongue. Despite these issues, others still highly recommend the Reebok Forever Floatride Energy because of its quality and excellent performance."
On Cloudflyer Waterproof,,81.0,83.0,22.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 8.6oz, Men: 7mm , Women: 7mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Several users mentioned that the On Cloudflyer Waterproof is a very comfortable shoe.
Many satisfied runners lauded the shoe's overall fit.
Some wearers observed that the Cloudflyer Waterproof has a roomy toe-box.
According to a few users, the shoe feels light.
The shoe is true to size, noted in some reviews.
A couple of buyers admired the shoe's design and color options.
1 reasons not to buy
The shoe is expensive. 
Bottom line
The On Cloudflyer Waterproof was well-received by users because of its design, fit and efficient features. As a waterproof running shoe, many users were impressed by its outstanding performance on the trail. Though the shoe is expensive, it was still an excellent shoe on the overall and was worth the purchase for many runners. "
Mizuno Wave Horizon 4,,91.0,92.0,8.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 9.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The majority of the users love the comfort that the Mizuno Wave Horizon 4 provides. 
A lot of runners are happy with the overall quality of the shoe. 
It is supportive, according to many buyers. 
Numerous wearers describe the shoe as fast and lightweight.  
The Wave Horizon 4 offers excellent protection against impact, some purchasers observe. 
This shoe offers a strong level of orthopedic support, a few consumers claim.
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of testers mention that the Wave Horizon 4 felt a bit tight. 
The shoe is expensive, said a reviewer. 
Bottom line
Crafted with excellent stability features, the Mizuno Wave Horizon 4 is specifically designed for runners and athletes who overpronate. It offers a high level of cushioning and support, which are necessary to help minimize the impact of overpronation. It is an everyday running shoe that is also suitable for workouts and casual wear. "
New Balance Fresh Foam 980,,87.0,80.0,279.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.9oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, New Balance Fresh Foam Boracay v3,"7 reasons to buy
Most runners believe that the comfort of the Fresh Foam 980 is simply one of the best in the business.
Most runners loved the comfortable fit right from the get go.
The transition from landing to take-off is effortless, based on the observations of several testers and runners.
It is quite flexible.
A significant number of runners raved about its versatility.
Consistent and responsive cushioning excels in the New Balance Fresh Foam 980.
It has an affordable price.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners hoped for more room in the toe box.
The upper material came apart after a few months for some users.
Others noted that the forefoot platform was a bit thin.
Bottom line
The New Balance Fresh Foam 980 ranks high in the list of neutral runners, according to experts and countless runners. This really shines when used for long distance runs or speed trainings because of its great arch support and responsive cushioning. It is a running shoe that deserves a place in the shoe rack of runners."
Salomon Sense Pro 3,,88.0,84.0,55.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Salomon Sense Pro 4,"5 reasons to buy
Some consumers considered the Salomon Sense Pro 3 to have a weight that is light enough for extended use.
The traction capacity of the outsole unit was lauded by those who have tried this trail running shoe.
Several testers deemed the price to be more affordable than most off-road options.
The lacing system quickly and effectively adjusted the tightness or looseness of the fit, according to a couple of purchasers.
Based on a handful of reviews, the Sense Pro 3 performed well on soft surfaces, particularly muddy paths.
1 reasons not to buy
The high gripping lugs and the lack of torsional flexibility contributed to an unstable underfoot experience, a few reviewers claimed.
Bottom line
The Salomon Sense Pro 3 was well-liked by consumers who appreciated performance and quality in a package that’s affordable. The lightness of the build and the preciseness of the fit-adjustment system were highlighted as elements that contributed to a well-rounded running experience. On the other hand, the outsole unit garnered split feedback; while some liked the assured traction, others felt that the lug-pattern resulted in unsteadiness."
Under Armour Charged Rogue 2,,83.0,,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.4oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A lot of the reviewers appreciate the comfort of the Under Armour Charged Rogue 2.
Several customers commend the snug fit of the running shoe. 
The Under Armour shoe has sufficient support, reported a few buyers. 
According to some purchasers, the road runner is very light. 
A number of users state that the shoe is versatile; it can be used in multiple activities. 
It provides stable running performance, expressed some wearers. 
The shoe is very durable, observed quite a few runners.
3 reasons not to buy
Some commenters have noted that the running shoe has a stiff underfoot feel. 
Several testers claimed that the running platform caused pain on the foot.
A few athletes remark that the shoe constricts foot movements.
Bottom line
The design principle of the Under Armour Charged Rogue 2 is centered on delivering a multi-functional running platform. May it be in jogs or long runs, the Charged Rogue 2 can do it all. Equipped with some of the brand’s quality technologies, the shoe does not compromise when it comes to speed, support, and protection."
Brooks Ricochet,,92.0,84.0,1247.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Brooks Ricochet 2,"6 reasons to buy
A lot of consumers considered the Brooks Ricochet to be true to size.
The width profiles were lauded for following the regular fit expectations of testers.
The midsole unit was excellent at energizing the toe-off phase of the gait cycle, some runners observed.
A couple of users appreciated the upper unit because it hugged the foot securely.
The design of this running shoe was welcomed by shoe enthusiasts; they felt that the aesthetics were unique and appealing.
The Brooks Ricochet gripped the ground well, some users reported.
1 reasons not to buy
A couple of runners noticed that the laces of the Brooks Ricochet were too long.
Bottom line
A lot of the shoe enthusiasts who have tried the Brooks Ricochet were happy with what it had to provide for them. The performance of the midsole, the preciseness of the outsole traction, the secure hug of the upper unit, and the uncommon aesthetics were elements that gained positive regard. There were some who didn’t like this neutral running shoe’s too-long laces, but such a complaint was isolated."
Columbia FKT,,83.0,91.0,18.0,,," Trail, Mud", Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 6.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Quite a few purchasers hail the snug fit of the Columbia FKT. 
Several buyers appreciate the comfort provided by the running shoe.
It provides a stable performance, claimed some runners. 
The athletes laud the shock mitigating qualities of the trail running platform. 
A number of customers commend the lightness of the runner.
2 reasons not to buy
A few reviewers state that the shoe requires quite a long time to break-in.
It constricts foot movements, some users commented.
Bottom line
An excellent all-terrain option for versatile runners, the Columbia FKT offers responsive cushioning and maximum comfort. With a design centered on implementing optimal durability and traction, this trail running shoe is a reliable choice. Packed in a featherlight platform, the running shoe offers premium support for a stable performance."
Brooks Caldera,,93.0,87.0,251.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Brooks Caldera 4,"10 reasons to buy
The Caldera is comfortable and lightweight, according to some reviews.
More than a few runners noted the good arch support of the shoe.
Many were satisfied with the shoe’s traction on varied surfaces.
Some runners liked the cushioning and supportive feature of the shoe.
The double mesh upper remains breathable while preventing small debris from entering the shoe.
The heel counter provides a secure and comfortable heel lock-down, as noted in some reviews.
True to size.
The well-ventilated upper is also quick-drying, as reported by a handful of expert reviewers.
More than a good number of runners considered the Caldera as the best trail shoe from Brooks.
It has ample trail-specific protection for ultra runs without compromising weight.
3 reasons not to buy
The Caldera is slightly expensive.
Few runners noticed that the outsole is not durable.
A handful of female runners mentioned that it looks clunky.
Bottom line
The Brooks Caldera is a neutral shoe designed for trail running. Though it is sold at an expensive price, it delivers a great combination of flexibility, durability, and stability. With high-energy returning design, the shoe will not disappoint when used in long runs or daily trainings."
Topo Athletic Ultrafly 2,,80.0,88.0,14.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,, Topo Athletic Ultrafly 3,"6 reasons to buy
Several users agreed that the Topo Athletic Ultrafly 2 is an impressive update; they said it gives more cushioning and breathable upper coverage than its predecessor.
Most runners lauded the lightweight design of the Ultrafly 2.
The shoe is very comfortable, said some buyers.
A few satisfied users mentioned that the shoe is supportive.
Some buyers admired the shoe's roomy toe box.
The Ultrafly 2 has a great outsole, based on some user reviews.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners agreed that the upper mesh is not durable.
Many buyers disliked the colors of the new Ultrafly 2.
One user mentioned that the shoe is too stiff for his liking.
Bottom line
The Topo Athletic Ultrafly 2 introduced new updates and enhanced performance that managed to amaze a significant number of users. Although some runners found issues with the colors, upper durability, and stiffness, the shoe's lightweight design and reliable support made it a valuable purchase for many. The Ultrafly 2 is best for those who are looking for an affordable and low-drop road running shoe."
Merrell Agility Peak Flex 2 E-Mesh,,89.0,,64.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 8.6oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The underfoot cushioning of the Merrell Agility Peak Flex 2 E-Mesh felt adequate, according to several testers.
The toe box was broad enough to accommodate the natural spreading of the toes, a runner commented.
Some people noted that the weight of this running shoe was sufficiently light.
A couple of reviewers stated that the shoelaces helped in keeping the foot in place, preventing in-shoe slipping.
The traction capability of the outsole unit received high praise.
According to a consumer, the upper façade wrapped around the foot like a glove.
2 reasons not to buy
The medial midfoot part of the platform had a bump that was awkward and uncomfortable, a runner complained.
The mesh material on the upper looked thin and flimsy, some people observed.
Bottom line
The trail running enthusiasts were generally interested in the Merrell Agility Peak Flex 2 E-Mesh. They were happy with its performance and its capacity to keep the foot in place. They were also appreciative of the surface traction that it offered. Conversely, several people had some qualms with the construction, particularly noting a bump in the sole unit as well as a thin and fragile façade."
Vibram FiveFingers EL-X,,91.0,84.0,1117.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,, Apr 2013,,,"9 reasons to buy
A large number of runners concluded that this is the closest thing they have to barefoot running without literally going barefoot.
The lightweight and flexible nature of this shoe were received well by fans.
It shines in the gym or indoor workouts, according to a significant number of users.
The shoe dries quickly, based on the comments of several reviewers.
Several consumers appreciated the breathable upper unit.
Many runners consider the price as affordable and worthy of the Vibram EL-X’s quality.
Traction is fairly good, as reported by a moderate number of runners.
A handful of runners who have had knee or shin issues were able to run without any pain in the FiveFingers EL-X.
The ground feedback provided by this product was greatly welcomed by those who appreciated barefoot running.
4 reasons not to buy
For a consumer, this running shoe had a tendency to stink, even after he has washed it.
The tightness and snugness of the fit, which is needed to keep the shoe in place, often restrict movements, according to a handful of runners.
Several runners felt that the uniqueness of this shoe’s façade didn’t appeal positively to the people around them.
Putting on the shoe was a challenge for some testers.
Bottom line
The Vibram FiveFingers EL-X is an Entry Level Crosstrainer which has the lightest and the thinnest sole in Vibram’s line-up of “toe shoes.” The shoe takes a little getting used to because it is designed for barefoot runners. However, reviews show that once the right fit and familiarity are met, the shoe is easily one of the most comfortable and versatile on the market. Runners who can get past the weird style should have a truly barefoot running experience with just enough protection on paved roads in this shoe."
Brooks Ghost 11 GTX,,90.0,,515.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.8oz , Women: 10.4oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Brooks Ghost 12 GTX,"6 reasons to buy
The overall quality of the materials used for the Brooks Ghost 11 GTX was lauded by consumers.
Many people felt that the width profiles followed their fit preferences.
Most consumers thought that the waterproof upper offered reliable protection against wetness.
Some testers considered the weight of this running shoe to be perfect for long adventures on the roads.
The outsole worked well on the trails, according to several runners.
A couple of people who had ankle and knee disorders claimed that the cushioning system responsibly staved off discomfort.
2 reasons not to buy
Some purchasers felt that this model needed various color schemes to heighten visual appeal.
A few individuals noted that the sizing scheme was half-a-size smaller than the usual.
Bottom line
Most of those who have tested the Brooks Ghost 11 GTX were happy with its various features. The waterproof upper and cushioning system were highlighted for being valuable and precise at their purpose. The quality and versatility of this road shoe’s build were also given renown. On the other hand, the sizing scheme was thought by some to be a bit small."
Nike Free RN Motion Flyknit 2017,,90.0,88.0,4702.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.3oz , Women: 6.5oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Nike Free RN Motion Flyknit 2018,"8 reasons to buy
A lot of buyers said that the shoe was great for their running activities.
Many users agreed that the Nike Free RN Motion Flyknit 2017 was a comfortable and great-looking shoe.
Many runners commented that the strap provided a more secure fit.
A good number of buyers loved the strap design of the shoe.
According to some runners, they felt like wearing a supportive and cushioned sock.
Many reviewers said that the Auxetic pattern of this shoe was really amazing.
Most of the testers commented that the Nike Free RN Motion Flyknit 2017 was form-fitting, durable and lightweight.
Users were happy because there were a variety of colors for them to choose from.
4 reasons not to buy
Some runners said that they felt a little pain and swelling in their Achilles after using this shoe.
A couple of buyers mentioned that this shoe’s form-fitting design and not-too-wide toe-box made it less agreeable for runners who have wide feet.
According to some buyers, the material used in the heel was stiffer when compared to the previous models.
The grooves on the outsole easily collected small rocks, gravel, and mud, according to some reviewers.
Bottom line
Many runners agreed that the Nike Free RN Motion Flyknit 2017 was a lightweight, flexible and comfortable daily training shoe. Many users were happy because of the changes that were made from the previous versions. Although some runners were disappointed due to some perceived pain and discomfort when they wore the shoe, others still recommended it for any running activity."
Brooks Addiction 12,,90.0,81.0,2299.0,,, Road, Motion control, Men: 13.5oz , Women: 11.9oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Brooks Addiction 14,"5 reasons to buy
It features the Brooks DNA technology for adaptive cushioning.
The Addiction 12 has a segmented crash pad for a smoother heel-to-toe transition.
Some runners liked the comfortable construction of the Brooks Addiction 12.
Many loved the simple and neutral colors of this shoe.
Many wide-footed runners liked the shoe’s roomy toe box.
3 reasons not to buy
This shoe is slightly expensive.
Others found this shoe heavy.
Some were disappointed by the shoe’s upper mesh because it wears out quickly.
Bottom line
The Brooks Addiction 12 is a motion control shoe that is great for road running. It is ideal for flat arches and runners with severe pronation. It received positive comments that are geared toward the shoe’s cushioning, ride quality and comfort. Though some considered the shoe as expensive, others are still willing to purchase a pair because performance-wise, it is indeed a good investment."
Skechers Max Cushioning Elite,,92.0,,275.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 11.5oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Most consumers believe that the cushioning system of the Skechers Max Cushioning Elite is highly supportive.
Several consumers have noted that the underfoot platform is able to alleviate tendonitis.
Some users believe that this running shoe is versatile enough to handle activities like gym exercises and walking.
Breathability is an aspect of this product that is considered highly noticeable.
The padded heel section locks the foot in place responsibly, based on a handful of reviews.
2 reasons not to buy
A few users are claiming that the cushioning unit is quick to sag, even after only a few uses.
The outsole tread wears off quickly, according to some consumers; the result is apparently a diminished traction capacity.
Bottom line
The overall reaction towards the Max Cushioning Elite has been positive. People are generally happy with this Skechers running shoe because it is apparently versatile and its cushioning system is highly lucrative. On the other hand, the durability of the midsole and outsole is criticized.
Fans of neutral running shoes with max cushioning capacities can enjoy the Skechers Max Cushioning Elite and what it has to offer."
Nike Air VaporMax Flyknit,,87.0,82.0,350.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Nike Air VaporMax Flyknit 2,"6 reasons to buy
Many purchasers loved the design of the Nike Air VaporMax Flyknit’s upper unit, stating that it looked cool.
The different colorways that are available for this shoe received positive feedback.
This shoe felt suitably lightweight for daily use, noted a number of runners.
Most of those who have tried this shoe wrote that the mid-sole was comfortable enough to carry their feet responsibly throughout various activities.
There were individuals who were able to use this shoe for gym exercises and other sports and they felt that it was efficient.
There were comments about the VaporMax Flyknit’s underfoot feel, which was apparently as soft as running on clouds.
4 reasons not to buy
While moving around with this shoe, there were runners claimed to hear some annoying squeaky noises from the midsole.
The Flyknit upper apparently caused some pressure as it encompassed the feet of some testers.
The shoe is expensive.
The midsole was not as soft or bouncy as some runners had expected.
Bottom line
The Nike Air VaporMax Flyknit generally received mixed reviews from consumers and testers. Many of them felt that this neutral road running shoe was inefficient in giving comfort and security to their feet. They also felt that it was an expensive product that didn’t provide the quality that they expected. Overall, this lightweight shoe needs more improvement. "
New Balance FuelCell Impulse,,88.0,82.0,145.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.2oz , Women: 6.7oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The ability to get the New Balance FuelCell Impulse in a wide-width option was welcomed by consumers.
The underfoot cushioning system was lauded for being responsive and comfortable.
Some people noted that the forefoot section was spacious enough to accommodate natural toe-splay.
The design of this running shoe was appreciated; people felt that it was appealing to the eyes.
According to some purchasers, the lateral support given by the platform kept the foot steady throughout an activity.
A couple of runners claimed that the weight of this road companion was suitably light.
1 reasons not to buy
A consumer observed some blistering occurring near the instep; he was wearing low-cut socks.
Bottom line
Neutral pronators were mostly happy with the New Balance FuelCell Impulse. They liked its eye-catching looks, the accommodating width-profiles, the lightweight build, and the pleasant underfoot experience. For them, it was a reliable option for the roads. On the other hand, there was an isolated incident wherein a consumer experienced some blistering from the upper fabrics."
Skechers GOrun 600, Skechers,95.0,94.0,596.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal, Skechers GOrun 600 - Refine,"6 reasons to buy
The design of the Skechers GOrun 600 was deemed stylish by most consumers.
A lot of purchasers used this model for casual walks and traveling; they noted that it functioned well.
The underfoot cushioning system was agreeable and responsive, stated several runners.
Some people noticed that the materials were durable and of high quality.
A reviewer commented that this shoe didn’t need a break-in period; it was comfortable right out of the box.
Several users praised the lightness of the shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
A tester reported that the upper separated from the sole unit after only a few weeks.
The shoe does not offer the expected amount of foot support, according to some wearers.
Bottom line
The Skechers GOrun 600 was considered a success. Most runners welcomed its comfortable construction, its stylish looks, and its versatile functionality. There were apparently some issues with this neutral shoe support and upper construction, but those complaints weren’t many. People still lauded this road companion’s efficacy."
Arc'teryx Norvan LD 2,,90.0,89.0,10.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The outsole unit of the Arc'teryx Norvan LD 2 is welcomed for providing exceptional grip over the unpredictable outdoor terrains.
Several consumers believe that this trail running shoe is lighter than its predecessor.
The inner sleeve of this product is welcomed because it is secure and not irritating to the skin.
Runners are happy because the aesthetics are eye-catching and appropriate for any activity.
Breathability is an aspect that is appreciated by those who have tested this running shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
The midfoot section of the upper unit was a bit snug for a few consumers.
Some comments have touched on the price of the Norvan LD 2, which was apparently expensive.
Bottom line
The overall reaction towards the Arc'teryx Norvan LD 2 has been mostly positive. People appreciate this product because it is versatile in look function. The lightweight structure, breathable upper, and traction-ready outsole are highlighted.
Fans of neutral running shoes that are devised for the off-road are the ones who are likely to enjoy the Arc'teryx Norvan LD 2."
Nike Renew Arena, Nike,93.0,,114.0,$75,$41 (save 45%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7oz,,,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Some of the buyers said that the Nike Renew Arena offers excellent cushioning.
Many users admired the comfort it provides while running.
According to those who have bought it, the shoe is true to size.
Based on several reviews, the footwear is stylish; they loved its beautiful and appealing color schemes.
The shoe is also used for work out and gym training, noted by some consumers.
The Nike Renew Arena provides enough level of stability, according to several testers.
1 reasons not to buy
One of the users said that the shoe fits too wide.
Bottom line
The majority of the users were contented and amazed with the Nike Renew Arena's design and comfort. Aside from its attractive design, they admired its sizing scheme and excellent cushioning. Although one of the testers had issues on the width, in general, the Nike Renew Arena has made a lot of consumers happy because of its overall performance on the road."
Under Armour SpeedForm Slingshot 2,,90.0,,247.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
A significant number of users mentioned that the Under Armour SpeedForm Slingshot 2 is very comfortable.
Some purchasers admired the lightweight design of the SlingShot 2.
The shoe fits well and requires no break-in time, said some wearers.
A few others happily expressed that they have been using the shoe not just for running, but also for walking and gym workout sessions.
Several users said that the mesh upper was sufficiently breathable.
According to some runners, the SpeedForm Slingshot 2 has a good-looking design.
One user is delighted with the shoe’s wide toe box.
Several testers thought that the laces of the shoe are odd, but it provides better fit and support.
2 reasons not to buy
The material used for the upper unit was considered by a few people to be rough and abrasive.
A consumer lamented the flimsy lateral support given by the knit upper and the asymmetrical lacing system.
Bottom line
The second version of the SpeedForm Slingshot is a lightweight running shoe packed with top-notch Under Armour technologies. It gained positive reviews from various users and had continued to wow runners with its functionality, design, and comfort. On the other hand, there were complaints about the upper unit, with some considering the fabrics to be irritating and one treating the fit system to be unreliable."
Asics 33-M 2,,94.0,90.0,99.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 9.1oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
A seamless upper ensures a non-irritating cover for the foot.
Many reviewers appreciated the ComforDry lasting and the ComforDry Sock Liner that offers an interior environment that has anti-microbial properties.
The AmpliFoam technology gives consistent and improved cushioning based on the comments of a small number of testers.
The mid-sole of the 33-M 2 feels soft despite its bulky look, remarked several users.
The outsole unit features a durable material that’s made to protect the sole unit from wear and abrasion.
The color choices for this running shoe are impressive.
3 reasons not to buy
The 33-M 2 has a very bulky look.
The high quality components found in this shoe equal a very high price.
Some runners felt that the fabrics didn’t wick off moisture and even absorb water during wet conditions.
Bottom line
The Asics 33-M 2 is a reliable road running shoe designed for neutral runners. Many runners have found great service and performance from the 33-M 2 from Asics. It has supportive components, breathable coverage, and durable parts. It is a solid option for daily running."
New Balance Fresh Foam Roav Trail,,71.0,,19.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 10.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The quality of the upper unit’s wrap is deemed dependable and secure.
A majority of testers believe that the midsole has a naturally comfortable structure.
The outsole unit’s structure is efficient on both flat and slightly rugged terrains, according to several consumers.
Some users believe that the close-weave upper is capable of preventing debris from entering the foot-chamber.
The aesthetics are considered eye-catching and versatile enough for casual urban strolls.
2 reasons not to buy
A few testers have claimed that the raised portion of the collar’s rear is irritating against the skin.
Based on a couple of reviews, the sole unit has a tendency to make a squeaking noise when taking each step.
Bottom line
The overall feedback of people for the Fresh Foam Roav Trail has been positive. This New Balance running shoe is welcomed for the fantastic wear experience it provides, as well as the structural configuration. Fans of trail running shoes that are designed for neutral foot pronation are the target consumers of the New Balance Fresh Foam Roav Trail."
Saucony Liberty ISO 2,,82.0,93.0,8.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Some of those who have used the Saucony Liberty ISO 2 for speed training sessions are happy with the overall performance of this shoe.
This Saucony running shoe has a midsole that is springy and able to properly attenuate impact shock, according to several testers.
The breathability of the upper unit is welcomed by those who desire a ventilated in-shoe feel.
A handful of runners have highlighted the durable construction of the materials, stating that the material longevity is dependable.
A few users who have plantar fasciitis claim that the Saucony Liberty ISO 2 is able to alleviate their concerns.
2 reasons not to buy
Several consumers believe that the forefoot section has a tendency to cause the toes to bunch together.
A couple of purchasers have reported that the platform isn’t thick enough.
Bottom line
The overall feedback towards the Saucony Liberty ISO 2 has been mostly positive. People like this product’s performance, with some applauding the supportive platform and the durable build. The breathable upper and speedy performance are also praised. On the other hand, the restrictive toe-box and the apparently inconsistent midsole thickness are the targets of criticism.
Runners who are enthusiastic about road running shoes that are for overpronated foot motion are the target market of this Liberty ISO 2 model."
The North Face Flight Trinity,,76.0,87.0,9.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The majority of those who have tested The North Face Flight Trinity like the grip capacity of the outsole unit, stating that the rubber is reliable and efficient.
A handful of runners welcome the breathable upper unit of this running shoe, claiming that the ventilation is relaxing.
Some consumers have lauded the lightweight structure of this product, believing that they could handle many obstacles because of the unrestrictive weight.
The bright and welcoming façade has received positive remarks from trail enthusiasts.
The versatility of the construction is praised; people claim that they can effortlessly use the shoe for multiple activities.
2 reasons not to buy
Several people have lamented the quickly wearing gripping lugs of the outsole unit.
The upper unit has developed tears after only a few uses, according to a surprising amount of testers.
Bottom line
Enthusiasts of off-road treks and soirees are given a chance to rejoice because of The North Face Flight Trinity. While the positive feedback for this trail companion is truly commendable, the negative points have prevented it from becoming one of the go-to classics for adventures on the unpredictable outdoor paths. The lightweight construction, the traction-ready outsole, and the breathability became highlights, but the flimsiness of the gripping lugs and the quick-to-rip upper unit overshadowed them. Neutral pronators and trail voyagers are the intended market of The North Face Flight Trinity."
Reebok Print Run 3.0, Reebok,93.0,,283.0,$80,$26 (save 68%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Many people thought that the Reebok Print Run 3.0 had a visually appealing design.
Several consumers commended the lightweight nature of this running shoe.
The upper unit was appreciated because it felt agreeable as it wrapped around the foot.
‘Comfortable’ was a word that was used when wearing this product.
People used this running shoe for casual walking, and they stated that it remained highly functional through such activities.
The lightweight nature of the materials was welcomed by runners.
2 reasons not to buy
The toe box was a bit narrow for some wearers.
A consumer complained that the underfoot platform was stiff.
Bottom line
The Reebok Print Run 3.0 was generally well-received by those who have tested it. This road shoe gained favor from neutral pronators who liked a lightweight and visually endearing companion for their activities. On the other hand, there were minor complaints like an inconsistent sizing scheme and stiffness to the midsole."
Nike LunarGlide 9,,92.0,86.0,248.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.3oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
Several buyers commented that the Nike LunarGlide 9 provided more support for their flat feet.
According to several consumers, the lightweight nature of this running shoe accommodated the foot’s natural movement and flexibility.
Most users have said that the LunarGlide 9 is very comfortable.
Aside from its excellent function, the Nike LunarGlide 9’s design and style also won the favor of various users.
A couple of runners stated that the LunarGlide 9 is true to size; it also gave a perfect fit and it allowed them to move comfortably.
One runner said that the sole thickness of the LunarGlide 9 is agreeable.
Its plastic reinforcement in the heel section offered good ankle support, a tester observed.
The LunarGlide 9’s fabric exuded quality, and it secured the foot properly, as mentioned by a user.
The overall cushioning and the roomy toe box received positive remarks for apparently being improvements over the design of the previous version.
4 reasons not to buy
A few users reported that the shoe was too narrow and was uncomfortable for them to wear.
A couple of buyers found it hard to add custom orthotics into the LunarGlide 9.
One user said that the shoes felt like it had a cheap finish and an unappealing look.
Another user stated that wearing the LunarGlide 9 felt like bare feet were slapping on concrete.
Bottom line
The Nike LunarGlide 9 has garnered positive reviews from the majority, with most users commenting on its comfort, flexibility, and support. While there may not be a lot of noticeable differences from past versions, the 9th LunarGlide apparently stood out with its vastly improved form and phenomenal performance. But some might argue that this is not the best version of the LunarGlide."
Hoka One One Stinson Mid GTX,,85.0,,7.0,,, Trail,, Men: 16.9oz , Women: 14.2oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The majority of the testers commented that the Hoka One One Stinson Mid GTX is comfortable. 
Several testers agreed that the shoe has the right amount of cushioning.
Many users said that the shoe is lightweight in structure.
It provides excellent arch support, based on some reviews.
According to those who have tried it, the running footwear is attractive.
As noted by a significant number of consumers, the shoe has excellent quality.
Some reviewers mentioned that it is best used for daily wear and hiking activities.
2 reasons not to buy
One of the users commented that the shoe has an off-gassing smell that is still strong after three weeks of use.
Some buyers noted that the Hoka One One Stinson Mid GTX has a narrow toe box.
Bottom line
This neutral running shoe, the Hoka One One Stinson Mid GTX, is engineered for users who want to excel in tackling challenging terrains. With the utilization of different technologies and materials, wearers can enjoy a high-quality, lightweight, and attractive running partner. This comfortable running shoe aims to deliver an outstanding amount of traction that helps to improve the user's performance. A more efficient ride is enjoyed by the user, especially in different hiking and running activities."
Under Armour Fat Tire,,89.0,79.0,52.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 13oz , Women: 10.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Under Armour Fat Tire 3,"5 reasons to buy
It features a rugged textile upper with bonded abrasion panels that is fairly breathable.
The superb comfort of the Under Armour Fat Tire is highly appreciated by several runners.
The shoe uses a WildGripper sole that gives the shoes an impressive grip on muddy and rocky terrain.
Most runners took note of the shallow stretch upper of the Fat Tire that provides a snug fit.
The cushioning and responsiveness of this shoe gained positives reviews from several runners.
2 reasons not to buy
Several runners found the Fat Tire heavy.
The shoe is slightly expensive.
Bottom line
The Under Armour Fat Tire is a neutral trail running shoe that offers comfort, impressive cushioning and snug fitting. Several users admired the overall design of the shoe while others were a bit disappointed with its weight and price. Though slightly expensive, this shoe will not disappoint even on muddy and rocky terrains. "
Reebok Fusium Run 2, Reebok,91.0,,637.0,$90,$25 (save 72%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Many wearers found the Reebok Fusium 2 to be a comfortable shoe.
A lot of users liked the snug fit provided by the shoe.
A number of runners commented on the smooth ride they experienced with the Fusium Run 2.
Several buyers were pleased that the shoe did not require a break-in period.
The shoe allowed for longer runs, a reviewer claimed.
2 reasons not to buy
The mesh upper of the Fusium Run 2 had torn apart after only a month, according to a commenter. Another wrote that the material of the upper felt flimsy.
A couple of users mentioned that the insole was slippery and their feet kept sliding while running.
Bottom line
Reebok has still managed to meet the consumers’ expectations with the Fusium Ride 2. The shoe has met positive feedback regarding its comfort level, fit, and performance. However, the brand seemed to have overlooked the criticisms of the previous version, as users have still found issues on durability. Despite this, many still considered the Reebok Fusium Ride 2 a worthy purchase and recommendable to others."
Brooks Hyperion Elite,,76.0,65.0,6.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.9oz , Women: 6.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Some testers have said that the Brooks Hyperion Elite is responsive.
Based on reviews, the running shoe is lightweight in structure.
One of the purchasers mentioned that no ""annoying stitches and seams"" are used in the shoe.
Several users commented that the shoe has a perfect fit.
Its roomy toe box was loved by a consumer.
According to those who have bought it, the running footwear has an attractive design.
The shoe is suitable for a 5-10k run, as noted by some reviewers.
2 reasons not to buy
A user mentioned that the Brooks Hyperion Elite is quite a bit firmer than to what he is used to. 
The shoe is expensive, according to those who have bought it.
Bottom line
The Brooks Hyperion Elite has gained the hearts of many consumers. The positive reactions towards this Brooks running shoe is a manifestation of its successful release. Its attractive design, lightweight structure, and fantastic fit allow the users to perform well on the roads. The materials and technologies incorporated into the shoe highlight the excellent quality and response the shoe have to offer. With the way the shoe is constructed, Brooks specifically designed the Hyperion Elite to last the 50-100 miles demands of racing."
Brooks Ghost 9,,93.0,85.0,1972.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 9.1oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Brooks Ghost 12 GTX,"12 reasons to buy
The Brooks Ghost 9 is almost unanimously commented upon by reviewers as very comfortable.
The price is around the norm for neutral trainers with good cushioning.
Most of the reviewers noted that it is quite light for a lot of shoe.
It has excellent traction, according to several.
The arch support of the 9th version of the Ghost is fantastic for a neutral runner, based on the comments of a good number of runners.
It has enough firmness to feel responsive, as remarked by a handful.
Several have used it for gym workouts without any issues.
A few noticed how good the shoe felt, even right out of the box.
The new stack height brings it a bit closer to the ground for heightened ground feedback.
The cushioning absorbs impact very well, as reported by many runners.
More than a handful of runners appreciated the Ghost 9’s durability.
A good number of those who are constantly on their feet loved the cushioning and support of this shoe.
4 reasons not to buy
Several fans of the series continue to wish for a lower heel to toe drop than the current 12mm difference.
A few runners wanted better color combinations.
Some users experienced rubbing on their toes, whether they were working out or running.
A small number of Ghost fans were angry that the laces come undone sometimes.
Bottom line
The Ghost 9 is sturdy, reliable, and versatile trainer that seamlessly provides the needs of runners looking for a tempo trainer or a well-cushioned version that can take on the poundings of a daily run. It has a superb arch support and quite responsive for a shoe with more than sufficient cushioning. The reasonable price tag is another reason to grab a pair of this very popular shoe from Brooks."
Adidas Alphabounce RC 2.0,,94.0,90.0,1351.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The price for a pair of the Adidas AlphaBounce RC 2.0 was considered by many to be affordable.
The quality of the materials was thought by some to surpass the relatively wallet-friendly price-tag.
Several testers commented that the underfoot cushioning system was very comfortable against the foot.
Wearing this shoe all day didn’t cause any fatigue or stuffiness; people liked that they remained energized while using it throughout the day.
The color schemes of this product were lauded for being eye-catching and stylish.
Some runners noticed that this shoe didn’t have a heavy structure, even though it looked bulky.
The traction capacity of this running shoe’s outsole unit was appreciated by many purchasers. They stated that their movements were precise and well-coordinated because of it.
2 reasons not to buy
The shoelaces come undone easily, according to a buyer.
One user complained that the shoe developed holes on the sides after only a couple of months.
Bottom line
The Adidas AlphaBounce RC 2.0 was able to rake in positive reviews from its testers. This road running companion was considered to be a great option for exercises and daily walks. The affordable price and quality construction were also elements that garnered high praise. On the other hand, more than a few complaints tackled an inconsistency in visual design, as well as a discrepancy in size. Still, neutral pronators rejoiced because of this running shoe’s existence."
Asics Roadhawk FF 2 MX,,88.0,,82.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Most of the users have praised the Roadhawk FF 2 MX's good balance of cushioning and spring.
The majority of the runners liked the shoe's good heel and forefoot support for long runs.
One user who had just recovered from plantar fasciitis noted how the shoe makes his feet feel supported and cradled correctly in place.
A number of runners liked the shoe's versatility as they say it is light enough for speed runs but also cushioned enough for longer runs.
The Roadhawk FF 2 MX is at a reasonable price said most of its buyers. They said it is well-made and stylish enough for its price value.
Also liked by a handful of runners is the shoe's super comfortable sock-like fit.
A couple of runners mentioned the shoe's excellent traction on the road.
4 reasons not to buy
A few runners did not like that the shoe’s fit was a little too tight for their preference.
Also disliked by some users was that the shoe’s toe box was too narrow to be comfortable.
Noticed by a couple of reviewers was the band over the arch where the shoelace is, this band caused some pain on the top of their feet.
One runner was not happy with the shoe’s rigid heel cup which caused blisters on the inside of his left heel.
Bottom line
Whether a pro runner or a complete beginner, the Asics Roadhawk FF 2 MX will give the right comfort, breathability, and support that is needed to achieve one's personal fitness goals. Most runners like that the shoe comes in a casual design that enables the shoe to be a staple for their active, outdoorsy lifestyle. Despite a few unfavorable reviews mostly about the shoe’s fit and sizing, the Roadhawk FF 2 MX still proves itself to be a versatile neutral trainer for different types of running styles."
Brooks Ricochet 2,,86.0,83.0,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The one-piece design of the Brooks Ricochet 2’s upper unit is welcomed by those who have tested it, stating that it is smooth and sock-like.
Some consumers have noted that the cushioning system is reactive to their movement capacity.
Breathability is an aspect of the upper unit that is appreciated by testers.
The traction yielded by the outsole rubber is deemed dependable as it apparently permits confident movements on the asphalt.
Flexibility is a trait that is lauded by those who welcome a shoe that accommodates natural motion.
2 reasons not to buy
A tester has claimed that that the rear of the collar has a tendency to rub against the foot.
The upper unit has exhibited some loose-threading after a few weeks of use, according to a purchaser.
Bottom line
The overall reaction towards the Brooks Ricochet 2 has been positive. This product is welcomed because of its seamless construction, the breathable upper, the traction-ready outsole, and the flexible midsole. It is an update that continues the legacy of its relatively fresh predecessor, the original Richochet model.
Fans of neutral running shoes that are for the roads are the target market of the Brooks Ricochet 2."
Nike Zoom Vaporfly 4%,,84.0,87.0,42.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The Zoom Vaporfly 4% gave an all-new sensation to the foot and made running feel effortless, pondered a reviewer.
Many runners were satisfied with the breathability and lightweight nature of this running shoe.
Several users commented that the heel cup worked well in preventing foot slippage.
A lot of runners praised the ZoomX cushioning as the best thing they have ever felt in a running shoe.
The shoe was supportive enough to provide the sensation of running at a better pace and quality, according to a tester.
3 reasons not to buy
There are no Flywire cables, which are typically present in most of Nike’s shoes. It made the Vaporfly 4% feel lacking in support, said one reviewer.
A user commented that the very thin upper felt weak and flimsy.
Some runners thought that the price did not justify the small number of features that were offered.
Bottom line
The Nike Zoom Vaporfly 4% is a shoe with a smart design. While it does not introduce newly-invented technology, it has put together existing technologies in a way that enables an improved running performance which satisfied most users. Despite its high price tag, many found the shoe to be worth it."
Hoka One One Evo Carbon Rocket,,83.0,85.0,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.3oz , Women: 7.3oz, Men: 1mm , Women: 1mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
A significant number of buyers like the amazing color combination of the Hoka One One Evo Carbon Rocket.
The shoe's lightweight structure is admired by many testers.
Several reviewers said that the shoe is breathable.
According to those who have bought it, the footwear is responsive.
A few purchasers lauded the attractive design of the Hoka One One Evo Carbon Rocket.
Based on some reviews, the running shoe is comfortable.
2 reasons not to buy
One of the users said that the shoe is not flexible.
Some of the reviewers have a problem with heel slippage.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Evo Carbon Rocket is a neutral running shoe designed for the roads. In general, the shoe gained positive comments because of its design, comfort, and responsiveness. Though some have issues with flexibility and heel slippage, these issues are not enough to overshadow the positive feedback. Overall, this shoe is an excellent option for those who are looking for a responsive, visually-appealing and breathable running companion."
New Balance 510 v4, New Balance,81.0,78.0,3223.0,,, Trail, Neutral,,,,,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Many people liked the affordable price of the New Balance 510 v4.
Some consumers noted that this running shoe functioned well as a general-purpose option.
Several testers claimed that the durability of the components proved to be reliable.
The underfoot platform had a firmness that worked well on the trails, several runners commented.
The width profiles were deemed as adherent to expectations.
According to some consumers, the upper unit was able to hug the foot securely and comfortably.
The grip capacity of the outsole was lauded by those who have tested this shoe.
4 reasons not to buy
Some consumers lamented that this running shoe wasn’t very fashionable.
A handful of consumers claimed that the cushioning system wasn’t responsive; they didn’t feel any bounce when taking a step.
Some people complained that the materials looked cheap and flimsy.
A tester reported that after only a few months, the internal lining tore apart while the tread on the sole unit wore off.
Bottom line
The New Balance 510 v4 trail shoe was appreciated because of its comfortable construction. Neutral runners liked how the shoe fit and how the materials meshed together to deliver a pleasant in-shoe environment. The low price was also a positive element, as well. Contrariwise, some people had complaints, such as a not-too-appealing design, the inconsistent sizing scheme, and the questionable quality of the materials."
Asics Gel Ziruss 2,,85.0,,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 10oz,,,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The cushioning system that is present in the Asics Gel Ziruss 2 is welcomed for being responsive.
The support given by the midfoot portion of this road running shoe is appreciated by testers.
According to most consumers, the outsole unit is able to deliver reliable traction on the ground.
Based on a handful of reviews, the upper unit does not irritate the skin of the foot.
The general durability of the materials is lauded by runners.
2 reasons not to buy
A few consumers have stated that the in-shoe experience is a bit restrictive.
According to a couple of testers, the tongue unit has a tendency to rub against the crest of the instep, causing discomfort.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Ziruss 2 aims to become a reliable neutral running shoe with its sturdy yet uncluttered construction and its confidence-giving midsole structure. It even has a sporty look that accommodates the ready-to-move mindset of those who are getting into running. Fans of road-ready footwear can have fun with the Gel Ziruss 2 from Asics."
Topo Athletic Runventure 3,,86.0,85.0,9.0,,, Trail,, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Some runners have noted that the lightweight construction of the Topo Athletic Runventure 3 permits all-day use.
The traction capacity of this Topo Athletic running shoe is welcomed by those who like to improve confidence over the unpredictable ground.
According to most users, the toe box of this product has a wide configuration that is ideal for natural toe-splay.
The sleek yet uncluttered design of this model is appreciated by casual shoe enthusiasts and trail adventurers alike.
Surface-to-foot interaction or proprioception dutifully maintains balance and versatility of motion, based on a couple of reviews.
2 reasons not to buy
The upper unit crinkles and irritates the skin, according to some users.
Some users have mentioned that the low-stack-height midsole doesn’t always save the foot from stone bruising.
Bottom line
The Topo Athletic Runventure 3 has been well-received by its testers. This product is welcomed because it has a lightweight build, a smooth and appealing look, and a performance-ready purpose. The low points only involve the irritating upper and the too-thin midsole.
Fans of trail offerings from Topo Athletic can enjoy this update to one of their enduring rosters."
Asics Gel Cumulus 20 MX,,80.0,,132.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Many users mentioned that the Asics Gel Cumulus 20 MX is comfortable.
It fits true to size, said some user comments.
A handful of users lauded the great level of support the shoe provides.
The shoe is durable, according to some reviews.
A few lauded the stylish design of the shoe. They said the shoe looks great with jeans and other casual wear.
3 reasons not to buy
A few mentioned that the sole of the Cumulus 20 MX is not flexible.
One user said that the heel cup is too firm.
A couple of runners noted that the upper of the older version is better. They said the upper of the Cumulus 20 MX is not breathable enough.
Bottom line
This MX version of the Cumulus 20 gained mix reviews from the users. Many were satisfied with how comfortable, supportive, and durable the shoe is. However, others are unhappy because the sole felt stiff and the heel cup is too firm. Overall, the shoe needs some improvement but still worth a try."
Adidas Alphabounce+,,90.0,95.0,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.5oz , Women: 11oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Many runners agreed that the Adidas AlphaBounce+ is very comfortable. 
Some consumers said that the shoe is great for walking and training. 
It offers good arch support, according to some reviews. 
The shoe is flexible, said a commenter. 
AlphaBounce+ is durable, reported by a couple of users. 
A consumer appreciated that it is easy to pull on and off. 
People love the stylish design of the shoe. 
2 reasons not to buy
Several buyers complained that the shoe is a little tight. 
A few testers experienced a sore foot after running in the shoe. 
Bottom line
People love the cushioning quality and durability of the Adidas AlphaBounce+. This neutral running shoe is crafted with advanced technologies that help deliver an efficient and comfortable running experience. Though there were a few runners who complained that the shoe is a little tight, the majority of the buyers have appreciated the overall performance of the Adidas AlphaBounce+."
Nike LunarGlide 7,,96.0,84.0,39743.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.1oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Nike LunarGlide 9,"9 reasons to buy
Many runners appreciated the stability mechanism in the mid-foot section, stating that it kept them stable throughout their running sessions.
Testers generally welcomed the lightweight nature of this version.
There were consumers who were able to use this shoe for a variety of activities like running and training, and they reported that it kept them secure and comfortable.
The durability of this shoe caught the attention of reviewers, and they commented that it was able to deliver in that regard.
The color schemes received recognition because they made the Nike LunarGlide 7 visually endearing.
A lot of testers noted that the underfoot cushioning was agreeably responsive.
‘Comfortable’ was a word that many reviewers utilized in order to describe the LunarGlide 7.
According to a number of runners, wearing this version staved off any foot or muscle aches while running.
The upper unit was breathable, stated many users; they welcomed how the fabrics were able to accommodate air flow.
3 reasons not to buy
Several testers reported that the back of the inner sleeve started to wear off, causing some rubbing and irritation.
The cushioning system felt a bit stiff for a runner; for them, it didn’t accommodate natural movement.
According to a number of users, the rubber compound used in the outsole started to peel off.
Bottom line
The 7th version of the Nike LunarGlide was able to provide quality service to many runners, especially those who needed support and stability. They wrote that this road shoe gave them quite the incentive to perform more efficiently; each component was competent when it came to making their entire running experience as comfortable and exact as possible. There were those who reported some issues about its durability, but these comments were drowned by the general appreciation that runners had for the Nike LunarGlide 7."
New Balance Fresh Foam Vongo v3,,88.0,,369.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, New Balance Fresh Foam Vongo v4,"5 reasons to buy
The stability mechanisms that are present in the New Balance Fresh Foam Vongo v3 were lauded by overpronators.
Several consumers considered the underfoot platform to be soft and responsive.
Some people felt that this shoe was pleasantly lightweight, considering it’s a stability option.
The various color schemes were deemed visually refreshing.
Wearing this shoe for long periods didn’t result in fatigue or muscle discomfort, a tester reported.
1 reasons not to buy
A few people claimed that this running shoe looked bulky.
Bottom line
The New Balance Fresh Foam Vongo v3 was considered by most to be a reliable option to combat overpronation. Runners were happy with its stability mechanisms, the comfortable underfoot platform, the lightweight build, and the endearing looks. On the other hand, this road companion’s façade was deemed burly, but such a complaint wasn’t deal-breaking."
Skechers GOmeb Speed 6 Hyper,,86.0,94.0,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 5.2oz , Women: 5.2oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
This running shoe is lightweight, according to a lot of users. 
It is highly durable, claimed some consumers. 
Many runners agreed that the shoe is comfortable. 
Some buyers appreciated that it offers an excellent grip.
Several testers mentioned that this shoe is breathable. 
The shoe is supportive, according to a reviewer. 
3 reasons not to buy
A couple of runners observed that the shoe is a bit tight. 
Some disappointed users mentioned that the midsole unit is too firm. 
One reviewer mentioned that the upper unit is made out of cheap materials.
Bottom line
The Skechers GOmeb Speed 6 Hyper is a race-ready shoe that is designed for runners and athletes with neutral gaits. It utilizes lightweight, yet durable materials that make the platform fast, sleek, and snug. This high performance running shoe is also equipped with advanced technologies, providing a secure and responsive ride.  "
Altra King MT 1.5,,89.0,84.0,73.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.5oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,, Altra King MT 2,"5 reasons to buy
The performance of the Altra King MT 1.5 was versatile; people noted that it functioned well over a variety of surfaces.
The protective rock plate gained fans; they noted that effectively shielded the foot from stones and rough topography.
Those who have tested this shoe felt that the close-to-the-ground platform kept them steady.
Grip was sure with the aggressive outsole configuration, based on several comments.
The width profile accommodated the usual fit preferences of consumers.
2 reasons not to buy
The midfoot strap was a bit restrictive, some consumers claimed.
A couple of reviewers felt that the toe bumper was too thin to be reliably protective.
Bottom line
The Altra King MT 1.5 was mostly well-received. Trail enthusiasts were happy with its adaptable build, having used it in various outdoor conditions and activities. Underfoot protection was also appreciated as the midsole offered sure assistance over the rough ground. A few complaints were directed at a few of its components, but they’re not too divisive or deal-breaking."
New Balance Fresh Foam More v2,,81.0,68.0,9.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.4oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The New Balance Fresh Foam More v2 is lauded by most users because its midsole unit is bouncy.
Strenuous exercises are said to be handled well by the max cushioning method of this road running shoe.
Consumers have welcomed the lightweight construction of this product.
Breathability is a trait that people have come to appreciate from this shoe’s upper unit.
All-day use is highly attainable because of the foot-focused construction of the entire silhouette.
2 reasons not to buy
Some users have complained of chafing near the ankles due to the presence of the stitch-on panels.
The in-shoe experience is deemed by several testers as a bit loose.
Bottom line
The Fresh Foam More v2 is an update to an up-and-coming series that caters to fans of max cushioning. This New Balance running shoe touts a lightweight construction despite its generous midsole piece. Also, it offers breathability and enabled performances. Caution is advised to irritable feet as there have been reports of a loose foot-wrap and an irritating collar feature. Fans of performance footwear for the roads can have fun with the Fresh Foam More v2."
Hoka One One Clifton 5 Knit,,90.0,89.0,219.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.4oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The upper unit was considered by testers to be just like a breathable sock.
The underfoot experience of the Hoka One One Clifton 5 Knit was dutifully comfortable, according to several consumers.
Some individuals stated that the generous thickness of the platform contributed to tendons and muscles that didn’t feel strained.
The weight was deemed light enough to handle all-day wear.
People liked the precise traction given by the outsole unit.
1 reasons not to buy
A purchaser complained that the knitted upper was loose and didn’t hold the foot appropriately.
Bottom line
Many people liked the Hoka One One Clifton 5 Knit and what it had to offer. The well-ventilated upper unit, the sock-like coverage, the supportive platform, and the lightweight build were elements that received praise. Conversely, the sizing scheme and fit configuration received criticism for being inconsistent."
Salomon Snowspike CSWP,,93.0,97.0,7.0,,," Snow, Trail", Neutral, Men: 14.1oz , Women: 14.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Many users testified that the Salomon Snowspike CSWP performs well on snow and ice.
Runners appreciated that it can keep the foot warm even in cold conditions.
The shoe delivers excellent traction on muddy and rocky surfaces, said some users. 
Several buyers mentioned that it offers reliable protection from the elements. 
This running companion is comfortable to wear, based on reviews.
A few purchasers commented that the shoe is lightweight.
2 reasons not to buy
The Salomon Snowspike CSWP is a bit bulky, according to a consumer. 
A couple of testers reported that the tungsten spikes are sharp enough to damage tile or hardwood floors.
Bottom line
The Salomon Snowspike CSWP is a unisex running shoe. Thus, it can be worn by men and women. It aims to provide comfort for runners with neutral gaits or those who do not overpronate. This shoe is crafted with highly durable materials, which are designed to protect the runner in wet and cold weather conditions."
,,,,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,
Asics FuzeTora Twist,,96.0,,75.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 6.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Those who have tested the Asics FuzeTora Twist liked the color schemes; according to them, the hues were eye-catching.
The width profiles were appreciated; people considered the fit to be adherent to expectations.
The sizing scheme was generally lauded for following the standard.
A couple of consumers welcomed the stretchy upper unit.
Several testers noted that the weight of this running shoe was suitably light.
1 reasons not to buy
A few purchasers felt that the in-shoe experience was a bit narrow.
Bottom line
The Asics FuzeTora Twist was welcomed with open arms. People were generally satisfied with what this neutral shoe had to offer. The aesthetics were considered superb. The weight and the sizing scheme were also aspects that were lauded. On the other hand, the response towards the width profiles was split; while some people liked the overall snugness, others claimed that it was tight."
Under Armour HOVR Sonic,,94.0,88.0,296.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.6oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Under Armour HOVR Sonic 3,"12 reasons to buy
A lot of wearers commented that the shoe was very responsive.
According to some testers, the Under Armour HOVR Sonic was supportive.
The shoe was good-looking, according to some purchasers.
Many reviewers noted that the upper construction was breathable.
Several wearers were impressed with the Under Armour HOVR Sonic's sound quality.
The majority of the testers said that the shoe was comfortable.
A handful of buyers reported that the shoe has a variety of color schemes to choose from.
Some of the consumers appreciated its wide toe box.
The shoe has excellent cushioning, noted by many buyers.
A handful of reviewers admired the right amount of traction it provided.
Based on some reviews, the shoe was lightweight.
A good number of consumers reported that the Under Armour HOVR Sonic was best used for short and long-distance walking and running activities.
2 reasons not to buy
One of the runners commented that the Under Armour HOVR Sonic was uncomfortable to wear. After an hour of wearing it, he developed a sore spot on top of his right foot.
Several users noted that the shoe was slippery on wet conditions.
Bottom line
A lot of them appreciated the excellent cushioning, comfort, softness and lightness of the Under Armour HOVR Sonic, especially on short and long-distance runs. Although some users have issues with its fit and the slippery outsole, others still recommended this neutral running shoe because of its excellent construction, and fantastic performance on the road and other paved surfaces."
Nike Free Flyknit 4.0,,91.0,88.0,1030.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.5oz , Women: 6.3oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,, Nike Free RN Flyknit 3.0,"7 reasons to buy
A stretchy polyester yarn makes up the upper unit of this running shoe and it effectively delivers breathable support for the foot.
Many reviewers greatly appreciated the flexibility that the 4th version of the Free Flyknit has to offer.
The different designs and color schemes placed a lasting positive impression on those who tried it.
The underfoot comfort is precise and the cushioning is effective.
Reviewers thought that the rounded heel worked pretty well because it encourages a more consistent stride.
The Flywire integrations to the sides work really well to enhance the fit.
The Nike Free Flyknit 4.0 feels light and fast.
2 reasons not to buy
The complaints for this running shoe stem from its initially inconsistent flexibility, though over time the full flexing capability of this shoe will stand out.
The mild arch support wasn’t very well-received because some runners felt they deserved more underfoot cradling from this running shoe.
Bottom line
The Free Flyknit 4.0 from Nike is actually one of the most popular running shoes on the market. Many tried it out and felt the comfort, the cool design and the consistent fit that it presented. It is a neutral running companion that offers mild underfoot support, as well as responsible durability."
Under Armour Charged Intake 4,,85.0,,6.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Several consumers believe that the underfoot cushioning of the Under Armour Charged Intake 4 is comfortable.
The durability of this product is welcomed by most testers.
The aesthetics and multiple color schemes have been well-received as they permit choice and stylishness via a personal preference.
Most users believe that the price of this pair of running shoes is affordable.
The breathability of the upper unit is appreciated by those who have tested this product.
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of consumers are claiming that the in-shoe experience is a bit loose near the heel section.
A few testers have complained about the collar lining's tendency to irritate the ankles.
Bottom line
Anyone can enjoy a run with their chosen performance footwear, but the Charged Intake 4 aims to include reliable underfoot cushioning that is plush yet flexible, as well as a versatile construction that welcomes a multitude of activities. The breathable upper works with the sturdy configuration to ensure that the overall performance is agreeable and comfortable."
New Balance 880 v7,,91.0,86.0,169.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 9.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Jun 2017,,,"7 reasons to buy
The shoe is available in wide and extra-wide widths, making some wide-footed runners truly satisfied.
Many of the users observed that the New Balance 880 v7 had ample room in the toe-box for toe-splay.
The majority of the wearers mentioned that the shoe is very comfortable.
The engineered mesh that featured perforations gained positive feedback from the users because it provided breathability all throughout the run.
A few runners with plantar fasciitis mentioned that with the New Balance 880 v7, they experienced lesser heel pain.
The lightweight construction of the shoe received praise.
A lot of testers admired the durable cushioning of the shoe, which made it great for long-distance runs.
2 reasons not to buy
A few mentioned that the tongue did not stay in place.
The toe box is too shallow, as observed by some wearers.
Bottom line
The New Balance 880 v7 is a road running shoe highly admired by its users. Many runners were appreciative of the shoe’s durable cushioning, comfortable fit, and breathable construction. This well-cushioned, neutral shoe is best for those who are looking for a reliable running shoe for long-distance runs."
Salomon S-Lab Ultra,,94.0,97.0,85.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 10.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Salomon S-Lab Ultra 2,"8 reasons to buy
The upper of the S-Lab Ultra had a fit that felt like a glove, according to a commenter.
One runner was amazed that the shoe gave no blisters after a marathon.
The midsole absorbed shock efficiently, despite being not as cushioned as other racing shoes, a customer wrote.
A reviewer shared that the shoe felt surprisingly nimble on rocky trails.
The Quicklace™ feature enabled an even and secure fit, said a user.
Many buyers liked the shoe’s improved forefoot cushioning.
An amazed runner claimed that the outsole was grippy enough for mountain trails.
The redesigned lace pocket on the tongue was now easier to use, a commenter wrote.
4 reasons not to buy
The toe box was too short and too narrow, complained a user. Another said it was too rigid and less flexible because of the added material.
There was not a lot of grip on wet rocks, a runner observed.
Some users criticized how the shoe required a break-in period.
One buyer thought the S-Lab Ultra was expensive.
Bottom line
Salomon has successfully improved the predecessor, as evident in the number of compliments for the S-Lab Ultra. Users were quick to note that the enhancements were noticeable, therefore efficient. While there were a few disapprovals about sizing and price, the consensus was in favor of the S-Lab Ultra, because of its purposeful features, comfortable ride, and impressive performance."
Topo Athletic Ultrafly,,90.0,85.0,57.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,, Topo Athletic Ultrafly 3,"6 reasons to buy
One buyer shared that the shoe performed very well during long runs.
Several users were satisfied with the fit of the shoe and how it wrapped nicely around the foot.
Based on the feedback of many consumers, the cushioning system was able to provide a comfortable ride, either on road or softer pavements.
A runner commended the arch support provided by the shoe and how great it felt during up-tempo runs.
Many users admired the roomy yet non-exaggeratedly spacious toe box.
The shoe’s weight and how it contributed to the overall experience was well-regarded.
1 reasons not to buy
The big toe pounded against the front of the shoe and made running uncomfortable, according to a couple of runners.
Bottom line
Presenting a bouncy ride and a commendable flexibility, the Topo Athletic Ultrafly provides enough guidance without forcing the movement of the foot. The shoe is touted to be durable and agreeable for moderate long tempo runs and tough road running. A few users hinted on improvement areas such as the weight and the structure, but it’s considered to be an overall satisfactory running shoe."
Asics Gel FujiTrabuco 8,,77.0,,8.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 13.2oz , Women: 10.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The Asics Gel FujiTrabuco 8 offers a firm grip, according to many users. 
A lot of runners commented that this shoe is comfortable. 
This running partner is supportive, said some buyers. 
Several reviewers mentioned that the shoe is responsive. 
A few purchasers admired the outsole’s durability.
2 reasons not to buy
A wearer reported that the Asics Gel FujiTrabuco 8 has a tendency to hold moisture.
The upper material has fallen apart after only a few uses, some testers reported.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel FujiTrabuco 8 is designed to provide comfort and protection to the runners even in the most technical terrains. It works best for users with neutral gaits or those who do not overpronate. This shoe incorporates durable materials and advanced technologies, making the platform suitable for long-distance and off-road running."
Hoka One One Hupana,,88.0,85.0,499.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.2oz , Women: 6.3oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,, Hoka One One Hupana 2,"11 reasons to buy
A lot of consumers appreciated the lightweight nature of the Hoka One One Hupana, stating that it didn’t drag their feet down.
Several purchasers wrote that the upper was able to give a locked-in feel in the mid-foot.
Those who have tried this shoe were able to use it for many kinds of activities, even casual walks; they noted that it remained efficient throughout.
The underfoot cushioning was firm yet responsive to the movements of the foot, some runners commented.
This running shoe looked visually appealing, according to some reviewers.
A heavyset tester was happy that the cushioning system was durable and long-lasting, noting that it was a winner for those with heavier weights.
Runners praised the traction-capability of the RMAT platform; they felt that it held the ground well.
The price is very reasonable based on its performance and durability.
The first Hoka shoe that does not look ridiculous, based on the comments of many reviewers.
The versatility of the Hupana includes speed work, fartleks, and high-mileage running.
A handful of expert reviewers were amazed by the smooth transitions, including a very nice toe-off phase from this shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
The toe-box was uncomfortably narrow, noted a dissatisfied runner.
Some runners noticed that the upper is quite stiff all throughout the shoe.
A handful of expert reviewers and some runners found the upper to lack breathability.
Bottom line
A lot of runners enjoyed the Hoka One One Hupana. They welcomed its simple yet eye-catching design, as well as its comfortable cushioning. Neutral runners were happy that it was able to allow them to move naturally without compromising the cushioning. The lightweight nature of this road shoe also received positive recognition. Inversely, some runners had some complaints about the width, as well as the construction of the upper."
Brooks Cascadia 13,,88.0,89.0,337.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.9oz , Women: 10.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Brooks Cascadia 14,"6 reasons to buy
The traction capability of the Brooks Cascadia 13 was lauded by many of those who have tested it.
The availability of a wide-width version was welcomed by those who had broad foot-dimensions.
Some consumers welcomed the airflow granted by the upper unit.
The underfoot cushioning system was deemed comfortable and easy on the muscles of the legs.
Some runners liked that the outsole wasn’t too aggressive; they were able to tackle the roads with ease.
There were no blisters and hot spots while wearing the Cascadia 13, according to several purchasers.
1 reasons not to buy
The eyelets ripped apart after several uses, a tester claimed.
Bottom line
The Brooks Cascadia 13 was mostly well-received by trail running enthusiasts. They apparently liked its versatile outsole unit, stating that the roads weren’t a problem. The cushioning unit, the rubber exterior, and the fabrics on the upper were also given praise. Overall, this trail running shoe for neutral runners proved to be a worthy update to the series."
Reebok Floatride Run Fast Pro,,86.0,94.0,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 3.5oz , Women: 3.5oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Reebok Floatride Run Fast London Pro,"5 reasons to buy
The lightweight nature of the Reebok Floatride Run Fast Pro was lauded by most consumers; they liked wearing it for extended
Several testers claimed that the underfoot platform was supportive.
Running in this running shoe felt fast, according to some purchasers.
The design of this running shoe was lauded; people felt that it looked visually appealing.
The responsiveness of the midsole gained praise; runners observed that it gave energy for a livelier step.
1 reasons not to buy
Some consumers noted that the price tag of the Reebok Floatride Run Fast Pro was overly expensive.
Bottom line
The Reebok Floatride Run Fast Pro was considered by many running enthusiasts to be a practical option for the roads. It was deemed very lightweight for all-day wear. Moreover, the responsiveness and efficacy of the underfoot platform were considered to be highly reliable. On the other hand, the price of this neutral shoe didn’t sit well with some runners."
Brooks Beast 14,,92.0,87.0,599.0,,, Road, Motion control, Men: 13.8oz , Women: 12.2oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Brooks Beast '20,"7 reasons to buy
The Element Mesh and Element Lining make sure that the foot gets coverage that’s water-repellent, keeping the shoe dry and cool at the same time.
The mid foot area offers a snugger fit to keep the foot in place, according to some reviews.
The mid-sole of the Beast 14 utilizes the DNA Cushioning Gel and the BioMoGo environmentally friendly mid-sole component to adapt to the wearer’s needs, ensuring a customized underfoot platform.
A few number of runners took note of the shoe's stability.
The Tuned Density Midsole gives a custom ride that’s tailored to the gender and weight of the wearer.
Traction over dry and wet surfaces is afforded by a robust and feature-filled outsole unit based on the comments of some runners.
Some noted that flexibility is provided for the wearer, allowing more natural movement in the forefoot area.
4 reasons not to buy
There were testers who noted that the mid-sole unit started to break down after a few months of use.
It has a narrow fit, which isn’t very ideal for those with wide feet.
It is slightly heavy.
The shoe is expensive.
Bottom line
The Beast 14 from Brooks is an expensive but high quality running shoe. And very much like the Beast 18, it gives stability and control to those who have severe over-pronation of the foot. The individual components are efficient and they work together well to make this shoe a great choice for daily road running."
Nike LunarEpic Flyknit,,92.0,84.0,237.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.7oz , Women: 6.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
The soft, form-fitting upper and cozy interior creates a very comfortable run.
A good number of runners liked the LunarEpic Flyknit’s plush cushioning.
It is flexible.
It is light.
The shoe can be used as a long-distance trainer or for shorter and faster runs, based on several comments from runners.
Nike’s unique Flywire helps secure the midfoot in snug comfort.
Two sockliners, one 4mm and another 6mm version, for better and personalized fit.
A small number of runners use the shoe for casual wear.
Unbelievable traction on a multitude of surfaces, based on several testers’ comments.
4 reasons not to buy
Nike’s LunarEpic in Flyknit is very expensive.
Others were having reservations about the mid-rise design of the upper.
The fit is too narrow for several runners.
Some said that the upper has several durability issues.
Bottom line
The Nike LunarEpic Flyknit is a stylistically-unique lightweight shoe that offers a seamless upper that fits like a second skin, decent arch support, and very comfortable ride. This is a versatile shoe that can take on various kinds of runs because of the responsive and durable Lunarlon foam. It feels fast and looks really nice for casual wear."
Hoka One One Mafate Speed 2,,84.0,85.0,41.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.6oz , Women: 9.6oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Most customers lauded the amazing traction they experienced on very challenging surfaces.
The runners highlighted the excellent durability of the Hoka One One Mafate Speed 2 since the pair held up great even, after many miles of running.
Most individuals liked the cushioning of the running shoes.
The customers admired how the pair was available in several eye-catching color schemes.
The runners appreciated the light weight of the shoe since it enabled them to do extra miles.
The users found the Mafate Speed 2’s toe box comfortably wide and spacious.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners thought that the shoe’s toe-box was narrow since they felt chafing in the forefoot region.
A user mentioned that this newer version was missing the ‘walking on cloud’ feeling and was therefore not as comfortable as its previous version.
A few customers had blisters from running in these shoes.
Bottom line
The second iteration of the Hoka One One Mafate Speed has undoubtedly caused a stir in the running community through its newer, more intelligent design which was established to offer a firmer, smoother and durable ride. While the shoe offers numerous benefits, some believed that it would’ve been more agreeable with a wider toe-box."
Hoka One One Mach 3,,87.0,85.0,10.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.6oz , Women: 7.1oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Many runners appreciate the lightweight structure of the Hoka One One Mach 3.
Numerous wearers are satisfied with the comfort that this shoe provides. 
The flexible outsole gained praise from several users. 
It offers excellent cushioning, based on some reviews. 
A few commenters mention that this running partner is supportive. 
One buyer claims that it delivers reliable underfoot protection.
It is also perfect for treadmill and gym sessions, according to some purchasers.
3 reasons not to buy
A couple of testers observe that the Hoka One One Mach 3 is a little narrow.
One consumer said that the tongue dugs into his foot, causing discomfort. 
A runner noticed that this shoe is not as breathable as its predecessors.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Mach 3 is a neutral running shoe that is suitable for runners with neutral gaits or those who supinate. Its lightweight design is also ideal for 10 kilometer runs to half marathons. This shoe is a perfect option for consumers who are looking for a comfortable, flexible, and durable running companion."
Nike Flex Experience RN 8,,88.0,,1726.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,, Nike Flex Experience RN 9,"7 reasons to buy
People have noted that the lightweight construction of the Nike Flex Experience RN 8 has allowed them to wear it all day.
‘Comfortable’ is a word that many have used to describe their overall experience when wearing this Nike running shoe.
The versatility of this product is lauded by those who like their footwear to be a mix of functionality and style.
Consumers are generally happy with the affordable price of this neutral running shoe.
The flexibility has gained praise as it apparently permitted the foot to move naturally through the gait cycle.
Most runners have noted that the durability of the components is commendable; the shoe didn’t break down quickly.
The cushioning system is praised for being responsive and able to encourage speedy steps.
4 reasons not to buy
According to some testers, the midsole has a tendency to emit an annoying squeaking noise when taking each step.
The scant use of rubber on the outsole brought with it a tendency for the shoe to quickly succumb to slipping, several users commented.
A few consumers claim that the forefoot section is a bit tight.
Some runners have reported cases of the upper quickly separating from the midsole after only a few uses.
Bottom line
The overall feedback for the Nike Flex Experience RN 8 has been mixed. The positive points are present and numerous, but the negative elements still made themselves known. Praise is given to the versatility of the silhouette, the lightweight build, the durability of the materials, and the flexibility of the midsole. On the other hand, criticism is afforded to the squeaking noise of the platform and the slip-magnet of an outsole.
Fans of road running shoes that are designed for neutral pronation are the ones who are going to enjoy the Flex Experience RN 8."
Nike Free RN 2017,,90.0,87.0,4801.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.4oz , Women: 6.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Nike Free RN 5.0,"6 reasons to buy
Many users found the Free RN 2017 to be comfortable and lightweight.
The shoe offers a running experience that is similar to running barefoot on grass, as commented by a reviewer.
It provided a secure fit without constraining the foot, stated one runner.
Several runners appreciated that the shoe was very easy to slip on or off.
A lot of buyers mentioned that it is sleek and stylish at an affordable price.
A majority of users was satisfied with the flexibility of the Free RN 2017 as they were able to run longer miles.
2 reasons not to buy
The lacing system was not very efficient as it came undone several times while running, a couple of runners observed.
One user felt that the upper, particularly the apparently narrow toe box and flimsy lacing system, is an area that needs improvement.
Bottom line
The Free RN 2017 is recommended for runners who are looking for both cushioning and flexibility. Many users have been satisfied with the level of comfort and flexibility the shoe has provided. With its excellent durability, the shoe has met expectations of standing well to wear, even with daily use."
New Balance 940 v2,,93.0,90.0,499.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 12oz , Women: 11.3oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, New Balance 940 v4,"7 reasons to buy
Even after a few strides, most of the runners have noted how stable the New Balance 940 v2 is.
The 940 v2 is packed with some of New Balance’s most popular and reliable stability features.
It is slightly lighter and more flexible than the original model.
New Balance incorporates the N2 cushioning in the heel area to provide better shock absorption and cushioning in this part of the shoe.
The inclusion of the T-beam shank in this version enhances the overpronation control measures of the shoe.
The cushioning has gone up a couple of levels better, according to those who have compared this version and the original.
The New Balance 940 v2 is not clunky on the road based on the comments of several users.
2 reasons not to buy
The arch support and overpronation control measures is a bit too prominent for slight overpronators.
Most reviewers noted that the shoe runs big overall.
Bottom line
New Balance cranks up the overpronation control measures of the 940 v2 that slight overpronators may find it too jarring. Moderate overpronators get a heavy dose of arch support and a bit of flexibility in the shoe without going all the way to motion control shoes."
Salomon Sonic RA Pro 2,,89.0,82.0,47.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 6.5oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The reactive midsole of the Salomon Sonic RA Pro 2 is lauded for energizing the toe-offs attenuating the landing impacts.
The platform is praised for giving a well-balanced ride that doesn’t buckle the foot.
Several testers have welcomed the curved midfoot design which apparently supported the arch.
Most testers claim that this Salomon running shoe is light enough to permit all-day wear.
A couple of runners appreciate the padding on the rear of the upper, stating that it suitably secured the Achilles tendon in place.
The upper unit is welcomed by those who like breathability and form-fitting security.
2 reasons not to buy
A few consumers claim that the collar of the Sonic RA Pro 2 has a tendency to rub uncomfortably against the skin.
According to a couple of testers, the rubber used for the outsole unit has a tendency to wear off quickly.
Bottom line
The overall feedback of consumers for the Salomon Sonic RA Pro 2 is positive. A majority of them are glad because this road running shoe is able to deliver reactive performances without being too heavy or unwieldy. The highlighted sections also include the secure in-shoe experience and the steady platform. On the other hand, the irritating collar and quick-to-wear rubber outsole are criticized.
Fans of neutral running shoes that are for flat surfaces like the asphalt and groomed dirt paths are the target market of the Sonic RA Pro 2."
Asics Gel Venture 6 MX, Asics,90.0,,5826.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 8.6oz,,,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
A few users commented that the Asics Gel Venture 6 MX is a good-looking shoe.
The running shoe is also great for gym training, based on a few reviews.
A tester said that the quality of the shoe is impressive.
According to a purchaser, the price is affordable.
The shoe is breathable.
The Venture 6 MX runs true to size.
1 reasons not to buy
A buyer noted that is not comfortable.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Venture 6 MX is a road running shoe designed for neutral runners. The majority of the users admired the shoe’s design, breathability, and versatility. Overall, the shoe is considered to be a successful release and it is a good option for those who are looking for an affordable and visually-appealing running shoe."
Mizuno Wave Inspire 13,,91.0,82.0,707.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Mizuno Wave Inspire 16,"9 reasons to buy
Many testers noted that the Mizuno Wave Inspire 13 adhered to their preference in terms of the size schemes.
A runner reported that it felt great and it performed well on the roads.
‘Comfortable’ was used by many consumers as a means to describe their time wearing this shoe.
Several reviewers stated that this version was suitably more cushioned than the previous ones.
The cushioning system was responsive and agreeable, according to several commenters.
A runner wrote that the toe box was roomy enough to allow natural toe-splaying.
According to a purchaser, the Mizuno Wave Inspire 13 felt lighter than the previous stability shoes they’ve used.
Runners generally didn’t have concerns when it came to the durability of this running shoe.
This version was touted by its users as a great evolution to the long-running series.
4 reasons not to buy
The fit was a little loose in the middle section of the shoe, commented a tester.
A runner didn’t like the laces much because they wrote that it easily came loose and that it gave the impression that it could easily break.
According to a purchaser, the cushioning near the heel area wasn’t very efficient because it felt as though the rear of the foot was falling through the bottom.
The midsole felt hard and inflexible, complained a consumer; it apparently diminished the potential for natural movement during the running session, as well as causing some foot discomfort.
Bottom line
The Wave Inspire 13 from Mizuno worked well for a great number of runners, especially those who desired reliable stability and performance. They noted that its components were dependable and efficient, making it a solid choice for the roads. On the other hand, there were those who had some concerns with its general construction and quality."
Asics Gel Nimbus 22 Knit,,83.0,,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 13mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The upper unit of the Asics Gel Nimbus 22 Knit is welcomed because of the breathability that it provides.
Impact-attenuation is a trait that some people have appreciated from the midsole unit of this neutral running shoe.
Several purchasers are happy because the outsole unit is traction-ready at all times.
The general durability of the materials has been lauded by those who like sturdily-made footwear.
Based on a couple of reviews, the in-shoe experience is not irritating to the skin of the foot.
2 reasons not to buy
Some users believe that the forefoot section of this product is a bit restrictive.
A few testers have observed some holes developing from the upper unit’s forefoot section.
Bottom line
Aiming for more substance to go along with its style, the Asics Gel Nimbus 22 Knit employs a knitted upper unit. The material is has a self-weave design that is seamless and stretchy. It also has a smooth and sleek look that evokes quality construction and fashion-forward design choices. A combination of technologies graces the midsole unit, offering comfort, speed, and energy to the runner throughout the running session."
Asics Gel Nimbus 17,,94.0,89.0,3182.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 13mm,,, Asics Gel Nimbus 22,"5 reasons to buy
The upper unit of the 17th version of the Asics Gel Nimbus is able to adapt to the foot of the wearer, giving a glove-like coverage.
An external heel counter keeps the heel locked down, preventing slippage and any accidental shoe removal.
The interior lining is made up of a soft material that is not irritating to the skin.
The cushioning systems of this shoe were appreciated by many because it was able to support their feet responsibly.
The rubber technologies in the outsole deliver sure protection and traction.
2 reasons not to buy
A few of the testers observed that the outsole wore out after only a few months.
Some noted that their toes went numb because the forefoot area was a bit stiff and narrow for them.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Nimbus 17 is a neutral running shoe that gained positive feedback from users. It offers comfortable performance on the roads. This running shoe has the cushioning runners need to get through their running sessions with ease. The appealing look of the shoe makes it endearing to modern athletes."
Mizuno Wave Sky,,94.0,88.0,451.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Mizuno Wave Sky 3,"8 reasons to buy
According to some runners, the Mizuno Wave Sky has the right amount of cushioning needed for long-distance running.
Several runners admired the comfortable feel of the shoe.
Some wearers noticed that the shoe required no break-in period.
A good number of users admired the versatility of the Mizuno Wave Sky; they said that it’s also good for walking, gym training, and as a casual shoe.
A couple of testers lauded the good-looking design and the available colorways.
Most of the runners admired the responsive feel of the Wave Sky.
Based on some user reviews, the shoe was able to provide a great amount of support.
It runs true to size, based on some comments.
2 reasons not to buy
The Mizuno Wave Sky is slightly expensive, based on a few reviews.
The shoe has a narrow toe-box, said some users; it apparently didn’t give enough space for natural toe-spread.
Bottom line
Most of those who tried the Mizuno Wave Sky admired the shoe’s high level of cushioning, as well as the plush and flexible ride. It has the right amount of underfoot protection for short and long-distance runs. This road shoe is packed with reliable technologies that deliver a good combination of comfort, stability, and performance."
Altra Lone Peak 4.0 Mid RSM,,88.0,84.0,175.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 12.9oz , Women: 10.7oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Some runners described the Altra Lone Peak 4.0 Mid RSM as a very comfortable trail running shoe.
Several reviewers claimed that the Lone Peak 4.0 Mid RSM is very effective in keeping the foot dry and warm, especially on wet and cold running conditions.
Many users were pleased by the shoe’s comfortable fit.
A few buyers were happy with the shoe’s wide toe-box.
The shoe is very durable, a reviewer commented.
A coupled of wearers mentioned that the shoe offers nice ankle support.
2 reasons not to buy
One purchaser said that the Altra Lone Peak 4.0 Mid RSM is overpriced.
The shoe is heavy, some users noticed.
Bottom line
As a trail running shoe, the Altra Lone Peak 4.0 Mid RSM gathered mixed reviews from the users. Compliments were focused on the shoe waterproof coverage, comfortable fit, and wide toe-box. A few expressed disappointments on the weight and sizing. In summary, many runners agreed that the shoe is a worthy investment."
Asics Gel Noosa Tri 11,,94.0,91.0,598.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.4oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Noosa Tri 12,"6 reasons to buy
Many runners appreciated the Engineered Mesh upper, which delivered breathable coverage that’s lightweight and responsive.
The seamless construction allows runners to wear it without the use of socks, essentially preventing skin irritation.
The Elastic Laces were welcomed by many testers because it helped them wear the shoe quickly without fumbling with the shoelaces.
The colorful designs of the men and women’s versions were well-received.
The 11th version of the Gel Noosa Tri is lighter than the previous iteration.
A lot of reviewers noted that the durability of this running shoe was dependable.
2 reasons not to buy
A few runners noted that it was a bit narrow in the toe area because they felt their small toes hitting the lateral edge of the shoe uncomfortably.
Some did not like the upper unit because, to them, it looked as if it were made of plastic.
Bottom line
A popular series continues to thrive with the Gel Noosa Tri 11 from Asics. This new version features an updated upper design, a more comfortable set of exterior & interior fabrics, and a more lightweight nature than its predecessor. It’s a solid choice for daily training for those who have over-pronated foot motion."
Mizuno Wave Inspire 14,,91.0,85.0,506.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 8.7oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Mizuno Wave Inspire 16,"7 reasons to buy
Most testers lauded the general quality of the materials used for the Mizuno Wave Inspire 14.
Heel strikers welcomed the shock attenuating platform of this running shoe.
The midsole helped some runners in preventing knee and back pain during activities.
Some purchasers appreciated the stability features in the midsole, stating that it suitably corrected their stance.
Those who had plantar fasciitis claimed that the combination of technologies in the midsole helped in staving off their discomfort.
The color schemes gained the favor of some shoe enthusiasts.
A few consumers noted that the Inspire 14 was lightweight.
1 reasons not to buy
Several testers felt that it was too narrow around the toe box.
Bottom line
Not a lot of complaints were listed on the Mizuno Wave Inspire 14. In fact, many people liked this iteration in the long-running series. They claimed that it shielded their feet, knees and back from discomfort. They also welcomed this stability shoe’s lightweight nature and trendy color schemes. There were complaints about the fit being too narrow, but they weren’t a lot of people who felt that way."
Salomon Speedcross 3 CS,,97.0,90.0,394.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 11mm , Women: 11mm,,, Salomon Speedcross 4 CS,"5 reasons to buy
The water repellent textile in the upper of the Speedcross 3 CS provides a semi-waterproof protection.
It has a mudguard technology at the base of the shoe.
Most runners mentioned that the 3rd version of the Speedcross CS offered great underfoot comfort.
It features a quick lacing system for easy-on and easy off.
The upper comes with an anti-debris mesh.
3 reasons not to buy
Available at a slightly expensive price.
Some runners took note that some materials tore off quicker than expected.
Size runs small and it is way too narrow for some runners.
Bottom line
Bring speed and quality performance to the trails with the Speedcross CS 3 from Salomon. The protective upper, weather protection and aggressive tread are the things this running shoe offers to the trail runners. This shoe is ideal for short runs and daily running."
Newton Kismet,,94.0,85.0,88.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 8.2oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,, Newton Kismet 6,"5 reasons to buy
The Kismet is a lightweight pair of shoe.
It features the breathable seamless mesh upper.
The Newton Kismet features the extended medial bridge for enhanced stability.
Some runners were satisfied with the cushioning and stability features of the shoe.
It features 360 degree reflectivity for increased visibility in low light.
3 reasons not to buy
Not durable as expected, according to some reviews.
Laces are not long enough, according to some testers.
A slightly expensive running shoe.
Bottom line
The Newton Kismet is a stability running shoe that is light weight and comfortable. This shoe will improve your running experience with its cushioning and comfort. This shoe is great for competitions and daily training. Based on the user reviews, the Kismet has proven to be a reliable running companion."
New Balance 1500 v5,,91.0,83.0,71.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 8.1oz , Women: 6.9oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,, New Balance 1500 v6,"6 reasons to buy
People liked the color schemes that were available for the New Balance 1500 v5, stating that the hues were arresting.
The general quality of the materials used for this product was dependable and agreeable, according to several testers.
Based on a handful of reviews, the midsole unit of this running shoe was responsive and comfortable.
Some purchasers noticed that the weight of this shoe was light enough to handle all-day running sessions.
The drop factor of the midsole wasn’t too limiting or unstable, based on several user comments.
The New Balance 1500 v5 enables a firm and fast ride, as observed by some runners.
2 reasons not to buy
The toe box is too narrow, providing no wiggle room, according to a reviewer.
The insole feels thin and less responsive, as mentioned by a few wearers.
Bottom line
Neutral pronators are the target audience of the New Balance 1500 v5. Those who have tested the New Balance 1500 v5 were mainly happy with what it had to offer. The design and color schemes became a particular highlight for appreciators of aesthetically pleasing shoe-façades. The comfortable midsole and lightweight build were also hailed as aspects that made this product alluring. On the other hand, there were a few people who observed issues on fit and feel aspects."
,,,79.0,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,
Saucony Cohesion 10,,90.0,,4612.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Saucony Cohesion 13,"11 reasons to buy
A large number of the reviewers commented that the 10th edition of the Cohesion was extremely comfortable.
It is very affordable.
It is lighter than the previous model.
The shoe has surprisingly good durability, considering its price point, as reported by many runners.
There were several reviewers who loved the way the shoe feels despite hours of work on their feet.
More than a handful stated that they got compliments for how the Cohesion 10 looks.
A good number of runners mentioned that they did not a break in period in this shoe.
The support is highly appreciated by some runners and gym rats.
Some reviewers use it for gym workouts.
Available in multiple colors and widths.
Features reflective elements for low-light running.
3 reasons not to buy
A handful noted that the forefoot cushioning is noticeably stiffer than the earlier model.
It runs a little small and narrow, according to a few runners.
The outsole grip is not as good when it rains, as noticed by some runner.
Bottom line
The Saucony Cohesion 10 is clearly a steal when one recognizes its value as a hard-nosed trainer or as a long-distance runner. While this lacks the best technologies from Saucony, it does offer a no-nonsense approach to those who require a moderately cushioned neutral shoe that does exactly and a bit more than expected. This lightweight running shoe is also perfect for those who are recreational runners, middle of the pack participants, entry-level runners and those who are budget conscious."
Salomon X Alpine Pro,,89.0,92.0,8.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
A lot of reviewers have complimented the Salomon X Alpine Pro for being very flexible. 
The mesh upper provides superior protection, commented several experts. 
Some runners appreciate the flexibility delivered by the shoe. 
The shoe offers a secure fit when running; no slippage issues, stated many users. 
The traction of the shoe is suited for any type of trail challenge, commended some reviewers. 
Numerous testers have recognized the heel collar of the X AlpinePro for the exceptional heel hold it offers. 
Many people claim that the EnergyCell midsole of the shoe is very supportive. 
Treading through different terrains, the shoe has been able to provide sufficient stability, mentioned many experts.
4 reasons not to buy
Salomon X Alpine Pro takes some time to break in, remarked some of the wearers. 
The shoe can be too firm, commented some runners. 
Some of the people have stated that the shoe is too expensive. 
According to some users, the shoe is too heavy. 
Bottom line
Salomon has once again effectively used its years of crafting trail running shoes by producing the Salomon X Alpine Pro. Although not feathery light, this shoe has kept its promise of delivering exceptional durability and grip. Many of the runners are very pleased with the level of protection it offers. Given all the technical components of the shoe, many experts claim that this shoe can practically tread through any type of terrain. "
Hoka One One Arahi 2,,91.0,90.0,467.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 7.7oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,, Hoka One One Arahi 4,"8 reasons to buy
Many people appreciated the stability mechanics present in the Hoka One One Arahi 2.
The roomy forefoot section gained favor for accommodating natural toe-splay.
Several people felt that its weight was lighter than most stability shoes.
The cushioning system felt suitably comfortable and responsive, according to most reviewers.
Some runners welcomed the midfoot fit as it was agreeable and unrestrictive.
The design and color schemes received positive feedback for being visually appealing.
The sizing scheme adhered to the expectations of most purchasers.
A runner stated that the outsole was sturdy enough to function well on both roads and groomed trails.
5 reasons not to buy
A consumer reported that the underfoot platform was stiff and unresponsive that it caused blistering on the arches.
The lacing system tended to dig into the skin of the instep, according to a tester.
There were complaints about the heel collar not correctly securing the foot; it apparently caused unintentional shoe removals.
A few runners observed the outsole peeling off after only a few uses.
There was a complaint about the tongue unit being too short; it apparently didn’t cushion the top of the foot.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Arahi 2 received mostly positive reviews from those who have tried it. This stability shoe apparently performed to the expectations of the majority, with most commending its stable and comfortable sole unit, its agreeable looks, and its robust construction. But there were those who had complaints about the design and the components, stating that these issues caused discomfort and an inconsistent fit."
Saucony Guide 9,,89.0,86.0,1383.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 8.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Saucony Guide 13,"9 reasons to buy
A lot of runners welcomed the eye-catching color schemes of the Saucony Guide 9.
Numerous testers reported that this shoe didn’t feel tight or restrictive; for them, it was true to its size.
The stability feature was reliable and not intrusive, according to several runners.
Those who have tried it indicated that the cushioning system of this shoe felt adequately responsive.
Many consumers appreciated the traction given by the rubber outsole unit.
Several testers commented that they were able to get great value for its price; they liked the quality of this version.
The durability of the Guide 9 was lauded and commended.
Some testers who tended to experience foot pain while running didn’t complain of such when wearing this shoe.
The toe box was roomy enough to accommodate natural toe-splaying, wrote several runners.
3 reasons not to buy
After only a few months of use, the upper unit’s fabric tore off on a tester.
According to several runners, the heel area of cushioning system broke down and rendered the platform unstable.
The fabric in the rear section of the upper tended to rub against the skin of some runners, causing some irritation.
Bottom line
The 9th version of the Saucony Guide was able to deliver great service to a lot of runners who needed support and stability for their activities on the pavement. They lauded its responsive and reliable components. Basically, they were satisfied with it. But such wasn’t the case for a few disgruntled consumers who thought that it some of its parts weren’t durable or agreeable to their feet."
361 Degrees Meraki 2,,85.0,89.0,10.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.3oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Many runners are satisfied by the lightweight running experience delivered by the 361 Degrees Meraki 2. 
According to several testers, the shoe is very durable; it does not easily wear and is resistant to abrasion. 
Numerous wearers admire the springy ride delivered by the QU!K Flex 4 Foot engineering of the shoe. 
Some users are very appreciative of the fit of the shoe. 
When in motion, the QU!KFOAM midsole of the Meraki 2 delivers a very comfortable ride. 
A few runners commend the good traction delivered by this neutral running shoe. 
Sufficient support has been provided by the shoe, said some purchasers. 
2 reasons not to buy
One user states that the Meraki 2 employs laces that are too long. 
The shoe can cause some irritation as it rubs against the foot, especially on the lateral area, a reviewer noted.
Bottom line
Built for both comfort and performance, the 361 Degrees Meraki 2 has received a mix response from the running community. There are some concerns regarding the shoe causing some irritation, especially on the lateral area. However, many of the runners and experts are very satisfied with the comfort delivered by the shoe, which has been the promised feature of the shoe. The shoe, according to many, is able to deliver a springy and propulsive ride. That is why many have claimed that they will surely recommend this runner to their peers. 
 "
Saucony Cohesion 9,,91.0,84.0,2282.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Saucony Cohesion 13,"7 reasons to buy
The Saucony Cohesion 9 was durable, according to many reviewers.
A lot of testers and reviewers wrote that the 9th version of the Cohesion was true to its size.
The cushioning system was appreciated by a lot of consumers, and they thought that it was adequately soft and responsive.
According to several runners, wearing this running shoe staved off muscle pain or discomfort in the foot.
Most consumers acclimated well to its affordable price.
A runner commented that though it didn’t have a hefty price, its quality was still competent and reliable.
The outsole was able to deliver reliable surface traction, wrote many reviewers.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners felt that the mid-sole unit wasn’t very flexible and that it limited the natural movement of the foot.
A few testers didn’t feel comfortable while wearing this shoe; for them, the cushioning wasn’t very efficient.
Bottom line
The Saucony Cohesion 9 became a popular shoe because of its efficient components and features. Many neutral runners commended its comfortable cover system, it’s responsive midsole and its traction-capable outsole tread. On the other hand, a number of consumers didn’t like the performance of this road shoe. For them, it was stiff, it wasn’t responsive enough, or it didn’t fit well."
Reebok Liquifect, Reebok,90.0,90.0,8.0,$80,$60 (save 85%)," Road, Treadmill", Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
The Reebok Liquifect has a midsole unit that is deemed comfortable by most users.
The full-length cushioning system of this road running shoe is welcomed for its durable yet responsive construction.
Some consumers are happy that the padded collar is able to properly support the ankles and heel.
The rubber outsole of this product is welcomed because it is able to provide a reliable grip on the ground.
Several people have mentioned that the upper unit isn’t irritating to the skin of the foot.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people have noted that the midfoot section of the upper unit is a bit restrictive.
According to a couple of purchasers, the upper has a tendency to separate from the platform.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of people towards the Reebok Liquifect has been positive. This neutral running shoe is welcomed because of its agreeable underfoot platform, its traction-ready outsole, and its smooth in-shoe wrap. Conversely, the restrictive midfoot and flimsy durability are noted as the negative aspects.
Fans of running footwear that can handle the roads can enjoy the Reebok Liquifect."
Brooks Levitate 3 LE,,82.0,,6.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.6oz , Women: 11.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Most testers believe that the Brooks Levitate 3 LE offers noticeable breathability for all-day running.
The underfoot experience is considered highly responsive and supportive, particularly during extended runs.
Some consumers have noted that the shoe's materials are durable.
The aesthetics of this neutral running shoe are welcomed by those who desire functionality and stylishness in one package.
‘Comfortable’ is a word that people have used to describe each step taken with this product support the foot.
2 reasons not to buy
For some testers, the collar is not able to secure the foot properly; they experienced some in-shoe slippage.
The stretchy collar rubs against the skin of the ankles and heel uncomfortably, according to several consumers.
Bottom line
The limited-edition iteration of the Brooks Levitate brings style and performance together as it provides top-notch energy return in a sleek-looking unit. This running shoe makes use of Brooks' tried and tested technologies for maximum comfort and protection throughout the run. Additionally, the shoe's design contributes to an efficient and energized running performance.
Fans of road running shoes that are stylish yet performance ready are the ones who are likely to have fun with the Levitate 3 LE."
Asics Frequent Trail, Asics,89.0,90.0,8.0,$60,$42 (save 30%)," Trail, Road", Neutral,,,,,," Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Normal, Wide",,"8 reasons to buy
Numerous runners said that the Asics Frequent Trail is fast and lightweight. 
It offers a mix of comfort and stability, according to several users. 
This shoe is built with just enough padding, based on reviews. 
Some wearers mention that this running partner is breathable. 
The overall quality of the shoe gained favor from a lot of commenters.
Many satisfied consumers confirm that this shoe is durable. 
It is responsive, several buyers observed. 
A few reviewers have testified that this shoe is also suitable for walking and hiking.
4 reasons not to buy
The Asics Frequent Trail is a bit narrow, some testers claimed. 
A couple of runners disliked the short shoelaces. 
One user noted that this shoe does not provide decent traction on wet surfaces.  
A runner complained that the upper material rubs on top of his feet, causing pain. 
Bottom line
The Asics Frequent Trail is a neutral running shoe that is designed specifically for light trail runs. It incorporates technical features that deliver lasting comfort, protection, and support for optimal performance. This shoe is a good choice for runners and athletes seeking a lightweight, yet durable running companion.
 "
On Cloudrush,,88.0,83.0,541.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 6.7oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Various consumers were amazed at how lightweight yet cushioned the On Cloudrush
The upper had a glove-like fit, according to many commenters.
Some users thought the midsole was responsive.
One reviewer said the Cloudrush was the fastest shoe they have ever worn.
The CloudTec pods worked well in enabling a soft landing and an energized toe-off, a runner stated.
4 reasons not to buy
A few reviewers thought the shoe did not look durable and felt that it might not withstand long runs.
The Cloudrush was not as comfortable as it claimed to be, a customer said.
One runner mentioned it was too firm despite the CloudTec pods on the outsole.
Another user reported suffering from foot fatigue after wearing the shoe for an entire day.
Bottom line
The On Cloudrush received mixed reviews from consumers. Many were satisfied with the performance of the shoe, and some were impressed with the features. However, there were a few complaints regarding the comfort. Overall, the Cloudrush proved to be a reliable footwear that delivered a responsive ride and efficient technology."
New Balance 1540 v3,,84.0,,74.0,,, Road, Motion control, Men: 14.9oz , Women: 11.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
People stated that the New Balance 1540 v3 is versatile enough to handle various activities other than running.
Several consumers claim that the underfoot experience is comfortable.
The cover system is praised by those who like a secure and uncompromising in-shoe experience.
This New Balance running shoe is apparently able to support heavyset runners, making it a durable and robust piece of performance wear.
Most testers have expressed their appreciation for the stability mechanisms of this product, stating that their strides didn’t become cumbersome because of such features.
The general durability of the materials is welcomed by many runners.
2 reasons not to buy
According to a few people, the height of the forefoot section has been shrunken, making the skin rub uncomfortably against the material.
A couple of runners have expressed their frustration towards the too-short shoelaces.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of people towards the New Balance 1540 v3 has been positive. Runners and those with underfoot problems believe that this motion control running shoe is consistent when it comes to stability. The durable and highly efficient construction is highlighted, as well. On the other hand, the upper unit’s tendency to scrape against the foot is criticized, as was the too-short shoelaces.
The New Balance 1540 v3 is a stability running shoe that aims to deliver full-bodied support for overpronated motion and foot issues like plantar fasciitis."
New Balance Vazee Pace,,88.0,83.0,254.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.5oz , Women: 6.5oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,, New Balance Vazee Pace v2,"9 reasons to buy
The upper unit of the New Balance Vazee Pace felt like a glove, according to those who tried it.
The fabrics of the upper were able to allow air into the foot chamber, and runners appreciated how it kept their feet cool and dry throughout their activities.
According to a user, the interior fabrics were smooth and it didn’t cause any discomfort or irritation.
The toe box was slightly roomy, but the rest of the cover system felt snug and secure, wrote a number of testers.
Many runners described this model as ‘comfortable’.
A reviewer wrote that the shoelaces felt rich, high-tech and stretchy; it didn’t unravel by themselves even after many miles of running.
This shoe was adequately lightweight for a lot of runners.
Users commented that the underfoot platform was reliable when it came to its capability to cushion the foot.
Based on many reviews, the outsole’s traction capability was dependable.
2 reasons not to buy
The outsole’s treads wore out on a number of testers, reducing the quality of surface traction.
A few runners noted that it was uncomfortably narrow and restricting.
Bottom line
The New Balance Vazee Pace was enjoyed by many of its testers. They were able to experience and comment about the efficient mid-sole, the comfortable upper unit, and the precise outsole rubber. But there were those who didn’t like the quality of the tread because it wore off too quickly on them, and the fit wasn’t as agreeable to others. Still, this neutral shoe became a popular choice among neutral runners."
Reebok Endless Road, Reebok,89.0,,590.0,$75,$29 (save 61%), Road, Neutral,,,,,," Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Normal, Wide", Reebok Endless Road 2,"5 reasons to buy
Some of the costumers commented that the Reebok Endless Road is very comfortable to wear.
The running shoe has a reasonable price.
A user said that his orthotics fitted perfectly in the footwear.
Based on a few reviews, the Endless Road is a good-looking shoe.
Many purchasers lauded the shoe’s excellent quality.
2 reasons not to buy
A few noticed that it feels a little stiff when running, making it hard to flex.
A tester commented that the width was too narrow.
Bottom line
Most of the consumers were made happy and satisfied with the Reebok Endless Road. They love the shoe’s good-looking design, comfort, and performance on the roads. Though a few have issues with the shoes narrow fit and stiffness,  others still recommended the running shoe because of its high-quality construction. Overall, the Reebok Endless Road is a good option for those who are looking for an affordable road running partner."
Brooks PureConnect 4,,89.0,87.0,291.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 6.6oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The PureConnect 4 stands out for its quick and effortless heel to toe movement as observed by several testers and runners.
Its average weight makes it adequate for those who do not want to be dragged down by heavy shoes.
The shoe’s comfort is appreciated by a large number of runners.
Its outsole unit provides excellent grip, even on wet ground.
It has an affordable price.
The low-cut design gives more freedom of movement.
The 6 color options make this shoe more visually appealing.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners were disappointed that the PureConnect 4 showed visible signs of wear and tear after a few months of use.
A few found the fit as just a tad narrow, particularly in the toe box area.
Others felt that the tongue didn’t have enough padding, thus making it irritating to the skin.
Bottom line
The Pure Collections 4 is the lightest one yet, and it continues to impress with great features and an appealing design. For such a lightweight running shoe, it has phenomenal arch support. It is a perfect shoe that ranks high as among versatile athletes."
New Balance Vazee Rush,,88.0,76.0,305.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.1oz , Women: 6.4oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,, New Balance Vazee Rush v2,"8 reasons to buy
Many runners were able to use the New Balance Vazee Rush for a variety of activities, including running and training.
This shoe looked visually endearing to those who have tried it.
The upper unit received praise because it allowed air into the foot-chamber, which kept the wearer cool and dry.
It had a lightweight nature, but it was dependably sturdy, commented a user.
The underfoot cushioning system was able to responsibly absorb impact shock during the landing phase of the gait cycle, noted a tester.
Several runners commented that this model held up well, even when used frequently.
This shoe was affordable and its general quality was very agreeable, wrote a lot of consumers.
According to numerous reviewers, the grip of the outsole was reliably precise.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners felt that the mid-sole unit wasn’t able to provide long-term underfoot cushioning during long races.
Others noted that it was a bit stiff, thus preventing them from achieving better freedom of movement.
A few noticed that the outsole tread wore off after only a few months of use.
Bottom line
The New Balance Vazee Rush became a popular running companion for those who needed smooth coverage, comfortable cushioning and reliable surface traction. The general durability of this road shoe was lauded, and though the outsole rubber wore off on some testers, it didn’t overshadow its efficacy as a go-to shoe for those with active lifestyles. Neutral runners still gave it solid reviews."
Xero Shoes Mesa Trail,,99.0,90.0,104.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 7.6oz , Women: 6.4oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
People love the lightweight construction of the Xero Shoes Mesa Trail. 
The shoe is highly durable, according to a lot of commenters. 
Many runners appreciated the platform’s flexibility. 
This running companion is comfortable, based on reviews. 
Most of the users confirmed that this shoe is breathable. 
The gripping performance of the outsole was praised by those who have worn this shoe.
It is also suitable for hiking and gym sessions, said some buyers. 
2 reasons not to buy
A few consumers noted that the Xero Shoes Mesa Trail does not provide enough support. 
This running shoe felt a bit wide, according to a couple of testers.
Bottom line
The Xero Shoes Mesa Trail is a lightweight and flexible running shoe that is ideal for light trails. It features vegan-friendly materials and a minimalist design, aiming to provide a comfortable and efficient running experience. This neutral running shoe is also suitable for workout sessions and all-day wear. It is a good option for runners and athletes seeking affordable, barefoot-friendly shoes."
Brooks PureCadence 7,,91.0,89.0,447.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"10 reasons to buy
Majority of the purchasers mentioned that the PureCadence 7 is a lightweight running shoe.
It has a snug fit, according to some reviews.
Many users mentioned that the shoe was comfortable. They did not experience knee pain and blisters with this version.
A lot of runners agreed that the Brooks PureCadence 7 performed well on short and long-distance runs.
Some users mentioned that it was supportive.
A runner said that he felt like ""running on air"" with this pair of shoes.
According to some reviewers, they loved its padded tongue.
A handful of users said that the style was great.
This running shoe runs true to size.
The shoe has an affordable price.
2 reasons not to buy
A purchaser commented that the width of the shoe was too tight for him.
Several testers observed that the Brooks PureCadence 7 has limited color options available.
Bottom line
The Brooks PureCadence 7 is a stability running shoe that was recommended by the majority of the runners who have tried it. Many of them appreciated the feeling of lightness it provided on short and long-distance runs. Aside from the healthy individuals, users who have experienced knee pain and blisters with the previous models gave recognition to the shoes’ comfort, support, and responsiveness. Overall, the Brooks PureCadence 7 made a lot of users happy and satisfied because of its great-looking design and excellent performance."
Asics Gel Torrance 2,,85.0,,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 9.2oz,,,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The underfoot cushioning system that is present in this road running shoe is considered responsive by most purchasers.
People have stated that the flexibility of the platform is a welcome aspect that encourages speedy steps.
The traction given by the outsole unit is treated by many runners as efficient.
Purchasers have commended the price of the Asics Gel Torrance 2, stating that it is affordable.
Several users have noted that breathability is an aspect that can easily be appreciated from this shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
Some users have noted that the inner sleeve near the forefoot section has a tendency to irritate the skin of the foot.
For several consumers, the fit of the in-shoe chamber is a bit loose.
Bottom line
Asics continues to churn out cheap running shoes that anyone can enjoy, especially neophytes who are just getting into running as an activity that they can apply to their daily lives. The straightforward design of the Asics Gel Torrance 2 allows the wearer to get into the activity with ease. Neutral pronators and casual shoe enthusiasts are also the target market for this product."
New Balance Fresh Foam Gobi Trail v3,,90.0,87.0,111.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.9oz , Women: 7.7oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Some consumers felt that the New Balance Fresh Foam Gobi Trail v3 worked well as a casual sneaker for their daily walks.
The façade of this trail companion was considered to be appealing to the eyes.
The Fresh Foam midsole compound was lauded by several testers for being comfortable, even during extended running sessions.
A lot of purchasers stated that the outsole was versatile enough to handle both trails and roads.
The capacity of the outsole to grip the ground was deemed as highly reliable, many runners commented.
The Toe Protect feature on the upper was appreciated for being able to guard the toes against the sharp objects on the trails.
2 reasons not to buy
Some users claimed that the wide version of the width wasn’t enough to accommodate broad foot dimensions.
The heel part of the upper didn’t seem able to hold the foot in place and prevent wobbling.
Bottom line
A lot of consumers were taken with the New Balance Fresh Foam Gobi Trail v3. They liked this running shoe’s outward aesthetics as they felt that it looked more like a casual shoe than a bulky and unappealing trail companion. The Fresh Foam platform and the versatile outsole were also components that received high praise from neutral runners. On the other hand, several people didn’t like the apparently too-snug width profiles while others lamented the not-too-secure upper."
New Balance Fresh Foam Crag v2, New Balance,77.0,,6.0,,, Trail, Neutral,,,,,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The Fresh Foam midsole unit of the New Balance Fresh Foam Crag v2 is praised for being responsive and comfortable.
The durability of the materials is praised by those who appreciate long-lasting shoes.
A few testers believe that the outsole is efficient on both the trails and flat surfaces.
The classic ‘90s look of the facade is appealing to those who appreciate the nostalgia.
Breathability is a trait that is nicely perceived, based on a couple of reviews.
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of testers believe that the in-shoe wrap is restrictive because of the presence of too many overlays.
The facade looks bulky, according to a consumer.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of people towards the New Balance Fresh Foam Crag v2 has been positive. This trail running shoe is praised for its nostalgic design, the traction-ready outsole, and the comfortable midsole. The shoe captures the best of style and function and puts them together for an off-road runner that is soft, light, and efficient."
Adidas Senseboost Go Winter, Adidas,78.0,,7.0,,," Road, Snow", Neutral,,,,,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Several consumers noted that the Adidas Senseboost Go Winter is comfortable.
Some users commented that the running footwear provides excellent traction in the snow and ice.
One of the buyers said that the shoe is quite good at keeping the foot cool and dry.
The majority of the purchasers commented that the Adidas Senseboost Go Winter is best used for walking and running activities. 
According to those who have tried it, the shoe is good looking. 
Based on reviews, the shoe is suited for casual and everyday wear.
3 reasons not to buy
The majority of the purchasers commented that the shoe is not waterproof.
It is a heavy shoe, according to those who have bought it.
A good number of testers said that the running footwear is not durable. The sole started to wear off after several uses only.
Bottom line
A significant number of consumers loved the Adidas Senseboost Go Winter. They agreed that the shoe features and materials are suitable for walking and running activities as well as casual occasions. Most of them were made happy because of its comfort level and design. On the other hand, the durability, waterproofness, and heaviness of the shoe became an issue to others. Despite the problems encountered, others still lauded the Adidas Senseboost Go Winter's style and breathability."
New Balance 510 v3,,84.0,85.0,2121.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 12.3oz , Women: 9.9oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, New Balance 510 v4,"8 reasons to buy
The New Balance 510 v3 was a very comfortable shoe, according to some users.
Some runners mentioned that they liked the eye-catching colors and design of the shoe.
More than a couple of runners made positive remarks on the shoe’s reliable grip on both wet and dry surfaces.
A number of users were impressed with the shoe’s reliable cushioning.
The 510 v3 was a versatile shoe; some users used it as a trail running and daily go-to shoe.
The shoe’s outsole unit was durable enough for off-road running, according to a handful of users.
According to a few users, the 510 v3 was a breathable shoe.
An affordable running shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
A number of runners mentioned that the shoe was heavy and looked bulky on their feet.
The shoe was way too narrow, said some users.
Bottom line
The New Balance 510 v3 is a trail running shoe designed for neutral foot movement. The shoe gained positive remarks because of its durability, comfort, and reliable traction while running on varied terrains. However, most of the runners were unhappy because of the tight fitting and off sizing of the shoe."
Nike Flex RN 2017,,90.0,87.0,4916.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 6.2oz, Men: 7mm , Women: 7mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Some consumers wrote that it felt great when running in the Nike Flex RN 2017.
The multi-purpose design of this shoe worked well for many users; they wrote that they were able to wear it for various activities, including running, gym workouts and casual walks.
A runner admired its lightweight nature because it kept her ankles safe from discomfort.
Many considered the price of the Nike Flex RN 2017 to be affordable.
The flexibility of the upper and the mid-sole worked well for those who wanted to take advantage of the natural movement of their feet.
The design of this product is fashionable, according to many of those who have tried it.
A majority of consumers felt that it was true-to-size.
A lot of runners noted that this shoe was generally comfortable.
3 reasons not to buy
The upper unit tore apart after only a couple of months, reported a purchaser.
Some users stated that the outsole wore away very quickly, losing its efficacy in the process.
This shoe felt narrow for several runners.
Bottom line
The overall response for the Nike Flex RN 2017 has been positive. Runners liked its cool looks, its apparently comfortable construction and its versatility on the asphalt. The casual shoe-enthusiasts were also happy about it. There were a few naysayers who reported some concerns about its durability and the fit."
Hoka One One Speedgoat Mid 2 GTX,,90.0,93.0,8.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 13.2oz , Women: 11.3oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The Hoka One One Speedgoat Mid 2 GTX performs well on snow and wet surfaces, based on reviews.
A lot of runners praised the shoe’s excellent cushioning system. 
Many users said that this running footwear offers reliable arch support. 
The majority of the users commented that this shoe is comfortable to wear. 
This running companion feels light, according to numerous wearers. 
People appreciated the waterproof feature of the shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
A few commenters noted that the Speedgoat Mid 2 GTX is a bit tight. 
Several buyers mentioned that the shoe is hard to get on and off. 
One runner reported that the tongue construction made the shoe a bit uncomfortable.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Speedgoat Mid 2 GTX is a highly durable trail running shoe that performs in a variety of weather conditions. It is crafted with a responsive midsole, aggressive outsole, and waterproof upper, which aim to enhance speed and comfort. This running shoe works best for neutral runners or those who do not overpronate."
On Cloudrush,,88.0,83.0,541.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 6.7oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Various consumers were amazed at how lightweight yet cushioned the On Cloudrush
The upper had a glove-like fit, according to many commenters.
Some users thought the midsole was responsive.
One reviewer said the Cloudrush was the fastest shoe they have ever worn.
The CloudTec pods worked well in enabling a soft landing and an energized toe-off, a runner stated.
4 reasons not to buy
A few reviewers thought the shoe did not look durable and felt that it might not withstand long runs.
The Cloudrush was not as comfortable as it claimed to be, a customer said.
One runner mentioned it was too firm despite the CloudTec pods on the outsole.
Another user reported suffering from foot fatigue after wearing the shoe for an entire day.
Bottom line
The On Cloudrush received mixed reviews from consumers. Many were satisfied with the performance of the shoe, and some were impressed with the features. However, there were a few complaints regarding the comfort. Overall, the Cloudrush proved to be a reliable footwear that delivered a responsive ride and efficient technology."
Jordan Zoom Trunner Ultimate, Jordan,90.0,90.0,6.0,$150,$120 (save 20%)," Road, Treadmill", Neutral,,,,, May 2020, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
The Jordan Zoom Trunner Ultimate is comfortable to wear, based on reviews. 
Many runners testify that this running shoe is responsive. 
The upper unit is breathable, some wearers claim. 
It is supportive, according to several consumers. 
This running partner offers a soft and bouncy feel, said some commenters. 
A lot of purchasers admire the Zoom Trunner Ultimate’s unique design.
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of testers noticed that this running shoe is hard to put on. 
A few buyers dislike the thin heel collar of the Jordan Zoom Trunner Ultimate.
Bottom line
The Jordan Zoom Trunner Ultimate is a high-performance running shoe that is ideal for runners with neutral gaits or those who supinate. Its dynamic design offers a blend of support and cushioning, making the platform suitable for conditioning runs and speed training. This shoe is recommended for consumers seeking a comfortable, breathable, and durable running companion.
 "
Nike Epic Phantom React Flyknit Icon Clash,,85.0,,8.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The Nike Epic Phantom React Flyknit Icon Clash is considered a visually endearing product that isn’t too flashy.
Several consumers believe that the slip-on design of this neutral running shoe allows them to quickly access the in-shoe experience.
The general durability of the materials is deemed reliable and spot-on with expectations.
Some individuals have stated that the upper unit is suitably breathable for extended running sessions.
According to most testers, the fabrics have a non-irritating construction that prevents hot spots and chafing.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people don’t feel very supported by the midsole during their all-day activities.
A couple of runners have noted that the forefoot section is a bit restrictive.
Bottom line
The Nike Epic Phantom React Flyknit Icon Clash is still the same uncluttered yet cool-looking running shoe that can be used for anything. The Icon Clash distinction melds sports-oriented apparel with the versatile yet accessible color schemes of stylish accoutrements for women. The predominant black silhouette of this shoe hints of crimson and bronze to bring out style without being too much."
Under Armour Charged Intake 3,,96.0,88.0,461.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 10oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Under Armour Charged Intake 4,"8 reasons to buy
A significant number of users noted that the Under Armour Charged Intake 3 is comfortable.
Several buyers commented that the shoe has a wide toe box.
The majority of the purchasers admired its lightweight structure.
One of the consumers said that he had not experienced any tight spots or blisters during and after his running activity.
Many users loved the Under Armour Charged Intake 3's perfect fit.
According to those who have tried it, the shoe has good quality.
Based on some reviews, the footwear is not only suited for running and walking but also best to wear with jeans on casual days.
The running shoe is supportive, according to several consumers.
1 reasons not to buy
One of the wearers said that the Under Armour Charged Intake 3 looked a little bulky when compared to other Under Armour shoes.
Bottom line
Designed for road running, the Under Armour Charged Intake 3 gained positive response from a lot of runners and shoe enthusiasts. The sizing and width profiles were also lauded, as well as its quality construction. Despite the issue on its bulky appearance, in general, the majority of the purchasers recommend this shoe because of its versatile design and performance on the roads."
Mizuno Wave Universe 5,,88.0,88.0,58.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 2.8oz , Women: 2.2oz, Men: 2mm , Women: 2mm,,,,"4 reasons to buy
Many runners valued the lightweight and flexible construction of the Mizuno Wave Universe 5.
The U4ic technology in the midsole is resilient and offers a smooth ride.
The G3 SOLE technology promotes great ground feel and superior traction.
Some took note of the comfortable construction of the Universe 5.
4 reasons not to buy
Some runners mentioned that the Wave Universe 5 looks ugly compared to the previous version.
According to some reviews, the shoe becomes too tight when worn with socks.
Others felt that the shoe lacks the necessary cushioning and support because of its light construction.
The Mizuno Wave Universe 5 is expensive.
Bottom line
The Mizuno Wave Universe 5 is a lightweight running shoe that offers minimal arch support, flexibility and smooth transition with every step. This shoe will not disappoint runners who are looking for a durable, fast and superior ride. With the technology used, this shoe is really a great racing partner."
The North Face Flight Trinity,,76.0,87.0,9.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The majority of those who have tested The North Face Flight Trinity like the grip capacity of the outsole unit, stating that the rubber is reliable and efficient.
A handful of runners welcome the breathable upper unit of this running shoe, claiming that the ventilation is relaxing.
Some consumers have lauded the lightweight structure of this product, believing that they could handle many obstacles because of the unrestrictive weight.
The bright and welcoming façade has received positive remarks from trail enthusiasts.
The versatility of the construction is praised; people claim that they can effortlessly use the shoe for multiple activities.
2 reasons not to buy
Several people have lamented the quickly wearing gripping lugs of the outsole unit.
The upper unit has developed tears after only a few uses, according to a surprising amount of testers.
Bottom line
Enthusiasts of off-road treks and soirees are given a chance to rejoice because of The North Face Flight Trinity. While the positive feedback for this trail companion is truly commendable, the negative points have prevented it from becoming one of the go-to classics for adventures on the unpredictable outdoor paths. The lightweight construction, the traction-ready outsole, and the breathability became highlights, but the flimsiness of the gripping lugs and the quick-to-rip upper unit overshadowed them. Neutral pronators and trail voyagers are the intended market of The North Face Flight Trinity."
Merrell Overedge,,76.0,,9.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 14.1oz , Women: 12.3oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Some of the buyers commented that the Merrell Overedge is comfortable.
According to those who have bought it, the shoe is lightweight.
It provides a great fit, as noted by a few testers.
The shoe has a roomy toe box, a purchaser observed.
Based on a review, the shoe is supportive.
One of the consumers said that the shoe is protective.
A reviewer commented that the running footwear is flexible.
A few buyers noted that the shoe is best used for walking and gym activities.
2 reasons not to buy
One of the testers thinks that the Merrell Overedge has poor quality because the material used in making the shoe is thin.
A user commented that the shoe does not provide enough protection when training.
Bottom line
The Merrell Overedge has made the majority of the users overwhelmed and contented. They were appreciative of the structure and performance of the shoe. Because of the comfort level, flexibility, and support the shoe provides, a lot of them lauded it. Although one of the users expressed his concern with its low quality, others still recommend the Merrell Overedge for those who are looking for a comfortable and well-performing running shoe."
Nike Air Zoom Wildhorse 5,,89.0,87.0,62.0,,, Trail, Neutral,,, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Apr 2019,, Nike Air Zoom Wildhorse 6,"6 reasons to buy
Most users mentioned that the Nike Air Zoom Wildhorse 5 offers a nice blend of cushioning and ground feel.
The shoe has a roomier toe-box than the previous version, noted in some reviews.
A few lauded the laced of the shoe that stayed tight all through the run.
Many runners commented that the grip of the Wildhorse 5 is excellent.
According to some reviews, the shoe is durable.
A couple of buyers said that the shoe performs both on-road and off-road surfaces.
1 reasons not to buy
A few mentioned that the Wildhorse 5 runs smaller than usual.
Bottom line
The Nike Air Zoom Wildhorse 5 is a trail running shoe designed for neutral runners. The shoe gained positive feedback from users. Some admired the shoe’s durability and grip while others are satisfied with the shoe’s roomy toe-box and cushioning. In summary, the Wildhorse 5 is indeed a successful update to the old version."
Nike Free RN Flyknit,,88.0,82.0,7923.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.6oz , Women: 6.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Nike Free RN Flyknit 3.0,"7 reasons to buy
Many were impressed by Nike Free RN Flyknit’s breathable upper coverage.
A number of runners mentioned that the cushioning is just right.
The outsole provides reliable traction while enhancing flexibility.
Many runners applauded the design of the shoe.
A significant number of runners said that the shoe is comfortable.
The shoe is available in different color options.
It is lightweight.
3 reasons not to buy
A handful of runners mentioned that they experienced blisters around the heel area.
Some users were disappointed with the shoe’s durability. The upper material wore out quickly after a few use.
Some runners found the shoe to be too narrow for their preferences.
Bottom line
A neutral shoe designed for road running, the Free RN Flyknit offers flexibility and responsiveness. Some users were impressed by the shoe's breathability, traction and comfort while others have issues with its durability and narrow fit. Overall, the shoe is still a reliable partner for daily training and short distance road running."
Adidas Pureboost RBL,,89.0,75.0,186.0,,, Road, Neutral,,, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The Adidas Pureboost RBL was perfect for both city running and walking, according to several wearers.
Numerous runners were pleased with the water-repellent feature of the shoe.
There were a lot of positive comments regarding the shoe’s design. Others also mentioned the suitability of the shoe for casual wear.
A lot of reviewers claimed the Pureboost RBL was a comfortable shoe.
The shoe provided excellent heel support, especially during running, said a commenter.
The Pureboost RBL was able to maintain a stable ride on uneven surfaces, stated a buyer.
3 reasons not to buy
One wearer thought the shoe fit smaller than expected.
The sides of the shoe wore down quickly, a disappointed user said.
A commenter reported that the side of the shoe got soaked easily after running on wet pavement.
Bottom line
The Adidas Pureboost RBL was a fantastic running shoe according to several users, based on favorable comments regarding its performance. There were a few who doubted the shoe’s durability and longevity. Despite some criticisms, many purchasers have concluded that the Adidas Pureboost RBL was a good investment for a neutral running shoe."
Saucony Ride 10,,91.0,89.0,719.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Saucony Ride 13,"6 reasons to buy
The in-shoe experience of the Saucony Ride 10 was considered by a lot of runners to be smooth and form-fitting.
People have commented that the underfoot experience given by this running shoe was responsive.
A lot of purchasers stated that they were able to wear the Ride 10 for extended periods as it was comfortable to wear.
This product didn’t need a break-in period, several users reported.
Some heavyset runners were happy with the full-bodied midsole because its foam compound was able to support their weights and their gait transitions.
The weight of the product was generally welcomed because it apparently didn’t hold the foot down or mar the natural speed of the run.
3 reasons not to buy
Some consumers complained that the fabric on the sides of the Saucony Ride 10 tore apart after only a few uses.
A handful of testers commented that the fit was a bit narrower than what they expected.
A couple of users felt that the outsole’s traction capacity was not very reliable on wet surfaces, stating that they experienced some slippage.
Bottom line
The Ride 10 from Saucony had received mostly positive feedback from the runners who have tried it. This companion for the roads was lauded for having a cover system that accommodated the natural form of the foot, hugging it smoothly and non-irritatingly. The cushioning system was also highlighted for being comfortable from the beginning as well as highly efficient at supporting various weight profiles. But on the flip-side, there were complaints about the durability of the upper, the narrowness of the in-shoe experience, the smaller-than-usual sizing options, and the flimsiness of the outsole traction."
Nike Free RN Commuter 2018,,90.0,,148.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 7.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The Nike Free RN Commuter 2018 is a very comfortable shoe, said some satisfied users.
Several runners admired the futuristic design of the shoe; they said it is good looking and eye-catching.
A couple of purchasers were happy with the shoe's toggle lacing; they said it is easy to adjust.
According to some user comments, the shoe feels light.
Some users noticed that the Free RN Commuter 2018 fits like a sock.
Many buyers also used the shoe for walking and gym training activities.
A few noted that the slip-on design makes the shoe easy to put on and remove.
2 reasons not to buy
Some reviewers remark that the heel area lacks cushioning.
The durability of the shoe is doubtful to some purchasers.
Bottom line
The Nike Free RN Commuter 2018 is a road shoe trusted by most runners. The majority of those who tried the shoe admired its design, fit and versatility. A few have issues with durability, but it was not an issue for the majority. In summary, the shoe was a fantastic addition to the Nike Free RN family. "
Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 36 Trail GTX,,89.0,94.0,16.0,,, Trail, Neutral,,,,,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The majority of the runners claim that the Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 36 Trail GTX is comfortable. 
Numerous users noted that the shoe provides great traction on various surfaces. 
A couple of consumers expressed that the shoe has kept their feet dry. 
One reviewer mentioned that shoe offers a responsive and bouncy ride. 
Many have appreciated the shoe’s waterproof upper. 
This running shoe is lightweight, according to some purchasers.
3 reasons not to buy
Some buyers are worried about the shoe’s durability. 
A few commenters are not satisfied with the available color options. 
The toe box is a bit narrow, based on some reviews. 
Bottom line
The Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 36 Trail GTX received a mixed response from the consumers. Many runners have appreciated the Gore-Tex® mesh upper of this trail running shoe as it enables them to continue even in wet conditions. This running shoe proves to be a great companion in damp and cold conditions because it effectively keeps the foot warm and dry."
New Balance 890 v6,,89.0,87.0,762.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,, New Balance 890 v8,"5 reasons to buy
The underfoot cushioning offered by the New Balance 890 v6 was lauded by a heavyset tester, stating that it suitably carried the foot.
Several consumers noted that the façade looked visually appealing.
Some people stated that it offered a lightweight and an agreeable response during low and medium-mile runs.
The breathability of the upper worked well, according to some purchasers.
The traction capacity of the outsole proved reliable, based on user feedback.
2 reasons not to buy
Most reviewers felt that the underfoot platform was unusually stiff.
The toe box was a bit snugger than expected, a few runners reported.
Bottom line
Most of those who have tested the New Balance 890 v6 liked its fresh looks, its lightweight nature and its breathable upper. The midsole gained some positive feedback, as well. But there were those who noticed the unusual stiffness of the platform and the awkwardly tight toe box. It’s a divisive neutral running shoe for the road, but it’s mostly welcomed by its purchasers."
Reebok Liquifect, Reebok,90.0,90.0,8.0,$80,$55 (save 86%)," Road, Treadmill", Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
The Reebok Liquifect has a midsole unit that is deemed comfortable by most users.
The full-length cushioning system of this road running shoe is welcomed for its durable yet responsive construction.
Some consumers are happy that the padded collar is able to properly support the ankles and heel.
The rubber outsole of this product is welcomed because it is able to provide a reliable grip on the ground.
Several people have mentioned that the upper unit isn’t irritating to the skin of the foot.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people have noted that the midfoot section of the upper unit is a bit restrictive.
According to a couple of purchasers, the upper has a tendency to separate from the platform.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of people towards the Reebok Liquifect has been positive. This neutral running shoe is welcomed because of its agreeable underfoot platform, its traction-ready outsole, and its smooth in-shoe wrap. Conversely, the restrictive midfoot and flimsy durability are noted as the negative aspects.
Fans of running footwear that can handle the roads can enjoy the Reebok Liquifect."
Merrell Bare Access Flex E-Mesh,,85.0,,220.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 7.4oz , Women: 5.5oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The testers welcomed the color schemes of the Merrell Bare Access Flex E-Mesh.
A few admired the lightweight design of the shoe.
Several wearers lauded the breathable coverage of the Bare Access Flex E-Mesh.
A couple of users mentioned that the shoe is durable.
Based on some reviews, the midsole offers the right amount of cushioning - not too firm, not too soft.
2 reasons not to buy
  The midsole allegedly offered little support to those who have tendon concerns.
Some people felt that the upper was too tight.
Bottom line
The Merrell Bare Access Flex E-Mesh wasn’t very well-received. People were welcoming of its aesthetics, but that’s just about the only thing that was appreciated. The underfoot platform was criticized for being uncomfortable and unaccommodating. The sizing schemes and width profiles of this road shoe were also subjects of disapproval."
Saucony Hurricane 22,,83.0,93.0,6.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.8oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Some users believe that the Saucony Hurricane 22 has allowed them to be speedy without worrying about underfoot support.
The cushioning system is likened to being a cloud on which the foot can rest.
Based on a handful of reviews, this road running shoe has an upper unit that is able to secure the foot properly.
Those with foot and leg concerns like easily injured muscles and tendons are happy that the stability mechanisms are able to stave off discomfort and strain.
The aesthetics are welcomed by shoe enthusiasts that gravitate towards appealing footwear-facades.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people believe that the in-shoe experience is a bit loose, particularly near the heel area.
A couple of runners have reported that the medial midfoot stability is a bit too much that they have noted some unusual outward rolling of the foot during the run.
Bottom line
The Hurricane 22 aims for a performance that is confident and well-supported. Runners who are afraid because the tendons and muscles of their feet might get injured during the run can go to this product and believe that it can stabilize and render comfort. Secure coverage and appealing looks can also be the elements that solidify this model's accommodating construction."
Adidas Rockadia Trail,,92.0,93.0,6014.0,,, Trail, Neutral,,,,,,, Adidas Rockadia Trail 3,"9 reasons to buy
Many runners agreed that the price of the Adidas Rockadia Trail was affordable.
The outsole unit of this running shoe was appreciated by many trail adventurers; they wrote that its grip capability was reliable.
Several consumers were able to use this shoe on flat surfaces; they wrote that it was still efficient and agreeable for their feet.
The visual aesthetics of this shoe were welcomed by a lot of testers; many of them received compliments while wearing it.
A lot of runners considered this shoe to be a comfortable one.
A number of purchasers wrote that the Adidas Rockadia Trail was durable and long-lasting.
According to a tester, wearing and using this shoe didn’t cause any discomfort in the foot.
Scores of runners were very comfortable in this shoe.
Based on the comments of a small number of reviewers, the shoe is of very high quality.
3 reasons not to buy
Numerous reviewers have observed a squeaking sound, which bothers them.
It felt a bit narrow, as noted by more than a handful of consumers.
There are no optional widths.
Bottom line
The Adidas Rockadia Trail was welcomed by many runners because they liked its price, its design and its overall functionality. Even though it’s for trails, a number of consumers were also able to use this on the roads and it worked well for them. Although it was a bit narrow for some, this neutral running shoe was still able to gain generally positive remarks."
Nike Flyknit Lunar 3,,93.0,83.0,261.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.7oz , Women: 6.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The Flyknit upper brings a comfortable and secure coverage that’s also breathable.
The Flywire mid-foot system responsibly keeps the foot feeling snug and in place.
Many runners felt that the upper felt like a sock against the foot, letting them move freely and naturally.
Most testers felt a definite springiness when it comes to lifting off the ground, thanks to the cushioned mid-sole of the Nike Flyknit Lunar 3.
The platform was created for neutral runners who need adequate cushioning.
The many color schemes allow this shoe to be visually appealing to runners.
2 reasons not to buy
The toe box of the Flyknit Lunar 3 is too tight to some wearers.
There was not enough arch support, which led to a sore foot after running, according to a reviewer.
Bottom line
Runners are given the capability to streak through their exercises and running sessions with t Nike Flyknit Lunar 3. This update brings lightweight, flexible and responsive performance to its wearer. Neutral runners are the ones who are going to enjoy this running shoe."
Asics Gel Kenun,,88.0,86.0,279.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.2oz , Women: 9.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Kenun 2,"7 reasons to buy
Some testers commented that the Asics Gel Kenun delivered excellent foot support.
A handful of runners appreciated the amount of grip the shoe provided.
Many purchasers said that it was comfortable.
Several wearers agreed that the shoe performed well on both indoor and outdoor walking and running activities.
Most of the purchasers loved its incredible cushioning.
Several wearers commented that the Asics Gel Kenun was lightweight.
Many reviewers loved its underfoot feel.
2 reasons not to buy
Based on observations, the shoe has a narrow toe box.
A good number of consumers said that it was expensive.
Bottom line
Overall, the majority of the purchasers said that the Asics Gel Kenun is an excellent option for those who want a well-cushioned, supportive and comfortable running shoe. They appreciated its incredible grip and underfoot-feel. They loved wearing the shoe on walking and running activities. Although several of them said that it has a narrow toe box, others still recommended the Asics Gel Kenun because of its remarkable performance."
Asics Frequent Trail, Asics,89.0,90.0,8.0,$60,$42 (save 30%)," Trail, Road", Neutral,,,,,," Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Normal, Wide",,"8 reasons to buy
Numerous runners said that the Asics Frequent Trail is fast and lightweight. 
It offers a mix of comfort and stability, according to several users. 
This shoe is built with just enough padding, based on reviews. 
Some wearers mention that this running partner is breathable. 
The overall quality of the shoe gained favor from a lot of commenters.
Many satisfied consumers confirm that this shoe is durable. 
It is responsive, several buyers observed. 
A few reviewers have testified that this shoe is also suitable for walking and hiking.
4 reasons not to buy
The Asics Frequent Trail is a bit narrow, some testers claimed. 
A couple of runners disliked the short shoelaces. 
One user noted that this shoe does not provide decent traction on wet surfaces.  
A runner complained that the upper material rubs on top of his feet, causing pain. 
Bottom line
The Asics Frequent Trail is a neutral running shoe that is designed specifically for light trail runs. It incorporates technical features that deliver lasting comfort, protection, and support for optimal performance. This shoe is a good choice for runners and athletes seeking a lightweight, yet durable running companion.
 "
Saucony Zealot ISO 3,,91.0,91.0,235.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.5oz , Women: 7.3oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Most users observed that the Saucony Zealot ISO 3 was able to offer great cushioning.
One tester narrated that the shoe felt great all throughout his walk and run.
Several runners observed that the bounce of the midsole has been retained.
Another runner expressed that it’s well-balanced in its construction.
A few testers said that the shoe performed well on both road and trail.
Some runners said that the toe box had an agreeable space for toe-splay.
A user felt that this iteration offered a more relaxed upper compared to the uppers of the previous versions.
One runner expressed that this was one of the shoes that delivered a well-cushioned experience.
6 reasons not to buy
One user narrated that the cushioning under the ball of her foot was not enough.
A few runners said that the arches felt loose.
One tester commented on the white midsole not matching the dark upper.
A small group of users was not satisfied with the number of color options the shoe came in.
One user mentioned that he was stuck in between sizes which left him at an inconvenience. Going up a size, he felt that this shoe was a tad bigger. Choosing a size down, he expressed that the shoe was a bit tight.
One runner felt pain on the ball of his foot every time he ran with the shoe.
Bottom line
The Saucony Zealot ISO 3 is a neutral, road running shoe that’s in the higher price range. This newest edition in the Zealot series possesses the fan-favorite features that were present from the previous iterations. On top of that, components were tweaked to enhance the shoe’s cushioning, ride and responsiveness. This makes the shoe well-balanced and lightweight, ready to take on any activity or running session."
Mizuno Wave Inspire 16 Waveknit,,88.0,89.0,8.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"0 reasons to buy
Many people mention that the Mizuno Wave Inspire 16 Waveknit is comfortable. 
Several runners praise the shoe’s responsive cushioning. 
This shoe offers a stable ride, according to some users. 
A lot of reviewers mentioned that the knit upper offers a snug fit. 
The shoe is breathable, a few consumers claim. 
Some wearers praise the shoe’s lightweight structure. 
One buyer notice that this running companion is flexible.
0 reasons not to buy
The Mizuno Wave Inspire 16 Waveknit is not built to last, said a purchaser. 
A user complained that the shoe is a little squeaky on hard surfaces. 
The shoelaces are not durable, according to a runner.
Bottom line
The Mizuno Wave Inspire 16 Waveknit is a comfortable running shoe designed for running on different paved surfaces. It provides long-lasting support for runners who exhibit mild to moderate overpronation. This stability running shoe also incorporates top-quality materials for breathability, flexibility, and protection."
Saucony Guide 9,,89.0,86.0,1383.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 8.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Saucony Guide 13,"9 reasons to buy
A lot of runners welcomed the eye-catching color schemes of the Saucony Guide 9.
Numerous testers reported that this shoe didn’t feel tight or restrictive; for them, it was true to its size.
The stability feature was reliable and not intrusive, according to several runners.
Those who have tried it indicated that the cushioning system of this shoe felt adequately responsive.
Many consumers appreciated the traction given by the rubber outsole unit.
Several testers commented that they were able to get great value for its price; they liked the quality of this version.
The durability of the Guide 9 was lauded and commended.
Some testers who tended to experience foot pain while running didn’t complain of such when wearing this shoe.
The toe box was roomy enough to accommodate natural toe-splaying, wrote several runners.
3 reasons not to buy
After only a few months of use, the upper unit’s fabric tore off on a tester.
According to several runners, the heel area of cushioning system broke down and rendered the platform unstable.
The fabric in the rear section of the upper tended to rub against the skin of some runners, causing some irritation.
Bottom line
The 9th version of the Saucony Guide was able to deliver great service to a lot of runners who needed support and stability for their activities on the pavement. They lauded its responsive and reliable components. Basically, they were satisfied with it. But such wasn’t the case for a few disgruntled consumers who thought that it some of its parts weren’t durable or agreeable to their feet."
Nike LunarEpic Flyknit,,92.0,84.0,237.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.7oz , Women: 6.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
The soft, form-fitting upper and cozy interior creates a very comfortable run.
A good number of runners liked the LunarEpic Flyknit’s plush cushioning.
It is flexible.
It is light.
The shoe can be used as a long-distance trainer or for shorter and faster runs, based on several comments from runners.
Nike’s unique Flywire helps secure the midfoot in snug comfort.
Two sockliners, one 4mm and another 6mm version, for better and personalized fit.
A small number of runners use the shoe for casual wear.
Unbelievable traction on a multitude of surfaces, based on several testers’ comments.
4 reasons not to buy
Nike’s LunarEpic in Flyknit is very expensive.
Others were having reservations about the mid-rise design of the upper.
The fit is too narrow for several runners.
Some said that the upper has several durability issues.
Bottom line
The Nike LunarEpic Flyknit is a stylistically-unique lightweight shoe that offers a seamless upper that fits like a second skin, decent arch support, and very comfortable ride. This is a versatile shoe that can take on various kinds of runs because of the responsive and durable Lunarlon foam. It feels fast and looks really nice for casual wear."
Brooks Ghost 7,,94.0,84.0,293.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Brooks Ghost 12,"6 reasons to buy
Ventilation is enhanced with the breathable mesh material used in the upper.
A mix of stitched and no-sew overlays provide a snug and secure fit.
The padded tongue and collar helps when it comes to keeping the foot in place and adding a bit of cushioning.
The mid-sole is appreciated by many testers because it’s flexible, responsive and adaptive to each movement made by the runner.
The Caterpillar Crash Pad smoothens the transition from heel to forefoot and distributes cushioning responsibly.
Durable and responsive rubber covers the rest of the sole unit and extends its lifespan.
2 reasons not to buy
A few runners thought that it had a narrow fit.
The mid-foot and toe-box rubbed against the skin of some runners, which caused irritation.
Bottom line
The Brooks Ghost 7 is a lightweight running shoe that’s great for daily running sessions. Neutral runners are going to enjoy how this shoe feels underfoot. The personalized platform, breathable coverage, and reliable outsole traction make it great for daily use."
Saucony Kinvara 8,,90.0,84.0,207.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.9oz , Women: 6.9oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Saucony Kinvara 11,"11 reasons to buy
Most of the reviewers continued their love affair with the comfortable ride of the Saucony Kinvara 8.
It is just a tad heavier than the earlier version, despite the addition of a full-length Everun top sole.
The shoe is significantly smoother than the past model, based on the observations of several expert reviewers.
Some reviewers loved the soft, but noticeably responsive cushioning.
The new mesh is more breathable than the prior edition, as noted by more than a handful of runners.
The Pro-Lock system provides a very secure midfoot.
A good number of reviewers mentioned that the 8th instalment of the Kinvara is worth every penny.
The majority of the reviewers appreciated its versatility as a trainer and as an up-tempo shoe.
A handful were very satisfied with the sleeker and more streamlined look of this shoe.
Reflective detail is available in the heel.
Multiple color options are available.
3 reasons not to buy
No optional widths.
Lack of outsole rubber could be an issue.
The main midsole is standard EVA and would not have the same experience as a full Everun midsole
Bottom line
The Saucony Kinvara series is easily one of the most popular shoes across all brands. In the 8th instalment of this line, Saucony provides a sleeker profile by virtue of a more refined use of the FlexFilm overlays and new mesh. It continues to provide excellent support, a very smooth ride, and well-cushioned midsole without putting on the weight. At a very reasonable price, few lightweight trainers are as versatile or as well-loved as the Kinvara 8."
Brooks Dyad 8,,91.0,85.0,315.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.6oz , Women: 10.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Brooks Dyad 11,"5 reasons to buy
The mesh upper of the Brooks Dyad 8 has moisture control attributes that keep foot cool and dry.
It has adjustable saddle construction for a custom fit.
It has Omega Flex Grooves for flexibility in every stride.
Some runners found this shoe comfortable.
It features the Heel Segmented Crash Pad for powerful take-off and soft landing.
3 reasons not to buy
This shoe is slightly expensive.
This is a bit heavy for some runners.
The sole wears out quickly than expected, based on some reviews.
Bottom line
The Brooks Dyad 8 is a road running shoe that is ideal for runners with flat arches. It has a soft and stable platform and well-cushioned underfoot. It is considered by some as expensive and heavy but positive comments are really overwhelming. This shoe is best for short runs and everyday training."
Merrell Bare Access 4,,88.0,85.0,301.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.4oz , Women: 4.5oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The Bare Access 4 features mesh lining and mesh upper that is breathable and non-irritating to the skin.
The M Select FRESH is a treatment for the shoe that staves off odor-causing bacteria, essentially keeping the interior environment clean and healthy.
Some runners took note of the cushioning tech that gives ground-to-foot feedback for a faster paced movement over the terrain.
Runners welcomed the Bare Access Outsole, which features Vibram pods for extreme levels of traction and efficiency with every step.
This running shoe feels light and fast for competition, according to some runners.
It has an affordable price.
2 reasons not to buy
Parts of the shoe started to wear off quickly, based on some comments.
It didn’t have very efficient anti-debris components because small stones tended to invade the interior and disrupt the comfort of some runners.
Bottom line
The Merrell Bare Access 4 is a minimalist running shoe with hyper-responsive insoles that give runners full control while running. It is a good option for those who are looking for an affordable lightweight road shoe. The Bare Access 4 has a few drawbacks, but it’s still able to provide a comfortable and satisfying ride."
Salomon Sense Pro Max,,90.0,86.0,68.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Several purchasers admired the apparent durable nature of the Salomon Sense Pro Max.
Most of the runners were highly appreciative of the shoe’s reliable grip on varied terrains.
The roomy toe-box gained positive feedback from several users.
Some of the wearers lauded the long-lasting cushioning of the Sense Pro Max, stating that it’s very useful for long-distance runs.
The Salomon Sense Pro Max was used by some users as their daily casual shoe and they felt that it was still efficient.
More than a few noted the comfortable feel of the shoe.
According to a few wearers with slightly-wide foot shapes, this running shoe offered a great fit.
A few testers admired the lightweight construction of the shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
The shoe is a bit expensive, said a few reviewers.
One user mentioned that he was disappointed by the lacing system because it did not work as expected.
According to a couple of wearers, the mud or dirt got easily stuck between the tread, particularly in the heel area.
Bottom line
The majority of the users lauded the overall performance of the Salomon Sense Pro Max. They generally said that the shoe truly provides the reliable grip, durable cushioning, and efficient foot protection that are needed for a better trail running experience. The comfort, durability, and its lightweight construction are additional features of the shoe that made some users satisfied.  Given the shoe’s long-lasting cushioning, this shoe is indeed a good partner for long-distance runs."
Adidas Energy Falcon, Adidas,73.0,,7.0,$70,$53 (save 24%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Several consumers note that the underfoot cushioning system is comfortable and accommodating of the shape of the foot.
The lightweight structure of the Adidas Energy Falcon has been lauded by those who welcome foot-apparel that are not cumbersome.
The stylish looks of this running shoe is praised by those who like a balance between performance and casual use.
Some users note that the durability of the materials are dependable, stating that the overall quality is high.
The fit profile of this Adidas running shoe is considered by many to be just enough to be snug but not too tight.
1 reasons not to buy
A few consumers complained that the Adidas Energy Falcon is a bit smaller than what they are expecting.
Bottom line
The overall feedback for the Adidas Energy Falcon has been positive. Testers and consumers are happy with this product because it is pleasing to look at and versatile enough to handle many types of activities. The underfoot cushioning system has been highlighted for being form-welcoming and comfortable while the general durability has been deemed superb. On the other hand, some people are unhappy with the apparently smaller-than-usual sizing scheme.
Fans of neutral running shoes that are for the roads are the ones who are going to enjoy this product."
New Balance Fresh Foam Lazr Denim, New Balance,87.0,,851.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 7.7oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"4 reasons to buy
Several satisfied users described the New Balance Fresh Foam Lazr Denim as super comfortable.
Many admired the shoe's street-ready design; they said the shoe looks great when worn with jeans.
Some buyers mentioned that the shoe runs true to size.
The Lazr Denim is affordable.
4 reasons not to buy
A couple of runners mentioned that the shoe needs some time to break in.
The traction is not good for slippery surfaces, according to some user reviews.
One disappointed buyer mentioned that he developed a blister while wearing the shoe.
A few users mentioned that the shoe is difficult to put on.
Bottom line
The New Balance Fresh Foam Lazr Denim is a lightweight running shoe designed for neutral runners. The shoe gained mixed comments from users - some admired the shoe's eye-catching design while others were disappointed with its sizing and grip. Overall, the shoe is still a good option for runners who are looking for an affordable pair, but there is still a significant room for improvement."
Saucony Kineta Relay,,88.0,,1554.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.8oz , Women: 5.2oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The breathable upper unit of the Kineta Relay keeps moisture away while maintaining a cool environment for the foot.
The FORM2U Memory Foam technology provides a custom platform that’s unique to each wearer because it mimics the shape of the underside of the foot noted several runners.
The color options for the Kineta Relay are numerous.
Some runners appreciated the comfortable inner sleeve, which lets them have an easier time wearing and taking the shoe off.
High abrasion EVA makes up the outsole unit of the Relay, which provides grip and more cushioning to the foot.
It has a very light weight.
3 reasons not to buy
Most of the complaints about this shoe were about its outsole, which lacked any rubber for protection against wear and tear.
Some runners felt that it was a bit tight in the forefoot area.
Others noted that the mid-sole unit didn’t have as much effectiveness in terms of underfoot support.
Bottom line
The Kineta Relay from Saucony is a popular running shoe model that many runners have tried out. It’s for daily performance training and running activities, offering mild support and lightweight service to the wearer. Overall, the Kineta Relay has proven to be a reliable road running shoe."
Inov-8 X-Talon G 235,,92.0,88.0,10.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.3oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The majority of the consumers commented that the Inov-8 X-Talon G 235 is flexible.
Many users said that the running shoe's grip is excellent.
According to those who have tried it, the shoe is lightweight.
Based on reviews, the shoe runs fast on both soft and extreme terrains as well as muddy and boggy fields.
It has a perfect fit, as noted by some buyers.
Its durable upper is loved by several reviewers.
The shoe does not retain water when waded through bogs and water.
2 reasons not to buy
One of the testers mentioned that the material located over the toes is a bit uncomfortable.
A consumer said that the lacing system of the Inov-8 X-Talon G 235 does not let him pronate properly without loosening the laces.
Bottom line
The X-Talon G 235 is considered as one of the successful shoe releases from Inov-8. Proven and tested by expert reviewers and casual runners, the shoe has made them happy and satisfied. Overall, the new features utilized by Inov-8 in crafting the shoe made avid fans believe that this version is a must-have running partner of every runner. Its materials and technologies are suitable for a wide variety of challenging terrains."
Saucony Hurricane ISO 4,,90.0,90.0,3549.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.2oz , Women: 9.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Saucony Hurricane ISO 5,"8 reasons to buy
A good number of buyers noticed that the Saucony Hurricane ISO 4 was comfortable.
A few testers lauded its perfect fit.
A lot of reviewers said that the shoe has a secured upper construction.
Many purchasers commented that the Saucony Hurricane ISO 4 has soft cushioning.
Various consumers said that the shoe fitted perfectly on them.
A good number of testers said that the shoe's stack height was less bulky.
The majority of the runners agreed that the shoe provided enough grip on different surfaces.
The length of the shoe was correct to size, based on observations.
3 reasons not to buy
Based on some reviews, the shoe was expensive.
Several runners said that the shoe was a little bit heavier than the previous model.
The Saucony Hurricane ISO 4 has limited color options to choose from.
Bottom line
Overall, the Saucony Hurricane ISO 4 has made a good number of purchasers happy and satisfied because of its structure and performance. Aside from its construction, the shoe also provides the right amount of grip and cushioning on different paved surfaces. Although several of them have issues with the price,thers still recommended the shoe because of its excellent quality. It is a good option for those who are ready to invest extra bucks for a comfortable and versatile running shoe."
Arc'teryx Norvan VT 2,,90.0,89.0,8.0,,, Trail, Neutral,,,,,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The majority of the testers commented that the Arc'teryx Norvan VT 2 is comfortable.
Many users loved its flexibility.
Several purchasers mentioned that the shoe is supportive.
Numerous consumers noted that the upper of the running shoe is breathable.
Based on the reviews, the Arc'teryx Norvan VT 2 provides incredible traction.
According to those who have tested it, the shoe has a perfect fit.
A significant number of users said that the running footwear is versatile.
4 reasons not to buy
Some reviewers observed that the shoe is not durable. After several uses, it's starting to wear off.
One of the buyers is disappointed that the shoe is not waterproof.
It is expensive, according to some consumers.
A few wearers said that the shoe has short laces.
Bottom line
Many users are considering to buy another pair of the Arc'teryx Norvan VT 2. Most of them are satisfied with the comfort, fit, support, and flexibility of the shoe. On the other hand, some of the users had issues with its price, laces, and durability. Despite these negative comments, others still believe that the shoe is an excellent partner in their activities. Overall, the majority of the consumers were expressive of their happiness and contentment with the Arc'teryx Norvan VT 2's fantastic performance, functionality, versatility, and amazing construction. "
Skechers GOrun Forza 3,,89.0,93.0,62.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 7.3oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Many people loved the design and colorways of the Skechers GOrun Forza 3.
The mild rocker shape of the platform enabled fast takeoffs, some users commented.
According to overpronators, the stable midsole helped in the prevention of discomfort and injury.
The lightweight nature of this running shoe worked well for many testers.
Most of those who have tested this product liked the durability of its components.
The toe box was roomy enough to accommodate the natural spreading of the toes, some consumers remarked.
Runners perceived the Forza 3 to be a reliable companion during marathons.
2 reasons not to buy
A few testers complained of blistering on the instep.
A consumer considered the insole to be hard.
Bottom line
The Skechers GOrun Forza 3 received many positive remarks, particularly with regards to its appealing design, its efficient underfoot platform, and its durability. They also welcomed the stability mechanisms featured in the midsole. Inversely, some people complained of blistering and hardness to the insole."
Mizuno Wave Inspire 16 Waveknit,,88.0,89.0,8.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"0 reasons to buy
Many people mention that the Mizuno Wave Inspire 16 Waveknit is comfortable. 
Several runners praise the shoe’s responsive cushioning. 
This shoe offers a stable ride, according to some users. 
A lot of reviewers mentioned that the knit upper offers a snug fit. 
The shoe is breathable, a few consumers claim. 
Some wearers praise the shoe’s lightweight structure. 
One buyer notice that this running companion is flexible.
0 reasons not to buy
The Mizuno Wave Inspire 16 Waveknit is not built to last, said a purchaser. 
A user complained that the shoe is a little squeaky on hard surfaces. 
The shoelaces are not durable, according to a runner.
Bottom line
The Mizuno Wave Inspire 16 Waveknit is a comfortable running shoe designed for running on different paved surfaces. It provides long-lasting support for runners who exhibit mild to moderate overpronation. This stability running shoe also incorporates top-quality materials for breathability, flexibility, and protection."
Adidas Supernova Glide Boost 8,,97.0,91.0,632.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A lot of runners felt well-supported by the Supernova Glide Boost 8.
Based on the remarks of a large number of runners, this shoe was aptly comfortable to use.
Most testers considered this as an excellent trainer as well as a great option for long-distance runs.
The foam platform of this shoe allowed the foot to take smooth and well-paced steps, a user commented.
The boost™ technology was welcomed by consumers because it was able to attenuate impact responsibly during landings and add a boost of energy to the toe-off.
For a lot of runners, the cover system fit adequately; they didn’t feel any hot spots or incidences of the fabric rubbing uncomfortably against their skin.
The toe box of the Glide Boost 8 was roomy and it enabled the toes to splay naturally, some users noted.
2 reasons not to buy
A reviewer was a bit disappointed that it didn’t come in other optional widths.
Some runners wrote that they needed respectable mileage to break-in the shoe.
Bottom line
Adidas stuffed the Supernova Glide Boost 8 with some of its best technologies from top to bottom. The quality and performance of this shoe really worked well for runners. They have perceived it to be very responsive to their movements. Many pointed out that they highly recommend this neutral road shoe for those who want to have a great running experience."
Brooks Ghost 7,,94.0,84.0,293.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Brooks Ghost 12,"6 reasons to buy
Ventilation is enhanced with the breathable mesh material used in the upper.
A mix of stitched and no-sew overlays provide a snug and secure fit.
The padded tongue and collar helps when it comes to keeping the foot in place and adding a bit of cushioning.
The mid-sole is appreciated by many testers because it’s flexible, responsive and adaptive to each movement made by the runner.
The Caterpillar Crash Pad smoothens the transition from heel to forefoot and distributes cushioning responsibly.
Durable and responsive rubber covers the rest of the sole unit and extends its lifespan.
2 reasons not to buy
A few runners thought that it had a narrow fit.
The mid-foot and toe-box rubbed against the skin of some runners, which caused irritation.
Bottom line
The Brooks Ghost 7 is a lightweight running shoe that’s great for daily running sessions. Neutral runners are going to enjoy how this shoe feels underfoot. The personalized platform, breathable coverage, and reliable outsole traction make it great for daily use."
Brooks Dyad 8,,91.0,85.0,315.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.6oz , Women: 10.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Brooks Dyad 11,"5 reasons to buy
The mesh upper of the Brooks Dyad 8 has moisture control attributes that keep foot cool and dry.
It has adjustable saddle construction for a custom fit.
It has Omega Flex Grooves for flexibility in every stride.
Some runners found this shoe comfortable.
It features the Heel Segmented Crash Pad for powerful take-off and soft landing.
3 reasons not to buy
This shoe is slightly expensive.
This is a bit heavy for some runners.
The sole wears out quickly than expected, based on some reviews.
Bottom line
The Brooks Dyad 8 is a road running shoe that is ideal for runners with flat arches. It has a soft and stable platform and well-cushioned underfoot. It is considered by some as expensive and heavy but positive comments are really overwhelming. This shoe is best for short runs and everyday training."
Hoka One One Bondi 4,,90.0,81.0,605.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Hoka One One Bondi 6,"6 reasons to buy
The Air Mesh upper unit provides breathable coverage.
The Lyrca ComfortFrame in the upper makes the material stretchable and agreeable to the skin, letting the runner wear it without first using socks.
The TPU External Heel Counter locks the rear section of the foot and keeps it in place, effectively preventing accidental shoe removal.
The padded tongue and collar deliver comfort and snug security.
Runners appreciated the Early Stage Meta-Rocker design in the midsole, which encourages better performance and propulsive movement.
Many runners took note that this shoe is very comfortable.
4 reasons not to buy
Some heavyset testers complained that the outsole unit wore off too easily.
This shoe’s forefoot area was a bit narrow and tight for some runners.
The Bondi 4 lacked proper arch support, as noted in some reviews.
This shoe has an expensive price.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Bondi 4 provides a smooth and well-cushioned ride. The overall construction and technologies used in this shoe provide responsiveness, support, and comfort. This shoe was designed for road running, but it has enough traction for dirt tracks."
Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 35 Shield,,87.0,86.0,587.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.4oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
  Most users admired the stylish and functional design of the Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 35 Shield.
According to some reviews, the shoe runs true to size.
Some runners highlighted that the Pegasus 35 Shield is very comfortable.
A few users admired the versatility of this winter shoe; they also use the shoe for walking and training.
The water-resistant upper is very effective in repelling water, said some reviews.
One user admired the shoe’s warm upper coverage, making it ideal for winter running.
3 reasons not to buy
A couple of users said that heel has a loose fit.
Several wearers claimed that the laces are too long.
A few consumers felt that the width was a bit narrow.
Bottom line
The majority of the reviews received by the Nike Pegasus 35 Shield were favorable. Praises were directed to the shoe’s design and the efficiency of its water-repellent features. Though there are a few issues with the fit and the laces, the overall reception for the Pegasus 35 Shield was welcoming."
Adidas Adistar Boost ESM,,95.0,88.0,318.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 10.7oz, Men: 11mm , Women: 11mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The flexible upper unit provide seamless support for the comfort of the runner.
Runners were satisfied with the shoe's external heel counter that improves fit on the rear area.
The color options for the Boost ESM were appreciated by those who want more aesthetic choices.
The boost™ mid-sole technology offers energy returns while also making sure that the foot is well-supported.
A significant number of runners applauded the cushioning system of the shoe that delivers a smooth and responsive ride.
Reviewers noted the efficacy of the outsole rubber in terms of traction.
3 reasons not to buy
The Adistar Boost ESM is an expensive running shoe.
There were complaints that the mid-sole was a bit stiff and unresponsive.
Most were worried that the outsole was too thin to be as efficient on a long-term basis.
Bottom line
The Adistar Boost ESM from Adidas is a running companion that testers generally enjoyed. The high quality materials that were used for the shoe work well. It’s a shoe that offers mild support in the mid-foot while being a reliable gear for neutral runners."
Nike Air Zoom Winflo 2,,94.0,,206.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Nike Air Zoom Winflo 7,"8 reasons to buy
Several runners wrote that the 2nd version of the Nike Air Zoom Winflo was suitably lightweight.
Many noted that the price of this version was affordable.
Some testers loved that they were able to use this shoe for a variety of activities: running, training and walking.
The coverage was snug yet secure for runners; they didn’t feel as if their feet were strangled by the materials.
The color schemes gained some fans, and they said that it was eye-catching, but not distractingly bright.
The underfoot cushioning was adequate, according to runners; they felt that it was springy and responsive.
Many testers described this shoe as ‘comfortable’.
A consumer wrote that because of its breathable upper, the interior essentially became free from odor-causing moisture.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners felt that the 2nd version of the Nike Air Zoom Winflo was a bit narrow.
The midsole broke down easily on one tester, essentially diminishing the underfoot comfort.
Bottom line
The Air Zoom Winflo 2 from Nike was generally well-received by new and veteran runners. A lot of them wrote that the upper cover system was comfortable. Also, for them, the durability was consistent and the overall quality was superb. Many neutral runners recommended this road shoe. On the other hand, the fit wasn’t very agreeable to a few of those who tried it."
Merrell Bare Access 4,,88.0,85.0,301.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.4oz , Women: 4.5oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The Bare Access 4 features mesh lining and mesh upper that is breathable and non-irritating to the skin.
The M Select FRESH is a treatment for the shoe that staves off odor-causing bacteria, essentially keeping the interior environment clean and healthy.
Some runners took note of the cushioning tech that gives ground-to-foot feedback for a faster paced movement over the terrain.
Runners welcomed the Bare Access Outsole, which features Vibram pods for extreme levels of traction and efficiency with every step.
This running shoe feels light and fast for competition, according to some runners.
It has an affordable price.
2 reasons not to buy
Parts of the shoe started to wear off quickly, based on some comments.
It didn’t have very efficient anti-debris components because small stones tended to invade the interior and disrupt the comfort of some runners.
Bottom line
The Merrell Bare Access 4 is a minimalist running shoe with hyper-responsive insoles that give runners full control while running. It is a good option for those who are looking for an affordable lightweight road shoe. The Bare Access 4 has a few drawbacks, but it’s still able to provide a comfortable and satisfying ride."
Hoka One One Tor Ultra Hi WP,,90.0,86.0,263.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 17oz , Women: 14.7oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Most of the testers applauded the waterproof construction of the shoes.
Many were satisfied with the overall design and construction of the Hoka One One Tor Ultra Hi WP.
The shoe provides maximum amount of cushioning.
It has impressive grip on both wet and dry surfaces as highlighted in some reviews.
The toe box is roomy enough for natural toe splay.
3 reasons not to buy
The Tor Ultra Hi WP is ultra expensive.
The shoe is super heavy.
Some parts of the shoe wear out quickly, as pointed out in some reviews.
Bottom line
The Tor Ultra Hi WP is a waterproof shoe that is equipped with the necessary technologies to survive the toughest terrain. It delivers maximum cushioning, protection and responsiveness. This shoe is ideal for daily running, hiking and short distance runs."
Under Armour Horizon RTT,,90.0,81.0,106.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 7mm , Women: 7mm, Apr 2017,,,"9 reasons to buy
The majority of the runners mentioned that the shoe is very durable.
Some satisfied customers admired the comfortable feel of the Under Armour Horizon RTT.
According to some comments, the shoe provides a reliable grip on varied trail surfaces.
It felt light, said some testers.
Most of the runners appreciated the right amount of support the shoe provides.
The shoe is very versatile; some of the wearers used the shoe during gym training, while playing golf, and on casual walks.
A few mentioned that the shoe requires no break-in.
It provides the right amount of cushioning needed for long-distance runs, based on some comments.
A couple of consumers were highly-appreciative of the shoe’s non-slip and high-quality laces.
1 reasons not to buy
Several reviewers disliked the lack of padding around the collar.
Bottom line
The Under Armour Horizon RTT is a running shoe designed for trail enthusiasts. The majority admired the shoe because of its durable design, good cushioning, reliable traction, unmatched support, and impressive comfort. Considered by most users as their go-to shoe, the Horizon RTT is also a dependable shoe for long-distance runs."
Adidas Energy Falcon X, Adidas,74.0,,9.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"8 reasons to buy
People have appreciated the comfort that the Adidas Energy Falcon X provides. 
The shoe offers a good grip, according to some users. 
Several reviewers mentioned that the shoe is supportive. 
This running shoe offers a perfect fit, claimed some buyers. 
It is reasonably priced, reported some purchasers 
Many runners love the stylish design of the shoe. 
A few wearers like the shoe’s lightweight structure.
Energy Falcon X is breathable, said a couple of consumers. 
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of testers complained because of the wide forefoot section. 
The shoelaces are way too long, a reviewer thought. 
Bottom line
The Adidas Energy Falcon X is a neutral running shoe designed to provide a well-cushioned ride. It is packed with advanced technologies enabling the shoe to provide good grip, breathability, and stability. There are a few consumers who complained that the shoe’s forefoot is a bit wide. Still, the majority of the users have recommended the Adidas Energy Falcon X for its overall performance. "
Reebok Floatride Run Panthea,,90.0,89.0,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 7.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
People are commenting that the Reebok Floatride Run Panthea offers a lightweight ride that accommodates all-day wear.
The aesthetics of this product are considered suitable for performance and casual use.
The cushioning system of this Reebok running shoe is appreciated by consumers because it is able to responsibly attenuate impact shock.
Some users believe that the roomy in-shoe experience can accommodate custom inserts that can help with the attainment of extra comfort.
Breathability is an aspect that runners have noticed from the Reebok Floatride Run Panthea’s upper unit.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people have noted that the midfoot portion of the inner sleeve has a tendency to irritate the skin.
The forefoot section is a bit restrictive, based on a couple of reviews.
Bottom line
The Reebok Floatride Run Panthea aims to provide runners with an in-shoe experience that enables the natural progression of the gait. The lightweight upper unit considers itself as a form-welcoming accoutrement that also delivers breathability. Below is a midsole unit that offers a blend of underfoot steadiness, impact protection, and energized liftoffs. Fans of road running shoes that are for neutral foot pronation can enjoy the Floatride Run Panthea."
,,,93.0,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.6oz , Women: 6.1oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,
Brooks Glycerin 12,,93.0,81.0,270.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 8.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Brooks Glycerin 18,"6 reasons to buy
Breathable mesh makes the upper unit feel comfortable and secure.
The 3D Fit Print overlay system provides flexibility and a snug fit.
Another unit that provides a snug fit is a saddle, which conforms to the shape of the runner’s foot.
The colorful aesthetics of the Brooks Glycerin 12 were appreciated by many testers.
This model features 20% more cushioning than the previous iterations.
The full-length crash pad smoothens impact and transitions the foot through the gait cycle with ease.
1 reasons not to buy
A few runners noted that it was a bit narrow.
Bottom line
The Brooks Glycerin 12 is a high quality running shoe that’s great for daily running activities and other exercises. It’s flexible, secure and comfortable, making each step feel well-supported. Appealing designs also make this model a great visual treat."
Saucony Stabil CS 3,,97.0,97.0,507.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.4oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The Hydrator Lining offers next-to-skin comfort with anti-moisture properties.
The Sauc-Fit is an overlay system of the Stabil CS 3 that secures the mid-foot well, according to some testers.
The Dual Density SLL EVA Midsole gives a comfortable underfoot platform that’s responsive and efficient.
Runners with concerns with the pronation of their feet get stability from the Stability Arch Lock and the CS Zone.
The PowerGrid tech in the heel area absorbs the impact shock, then enables the foot to have a more efficient step as noted in some reviews.
Injected Blown Rubber outsole provides traction and maximum durability to the Stabil CS 3.
4 reasons not to buy
Most of the complaints about this shoe were about its stiff nature.
Some runners noted that it was too narrow in the forefoot area.
The Stabil CS 3 has a slightly expensive price.
Other testers criticized its bulky look.
Bottom line
The Stabil CS 3 from Saucony is a running shoe that offers maximum stability and control for those who need additional comfort and support. Its durable and dependable components make it a long-lasting part of anyone’s athletic gear. Though it received mixed reviews  from the users, the Stabil CS 3 is still a road shoe that is worth-trying."
Newton Gravity 9,,83.0,,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 6.8oz, Men: 3mm , Women: 3mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The Newton Gravity 9is believed to feel lighter than version number 8.
The upper unit is appreciated because it apparently conforms to the natural shape of the foot.
Underfoot cushioning is reliable and reactive to the movement of the foot, based on a couple of reviews.
According to some comments, the platform has a springiness that enables the toe-off.
The form-fitting design of this Newton running shoe is welcomed by those who like a product that follows natural motion and foot flexibility.
2 reasons not to buy
The inner sleeve is said to slightly irritate the skin.
Signs of wear can apparently be seen on the parts of the outsole that are not covered with rubber.
Bottom line
The overall reaction towards the Newton Gravity 9 has been generally positive. This neutral running shoe is believed to be efficient at doling out reliable performance and form-welcoming coverage. The reactive platform is deemed the standout element.
Fans of road running shoes that can work well for races and other extended running sessions are the ones who are likely to enjoy the Newton Gravity 9."
Asics Gel Quantum 360,,88.0,82.0,1793.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.9oz , Women: 9.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Quantum 360 5,"10 reasons to buy
A lot of runners commented that the Asics Gel Quantum 360 looked cool and endearing.
Many testers still felt comfortable even after using this shoe for longer runs.
The upper felt soft, and they didn’t restrict the motions of the foot, wrote some runners.
The breathable nature of the upper fabrics was appreciated because it kept the feet of wearers cool and dry.
The inner fabric didn’t rub uncomfortably against the skin of a tester, giving them blister-free running experiences.
A great number of purchasers used the word ‘comfortable’ to describe their time wearing this running shoe.
The Gel Quantum 360 stayed durable and resilient for those who have tried it.
Runners stated that the mid-sole unit was capable of delivering responsive and reliable underfoot cushioning.
Some of the testers felt that the mid-sole platform was able to support the arch of their feet, thus correcting supination.
The Gel® Cushioning System did a great job at absorbing impact, according to a reviewer.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners found the Gel Quantum 360 to be a bit heavy.
Some wide-footed runners felt that the mid-foot area was a bit narrow.
The outsole rubber wore off on some runners after only a few months of use.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Quantum 360 was generally well-received by runners. They felt that it was able to provide reliable cushioning and consistent breathable coverage. Many were also impressed by its colorful façade and its various colorways. Some runners didn’t sit well with it, saying they preferred another Asics shoe over it. But this road running shoe pleased neutral runners and those who needed some mid-foot support."
Adidas Terrex Agravic Speed,,92.0,85.0,544.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"12 reasons to buy
Most Customers called Adidas Terrex Speed an excellent trail running shoe as it held their feet firmly and securely.
A large number of runners praised the high level of comfort offered by Terrex Agravic Speed.
The customers said that it was a good-looking shoe; it satisfied their fashion urge.
The users were also happy with the variety of color schemes available for this shoe.
Users were happy that the price of the shoe was affordable.
The wearers admired the grip of the shoe on the ground, which prevented unnecessary slippage.
Runners had been impressed with the resilience and flexibility of the shoe, especially on the unpredictable trails.
The toe-box of the shoe was very roomy and airy, said a customer.
One user liked the versatile nature of Adidas Terrex Agravic Speed since it caused the shoe to adapt comfortably to the changing foot movements without having any harsh impact on his feet.
Consumers generally admired how this shoe remained true to size.
A customer also liked the outsole of the shoe; he mentioned that the cutouts on it handled his weight really well.
Another user mentioned how light these shoes were; it felt like he was wearing nothing on his feet.
3 reasons not to buy
A few users said that the upper of the shoe was a bit narrower than the shoes they had used in the past.
A runner said that the insole of the shoe was a bit constricted, which resulted in pain in his foot arch.
A customer was concerned that the lightweight nature of this shoe rendered it incompetent for running on trails.
Bottom line
Runners considered the Adidas Terrex Agravic Speed a package of high comfortability and stability available at an affordable price. Many runners appreciated the ready-to-go looks and the better-than-expected performance of the shoe. However, a few customers expressed concern about its narrow upper."
Asics GT 2000 4,,89.0,88.0,4563.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics GT 2000 8 Lite-Show,"9 reasons to buy
A runner used the Asics GT 2000 4 for a half-marathon and he wrote that it kept him comfortable and safe from knee aches.
The vibrant colorways for this model were lauded by consumers.
The underfoot cushioning system was responsive, noted many testers.
The shock absorption capability of the Gel® Cushioning System became a highlight for runners.
Several testers took note of the efficient mid-foot stability mechanics, which didn’t allow their feet to roll inwards unnaturally.
A number of runners commented that this shoe remained strong and durable, even after many uses.
Some users said that the upper fabrics were able to hug their feet securely, just like a glove.
A runner claimed that wearing the Asics GT 2000 4 significantly diminished ankle pain when running.
There were consumers who stated that this shoe was great not only for running, but also for casual use.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners noted that the sole unit was so jam-packed with features that it limited the flexibility of their feet.
The exoskeletal heel counter caused the inner fabric to rub uncomfortably against the skin of some runners, resulting in some blisters.
A few of the testers felt that this this shoe’s toe box was uncomfortably narrow.
Bottom line
The Asics GT 2000 4 gained a lot of fans because of its comfortable features and stability mechanics. Those with over-pronated foot motion felt that it supported them well. Many said that it was constructed well, that it remained durable even after many uses. Inversely, some complained that it was unpleasingly narrow; others claimed to suffer from blisters because of the fabric rubbing against their heels."
Adidas Falcon Elite 5,,94.0,86.0,87.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 9.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
5 delightful color combinations make it visually appealing.
The Falcon Elite 5 is a great casual shoe for everyday use, based on comments from a large majority of users.
It has an affordable price.
The responsive features of the shoe really impressed many runners.
The Adidas Falcon Elite 5 tackles distances ranging from 5Ks to marathons with ease, remarked several runners and testers.
The spacious toe box delighted runners with slightly wider feet.
3 reasons not to buy
Slightly heavy.
A few runners noted the appearance of wear and tear sooner than expected.
The high heel drop may be a bit much for some.
Bottom line
Adidas offers its usual flair for producing running shoes that can match the appeal of those designed purely for fashion in the 5th version of the Falcon Elite. It is a surprisingly very affordable shoe that offers sufficient arch support for road and track racing.  Similar to the popular Adidas Ultra Boost, the Falcon Elite 5 can be worn casually or for daily training."
Merrell All Out Crush 2,,91.0,85.0,165.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 6.6oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Many people felt that the Merrell All Out Crush 2 was comfortable.
The upper was lauded for preventing trail debris and soil from infiltrating the interior foot-chamber.
Many consumers appreciated the grip of the outsole on soft surfaces and rocks.
Most runners liked the lightweight nature of this running shoe.
The spacious toe box allowed natural toe-splay, based on several reviews.
The durability of the materials used for the All Out Crush 2 was deemed reliable.
1 reasons not to buy
According to a tester, the lightness of this product was a catalyst for in-shoe wobbling and foot instability.
Bottom line
The Merrell All Out Crush 2 received quite a positive response from trail running enthusiasts who wanted dependable surface traction and agreeable in-shoe coverage. Most of those who have tested this neutral shoe liked its lightweight build, as well. Conversely, several people griped about its sizing scheme and its unstable interior fit."
Hoka One One Cavu 3,,90.0,93.0,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.9oz , Women: 5.2oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
'Comfortable' is the term that is used to describe the in-shoe experience of the Hoka One One Cavu 3; runners are mostly happy because of the form-welcoming design.
The uncluttered facade of this road running shoe is welcomed by those who don't like bulky-looking footwear.
The outsole unit is able to adhere to the ground with ease, according to a couple of reviewers; swerves, turns, and brakes are effortless to pull off because of the rubber.
Based on a handful of comments, the upper unit is breathable enough to accommodate all-day use; the foot can apparently enjoy a cool and dry ride due to the breathing pores of the knitted textile.
The cushioning system is suitably responsive and flexible, some users have noted.
2 reasons not to buy
The forefoot section of the in-shoe chamber is a bit restrictive, according to a few testers.
A couple of users have noticed that the collar's lining has a tendency to irritate the skin of the ankles.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Cavu 3 aims to provide runners with a smooth and agreeable ride. The in-shoe experience of this product is intentionally made to feel smooth and form-fitting. Such a design works because a stretchy knitted fabric governs the upper unit’s construction. Also, natural motion and easy steps are afforded by the slightly rockered midsole and the premium foam that encompasses it."
Under Armour Scorpio,,87.0,80.0,173.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 8.2oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
A flat mesh makes up the upper unit of the Scorpio, which offers breathable support.
Most runners welcomed the structure and lateral support given by the welded overlays.
Some of the testers were appreciative of the 4D Foam, which provides a more customized underfoot platform because it conforms to the natural shape of the wearer’s foot.
The Pebax plate offers lightweight support for the underside of the foot whenever it is needed.
The mid-sole is responsible enough that it carries the foot well through many activities.
The blown rubber in the outsole unit improves the durability and traction mechanics of the Scorpio.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners thought that it was a bit narrow for their feet.
The durability of the upper was not liked by some testers because they experienced the material being torn after a few uses.
It has a high price.
Bottom line
Many runners have come to enjoy the Scorpio from Under Armour because of its comfortable platform, steady arch support, cool design and robust outsole. While some experienced issues on the upper, it still is capable of providing a reliable service to those who wear it."
Asics Gel Venture 5,,91.0,86.0,39660.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 8.7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Venture 7,"9 reasons to buy
Many runners felt that the Asics Gel Venture 5 delivered a precise fit.
The different color schemes were lauded by a lot of testers.
The sturdiness and general durability of this shoe were lauded by those who have purchased it.
The toe box was roomy enough to accommodate natural toe splaying, according to some testers.
Those who needed some arch support were able to feel it in the mid-sole unit of this running shoe; it was able to correct supinated foot motion.
The grip of the outsole was noticed by many and they said that it was efficient.
Though optimized for the trails, there were runners who wrote that they were able to enjoy the outsole tread’s traction capabilities on the pavement.
Some users commented that the Gel® Cushioning System responsibly absorbed the landing impact; they didn’t feel any discomfort when striking the foot on the ground.
The full-length mid-sole foam carried the foot well and it didn’t break down easily, runners observed.
3 reasons not to buy
A tester complained that the stitched sections of the upper started falling apart after a month of intermittent use.
The outsole rubber separated from the platform, and it placed a lot of concern for a number of runners.
The Gel Venture 5 is a bit narrow for some runners.
Bottom line
A lot of runners wrote that they were able to use the Asics Gel Venture 5 on both the trails and the roads. For them, it was versatile when used on a variety of surfaces. They praised its cushioning units, which responsibly carried their feet well and even provided some arch support. But there were those who doubted the general durability of this trail shoe because some parts started to fall apart on them."
Salomon X Alpine Pro,,89.0,92.0,8.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
A lot of reviewers have complimented the Salomon X Alpine Pro for being very flexible. 
The mesh upper provides superior protection, commented several experts. 
Some runners appreciate the flexibility delivered by the shoe. 
The shoe offers a secure fit when running; no slippage issues, stated many users. 
The traction of the shoe is suited for any type of trail challenge, commended some reviewers. 
Numerous testers have recognized the heel collar of the X AlpinePro for the exceptional heel hold it offers. 
Many people claim that the EnergyCell midsole of the shoe is very supportive. 
Treading through different terrains, the shoe has been able to provide sufficient stability, mentioned many experts.
4 reasons not to buy
Salomon X Alpine Pro takes some time to break in, remarked some of the wearers. 
The shoe can be too firm, commented some runners. 
Some of the people have stated that the shoe is too expensive. 
According to some users, the shoe is too heavy. 
Bottom line
Salomon has once again effectively used its years of crafting trail running shoes by producing the Salomon X Alpine Pro. Although not feathery light, this shoe has kept its promise of delivering exceptional durability and grip. Many of the runners are very pleased with the level of protection it offers. Given all the technical components of the shoe, many experts claim that this shoe can practically tread through any type of terrain. "
Adidas Energy Falcon, Adidas,73.0,,7.0,$70,$53 (save 24%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Several consumers note that the underfoot cushioning system is comfortable and accommodating of the shape of the foot.
The lightweight structure of the Adidas Energy Falcon has been lauded by those who welcome foot-apparel that are not cumbersome.
The stylish looks of this running shoe is praised by those who like a balance between performance and casual use.
Some users note that the durability of the materials are dependable, stating that the overall quality is high.
The fit profile of this Adidas running shoe is considered by many to be just enough to be snug but not too tight.
1 reasons not to buy
A few consumers complained that the Adidas Energy Falcon is a bit smaller than what they are expecting.
Bottom line
The overall feedback for the Adidas Energy Falcon has been positive. Testers and consumers are happy with this product because it is pleasing to look at and versatile enough to handle many types of activities. The underfoot cushioning system has been highlighted for being form-welcoming and comfortable while the general durability has been deemed superb. On the other hand, some people are unhappy with the apparently smaller-than-usual sizing scheme.
Fans of neutral running shoes that are for the roads are the ones who are going to enjoy this product."
Nike Flex Experience 5,,87.0,70.0,1317.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 10oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Nike Flex Experience RN 7,"8 reasons to buy
The Nike Flex Experience 5 looked great on their feet, stated a lot of runners.
Many testers appreciated the breathable nature of the upper fabrics because they felt that it actually allowed air to keep their feet cool.
The price of this version was generally well-received; consumers wrote that it was affordable.
A reviewer wrote that this shoe was a well-designed one because, for them, its components were consistent and that it didn’t have any unnecessary ‘gimmicks’.
The length and width of this model nicely adhered to the preferences of many runners.
A runner reported that even after over 6 months of use, the Nike Flex Experience 5 still remained efficient.
‘Comfortable’ was a word used frequently as a means to describe the Flex Experience 5.
It didn’t look uncomfortably bulky, wrote several relieved purchasers.
3 reasons not to buy
The bottom part of the sole unit came apart on a number of testers, and they stated that it looked like it was made from cheap material.
The cushioning system was half-baked for a couple of testers; for them, it was comfortable at first, but they claimed that it eventually caused some discomfort to the underside of their feet.
The rear section of the upper unit tended to dig into the skin of a number of testers, causing her some discomfort throughout the running session.
Bottom line
Generally, the response to the Nike Flex Experience 5 was positive. Runners welcomed its comfortable, modern design, as well as its cohesive set of features. They commented that though it didn’t have a lot of systems, the ones that were present were efficient. The affordable price of this road shoe also garnered praise. On the other hand, some purchasers stated that the durability and the efficacy of some of this shoe’s components left a lot to be desired. It just didn’t agree with their preferences and expectations."
Nike Flex Fury,,91.0,80.0,432.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.4oz , Women: 6.8oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,, Nike Flex Fury 2,"8 reasons to buy
A great number of runners welcomed the cool-looking design of the Nike Flex Fury.
The color schemes of this shoe made a positive impression on those who tried it.
Many users commented about this model’s lightweight nature, writing that they were satisfied with it.
A lot of reviewers wrote that this shoe was comfortable for their feet.
There were runners who stated that it was able to fit them nicely.
The cushioning system was efficient and responsive, according to consumers.
The grip of the outsole didn’t disappoint the testers.
The flexibility of this shoe was lauded because it allowed the foot to move as naturally as possible.
3 reasons not to buy
The mesh material used in the upper was hard to clean, noted a tester.
The insole tended to slip away, according to a reviewer.
The lacing system kept unraveling on a runner, which annoyed them.
Bottom line
Neutral runners were able to enjoy the natural performance given by the Nike Flex Fury. This road shoe became their go-to footwear for their running sessions. They welcomed its flexible and agreeable nature. But a few weren’t able to acclimate well to some of its components, saying that they were a bit flimsy."
Under Armour HOVR Guardian 2,,81.0,76.0,9.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.2oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The stability mechanisms that are present in the Under Armour HOVR Guardian 2 are welcomed by those who have overpronated foot motion.
Some users have noted that the underfoot platform is able to ease the strain on the tendons and muscles of the underfoot, thus averting tendonitis and other potential injuries.
People appreciated the fact that a sensor is present to permit the runner to track their performance via the Under Armour's app.
The durability of the materials is welcomed by many consumers.
Breathability is a trait that people have come to observe from this performance footwear.
2 reasons not to buy
A few testers are claiming that the midfoot support is not as obvious nor as efficient at correcting pronation as expected.
The forefoot section is a bit restrictive, according to a couple of purchasers.
Bottom line
Runners who require extra support for the foot can certainly enjoy the Under Armour HOVR Guardian 2. This model aims to provide a cushioning experience that can ease any excess strain on the tendons and muscles. Also, it offers breathability, in-shoe security, and durability as it has a performance-ready construction that is mindful of the performance of the wearer."
Vibram FiveFingers V-Trail 2.0,,81.0,74.0,97.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 6.4oz , Women: 5oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"3 reasons to buy
The outsole unit of the Vibram FiveFingers V-Trail 2.0 was lauded for being durable and capable of doling out dependable traction over the surfaces.
The design of this trail running companion was praised by most testers, stating that the aesthetics were pleasing to the eyes.
Some users were happy with the overall durability of this product, claiming that it carried and protected them as they tackled aggressive paths.
5 reasons not to buy
The upper unit didn’t stretch and acclimatize to the shape of the foot, stated several testers; they felt a snugness that bothered them.
A couple of runners complained that the stitch-on overlay on the midfoot restricted the natural swelling of the foot, resulting in an uncomfortably tight wrap.
The inner sleeve tended to rub against the skin of the toes, stated a handful of purchasers.
The heel collar caused some chafing on the ankles and heel, according to a disgruntled consumer.
A few people reported that the sizing scheme was half-a-size smaller than their usual choices.
Bottom line
Mixed to negative reviews were showered upon the Vibram FiveFingers V-Trail 2.0. This addition to the global roster of trail running shoes apparently didn’t have the soundest construction because people were complaining about a tight width profile, a half-a-size too small sizing scheme, and an upper that scratched skin. But not all of the responses were dire; some users commended the durability of this product, as well as its reliable traction and appealing looks.
The V-Trail 2.0 is a product for the neutral pronator. It’s also meant for trail adventurers and fans of minimalist running shoes."
On Cloud Dip,,85.0,86.0,10.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 6.8oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The On Cloud Dip is considered to be lightweight enough for all-day use.
Some consumers believe that the speed lacing system on the upper permits them to effortlessly wear the shoe.
The versatility of the design is lauded by runners; they feel that they can use this product for any activity.
A handful of testers have observed and appreciated the durable construction of this running shoe, emphasizing the upper unit’s use of ballistic-weave textiles.
The rubberized mud-guard that surrounds the bottom of the silhouette is welcomed for its waterproofing capacity.
A few runners have deemed the Cloud Dip a viable option for cold weather; the canvas upper apparently keeps the foot warm.
2 reasons not to buy
The outsole unit is slippery on slick surfaces, according to several consumers.
Purchasers report that the upper is not very breathable.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of people towards the On Cloud Dip has been positive. This road running shoe and its durable construction are deemed solid efficient for a variety of activities. The ballistic canvas upper is highlighted as the driving force that makes the whole product appealing and accommodating. On the other hand, the outsole unit’s inconsistent traction on wet surfaces and the upper’s too-warm construction are lamented.
Fans of neutral running shoes that are meant for different activities on the urban landscape are the target market of the On Cloud Dip."
Asics Gel Torrance, Asics,88.0,,1233.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.5oz , Women: 7.4oz,,,," Narrow, Normal | Normal, Wide", Asics Gel Torrance 2,"11 reasons to buy
Several runners loved the affordable price of the Asics Gel Torrance.
A good number of wearers appreciated its nice-looking design and great color options.
A few testers lauded its breathable coverage which keeps the foot cool and dry through the running activity.
Many buyers commented that the shoe was lightweight in structure.
A lot of reviewers admired its accurate size.
Some purchasers mentioned that the shoe was supportive.
According to those who have tried it, the Asics Gel Torrance provided great traction when used on a treadmill.
The majority of the consumers noted that the shoe was best for casual wear.
The shoe was comfortable, based on some reviews.
The Asics Gel Torrance has attractive colors to choose from, according to many testers.
A handful of purchasers agreed that the shoe fitted perfectly on them.
3 reasons not to buy
Some of the users said that the toe box was not durable.
A tester commented that the webbing of the Asics Gel Torrance broke down quickly after several uses only.
One of the users said that it has poor quality.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Torrance is a lightweight road running shoe designed for competition. This running shoe from Asics has made many runners satisfied because of its good-looking design, attractive colors, and impressive fit. Aside from the lightweight design, the shoe also offers a good amount of breathability and comfort. While others have issues on durability, others still recommend the shoe because of its affordable price. Overall, the Asics Gel Torrance is a good option for runners who are looking for a comfortable, lightweight, and visually appealing shoe."
Mizuno Wave Enigma 4,,94.0,95.0,58.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
That the Mizuno Enigma 4 is a superbly comfortable shoe is a common denominator in many reviews.
The 4th version of the enigma runs lighter than its weight indicates, according to several comments.
The cushioning is plush.
There is a very nice rolling motion through the gait cycle, noted a few runners.
Mizuno’s Dynamotion Fit helps hold the foot in place without hindering the runner’s natural movement.
A breathable mesh ensures a cool and sweat-free run.
3 reasons not to buy
The price point is too much for quite a number of runners.
It is a bit stiff for some.
The 12mm heel offset lessens the stability of the shoe as observed by a handful.
Bottom line
The Wave Enigma 4 is Mizuno’s answer to a relatively lightweight trainer that can slog through miles of daily running. It has more than enough arch support for long runs with a very smooth transition from landing to take off."
Salomon Sonic RA Pro 2,,89.0,82.0,47.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 6.5oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The reactive midsole of the Salomon Sonic RA Pro 2 is lauded for energizing the toe-offs attenuating the landing impacts.
The platform is praised for giving a well-balanced ride that doesn’t buckle the foot.
Several testers have welcomed the curved midfoot design which apparently supported the arch.
Most testers claim that this Salomon running shoe is light enough to permit all-day wear.
A couple of runners appreciate the padding on the rear of the upper, stating that it suitably secured the Achilles tendon in place.
The upper unit is welcomed by those who like breathability and form-fitting security.
2 reasons not to buy
A few consumers claim that the collar of the Sonic RA Pro 2 has a tendency to rub uncomfortably against the skin.
According to a couple of testers, the rubber used for the outsole unit has a tendency to wear off quickly.
Bottom line
The overall feedback of consumers for the Salomon Sonic RA Pro 2 is positive. A majority of them are glad because this road running shoe is able to deliver reactive performances without being too heavy or unwieldy. The highlighted sections also include the secure in-shoe experience and the steady platform. On the other hand, the irritating collar and quick-to-wear rubber outsole are criticized.
Fans of neutral running shoes that are for flat surfaces like the asphalt and groomed dirt paths are the target market of the Sonic RA Pro 2."
Asics GT 2000 5,,90.0,86.0,7865.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics GT 2000 8 Lite-Show,"7 reasons to buy
Most of the reviewers appreciated the comfortable sole of the GT 2000 5.
A handful of runners loved the shock-absorbing cushioning of the 5th version of the GT 2000.
The structured Heel Clutch System and the Duomax Support System combine to provide excellent support and stability.
The new mesh upper offers better foot-hugging support in this model.
The deep vertical flex groove enhance transitions and helps with the flexibility of this well-cushioned shoe.
Additional midfoot overlays deliver a wraparound feel in the midfoot, particularly in the arch.
Gender specific cushioning gives a slightly softer feel for the women for more comfort.
3 reasons not to buy
A few wished for substantial weight reduction in the Asics GT 2000 5.
It is a bit expensive.
A handful of runners needed a break-in period to be very comfortable in this shoe.
Bottom line
The GT 2000 series is one of those shoes from Asics that has slowly but surely gained a solid following from runners who require a shoe that blends a well-cushioned run and a supportive ride. In the GT 2000 5, Asics continues this line’s tradition of excellent cushioning, superb arch support, with improved security in the midfoot and the heel. For heel strikers, the 10mm heel offset and the Gel Cushioning system combine to soften the impact with every strike."
361 Degrees Sensation 4,,82.0,84.0,8.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The majority of the users said that the 361 Degrees Sensation 4 is comfortable. 
This running shoe is lightweight, several runners claimed. 
Many buyers appreciated the soft cushioning of the shoe. 
Some wearers noted that the tongue helps offer a snug in-shoe feel. 
It is supportive, according to a couple of consumers. 
Several purchasers mentioned that it is also good for casual walks. 
People appreciated the shoe’s breathability. 
2 reasons not to buy
A lot of consumers mentioned that the shoe is a bit narrow. 
The shoe lacks flexibility, according to a user. 
Bottom line
The 361 Degrees Sensation 4 is a road running shoe designed to provide support for runners who overpronate. It utilizes technologies that deliver enhanced stability and comfort to improve the running experience. The shoe also features a stylish design, making it perfect not only for running but also for casual walks. "
Nike Air Max 2017,,86.0,70.0,1228.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.9oz , Women: 11.9oz, Men: 13mm , Women: 13mm, Nov 2016,,,"11 reasons to buy
The Nike Air Max 2017 solidifies the line’s tradition of mixing performance and lifestyle with its cool, sophisticated looks and solid performance on track.
It is extremely comfortable, according to several reviewers.
It comes in different color combinations.
The shoe has sufficient reflectivity for low-visibility running.
A few runners noted that it has better quality than the 2016 edition.
The cushioning absorbs shock well, based on the experience of several users.
It is great for all day wear, as a running shoe or as a casual footwear.
More than a few mentioned that is several times better than the past model.
The 2017 version of the Air Max showed little sign of wear after being extensively used on the road, as noticed by a small number of runners.
Some avid fans of the series agreed that the quality and construction of the latest version of the Air Max are a notch better than the predecessor.
It works well as a gym shoe, according to some reviewers.
6 reasons not to buy
The $190 price tag is too tough to swallow.
It is a bit smaller than before.
It is also slightly narrower than the 2016 version.
The new tongue, which is attached, caused a little too much snugness or tightness even if the laces are adjusted, based on the reviews of several runners.
A small number of runners found the cushioning too hard.
Some very loyal fans of the Air Max felt that the air bag design is long overdue for a change as it could really improve the line’s performance as a running shoe.
Bottom line
Nike is steadfast in its aim of blending performance and lifestyle with every release of the Air Max series. The 2017 Nike Air Max is no different as it thrives on its ability to match superior comfort, adequate arch support, and insane looks. Although the price won’t allow everyone to own a pair, this should be one of those shoes that people will be itching to get their hands on."
New Balance Fresh Foam Kaymin, New Balance,89.0,,339.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Several consumers noted that the New Balance Fresh Foam Kaymin offered a comfortable experience.
Some runners lauded the midsole unit for attenuating impact shock well.
The general durability of the materials was deemed by testers to be reliable.
The aesthetics of this running shoe were appreciated by many of those who have tried it.
A tester welcomed the lightweight nature of the product.
1 reasons not to buy
The cushioning was apparently too hard in the heel area, according to a disgruntled purchaser.
Bottom line
The New Balance Fresh Foam Kaymin was welcomed by many neutral pronators. They loved the comfortable in-shoe experience, the agreeable underfoot platform, and the eye-catching design. For them, it’s a trendy new shoe for the roads. But some people had gripes with the heel part of its midsole and the inconsistent sizing scheme."
Adidas Questar Ride,,91.0,,982.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.6oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 11mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The width profile of the Adidas Questar Ride impressed many consumers.
The weight of this running shoe was deemed lightweight by most testers.
Several people liked the price; for them, it was affordable.
Some runners noted that the general quality of the materials was reliable and sound.
The design was well-liked by a lot of those who have purchased it.
Most testers were happy with the traction-ready outsole configuration.
A few people appreciated the flexible nature of the underfoot platform; they claimed that it allowed them to toe-off more efficiently.
3 reasons not to buy
Some consumers claimed that the mesh in the forefoot section rubbed uncomfortably against the toes.
A few testers claimed that the midfoot section of the upper was too narrow.
A handful of purchasers complained that the midsole’s lack of arch support caused some discomfort to the underfoot.
Bottom line
Many people were happy with the Adidas Questar Ride. Many of them claimed that it offered lightweight comfort and performance on the roads. Moreover, they liked the agreeable price and dependable components. On the other hand, there were concerns with the neutral shoe's upper unit being irritating to the skin, as well as incidents wherein runners got inconsistent shoe-sizes for their purchased pair."
Hoka One One Tivra,,83.0,,8.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"6 reasons to buy
People have noted that the Hoka One One Tivra can be used for gym exercises and impact-centered workouts.
The aesthetics of this running shoe are welcomed by those who like a sporty yet stylish shoe-facade.
The front of the platform is suitably flexible for energized forefoot lifts, based on most reviews.
A few people have noted that the broad toe box design encourages balance through natural toe-splay.
Breathability is an aspect that is appreciated by many purchasers.
The lightweight structure of this Hoka One One running shoe is appreciated by many runners.
3 reasons not to buy
Some users are unhappy with the outsole unit because it doesn’t offer a lot of traction.
According to several consumers, the tread pattern of the outsole unit quickly wears off, thus erasing what’s left of the traction potential.
A few people have complained about the collar irritating the skin of the ankles.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of people towards the Hoka One One Tivra has been mostly positive. This neutral running shoe is welcomed because it is lightweight, flexible, and made to be versatile. Conversely, the outsole unit’s limited capacities and the apparently irritating collar are criticized.
Fans of Hoka One One’s generous cushioning implementations can have fun with the optimized-for-women Tivra."
Saucony Triumph ISO 2,,90.0,90.0,1576.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Saucony Triumph ISO 5,"7 reasons to buy
The ISOFIT upper construction adapts to the shape of the wearer’s foot, offering breathable and soft coverage.
Most reviewers appreciated the inclusion of a Lightweight Support Frame, which increases the upper’s structure and stability.
The RUNDRY moisture-wicking collar lining keeps the foot secure and comfortable.
Runners generally acclimated to the EVERUN cushioning compound, which provides responsive underfoot support and shock absorption.
The PWRGRID+ enhances the Triumph ISO 2’s capacity of the midsole to cushion the foot.
It has a roomy toe box for toe splay and some runners liked it.
It comes in a variety of colors and design schemes, which many found to be appealing.
2 reasons not to buy
The Saucony Triumph ISO 2 is expensive.
A few thought that the forefoot area was a bit narrow.
Bottom line
The Triumph ISO 2 from Saucony is a popular mild support running option for many runners because of its comfortable platform, its great looks, and its durable materials. It’s a great way to enjoy an active lifestyle every day."
Adidas Energy Boost 3,,92.0,80.0,1097.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
The Adidas Energy Boost 3 looked visually endearing to a lot of runners.
This shoe was versatile enough that it enabled many users to wear it for running sessions, workouts and casual walks.
The mid-sole unit was able to deliver reliable and responsive cushioning, noted a runner.
Some testers noticed that the technology used in the mid-sole really caused each step to be springy.
A reviewer wrote that the mid-foot support unit in the platform helped them in achieving a smooth and stable gait.
Several runners thought that the Energy Boost 3 was an example of a perfect marriage of support and cushioning.
The grip of the outsole was reliable, according to testers.
Reviewers lauded the overall quality and durability of this shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
The rigid plastic stripes or overlays that are placed on the upper unit caused the fabrics to rub against the skin of some testers, causing discomfort.
A runner commented that the lacing system wasn’t able to reach the ball of the foot; they felt that they weren’t able to adjust the fit securely enough.
The tread of the outsole wore off on a few runners, thus exposing the mid-sole to abrasion and reducing traction.
Bottom line
Many runners were able to get quality service from the Adidas Energy Boost 3. For them, it’s a reliable option for their running sessions. It looked appealing and it felt great for their feet. Inversely, some testers observed that the upper unit was a bit uncomfortable, and a few felt that the durability of the outsole left a lot to be desired. But this neutral road shoe generally performed well for the majority of consumers."
Saucony Triumph ISO 3,,88.0,84.0,680.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Saucony Triumph ISO 5,"9 reasons to buy
A runner stated that even though they had the Saucony Triumph ISO 3 for some time, it still felt fresh and comfortable, like wearing it for the first time.
A tester commented that the platform felt just as plush as the previous version.
The responsiveness of the mid-sole unit was enjoyed by many.
Several consumers wrote that the toe box had enough room to accommodate natural toe-splaying.
The upper unit’s breathable nature was appreciated by the consumers.
A lot of runners agreed that this shoe was true-to-size.
A reviewer reported that the underfoot experience didn’t make them feel as if they were sinking into the cushioning system; it was smooth yet reliable.
According to a runner, it was versatile enough to handle tempo runs and those long, slow sessions on the road.
Based on the feedback of purchasers, wearing this shoe was a generally comfortable affair.
2 reasons not to buy
According to a tester, the tongue of this running shoe was too thin, causing lacing pressure to transfer directly to the skin.
Some runners felt that this shoe’s price was a bit expensive.
Bottom line
The Saucony Triumph ISO 3 was a success, according to the feedback of many of those who have used it. It delivered a smooth and comfortable ride, which agreed with neutral runners. The responsiveness of its components gained some praise, as well. Conversely, it didn’t fit well for a few testers."
New Balance 870 v4,,90.0,87.0,224.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.3oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, New Balance 870 v5,"6 reasons to buy
The New Balance 870 v4 is lighter than any of its past iterations.
Most of the runners agree that it is more flexible compared to past editions.
Reviews coming from mild overpronators show that they were pleasantly surprised by the sufficient stability and support.
A touch of flexibility in a very stable ride is given huge thumbs up from many runners.
The stability is reliable without being intrusive, according to several slight overpronators.
The 870 v4 is a versatile shoe that has been proven by many to do very well in different distances and in various speeds.
2 reasons not to buy
There are many moderate overpronators who would have wanted more arch support coming from the 870 v4.
A few runners with wide feet found the shoe as too narrow for comfort.
Bottom line
The New Balance 870 v4 is a shoe that looks and performs way better than its price tag. It firmly finds a place in the lightweight trainer category that is suited best for distances ranging from 10Ks to marathons. Neutrals and slight overpronators will find the arch support perfect in reining in the slight inward rolling of the foot."
Reebok Endless Road 2, Reebok,85.0,,7.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Some users have mentioned that the upper unit of the Reebok Endless Road 2 is able to buttress the foot properly.
The underfoot platform is praised for providing responsive support at all times.
Several runners believe that the weight of this Reebok running shoe is suitably light for all-day use.
The traction given by the outsole unit is considered reliable and confidence-giving.
The breathability of the upper unit is welcomed by most purchasers.
2 reasons not to buy
Some consumers feel a bit of discomfort because of the tongue unit slipping to the sides of the shoe.
A few people have noted that the upper unit needs a break-in period before becoming agreeable and form-welcoming.
Bottom line
The overall reaction towards the Reebok Endless Road 2 has been positive. People are happy with the comfortable midsole construction, breathable silhouette, and traction-ready external pad. Conversely, the quick-to-deviate tongue piece and need for a break-in period have turned off some consumers.
Fans of road running shoes that can handle many types of activities can enjoy the Reebok Endless Road 2."
Under Armour Charged Escape,,87.0,,236.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.1oz , Women: 7.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Under Armour Charged Escape 3,"6 reasons to buy
The design of the Under Armour Charged Escape was much appreciated by many consumers.
Most testers loved that the weight was suitably light.
The upper unit gained favor for being able to provide ventilation to the foot throughout the running session.
The smooth and uncomplicated design of the façade was appreciated; runners liked that there were no dense layers for overlays.
Several runners commented that this running shoe was robust in its performance.
The price was considered by many to be affordable.
3 reasons not to buy
A few consumers noted that it was a bit narrower compared to the shoes that they already had.
The grip of the outsole was inefficient, several testers complained.
A person noted that the front part of the mesh upper developed holes within six months of use.
Bottom line
The Under Armour Charged Escape received mostly positive reviews from runners and shoe enthusiasts. They welcomed its lightweight nature, its appealing looks, and its apparently proficient components. It performed well, according to their feedback. But this road running shoe was not free from detrimental scrutiny, receiving unfavorable reviews for inconsistent performance and questionable durability."
Nike LunarGlide 8,,89.0,82.0,420.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.1oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Nike LunarGlide 9,"7 reasons to buy
The plush inner sleeve and the soft cushioning are the main reasons for the Lunarglide 8’s comfortable ride, based on most reviews.
It runs very light for a stability shoe, according to several comments.
A good number of runners have used the 8th iteration of the Lunarglide as an up-tempo or high-mileage trainer.
The breathability of the shoe was appreciated by a few.
A small number of reviewers noticed that it performed as well or better than some of the most popular lightweight stability shoes around.
More than a few runners noted that this shoe was reasonably-priced.
More than 10 different color combinations for runners to choose from.
5 reasons not to buy
Most runners were frustrated by the pebbles that gather in the outsole of the latest Lunarglide.
Some runners felt that the shoe lacked the responsiveness of the previous model.
It is quite tight and narrow, unlike the earlier version of the Lunarglide, remarked several.
The outsole is blamed by most negative comments as the main difference in the ride and performance between the 8th version of the LunarGlide 8 and the earlier model.
Outsole durability gets a heavy dose of criticism coming from a significant number of runners.
Bottom line
The Nike Lunarglide 8 is a lightweight, well-cushioned, and supportive trainer that can basically take on any type of distance. With great comfort, breathability, and solid versatility, runners should have a really good shoe for their trainings. What makes the shoe a winner is its ability to compete with some of the more illustrious lightweight stability shoes around without having the same hefty price tag."
Reebok One Lite,,89.0,,121.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.6oz , Women: 6.4oz, Men: 7mm , Women: 7mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Breathable protection found through a mesh upper.
The seamless construction of the One Lite makes it great for sock-less wearing.
Some mild overlays are added to the sides and they don’t add to the weight or hinder the structure of the upper.
The FoamFusion mid-sole cushioning technology provides responsive cushioning when transitioning from the heel to the toe.
The Reebok One Lite is a durable shoe that is consistent.
The ankle area and tongue are both padded and this is appreciated by many testers.
Runners received the lightweight nature of the One Lite really well.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners felt the need to add a more customized insole to achieve the right added cushioning for the foot.
There were those who thought that this running shoe looked a bit plain.
The stability capability of the mid-sole didn’t work well for some who needed more support.
Bottom line
The One Lite from Reebok is a solid running shoe for many types of athletes. Beginners can ease into it and get great cushioning and support, while advanced athletes appreciate the lightweight nature of this running shoe that has mild arch support."
Mizuno Wave Prophecy 7,,84.0,,551.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.9oz , Women: 10.5oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Mizuno Wave Prophecy 9,"7 reasons to buy
A lot of runners said that the Mizuno Wave Prophecy 7 was best for walking, running, and cross-training.
The shoe was comfortable, based on some reviews.
Many testers commented that it was supportive.
Some reviewers said that the shoe has no breaking in needed.
A handful of buyers were impressed with the shoe's great-looking design.
According to several wearers, the Mizuno Wave Prophecy 7 was lightweight.
The majority of the buyers agreed that the shoe quickly adapted to all their running needs.
4 reasons not to buy
The shoe was expensive, according to some purchasers.
Several testers observed that the grooves in the outsole quickly collected tiny rocks as they run.
The Mizuno Wave Prophecy 7 was a little bit narrow for some users.
One of the wearers said that the shoe ripped-off easily after several uses only.
Bottom line
In general, the Mizuno Wave Prophecy 7 has made a lot of users satisfied because of its performance and design. Aside from its excellent construction, the shoe also provides the right amount of support that is needed on different paved surfaces. Although some of them have problems with the shoe's price and size, others still recommend the Mizuno Wave Prophecy 7 because of its versatility. It is an excellent option for those who are looking for a comfortable and quality running shoe."
Salomon Sense Escape 2,,83.0,,200.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Most of those who have tested the Salomon Sense Escape 2 claim that this shoe has a suitably lightweight construction.
The grip capacity of the outsole unit has garnered positive feedback from those who welcome precise traction and movement control.
People like the overall design and colorways of this running shoe, stating that the silhouette is eye-catching.
Purchasers like the affordable price of the Salomon Sense Escape 2.
The breathability of the upper has been emphasized as a source of comfort and enjoyment.
The midsole offers adequate cushioning for the whole foot, according to most users.
3 reasons not to buy
Several consumers have complained of a too-short in-shoe feel. While some state that the deviation is half-a-size from the usual, others claim that the discrepancy is actually one full size.
A handful of people have decided that the width profile of the Salomon Sense Escape 2 is a bit narrow compared to their expectations.
Some testers have expressed their displeasure about the apparently firm underfoot cushioning; they noted that such a feature is not for all-day use.
Bottom line
While the Salomon Sense Escape 2 enjoys lavish acceptance from those who have tried it, some of its elements have become quite controversial. This update to the relatively new, but ultimately well-received Sense Escape features accommodating components, but the complaints still abound. The highlights of the criticism include a narrow width profile and a stiff midsole. On the other hand, the positive feedback emphasizes the lightweight construction, the grippy outsole, and the affordable price.
Trail running shoe enthusiasts and neutral pronators are the intended users of the Salomon Sense Escape 2."
Altra Timp,,89.0,82.0,248.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,, Altra Timp 2,"7 reasons to buy
Several testers were happy about the Altra Timp’s grip on mud, rock, and dirt.
Various users commented on how comfortable the shoe was on their feet.
A lot of users, especially female ones, appreciated the colorways this shoe comes in.
One user, who has high arches, commended the comfort and stability the shoe offered him.
A majority of users shared that the ride of the shoe is very smooth.
A tester mentioned that the shoe felt more robust than other Altra trail shoes he has tried.
Many runners appreciated the shoe for having enough cushioning.
5 reasons not to buy
One tester remarked that the shoe felt small and narrow.
Another user commented that the lacing system doesn’t offer good support. This user continued by saying that his foot slid inwards during his runs.
Some runners said that the toe box felt odd.
A runner was able to observe that sand and dirt got into his shoe through the mesh.
There were testers who mentioned the Altra Timp not having a good grip on wet rock or pavement.
Bottom line
The Altra Timp is a neutral, zero-drop trail running shoe with a reasonable price tag and maximum cushioning. It provides a secure fit and enough support on areas of your feet that need it most when running on various terrains. With its 4mm outsole lugs, it’s a solid option for trail running or trail racing."
Mizuno Wave Creation 17,,92.0,88.0,758.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.1oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Mizuno Wave Creation 21,"6 reasons to buy
A majority of runners applauded the durable and comfortable construction of the Wave Creation 17.
Based on the some reviews, the 17th version of the Wave Creation offers plenty of cushioning.
It features the Mizuno’s U4ic technology for durability and superior ride, according to a few testers.
It uses the X10 carbon rubber for added durability in high wear areas.
The Mizuno Intercool midsole offers full-length ventilation for breathability and comfort.
Available in several color options.
2 reasons not to buy
A moderately high-priced shoe.
Some runners felt that this shoe is a bit heavy.
Bottom line
The Mizuno Wave Creation 17 offers an impressive update as far as cushioning, durability and support are concerned. This road running shoe is reliable for high mileage runs and great for everyday running. A few negative comments geared towards the price and weight, but overall, the shoe is really a wise buy."
Vivobarefoot Stealth II,,87.0,87.0,148.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.5oz , Women: 4.2oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,, Vivobarefoot Stealth III,"6 reasons to buy
Most users of the Stealth II found it to be comfortable, flexible, and lightweight.
A runner commented that the shoe gave adequate toe room and enabled a more natural foot movement compared to mainstream running shoes.
Many runners agreed that it had a stylish appearance unlike other brands of barefoot-running shoes.
A lot of users felt the Stealth II was effective in delivering a barefoot running sensation.
One reviewer mentioned that a recurring heel pain was reduced when running.
Another tester noted that the shoe did not require a long break in period.
4 reasons not to buy
One user said the Vivobarefoot Stealth II was not able to perform well on rough roads and dirt tracks.
The shoe caused discomfort around the ankle, said one reviewer.
It was a little expensive considering its few features, as observed by a couple of buyers.
Some runners felt the shoe did not provide enough support to the foot.
Bottom line
Many will find that the Stealth II is a relatively durable running shoe that reaches its goal in making barefooted running easy and enjoyable. The shoe delivers comfort and flexibility while remaining visually appealing. It is not recommended for runners who want a shoe that promotes minimalist running."
Under Armour HOVR Infinite Camo,,78.0,,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
A lot of users commented that the shoe is comfortable. 
Its record sensor technology has helped runners keep on track of their fitness goals.
It is durable, according to some consumers. 
A tester said that his knee pain disappeared after several weeks of using the shoe. 
Many people admired the stylish look of the shoe. 
The shoe also works on light trails, said a commenter. 
3 reasons not to buy
A tester felt like his foot was being pushed to the front of the shoe. 
The shoe is a little bulky, said a buyer. 
It is not responsive, according to a purchaser. 
Bottom line
The Under Armour HOVR Infinite Camo is a stylish road running shoe that is perfect for everything from base mileage to long runs. It offers a gender-specific fit that aims to deliver comfort right where men and women need it. It is perfect for runners who are looking for cushioning, flexibility, and versatility. "
Salomon Sense Ride GTX Invisible Fit,,86.0,,59.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Salomon Sense Ride 3 GTX Invisible Fit,"5 reasons to buy
Several consumers liked the lightweight build of the Salomon Sense Ride GTX Invisible Fit.
The underfoot cushioning system was liked because it was responsive.
The upper unit was lauded for being able to hug the foot securely and comfortably.
Purchasers welcomed the waterproof upper, stating that it acted as a wall against water infiltration.
The durability of the materials was appreciated by runners.
1 reasons not to buy
The tongue easily let debris in the foot-chamber, a few people claimed.
Bottom line
People were mostly happy with the Salomon Sense Ride GTX Invisible Fit. They felt that this trail companion offered superb performance and quality. The GORE-TEX® upper and the midsole cushioning system were elements that garnered praise. Overall, this neutral running shoe was seen as a worthy addition to Salomon’s roster."
Nike Odyssey React Shield 2,,86.0,90.0,9.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11oz , Women: 11oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Many users said that this shoe is suitable for running and walking. 
The Nike Odyssey React Shield 2 is comfortable, based on reviews. 
A couple of users mentioned that the shoe is supportive.
Runners appreciated the water-repellent feature of the shoe. 
A lot of buyers highlighted the shoe’s overall quality.  
Several wearers loved the eye-catching color schemes.
3 reasons not to buy
The Nike Odyssey React Shield 2 is a bit narrow, some users reported. 
A couple of users reported the excess upper material causing discomfort. 
One disappointed user complained about the stiff midsole section. 
Bottom line
The Nike Odyssey React Shield 2 features a winterized construction that empowers the runner to continue running even in cold and wet conditions. This shoe incorporates state-of-the-art technologies that aim to support the runner in every mile. Its lightweight design and responsive cushioning aim to deliver a comfortable and efficient ride. "
Zoot Solana ACR,,86.0,81.0,42.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The Zoot Solana ACR is using a waterproof membrane for better wet and cold resistance.
The Solana ACR lighter than many of the other waterproofed shoes on the market.
Responsive cushioning is something that can be found in this shoe, according to some runners.
Traction is superb, regardless of the conditions, based on the observations of a handful of runners.
Most runners noted the tons of comfort provided by the shoe.
Durability is considered by many as its best asset.
The price is a bit cheaper than some options with the same weatherproof features.
2 reasons not to buy
The Solana ACR’s breathability is compromised by the waterproof membrane, based on the remark of several runners.
A few runners were let down by the tight toe box.
Bottom line
The Solana ACR is Zoot’s way of incorporating a waterproofing membrane to allow a run for all seasons. While it excels in performing its task, the breathability is somewhat compromised. Other than slight issues with ventilation, this remains a shoe that runners can desire as it has good arch support, durable components, and an overall comfortable design. No less than an award from the esteemed Runner’s World is proof of this shoe’s amazing performance and quality."
New Balance 870 v4,,90.0,87.0,224.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.3oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, New Balance 870 v5,"6 reasons to buy
The New Balance 870 v4 is lighter than any of its past iterations.
Most of the runners agree that it is more flexible compared to past editions.
Reviews coming from mild overpronators show that they were pleasantly surprised by the sufficient stability and support.
A touch of flexibility in a very stable ride is given huge thumbs up from many runners.
The stability is reliable without being intrusive, according to several slight overpronators.
The 870 v4 is a versatile shoe that has been proven by many to do very well in different distances and in various speeds.
2 reasons not to buy
There are many moderate overpronators who would have wanted more arch support coming from the 870 v4.
A few runners with wide feet found the shoe as too narrow for comfort.
Bottom line
The New Balance 870 v4 is a shoe that looks and performs way better than its price tag. It firmly finds a place in the lightweight trainer category that is suited best for distances ranging from 10Ks to marathons. Neutrals and slight overpronators will find the arch support perfect in reining in the slight inward rolling of the foot."
Zoot Ultra TT,,88.0,,10.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.5oz , Women: 6.5oz, Men: 3mm , Women: 3mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The Zoot Ultra TT is lightweight, most runners observed. 
Many users have expressed that the shoe is comfortable. 
It is very supportive, based on some reviews. 
A couple of testers mentioned that the shoe is responsive. 
This running companion is breathable, a buyer claimed. 
Several runners praised the shoe’s soft cushioning. 
People like the stylish design of the shoe. 
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of users complained because the shoelaces are too long. 
The toe box is a bit tight, according to a consumer.
Bottom line
Zoot Ultra TT is a neutral running shoe that works best for runners and athletes with mild pronation or neutral gait. It is a limited-edition triathlon shoe that aims to provide a comfortable, light, and efficient running experience. This Zoot running shoe features advanced technologies that are designed to support runners to achieve optimal performance. "
New Balance 1340 v3,,78.0,,130.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 15.4oz , Women: 12.3oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Some testers were happy with the shoe’s exceptional fit.
Many reviewers agreed that the shoe was comfortable.
A buyer noted that he did not experience any foot pain while wearing the shoe.
The shoelaces were lauded for being elastic and easy to secure.
According to a few users, the shoe provides an impressive in-shoe feel.
3 reasons not to buy
One of the purchasers commented that the shoe was a little stiff.
A consumer claimed that the outsole rubber separated quickly from the bottom of the platform.
People felt that this running shoe was too heavy for extended use.
Bottom line
Overall, the response for the New Balance 1340 v3 was mixed. While many runners enjoyed this stability shoe’s agreeable fit, comfortable platform, and easy-to-secure shoelaces, others criticized its build-quality and its weight. Some people also believed that the in-shoe experience was stiff. When it received praise, the 1340 v3 was painted in grace, but when it was panned, it seemed an entirely different shoe. Suffice it to say that to try it out first before purchasing would be a wise decision."
Adidas Ultraboost Uncaged,,96.0,86.0,1498.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A lot of runners welcomed the appealing look of the Adidas Ultraboost Uncaged, which allowed them to use it casually.
The majority of reviewers commended its lightweight disposition.
Commenters said that the comfortable and long-lasting nature of this running shoe was worth the otherwise expensive price.
Many testers used the word ‘comfortable’ to describe their experience wearing this model.
The Boost™ technology received high praise for its responsive performance and durability.
A user commented that the upper was able to wrap around their feet snugly and securely.
The overall quality was reliable for a lot of those who tested the Adidas Ultrboost Uncaged.
4 reasons not to buy
A few runners noted that the width of the Adidas Ultraboost Uncaged was a bit tight.
One tester commented that it was a struggle to put on and that it needed a pull-tab to assist them.
A reviewer stated that it lacked midfoot support, which could’ve been helpful for performance running.
The garter-like collar tended to irritate the skin after prolonged use, complained a tester.
Bottom line
The Adidas Ultraboost Uncaged gave comfort and security to a lot of runners. It kept their feet moving without restriction. The cushioning system was greatly appreciated, as well. Many said that this shoe was expensive, but its overall performance and service made it worth its price."
Adidas Adizero Tempo 9,,88.0,89.0,531.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Most testers noted that the weight of the Adidas Adizero Tempo 9 was suitably light.
The boost™ technology in the midsole impressed many runners; they loved its bouncy performance and comfortable nature.
The price of this running shoe was deemed affordable.
A tester noted that the mesh material of the upper was breathable; she welcomed its capability to deliver a cool and dry running experience.
‘Comfortable’ was a term that was used to describe this product.
2 reasons not to buy
Several consumers noted that the sizing schemes were too small.
Some purchasers observed that it was a bit narrow in the heel and forefoot.
Bottom line
The Adidas Adizero Tempo 9 was considered a successful upgrade to the revered series. Most runners enjoyed its comfortable and appealing design. They also welcomed its breathable construction and affordable price. Some people didn’t like its sizing and the width profiles, stating that the measurements were inconsistent."
La Sportiva Bushido,,89.0,84.0,313.0,,, Trail, Stability, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 9.1oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,, La Sportiva Bushido II,"6 reasons to buy
The high level of support in the upper makes sure that the foot stays in place and gets enough ventilation.
The Bushido features an internal slip-on construction for a more sock-like feel.
Moderate cushioning is handled by the Compression Molded MEMIex mid-sole.
Protective components add a layer of anti-debris mechanics that function well on soft and hard surfaces.
Many were impressed by the FriXion XT, a sticky compound that holds onto many types of terrain.
The Impact Brake System reliably provides traction when climbing and going down paths.
3 reasons not to buy
The Bushido has a moderately heavy weight.
Some reviews noted that the TPU Toe Cap was not as efficient as advertised because they still felt the hard surfaces pound their toes.
Some runners thought that the heel cup needed improvement in order to prevent slippage.
Bottom line
The La Sportiva Bushido is a running shoe that offers a perfect combination of responsiveness, stability and comfort. You can expect adequate protection and traction from this shoe, especially when running on technical terrain. This is great for daily training and long distance runs."
Saucony Triumph ISO 2,,90.0,90.0,1576.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Saucony Triumph ISO 5,"7 reasons to buy
The ISOFIT upper construction adapts to the shape of the wearer’s foot, offering breathable and soft coverage.
Most reviewers appreciated the inclusion of a Lightweight Support Frame, which increases the upper’s structure and stability.
The RUNDRY moisture-wicking collar lining keeps the foot secure and comfortable.
Runners generally acclimated to the EVERUN cushioning compound, which provides responsive underfoot support and shock absorption.
The PWRGRID+ enhances the Triumph ISO 2’s capacity of the midsole to cushion the foot.
It has a roomy toe box for toe splay and some runners liked it.
It comes in a variety of colors and design schemes, which many found to be appealing.
2 reasons not to buy
The Saucony Triumph ISO 2 is expensive.
A few thought that the forefoot area was a bit narrow.
Bottom line
The Triumph ISO 2 from Saucony is a popular mild support running option for many runners because of its comfortable platform, its great looks, and its durable materials. It’s a great way to enjoy an active lifestyle every day."
Altra Timp,,89.0,82.0,248.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,, Altra Timp 2,"7 reasons to buy
Several testers were happy about the Altra Timp’s grip on mud, rock, and dirt.
Various users commented on how comfortable the shoe was on their feet.
A lot of users, especially female ones, appreciated the colorways this shoe comes in.
One user, who has high arches, commended the comfort and stability the shoe offered him.
A majority of users shared that the ride of the shoe is very smooth.
A tester mentioned that the shoe felt more robust than other Altra trail shoes he has tried.
Many runners appreciated the shoe for having enough cushioning.
5 reasons not to buy
One tester remarked that the shoe felt small and narrow.
Another user commented that the lacing system doesn’t offer good support. This user continued by saying that his foot slid inwards during his runs.
Some runners said that the toe box felt odd.
A runner was able to observe that sand and dirt got into his shoe through the mesh.
There were testers who mentioned the Altra Timp not having a good grip on wet rock or pavement.
Bottom line
The Altra Timp is a neutral, zero-drop trail running shoe with a reasonable price tag and maximum cushioning. It provides a secure fit and enough support on areas of your feet that need it most when running on various terrains. With its 4mm outsole lugs, it’s a solid option for trail running or trail racing."
Reebok One Lite,,89.0,,121.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.6oz , Women: 6.4oz, Men: 7mm , Women: 7mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Breathable protection found through a mesh upper.
The seamless construction of the One Lite makes it great for sock-less wearing.
Some mild overlays are added to the sides and they don’t add to the weight or hinder the structure of the upper.
The FoamFusion mid-sole cushioning technology provides responsive cushioning when transitioning from the heel to the toe.
The Reebok One Lite is a durable shoe that is consistent.
The ankle area and tongue are both padded and this is appreciated by many testers.
Runners received the lightweight nature of the One Lite really well.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners felt the need to add a more customized insole to achieve the right added cushioning for the foot.
There were those who thought that this running shoe looked a bit plain.
The stability capability of the mid-sole didn’t work well for some who needed more support.
Bottom line
The One Lite from Reebok is a solid running shoe for many types of athletes. Beginners can ease into it and get great cushioning and support, while advanced athletes appreciate the lightweight nature of this running shoe that has mild arch support."
Altra Provision 4.0,,83.0,92.0,10.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 8.2oz , Women: 8.2oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The Altra Provision 4.0 is comfortable to wear based on reviews. 
Many users appreciated this running companion’s overall quality.
A good number of testers observed that it offers a snug fit.  
Some runners praised the lightweight structure of this shoe. 
It offers just the right amount of cushioning, according to a lot of wearers. 
Several purchasers loved this running partner’s flexibility. 
The shoe is ideal for long runs, said a few buyers.
2 reasons not to buy
Consumers who preferred plush cushioning mentioned that the shoe is too firm. 
A couple of overpronators mentioned that the shoe does not offer enough support.
Bottom line
The 4th version of Altra Provision is categorized as mild stability running shoe that is suitable for both neutral runners and mild pronators. This shoe incorporates newly developed stability features that only work when the user needs them. It provides a healthy blend of support and comfort, helping the runners and athletes achieve optimal performance."
Nike Free RN Distance,,89.0,84.0,3135.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 7.3oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Nike Free RN Distance 2,"8 reasons to buy
A tester commented that the underfoot experience felt like walking on pillows; they’d loved their time wearing the Nike Free RN Distance.
People used this running shoe for their daily activities and they felt that it kept them from any muscle or joint pains.
The colors of this shoe were more vibrant in actuality, wrote a tester; they acclimated well to its eye-catching look.
‘Enjoyable’ was a word that many reviewers used to describe their time wearing this running shoe.
The upper unit’s cloth-like quality gained praise from a lot of consumers.
According to runners, the shoelaces stayed in place and they didn’t unravel easily.
The mid-sole cushioning system was appreciated because of its capability to keep the feet of the wearer well-cushioned throughout the running session.
The flexibility of the Nike Free RN Distance received acclaim; the users felt that it truly allowed them to move more naturally through the gait cycle.
3 reasons not to buy
The outsole unit’s hexagonal grooves didn’t last for some testers; they noticed some of them wearing off or peeling away.
The cushioning system made a popping noise that irritated some runners.
The side of a tester’s big toe had a blister because the inner fabric kept rubbing against it.
Bottom line
The Nike Free RN Distance made quite a positive impact on a great number of runners. They felt that they were able to run more confidently and freely because of the flexible and accommodating design. The cover system felt like cloth and many wrote that they felt comfortable because of it. On the other hand, there were a few caveats for this model. Most complaints were about its components, which didn’t work well for a few consumers. Still, this road shoe pleased those with neutral gaits."
Under Armour Liquify,,84.0,85.0,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The majority of the runners stated that the shoe is comfortable. 
Many users appreciated the high-quality construction of the shoe. 
The outsole unit of the shoe is very flexible, some wearers claimed. 
This running partner is breathable, according to several purchasers. 
A lot of buyers praised the shoe’s responsive cushioning. 
Some consumers noted that the Under Armour Liquify is supportive.
A few runners commented that the shoe is lightweight.
2 reasons not to buy
The Under Armour Liquify is a bit narrow, based on some reviews. 
A couple of consumers reported that the midsole unit is a bit firm.
Bottom line
The Under Armour Liquify is a road running shoe that is recommended for people with neutral gaits. It utilizes high-quality materials that are designed to make the shoe last. Aside from durability, this everyday running shoe is also created to provide a smooth and efficient running experience. It is perfect for walking, running, and casual walks. "
Nike Flex Experience RN 7, Nike,85.0,72.0,1500.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.1oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The design of the Nike Flex Experience RN 7 looked appealing, according to many of those who have purchased it.
Most runners felt that this running shoe was right to size.
A tester claimed that it was comfortable from the start, that it didn’t need a break-in period.
Several purchasers lauded its capacity to be versatile for a variety of activities, including light sprints, gym workouts, and even casual walks.
A lot of people stated that the quality of the materials looked reliable and long-lasting.
The price of the Flex Experience RN 7 received praise for being affordable.
4 reasons not to buy
Some consumers noted that that midsole felt hard and unresponsive.
The cushioning capacity of the foam wasn’t very palpable or efficient, a few people reported.
Several testers observed that there were some lumps in the underfoot platform and they caused some discomfort and awkwardness to the performance.
The width profiles were a bit narrow for a consumer; he claimed that the medium width option was too tight.
Bottom line
Overall, the Nike Flex Experience RN 7 received mixed reviews from neutral runners. Most of them appreciated its appealing design and flexible nature, as well as its high-quality build and its affordable price. But many weren’t sold on its apparently uncomfortable underfoot platform and inconsistent width profile. This road shoe is an athletic companion that is divisive."
Saucony Cohesion TR 13,,85.0,,10.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.9oz , Women: 7.3oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Many users agree that the Saucony Cohesion TR 13 is fast and lightweight.
Numerous runners appreciate the comfort that the shoe provides. 
This running partner is supportive, according to a lot of reviewers. 
It offers an excellent grip on various surfaces, several wearers claim. 
The cushioning system receives praise from several reviewers. 
People are happy that the price for a pair of Cohesion TR 13 is affordable.
2 reasons not to buy
A few testers have mentioned that this shoe feels a little narrow. 
One commenter says that it is not durable enough for long runs.
Bottom line
Featuring a trail-specific design, the Saucony Cohesion TR 13 equips the user with the confidence to tackle any terrain. This neutral running shoe is packed with advanced technologies that give long-lasting comfort and protection. It is a great option for price-conscious runners seeking a blend of responsive cushioning and durability."
Vibram FiveFingers V-Trail 2.0,,81.0,74.0,97.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 6.4oz , Women: 5oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"3 reasons to buy
The outsole unit of the Vibram FiveFingers V-Trail 2.0 was lauded for being durable and capable of doling out dependable traction over the surfaces.
The design of this trail running companion was praised by most testers, stating that the aesthetics were pleasing to the eyes.
Some users were happy with the overall durability of this product, claiming that it carried and protected them as they tackled aggressive paths.
5 reasons not to buy
The upper unit didn’t stretch and acclimatize to the shape of the foot, stated several testers; they felt a snugness that bothered them.
A couple of runners complained that the stitch-on overlay on the midfoot restricted the natural swelling of the foot, resulting in an uncomfortably tight wrap.
The inner sleeve tended to rub against the skin of the toes, stated a handful of purchasers.
The heel collar caused some chafing on the ankles and heel, according to a disgruntled consumer.
A few people reported that the sizing scheme was half-a-size smaller than their usual choices.
Bottom line
Mixed to negative reviews were showered upon the Vibram FiveFingers V-Trail 2.0. This addition to the global roster of trail running shoes apparently didn’t have the soundest construction because people were complaining about a tight width profile, a half-a-size too small sizing scheme, and an upper that scratched skin. But not all of the responses were dire; some users commended the durability of this product, as well as its reliable traction and appealing looks.
The V-Trail 2.0 is a product for the neutral pronator. It’s also meant for trail adventurers and fans of minimalist running shoes."
Nike Dual Fusion X 2,,86.0,,483.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 11mm , Women: 11mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A significant number of comments mentioned how comfortable the Dual Fusion X 2 is.
It has a very affordable price.
Some runners noted that the shoe runs very light.
A handful noticed that it looks much better than the price tag shows.
The upper is very breathable, according to a few.
The cushioning is soft with some responsiveness, noted quite a number.
Several observed that the 2nd version of the Dual Fusion X works quite well for other workouts.
2 reasons not to buy
A small number of runners were disappointed by the poor quality of the Nike Dual Fusion X 2.
A couple of reviewers wanted more room in the toe box.
Bottom line
Nike comes up with the 2nd serving of the Dual Fusion X with more of the same type of performance. It is a lightweight trainer that can handle high-mileage runs or up-tempo trainings. The shoe has adequate arch support, great comfort, and a wallet-friendly price that should excite entry level runners or those looking for hassle-free shoe that works as intended."
New Balance Fresh Foam Cruz Decon,,81.0,,113.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.6oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Many people felt that the New Balance Fresh Foam Cruz Decon had a correct sizing scheme.
The underfoot cushioning system was appreciated because it offered a lightweight yet comfortable performance.
The width profiles followed the expectations of a lot of consumers.
The design and color schemes received recognition for being modern and eye-catching.
A couple of reviewers commended the lightweight nature of this running shoe.
1 reasons not to buy
The midsole didn’t offer long-term support, according to a few testers who wanted to use the shoe the entire day.
Bottom line
The New Balance Fresh Foam Cruz Decon was mostly well-received by its purchasers. They welcomed its appealing design, its regular sizing schemes, and its lightweight nature. On the other hand, this neutral running shoe’s cushioning unit was perceived to be inadequate for all-day use."
,,,83.0,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,, 361 Degrees Spire 4,
Asics Gel Fortify,,91.0,80.0,347.0,,, Road, Motion control, Men: 13.5oz , Women: 11.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The Asics Gel Fortify is a superb motion control shoe.
A sizeable portion of reviews praised the incredible support that the shoe affords.
The cushioning is excellent, according to a majority of the runners who have used the shoe.
The Asics Gel Fortify is perfect when it comes to size and width.
A couple of testers appreciated the low profile design of the Gel Fortify.
3 reasons not to buy
The Asics Gel Fortify sacrificed weight to accommodate all the stability and support features.
It runs a little clunky due to the Gel Fortify’s weight.
Several runners felt the shoe was too stiff.
Bottom line
Testers and runners have remarked that the shoe is a prototype of a motion control footwear. It delivers maximum arch support and other overpronation control measures. The cushioning and stability features put more weight on the shoe. This is an unbelievable option, though, for those with really excessive inward rolling movements."
New Balance Fresh Foam 1080 v7,,88.0,72.0,397.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, New Balance Fresh Foam 1080 v10,"9 reasons to buy
A tester commented that her feet felt great while wearing the New Balance Fresh Foam 1080 v7.
Natural toe-splay is accommodated thanks to the wide toe box, noted a consumer.
This shoe felt true-to-size, some users stated.
Wearing this shoe all day didn’t cause any discomfort, according to several reviewers.
The shock absorbing capability of the mid-sole gained recognition for being efficient.
A user commented that the underfoot platform had a bouncy disposition, which energized each step through the gait cycle.
Many runners described the 1080 v7 as comfortable.
The aesthetics of this shoe received positive feedback from consumers who liked how it looked.
The outsole worked well for those who were particular about the traction-capability of their pair of running shoes.
2 reasons not to buy
A few runners observed that the coverage was a bit narrow, causing some tightness to be felt.
A purchaser reported that the sole unit had broken down after only 5 weeks of use.
Bottom line
The New Balance Fresh Foam 1080 v7 had many supporters. Runners who wanted an efficient, neutral shoe apparently received it in the form of this update. They welcomed its color schemes, its responsive underfoot platform, and its general performance. On the other hand, there were complaints about sizing, as well as a gripe about the durability of its sole unit."
On Cloudflash,,88.0,71.0,208.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 6.2oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The majority highly appreciated the light weight of the On Cloudflash.
Most users mentioned that the shoe was highly comfortable.
A few wearers lauded the responsiveness of the Cloudflash especially on concrete surfaces and called it a ‘great racing shoe’.
A reviewer thought that the upper was fairly breathable since it allowed a good amount of air circulation through it, thereby keeping his feet cool and the rides fun.
A few purchasers expressed admiration for the colors and the overall look of the shoe by calling it ‘pretty’.
A runner intended to use these shoes for his upcoming marathon race owing to its great all-around features.
1 reasons not to buy
Several runners labeled this running shoe’s price as expensive.
Bottom line
With its unbelievably light mesh material, impressively soft yet responsive build, and an eye-catching look, this running shoe has won the hearts of millions of customers worldwide. While the shoe may be expensive for some individuals, its unparalleled qualities make it a worthwhile choice. The On Cloudflash has certainly become the topmost choice of many professional runners."
Hoka One One Clifton 3,,92.0,86.0,988.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.6oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,, Hoka One One Clifton 6,"6 reasons to buy
Testers wrote that the inner sleeve didn’t rub against their skin, thus giving them irritation-free running experiences.
The breathable upper was lauded by many because it allowed air to keep their feet ventilated easily.
The thick midsole unit of the Clifton 3 was a hit for runners because it was able to deliver maximum underfoot comfort.
Users also felt that the robust mid-sole was able to attenuate the landing impacts efficiently, which was helpful.
The curved arch was able to keep the mid-foot area well-supported, and it gave many of the testers the incentive to run farther with sureness and ease.
One of the ‘pros’ listed for this running shoe was that it delivered good traction on the surfaces.
2 reasons not to buy
For a daily running shoe, the Hoka One One Clifton 3 is bulky, according to some runners.
A few testers noted that the outsole unit’s rubber layer wore out quickly.
Bottom line
The Clifton 3 from Hoka One One gained positive feedback from a lot of runners who thought that it was a comfortable option for the roads. The cushioning system was particularly popular because it was thick yet surprisingly comfortable. Neutral runners were also happy that it was supportive. Inversely, there were those who felt that it was a bit bulky; others noted that the outsole wasn’t very durable."
Asics Gel FujiTrabuco 6,,89.0,80.0,433.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.4oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Asics Gel FujiTrabuco 8,"6 reasons to buy
The Gel cushioning provided comfort and support during uphill runs, a runner said.
Some buyers found the Gel FujiTrabuco 6 to be an affordable shoe.
An average-weight shoe that enabled a laidback and smooth ride on technical trails, an impressed user wrote.
Many users liked the Lace Garage™ feature of the Gel FujiTrabuco 6.
Several consumers praised the shoe’s roomy toe box.
A runner reported a steady run with the Asics Gel FujiTrabuco 6, even on the toughest
5 reasons not to buy
The toe box offered little protection on rugged hills, according to a reviewer.
One user observed poor traction from the outsole while running on muddy paths.
The traction was not as good as the shoe’s previous versions, some runners compared.
A runner mentioned that the shoe rubbed on the heels and caused blisters.
Although a comfortable shoe, the mesh upper started to tear after just one month of use, stated a disappointed runner.
Bottom line
Already on its sixth release, but it seems Asics has not yet captured the best version of the Gel FujiTrabuco, as it received mixed reviews from its wearers. While the Asics trail running shoe was able to amaze runners with its performance and comfort, many others have found significant flaws in the structure. However, despite the negative feedback, most users even look forward to the next version of the Gel FujiTrabuco to check for improvements."
Asics Gel Kayano 22,,89.0,84.0,9581.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.4oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 13mm,,, Asics Gel Kayano 27,"7 reasons to buy
Wearers appreciated the adaptive stretchable mesh used in the upper unit of the Asics Gel Kayano 22 because it covered their feet securely.
Several users wrote that they were able to get compliments because of the colorful design of the upper.
Some testers observed that the mid-sole unit didn’t break down easily, even after many uses.
Those with narrow foot-dimensions and slim feet in general felt welcome when they wore this shoe.
A runner stated that dirt came off easily from the external façade when it was cleaned.
Most runners commended the excellent blend of cushioning and stability found in the underfoot platform.
The platform felt like ‘clouds’ to several reviewers; they felt that it was responsive and springy.
4 reasons not to buy
There were testers who complained that the upper unit—particularly the toe box—felt uncomfortably narrow and tight.
A reviewer thought that the cushioning wasn’t very efficient because they began to notice some knee pain after two weeks of use.
The inner fabric used in the heel area wore off on several runners. It caused skin irritation and, eventually, blistering
The overall design of this model didn’t seem very appealing to some consumers.
Bottom line
Those who needed stability and support were generally happy with the performance of the Asics Gel Kayano 22. A cloud-like underfoot experience was described by quite a number of testers. For them, it gave a solid time on the asphalt. But there are caveats associated with this, including an apparently narrow toe box, a flimsy inner lining, and a rather bland design."
Adidas Ultraboost Laceless,,93.0,80.0,6112.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Many buyers have enjoyed wearing the Ultraboost Laceless because of its comfortable feel and lightweight build.
One consumer said that the cushioning was impressive, as well as sturdy and plush.
The snug midfoot area has brought about a more stable ride, according to a reviewer.
A majority of users appreciated the stylish look of this running shoe.
The outsole technology was very efficient and has excelled in both wet and dry conditions, as mentioned by a runner.
A reviewer stated it was surprisingly supportive despite the lack of shoelaces.
3 reasons not to buy
Some users said the ribbed texture on the upper made the shoe look unpleasant and awkward to touch.
Extended running sessions with this shoe caused the toes and heel to feel uncomfortable, a runner observed.
A couple of wearers reported bruising their ankle after using the shoe for some weeks.
Bottom line
A lightweight shoe that is heavy on performance, the Adidas Ultraboost Laceless has won many runners over with its simple structure and efficient features. A good majority of users celebrated the shoe for its above-average performance. It is a good option for female runners who are looking for a street-ready running partner."
Asics Gel Ziruss 2,,85.0,,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 10oz,,,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The cushioning system that is present in the Asics Gel Ziruss 2 is welcomed for being responsive.
The support given by the midfoot portion of this road running shoe is appreciated by testers.
According to most consumers, the outsole unit is able to deliver reliable traction on the ground.
Based on a handful of reviews, the upper unit does not irritate the skin of the foot.
The general durability of the materials is lauded by runners.
2 reasons not to buy
A few consumers have stated that the in-shoe experience is a bit restrictive.
According to a couple of testers, the tongue unit has a tendency to rub against the crest of the instep, causing discomfort.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Ziruss 2 aims to become a reliable neutral running shoe with its sturdy yet uncluttered construction and its confidence-giving midsole structure. It even has a sporty look that accommodates the ready-to-move mindset of those who are getting into running. Fans of road-ready footwear can have fun with the Gel Ziruss 2 from Asics."
Reebok Fusion Flexweave, Reebok,82.0,68.0,323.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,, Mar 2018," Normal, Wide | Normal",,"8 reasons to buy
Most of those who have tried the Reebok Fusion Flexweave were happy with its unique look and color schemes.
Some people used this running shoe for gym workouts, and they stated that it worked well.
The width profile catered to the expectations of many runners.
The underfoot cushioning system was lauded for being efficient and responsive.
Several purchasers felt that the weight of this product was agreeably light.
Consumers greatly appreciated the traction capacity of the outsole rubber.
Certain reviewers thought that the general durability of the Fusion Flexweave was reliable.
People have often described the in-shoe experience to be ‘comfortable,’ even with long-term use.
4 reasons not to buy
Several testers noted that the upper unit didn’t support the foot very well; they observed sideward rolling or forward slipping during the running session.
A purchaser stated that this shoe took a while to break in.
A few reviewers complained that the materials looked cheap.
Durability wasn’t a strong aspect of this shoe because some consumers noticed the upper easily separating from the platform.
Bottom line
Neutral runners and athletic shoe enthusiasts mostly welcomed the Reebok Fusion Flexweave. They liked its lightweight configuration, its versatile design, the responsive cushioning system and the comfortable fit. Conversely, there were complaints about a cheap-looking façade, an extended break-in period, and an unsupportive upper. Overall, this road companion, while not being perfect, gained a following of avid testers."
Puma Speed 300 Ignite,,89.0,78.0,509.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.2oz , Women: 6.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Puma Speed 300 Ignite 3,"8 reasons to buy
The Speed 300 is a very comfortable shoe, based on most comments.
It is affordable.
The 300 Speed Ignite is flexible.
It is very light.
Some runners loved the decent cushioning for this minimalist shoe.
A good number of comments loved its simple, yet appealing look.
Visibility in low-light conditions is enhanced by the reflective overlays.
It is quite responsive, according to several testers.
3 reasons not to buy
The minimal upper showed wear and tear before the usual time, noted a few.
A handful of comments observed that the midfoot security is a little lacking.
The sole is slightly too stiff for several.
Bottom line
Puma’s Speed series continues to gain traction among a wide variety of runners. While it caters to minimalist runners because of its lightweight nature, and fast sole, others also appreciated the decent cushioning and moderate arch support for a feather-light shoe. It can tackle 5Ks to mid-distance runs or even up tempo training with ease."
Mizuno Wave Shadow,,87.0,84.0,269.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Mizuno Wave Shadow 3,"5 reasons to buy
Most runners appreciated the lightweight nature of the Mizuno Wave Shadow.
One runner expressed that he forgot that he had the shoe on because they felt natural and comfortable.
A majority of testers appreciated the color combinations on the shoe. All of them said that the overall design of the shoe was made for a runner to stand out from a crowd.
A few testers agreed that the shoe was ideal for uptempo
One user with overpronation said the shoe was fast enough, but could still provide a bit of support.
3 reasons not to buy
A majority of runners mentioned that the midsection was tight.
A reviewer noted that small rocks and sticks easily got stuck in the outsole.
A lot of users felt that the shoe did not have enough cushioning.
Bottom line
Mizuno’s Wave Shadow is a neutral running road shoe with a reasonable price. Donning this lightweight and colorful shoe allows runners to experience a softer landing with a more propelled toe-off while standing out from a crowd. It’s for runners who are looking for a stylish yet nimble companion for tempo runs, general workouts or short road races."
Asics Gel Kayano 23,,85.0,81.0,4079.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.5oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 13mm,,, Asics Gel Kayano 27,"8 reasons to buy
Asics’ trademark cushioning and seamless construction create a comfy ride, according to several reviews.
The Kayano 23 continues to be Asics’ flagship stability shoe, based on most comments.
It is lighter than the earlier model.
The cushioning is a pleasure to run-in as noted by some.
Out of the box plushness of the interior is almost always mentioned in reviews.
A new engineered mesh helps with foot support and security, even without the forefoot overlays.
There are already many different color combinations to choose from.
The upper of the 23rd edition of the Gel Kayano conformed much better to the foot compared to the previous model.
4 reasons not to buy
The 23rd ride of the Kayano is still a bit pricey for most.
Most of the negative comments from fans of the Kayanos mentioned how narrow the toe box is in the latest model.
A handful of Kayano loyalists noted that it is clearly stiffer than any of the past models.
The latest instalment of the Kayanos have early durability issues, which should be a no-no particularly because of its expensive price tag.
Bottom line
The Kayano 23 continues to live up to the lofty standards set by its predecessors. An influx of some technologies makes it lighter and more durable while it remains to be very well-cushioned and stable. Despite being always on the more expensive side of things, the Kayano is an established name where cushioning and stability are needed by runners."
Puma Tazon 6 Fracture, Puma,85.0,,299.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11oz , Women: 11oz,,,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
Based on several reviews, the Puma Tazon 6 Fracture is a shoe that has a stylish and eye-catching design.
Testers were glad to discover that the look of the shoe enabled it to be used for occasions and activities other than running.
Most testers felt that the shoe is well-made and of high quality.
Several testers commented on how comfortable the shoe felt when used for walking.
The insoles were a pleasant addition to the cushioning system, said a few reviewers.
Testers were very happy with the available color schemes.
Most users were delighted at the effectiveness of the shoe as a cross-trainer.
5 reasons not to buy
According to a majority of testers, the shoe felt too small and narrow. Because of this, one tester opted to return his ordered pair.
Reviewers noticed that the shoe felt uncomfortable when first worn. Apparently, it needed a week to be broken in, and that was too long a time for them.
Several testers noticed that their feet easily got hot while wearing this shoe.
One user’s opinion focused on the level of comfort from inside the shoe. He said that the in-shoe feel is not comfortable enough for long runs or half Marathons.
The soles of the shoe felt thin, said a few testers. One of them experienced the sole coming off after he ran on rough terrain.
Bottom line
Although the Puma Tazon 6 Fracture may look like a shoe that was designed for fashion and casual wear, its functionality was not neglected when it was conceptualized. It is a good-looking neutral road shoe but its façade is merely one-half of its usefulness. The other half is comprised of its features and functionality, making it a highly effective running and gym companion."
Under Armour Verge Low GTX,,93.0,94.0,43.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 12.7oz , Women: 10.7oz, Men: 7mm , Women: 7mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The GTX model of the Under Armour Verge Low is comfortable, according to most of the reviews.
It is very durable, based on the remarks of several runners.
The shoe is quite breathable, as noted by a handful.
There are 4 color options.
The Michelin rubber compound and outsole layout significantly improves traction.
Some runners noticed the responsiveness of the thick midsole.
4 reasons not to buy
The price is too much for several.
A good number of reviewers mentioned that the shoe makes an irritating flopping noise.
It is a bit heavy for a few.
The rear portion of the shoe is very rigid, according to some runners.
Bottom line
Under Armour’s entry in the trail-running category is set to become better with the Verge Low GTX. While the numbers on the scale point to a burly trail partner, it does make up for its weight in its plush comfort, exceptional traction, solid durability, and a waterproof, but still breathable upper. The shoe is built to tackle the most rugged conditions for miles in the outdoors."
Under Armour SpeedForm Intake 2,,90.0,,409.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The lightweight nature of the Under Armour SpeedForm Intake 2 was well-liked by most testers.
Several consumers lauded the form-fitting nature of the upper unit.
The width profiles were considered to be adherent to expectations.
The traction capacity of this running shoe’s outsole was lauded; some runners claimed that it held onto the ground with ease.
A handful of purchasers appreciated the elastic heel portion of the façade, stating that it kept the foot in place.
2 reasons not to buy
The lateral section of the interior sleeve rubbed uncomfortably against the small toe, several people commented.
A few testers claimed that the heel section of the sole unit felt narrow.
Bottom line
The Under Armour SpeedForm Intake 2 generally received positive reviews from those who have tested it. This neutral road shoe was lauded for providing a contoured wrap and a freeing performance. But a few people believed that the inner portion of the upper was uncomfortable while others felt that the back part of the platform didn’t align with the dimensions of the heel."
Asics DynaFlyte,,93.0,90.0,754.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.3oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Asics DynaFlyte 4,"7 reasons to buy
The upper unit uses high quality fabrics in order to provide a secure and comfortable coverage.
Irritation-free wearing is part of what the upper unit provides, so runners were happy with it.
Runners were appreciative of the anti-microbial and anti-moisture sock liner.
Asics offers many color schemes when it comes to their shoes and the Asics DynaFlyte is no exception.
Landing impact is handled by the comfortable and durable platform.
A very lightweight mid-sole foam offers continuous cushioning and support that’s very easy on the foot.
Durable carbon rubber in the outsole unit protects the shoe from abrasion.
1 reasons not to buy
This shoe is a bit expensive.
Bottom line
The Asics DynaFlyte is gaining momentum when it comes to the comfort and efficacy of the wearer. This neutral shoe gives responsive cushioning that’s going to feel like nothing when taken to the races or daily running sessions. A striking look certainly adds to the appeal of this running shoe."
Brooks Cascadia 13,,88.0,89.0,337.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.9oz , Women: 10.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Brooks Cascadia 14,"6 reasons to buy
The traction capability of the Brooks Cascadia 13 was lauded by many of those who have tested it.
The availability of a wide-width version was welcomed by those who had broad foot-dimensions.
Some consumers welcomed the airflow granted by the upper unit.
The underfoot cushioning system was deemed comfortable and easy on the muscles of the legs.
Some runners liked that the outsole wasn’t too aggressive; they were able to tackle the roads with ease.
There were no blisters and hot spots while wearing the Cascadia 13, according to several purchasers.
1 reasons not to buy
The eyelets ripped apart after several uses, a tester claimed.
Bottom line
The Brooks Cascadia 13 was mostly well-received by trail running enthusiasts. They apparently liked its versatile outsole unit, stating that the roads weren’t a problem. The cushioning unit, the rubber exterior, and the fabrics on the upper were also given praise. Overall, this trail running shoe for neutral runners proved to be a worthy update to the series."
La Sportiva Lycan,,74.0,87.0,17.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,, La Sportiva Lycan 2.0,"8 reasons to buy
The La Sportiva Lycan was a fast and agile shoe, according to some consumers.
The upper was simultaneously breathable and durable, as experienced by a user.
A reviewer mentioned that the tongue was surprisingly secure even though it was not gusseted.
Several wearers commented that the toe box was roomy and was able to accommodate even high foot volumes.
One user felt a supportive fit from the heel collar.
A runner admired the flexibility presented by the midsole.
Many buyers have found the shoe to be well-cushioned.
The low-profile lugs performed well on dirt roads, a runner observed. Various other users appreciated the outsole for its excellent grip.
4 reasons not to buy
Some users have noticed that the shoe ran small.
The shoe was unable to prevent unnecessary movements during steep hills, according to a couple of runners. Others observed the same while running on muddy or snowy ground.
The shoelaces were too thin and rigid that made tying difficult, a reviewer stated. Another commenter said it was not as stretchy as they would have preferred.
A user thought that there was not enough underfoot protection when running on rocky terrain.
Bottom line
The new Lycan has surprised and pleased the majority of La Sportiva’s consumers, as reflected in the positive reviews the shoe has gathered. Users have confidently praised the shoe’s construction, particularly the toe box, midsole, and outsole lugs. There were a few criticisms about the fit and other structural details, but overall, runners have considered the shoe to be a total package."
Nike Free 5.0,,89.0,83.0,4057.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.3oz , Women: 6.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
The upper unit was agreeable to the shape of the foot, stated a runner; it was able to stretch in order to accommodate the foot well.
The breathability of the upper fabrics satisfied runners who wanted to keep their feet cool and dry throughout the running session.
Many testers used the word ‘comfortable’ to describe this running shoe’s components and its general performance.
Some users have been able to use it frequently and they wrote that it was long-lasting.
Several consumers noted that the Nike Free 5.0 was suitably lightweight.
The cushioning system was responsive and springy, according to many reviewers.
A lot of runners welcomed the flexible nature of the underfoot platform, which permitted them to move more naturally through the gait cycle.
Wearing this running shoe staved off any instances of foot or muscle pain, reported a number of consumers.
2 reasons not to buy
Some of the testers felt that the mid-sole of this shoe wore off quickly.
The shoelaces were too long for a tester; they ended up slipping them in the collar, which added a bit of discomfort.
Bottom line
The Nike Free 5.0 performed well for a lot of runners. Most of them welcomed the flexible mid-sole unit, while others adored the comfortable fabrics of the upper. Some of them were able to use it frequently, and they were happy that it looked visually endearing. Though a few had some qualms about some of its components, a lot of neutral runners still appreciated this road shoe."
Nike Air Zoom Structure 21,,92.0,86.0,254.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Nike Air Zoom Structure 22,"8 reasons to buy
Most runners agreed that the Nike Air Zoom Structure 21 had a suitably lightweight feel.
Several runners commended the smooth transition that this shoe offered.
A good number of testers felt that it had plenty of cushioning.
One user said that the 21st version of the Air Zoom Structure secured the foot better than its predecessor.
Many agreed that the style and colorways were stylish.
One user was appreciative of the air pockets located in the forefoot. He said that they helped propel him forward during his tempo runs.
A majority of the reviewers agreed that the shoe was true-to-size.
Several testers observed that the toe box had ample space for toe-splay.
4 reasons not to buy
One reviewer felt that his heel wasn’t fully supported or stabilized.
Another tester said that the shoe felt stiff out of the box; she wasn’t glad that she had to break it in.
One runner narrated that the angle of the shoe placed downward pressure on the ball of his foot, which resulted in some irritation.
A runner said that the insole was not as comfortable as expected.
Bottom line
The Nike Air Zoom Structure 21 is a stability road running shoe that provides moderate support. It has received much-needed upgrades to make it lighter and more comfortable to wear. The responsiveness and cushioning from the previous version have been retained. Those who are fans of the Air Zoom Structure 20 should check this one out."
New Balance Fresh Foam Vongo,,92.0,86.0,218.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, New Balance Fresh Foam Vongo v4,"7 reasons to buy
The plush interior and the Fresh Foam combine to give the Vongo a very comfortable ride.
It has respectable durability, according to many runners.
New Balance’s Vongo has a sufficiently stable ride that is never jarring, based on some comments.
The 4mm drop enhances the turnover from the heel to the forefoot, observed a handful of runners.
Shoe breathability is afforded by a very breathable mesh and a perforated midfoot saddle.
It is quite light for a stability shoe.
A large number of runners loved the correct blend of cushioning and stability.
2 reasons not to buy
The price tag is a little harder to swallow for some runners.
Some runners think the cushioning is a bit firmer than expected or as advertised.
Bottom line
The stability shoe in the Fresh Foam collection, the Vongo uses an innovative midsole setup to deliver mild stability. New Balance raises the medial side a bit higher than the lateral side so the overpronator rolls towards the elevated part of the shoe to curb overpronation. It has superior comfort and breathability. The Fresh Foam Vongo is one of New Balance’s best lightweight trainers."
Reebok Zigwild TR 2, Reebok,92.0,,354.0,,, Trail, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal, Reebok Zigwild Trail 6.0,"6 reasons to buy
Many runners were satisfied with the shoe’s zigzag sole that provides reliable grip and added cushioning for an enhanced performance.
The upper coverage is breathable and flexible enough to hug the foot comfortably.
Some users admired the flexibility of the shoe due to the flex grooves in the forefoot.
The SmoothFit element provides irritation-free environment for the foot.
According to some comments, the shoe is very comfortable to wear on the trail.
The shoe is affordable.
1 reasons not to buy
Some runners noticed that tread of the Reebok Zigwild TR 2are coming off after few months of use.
Bottom line
The Reebok Zigwild TR 2 neutral running shoe designed for trail running. It provides a combination of responsive cushioning, impressive fit and comfort. The shoe comes in a low-cut design for enhanced mobility. Based on user reviews, the shoe is not only affordable but indeed, reliable."
Adidas Adizero Takumi-Sen 3,,95.0,90.0,105.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.4oz , Women: 6.1oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,, Adidas Adizero Takumi-Sen 6,"7 reasons to buy
It is a great racing flat for marathons, as commented by some testers.
Light and breathable, this shoe is phenomenal according to some marathoners.
The durable upper unit essentially provides reliable coverage through the use of high-quality synthetic materials.
Minimalist runners are appreciative of the low-profile design of the Takumi-Sen 3.
It works well on the roads, but it can transition well when on dirt tracks.
The mix of the Quickstrike technology and Continental Rubber in the outsole ensures durable protection, traction, and flexibility on dry and wet surfaces.
The mid-sole unit delivers adequate underfoot cushioning with the use of proprietary components.
4 reasons not to buy
This shoe is quite expensive, as noted by many runners.
The fit runs wide.
The low profile design and the minimal level of cushioning make it ideal for minimalist runners.
It is not a water-resistant athletic shoe.
Bottom line
The Adidas Adizero Takumi-Sen 3 is a racing flat built on the Adizero technology with a boost midsole in the forefoot. It offers an efficient energy-return and it encourages high-speed performance. Because of the quality outsole, traction is never a problem even on uneven terrain. This high-quality shoe is worth its expensive price."
Brooks Launch 5,,93.0,88.0,2088.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Brooks Launch 7,"9 reasons to buy
The design of the Brooks Launch 5 was appreciated for being appealing to the eyes.
Several consumers welcomed its suitably lightweight nature.
The cushioning system received positive feedback for being responsive and agreeable.
According to some testers, the softness of the midsole foam evoked a feeling of running on clouds.
Many runners considered this running shoe to be one of the most comfortable road companions.
A lot of people lauded the spacious toe box; it allowed their toes to spread nicely with each step.
Some runners felt that it didn’t need a break-in period; it was accommodating right from the start.
Wearing this running shoe for the entire day didn’t cause any discomfort or fatigue.
The sizing scheme followed the usual preferences of consumers.
2 reasons not to buy
The arch of this shoe was apparently too high for some testers.
A few runners felt that the width was a bit narrow.
Bottom line
Calling the Brooks Launch 5 a suitable upgrade is an understatement. This neutral shoe reignited many runners’ desires for the long-standing series. They welcomed its appealing looks, its agreeable construction, and its comfortable underfoot experience. A few consumers had complaints about its width and arch, but that didn’t diminish the overall positive response."
Nike Air VaporMax Run Utility, Nike,86.0,80.0,93.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,, Sep 2018, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
A lot of users said the Nike Air VaporMax Run Utility is one of the most comfortable running shoes they have ever worn.
A few testers commented that the shoe is durable.
The VaporMax Run Utility provides an excellent fit, according to a wearer.
The shoe feels light, a reviewer mentioned.
A significant number of wearers admired the shoe’s good-looking and stylish design.
A couple of runners mentioned that the Nike Air VaporMax Run Utility keeps their foot warm on cold running condition.
3 reasons not to buy
A few buyers disliked the shoe’s squeaky sound; they said it is too loud and distracting.
The shoe runs big, said some users.
The VaporMax Run Utility is expensive.
Bottom line
Many runners were pleased with the Nike Air VaporMax Run Utility. Some expressed satisfaction with the shoe’s design, fit, durability, and performance. There are also a few who gave negative feedback about the sizing and shoe’s squeaky sound. With the majority of praises it received, it is easy to conclude that the VaporMax Run Utility is indeed a successful release."
Adidas Response Boost Trail,,89.0,85.0,52.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.5oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
The superb comfort of the Response Trail Boost begins right out of the box, according to a large number of comments.
Some runners believe the durability is better than average trail shoes.
A good number of reviews consider the shoe as an excellent investment.
The traction provided by the Continental rubber compound is a proven commodity in the business.
The multi-directional lugs make uphill and downhill running a little easier.
It is quite nimble and quick on technical trail, as noted by a couple of testers.
Many users raved about its ability to tackle the trail and road.
Several reviews appreciated the wide toe box.
Adidas uses a very breathable mesh in the Response Boost.
2 reasons not to buy
The shoe could use some weight reduction, observed some runners.
Others noted that the design looks strange because of the seatbelt-like overlays.
Bottom line
The Adidas Response Trail Boost runs and works as intended. While it may have a rather unique design, the upper delivers the kind of support, flexibility, and structure that trail runners usually look for in their neutral trail shoes. The Response Boost has decent arch support, cushioning, and unbelievable grip on almost all kinds of surfaces, including the road despite the heavily-lugged outsole."
New Balance Cypher Run,,89.0,84.0,277.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.4oz , Women: 6.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, New Balance Cypher Run v2,"6 reasons to buy
A good number of consumers said that the shoe was very comfortable and supportive.
A lot of runners commented that the New Balance Cypher Run was breathable and lightweight in structure.
Many runners loved its nice-looking design. It was stylish, according to them.
Some testers were happy with the different color options.
The shoe was reasonably-priced, according to most of those who have tried it.
Many reviewers agreed that it was not only suitable for walking and running sessions, but also for casual activities and gym exercises.
3 reasons not to buy
One of the users commented that the shoe was too narrow for his foot.
A buyer said that he had a hard time putting the shoe on. According to him, the opening was small.
A user was disappointed because the rubber at the bottom of the shoe started to fall off after only several uses.
Bottom line
Many runners loved the New Balance Cypher Run because of its different color options. They commented that it was lightweight, supportive, comfortable and breathable. They agreed that the shoe worked well on running, walking, gym and casual activities. Although one of those who tested it noted that the shoe was too narrow for his foot, others still recommended the New Balance Cypher Run, mainly because of the amount of grip it provided during the running session."
Hoka One One Huaka,,90.0,84.0,96.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.3oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 2mm , Women: 2mm,,, Hoka One One Huaka 2,"5 reasons to buy
The No Sew Construction effectively provides a comfortable wearing experience for runners, even when not using socks.
Many applauded the Hoka Race Lace System, which essentially makes adjusting the fit possible with only a single pull of the laces.
Impact protection is delivered by the Rmat mid-\sole material.
The Early Meta-Rocker Geometry encourages better running performance through a semi-rocker shape of the sole unit.
This shoe has a roomy toe box.
4 reasons not to buy
This running shoe has a moderately expensive price.
Some runners mentioned that the outsole gripping lugs wore out quicker than expected.
The forefoot area was a bit narrow for some runners.
Based on some comments, the RMAT material in the outsole was slippery when used in muddy surfaces.
Bottom line
The Huaka from Hoka One One gained mixed reviews from its users. But despite the negative comments, the shoe has proven to be a worthy investment. The Huaka is a lightweight road running, neutral shoe that provides the runner with enough cushioning while maintaining a supportive and responsive nature. This shoe can also function well on soft off-road tracks."
Xero Shoes Speed Force,,90.0,93.0,17.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 5.8oz , Women: 5.2oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
Many people complimented the Xero Shoes Speed Force’s lightweight structure. 
The shoe fits true to size, according to many consumers. 
A lot of buyers appreciated the responsive and flexible platform of this running shoe.
This running gear is very supportive and comfortable to wear for long runs, casual walks, and other activities, users claimed. 
The Xero Shoes Speed Force can hug the foot comfortably without creating any pressure points, according to some reviews. 
This Xero Shoes running shoes is a perfect balance of style, comfort, and function, said a runner. 
A good number of users welcomed the stretchy upper of Xero Shoes Speed Force.
Several reviewers mentioned that the shoe provides good traction in both wet and dry surfaces. 
Xero Shoes Speed Force’s upper unit gained favor from many purchasers for being breathable. 
2 reasons not to buy
One tester reported that the shoe is a bit narrow. 
Some heel-strikers felt the Speed Force is a bit harsh on the foot.
Bottom line
Runners and sports enthusiasts welcomed the performance of Xero Shoes Speed Force. This running companion is deemed responsive and comfortable to wear not only for running but also for casual walks. People are also impressed with the shoe’s lightweight structure, gripping ability, flexible outsole and breathable upper. Overall, the Xero Shoes Speed Force met the expectations of consumers and many reviewers have testified about it. "
Hoka One One Evo Jawz,,84.0,82.0,32.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 7.2oz , Women: 6oz, Men: 3mm , Women: 3mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The grip capability of the outsole unit impressed many consumers.
The weight of the Hoka One One Evo Jawz was deemed to be surprisingly and fittingly light.
A few people observed that this running shoe drained water well.
Several individuals felt that the cushioning unit was able to suitably absorb impact shock.
According to a few users, the Evo Jawz has a durable construction.
3 reasons not to buy
The lack of a protective plate in the sole unit was lamented by many.
The outside of the upper tended to make an annoying crackling sound whenever the foot bent for the toe-off, some people noted.
The fit was a bit narrow, according to a few people.
Bottom line
The reception for the Hoka One One Evo Jawz trail running shoe was mixed to negative. Though it was lauded for being a useful option for outdoor adventures, some detractors felt that it lacked some of the necessary components that make off-road shoes more lucrative. The chief complaint that people had was the bleeding blue tint of the interior sleeve; they were unhappy with their blue feet and blue socks."
Asics Gel Fortitude 7,,92.0,92.0,297.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.2oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Fortitude 8,"6 reasons to buy
Several runners admired the cushioning system of the Asics Gel Fortitude 7.
It is unbelievably comfortable as based on several comments.
A significant number of runners loved the traction the Asics Fortitude 7 provides.
The shoe is a bargain for its price.
Some runners were pleasantly surprised by the Fortitude 7’s relative flexibility.
Adequate ground feedback is another great asset in this shoe, according to a few runners.
2 reasons not to buy
The shoe is quite heavy, said a few users.
Mainly limited as a sturdy training partner.
Bottom line
The Gel Fortitude series finds a unique place in the hearts of neutral runners with flat feet. With better ground feedback, tons of comfort, and unbelievable overpronation measures, runners with flat arches, inflexible feet, or fallen arches are on their way to more fun on the road in the Fortitude 7."
Merrell Antora Rainbow,,85.0,,7.0,,, Trail, Neutral,,,,,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Many of the runners commend the comfort that the Merrell Antora Rainbow offers. 
According to a number of experts, the shoe is highly versatile; it can perform well in different terrains. 
The shoe provides sufficient stability, some testers remarked. 
The lacing system of the shoe disables heel slippage and does not unravel easily, a few reviewers noted. 
Some runners have lauded the fact that the shoe does not require a break-in period. 
Some users have been delighted that the Merrell Antora Rainbow provides a lightweight feel. 
The shoe fits extremely well, shared numerous runners. 
2 reasons not to buy
The shoe has caused some blisters on the foot, a disappointed buyer claimed.
The shoe squeaks on every step, remarked one wearer.
Bottom line
This vegan-friendly trail running shoe is highly lauded for the overall comfort it gives and has garnered quite a few positive responses from different runners, testers, and experts. A lot appreciate the stability delivered by the shoe, which greatly helps runners, especially when treading through rugged trails. Although there have been some negative responses regarding the wear experience, many are still satisfied with the overall performance of the shoe. A lot of the users even claim that they will surely get another pair of the Merrell Antora Rainbow and recommend the shoe to their peers. "
Brooks Glycerin 13,,93.0,84.0,974.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 9.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Brooks Glycerin 18,"8 reasons to buy
A great number of runners described the Brooks Glycerin 13 as a comfortable shoe to wear daily.
Several reviewers wrote that the design and general durability of this model were above its predecessors; it remained efficient for them, even after many uses.
Many runners have taken a liking to the color schemes this shoe, saying that they heightened its visual appeal.
The mid-sole was able to support the arch of those with supinated foot motion, balancing their stance and stabilizing their gait.
A lot of testers noted that the underfoot experience was very agreeable, that the platform was able to prevent knee & muscle aches when running.
One reviewer commended the Glycerin 13’s lacing system, which stayed snug and didn’t unravel even after long running sessions.
Some consumers were able to use this shoe for casual purposes and they said that it didn’t disappoint.
Runners stated that this shoe performed exceptionally well on the pavement.
3 reasons not to buy
A tester commented that the foam cushioning wasn’t as long-lasting as they thought.
The outsole rubber wasn’t very efficient on wet surfaces, according to a few runners.
A reviewer reported that the fit was too narrow; blisters have started to appear on their toes after six miles of running.
Bottom line
Many runners were satisfied with the 13th version of the Glycerin from Brooks. They lauded its efficient features, from its pleasant upper cover system to its stability mechanics. The underfoot experience was comfortable for a great number of them, as well. But according to a reviewer, the fit was too narrow. Another one panned its cushioning system because it didn’t last long. Despite these negative comments, the Glycerin 13 still gained favor as a reliable road running shoe."
Asics 33-FA,,87.0,80.0,487.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The 33-FA features a lightweight open mesh, which is highly breathable.
The Amplifoam of the shoe provides consistent and uniform cushioning that’s great for those who desire a more responsive platform.
Most runners applauded the overall construction, cushioning and fit of the Asics 33-FA.
The ComforDry Sock Liner delivers anti-microbial features, moisture protection and added cushioning.
Some runners took note of the durable features of the shoe.
The FluidAxis grooves in the sole unit encourage natural freedom of motion.
The 33-FA has an affordable price.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners noted that the outsole grip needs improvement.
The shoe was a bit narrow in the midfoot area for some runners.
Bottom line
If you are looking for a shoe that offers comfort and a stable ride, this shoe is perfect for you. The Asics 33-FA is a neutral running shoe that performs well on the roads. This is great for daily training and other athletic activities."
Brooks Defyance 9,,90.0,83.0,182.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Brooks Defyance 10,"5 reasons to buy
Some runners were impressed by the arch support of the Brooks Defyance 9.
It has Segmented Crash Pad that promotes a smooth heel-to-toe transition.
This shoe delivers great flexibility because of the Omega Flex Grooves based on several comments.
The breathable mesh upper keeps the foot cool and dry.
Most runners liked the Defyance 9 because it is durable and comfortable to wear.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners observed a poor cushioning in the Defyance 9.
This shoe is slightly expensive.
It is a bit stiff.
Bottom line
The Brooks Defyance 9 is a neutral shoe that is great for road running. It is a versatile running shoe that offers a combination of smooth ride and cushioning. However, some felt that it lacks the necessary cushioning for long-distance runs. But despite the negative comments, overall, users still consider the shoe a successful release."
Mizuno Wave Inspire 12,,90.0,83.0,1015.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Mizuno Wave Inspire 16,"7 reasons to buy
The AIRmesh is the fabric of the Inspire 12 and it offers breathable and comfortable coverage.
Most reviewers appreciated the Stitched Overlays that are located in the lateral and medial sides, giving a snug yet secure fit.
The Ortholite Sock Liner gives additional cushioning, moisture wicking and anti-microbial protection.
The U4ic is a mid-sole material that is shock absorption, durability, and responsiveness.
Moderate over-pronation of the foot is handled by the added mid-sole components, such as the Wave tech and the Smooth Ride system.
X10 is an outsole unit that is super durable and efficient when dealing with wear and abrasion.
The Wave Inspire 12 has systems that improve the natural flexibility of the foot.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners noticed that it was a bit narrow in the forefoot area, making the toes clump uncomfortably close together.
There were testers who noted that it didn’t offer as much stability as the previous version.
This running shoe has a slightly expensive price.
Bottom line
The Wave Inspire 12 from Mizuno is a daily running companion that is efficient and trustworthy. The shoe garnered quite the popularity from runners who search for a running shoe that offers responsible stability and control. Though a few have some issues with the shoe, it is still considered by some success a successful update to the Wave Inspire line."
Nike Free RN 2018 Shield,,90.0,,911.0,,, Road, Neutral,,, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Nike Free RN 5.0 Shield,"6 reasons to buy
Several wearers stated that the Nike Free RN 2018 Shield has a very good-looking design.
A couple of users said that the shoe is very comfortable.
The upper is very efficient in keeping the foot dry and warm, said some reviews.
A few runners admired the toggle-tighten lace of the Free RN 2018 Shield.
Some wearers found the fit to be true to size.
Some wearers considered the Nike Free RN 2018 Shield as a versatile running shoe; they wear the shoe on casual walking activities.
2 reasons not to buy
One disappointed user mentioned that he needs to stop several times while running to remove the small stones that got stuck in Tri-star outsole pattern.
One user cited that the shoe is difficult to put on.
Bottom line
The Nike Free RN 2018 Shield was able to get the approval of the majority of its users. Many runners praised the shoe’s good-looking design, waterproof coverage, and comfortable fit. The toggle lacing system was also positively regarded. Though there are some users that were disappointed, the overall performance of this water-repellent running shoe is impressive."
Saucony Ride 8,,90.0,84.0,720.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.4oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Saucony Ride 13,"6 reasons to buy
Most runners were impressed with the shoe’s FlexFilm upper which gives an adequate fit without sacrificing weight.
A few users noticed that the Ride 8 has a more appealing design than its predecessors.
Many reviewers took note of the shoe's flexibility.
The mid-sole unit is essentially a smorgasbord of great technologies that would help the runner move forward in a much more efficient way.
The durability of this 8th version of the series is also lauded.
The outsole has components that improve traction and protection against abrasion.
3 reasons not to buy
The Sauncony Ride 8 his slightly expensive.
There were testers who thought that the forefoot area also deserved more cushioning because the systems were mostly found in the heel and mid-foot sections.
Some runners noted that the Open Mesh upper isn’t as breathable as intended, making their feet warmer inside.
Bottom line
Many athletes recognized the Ride 8 because of its moderate weight, great heel cushioning, and overall durability. It’s a neutral running footwear that anyone can pick up and enjoy. It may just be the perfect shoe for runners who are looking for a dependable daily trainer."
Xero Shoes Speed Force,,90.0,93.0,17.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 5.8oz , Women: 5.2oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
Many people complimented the Xero Shoes Speed Force’s lightweight structure. 
The shoe fits true to size, according to many consumers. 
A lot of buyers appreciated the responsive and flexible platform of this running shoe.
This running gear is very supportive and comfortable to wear for long runs, casual walks, and other activities, users claimed. 
The Xero Shoes Speed Force can hug the foot comfortably without creating any pressure points, according to some reviews. 
This Xero Shoes running shoes is a perfect balance of style, comfort, and function, said a runner. 
A good number of users welcomed the stretchy upper of Xero Shoes Speed Force.
Several reviewers mentioned that the shoe provides good traction in both wet and dry surfaces. 
Xero Shoes Speed Force’s upper unit gained favor from many purchasers for being breathable. 
2 reasons not to buy
One tester reported that the shoe is a bit narrow. 
Some heel-strikers felt the Speed Force is a bit harsh on the foot.
Bottom line
Runners and sports enthusiasts welcomed the performance of Xero Shoes Speed Force. This running companion is deemed responsive and comfortable to wear not only for running but also for casual walks. People are also impressed with the shoe’s lightweight structure, gripping ability, flexible outsole and breathable upper. Overall, the Xero Shoes Speed Force met the expectations of consumers and many reviewers have testified about it. "
La Sportiva Ultra Raptor,,90.0,80.0,416.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 12.1oz , Women: 10.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The Ultra Raptor features a breathable Air Mesh upper.
It has an EVA Rock Guard, which provide foot protection from stones and other debris.
Many testers were welcomed the durable nature of this running shoe
Stability is received from the mid-sole and even upper unit, both of which utilize components that keep the foot balanced and in place.
This shoe has the Sticky FriXion XF rubber outsole for impressive grip and traction on rocky surfaces.
The Impact Brake System lessens impact and improves the surface grip during uphill and downhill traversals.
4 reasons not to buy
Some runners experienced slippage when running on technical terrain and wet surfaces.
The weight of this running shoe is heavy.
Its price is slightly expensive.
There were testers who noted that it was too bulky and unwieldy.
Bottom line
The La Sportiva Ultra Raptor is a neutral running shoe designed for trail running. It features a combination of comfortable, stable and responsive parts that give an adequate ride. You can use this shoe as a daily trainer or for long distance running."
361 Degrees Strata 3,,83.0,82.0,8.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 12.3oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Many runners have noted that the Strata 3 feels light and gently molds to the contours of their feet, ensuring a comfortable ride.
Some users were happy on how well the shoe performed on a variety of terrains and provided a smooth ride.
A number of wearers deemed the Strata 3 to be sturdy yet feel light, which is a good assurance for a running shoe that is aimed at high mileage runners.
Most users liked the shoe's toe box as it is spacious enough to allow the feet to splay naturally during the runs.
A few testers mentioned how the shoe’s lacing system was both comfortable and secure.
2 reasons not to buy
A handful of wearers have disliked that the Strata 3’s tongue felt a little flimsy.
One runner has said that under race conditions, the shoe felt a bit too clunky for his liking.
Bottom line
Overall, the improvement seen in the 361 Degrees Strata 3 has impressed most of its users.  The shoe fits well and performed great on different types of terrains, even providing a smooth ride along the way.  Despite concerns about the shoe’s tongue and bulkiness, most runners are still pleased with its performance in general proving that the Strata 3 is a reliable road running shoe offering just the right amount of stability."
Mizuno Wave Shadow,,87.0,84.0,269.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Mizuno Wave Shadow 3,"5 reasons to buy
Most runners appreciated the lightweight nature of the Mizuno Wave Shadow.
One runner expressed that he forgot that he had the shoe on because they felt natural and comfortable.
A majority of testers appreciated the color combinations on the shoe. All of them said that the overall design of the shoe was made for a runner to stand out from a crowd.
A few testers agreed that the shoe was ideal for uptempo
One user with overpronation said the shoe was fast enough, but could still provide a bit of support.
3 reasons not to buy
A majority of runners mentioned that the midsection was tight.
A reviewer noted that small rocks and sticks easily got stuck in the outsole.
A lot of users felt that the shoe did not have enough cushioning.
Bottom line
Mizuno’s Wave Shadow is a neutral running road shoe with a reasonable price. Donning this lightweight and colorful shoe allows runners to experience a softer landing with a more propelled toe-off while standing out from a crowd. It’s for runners who are looking for a stylish yet nimble companion for tempo runs, general workouts or short road races."
New Balance Fresh Foam Hierro v2,,91.0,92.0,64.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, New Balance Fresh Foam Hierro v5,"8 reasons to buy
New Balance introduces an all-new Vibram MegaGrip outsole in the Hierro v2 for a guaranteed improvement in traction on a variety of outdoor surfaces.
The 2mm of added stack height increases cushioning and protection on rugged trails.
Several runners gave a thumbs up to the shoe’s comfortable ride.
It is surprisingly very light, according to a handful of runners.
More than a few reviewers were impressed by the smooth ride of the New Balance Hierro v2.
The upper moves well with the foot in support, based on the comments of some runners.
The deeper lugs are also spaced out to prevent mud from accumulating in the outsole.
A few expert reviewers were amazed by the smoothness of the ride in this shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
A few runners found the price to be too expensive.
There were a handful who wished for more room in the toe box.
A handful of runners were disappointed that the Fresh Foam Hierro v2 still does not have rock plate.
Bottom line
New Balance builds on the success of the original Hierro by introducing a stickier rubber outsole with newly designed lugs to ramp up the performance of the 2nd version of this shoe. The Fresh Foam Hierro v2 is a versatile trainer that takes the runner effortlessly across different outdoor surfaces. The well-cushioned ride makes it ideal for a variety of distances at different speeds."
Brooks Transcend 7,,84.0,86.0,7.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"  8 reasons to buy
The majority of the testers commented that the Brooks Transcend 7 is comfortable.
Some of the users said that the shoe is well-cushioned.
Several purchasers agreed that the running footwear is responsive.
One of the consumers mentioned that the shoe is lightweight.
A consumer noted that the shoe provides stability.
According to those who have tried it, the shoe is supportive.
The shoe is best used in running and walking activities, agreed by the majority of the reviewers.
A good number of users agreed that the design of the shoe is suitable for casual and daily wear.
2 reasons not to buy
One of the testers observed that the shoe has a narrow toe box.
A few buyers commented that the foot becomes sloppy and floppy around, even when laced, during the running activity. This made them stop for a while to ensure better fitting.
Bottom line
Overall, with the features and technologies employed to the Brooks Transcend 7, a lot of users were made happy and contented. The 7th installment of the shoe garnered positive feedback from the users. The combination of comfort and support have given runners excellent performance. They love how lightweight and stable the shoe is constructed. This shoe is a great option for neutral runners who are seeking a well-cushioned, supportive, and responsive running shoe."
Salomon Sense Ride 3 GTX Invisible Fit,,92.0,96.0,8.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The Salomon Sense Ride 3 GTX Invisible Fit is comfortable, based on reviews. 
Some wearers confirm that this shoe offers adequate support. 
Many runners appreciated the excellent cushioning of the shoe. 
It is highly durable, according to several runners. 
A few buyers loved the water protection feature of this running partner. 
It is lighter than the other trail running shoe, said some reviewers. 
A purchaser mentioned that it performs well even in light snow and rain.
2 reasons not to buy
One tester said that it is a bit unstable on technical terrain. 
A couple of consumers noticed that the toe section is a bit wide.
Bottom line
Featuring full weather protection and an all-terrain grip, the Salomon Sense Ride 3 GTX Invisible Fit is specifically designed for long runs in adverse conditions. It is built with a lightweight, yet highly durable structure that enhances speed without sacrificing protection. This trail running shoe works best for runners and athletes with neutral gaits or those who supinate."
New Balance Fresh Foam Lazr Sport,,74.0,50.0,405.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Several consumers reported that the New Balance Fresh Foam Lazr Sport was well-built.
The midsole unit was appreciated because it was flexible and responsive.
The design and color schemes of this model appealed to many runners.
Many people liked the price of this running shoe.
Most of those who tried this model commented that its weight was adequately light.
3 reasons not to buy
Some people stated that the close-fitting midfoot section tended to destabilize the foot’s position on the ground.
Several heavyset consumers lamented the midsole’s incapacity to support their weight.
The back part of the upper rubbed against the ankle uncomfortably, a runner complained.
Bottom line
The New Balance Fresh Foam Lazr Sport was much appreciated by consumers who wanted a great-looking neutral shoe for their daily activities. Its sturdiness was lauded, as well as its versatile construction. Moreover, the price was considered to be accommodating. On the other hand, some weren’t very happy with this road shoe, emphasizing an abrasive heel fabric and an inconsistent underfoot experience."
New Balance Cush+ District Run,,83.0,90.0,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.2oz , Women: 6.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Many people are comfortable wearing the New Balance Cush+ District Run for running and casual walks.  
A lot of consumers welcomed this running shoe for providing generous cushioning. 
The New Balance District Run is very supportive and perfect to wear for long runs and other activities, according to several reviewers. 
Some purchasers appreciated the value of this running partner considering the quality of its materials. 
A handful of commenters were impressed with New Balance District Run’s lightweight structure. 
The rubber outsole of this New Balance running shoe is very flexible and offers excellent traction on both wet and dry surfaces, as stated by various users. 
The breathability of this running companion’s upper unit was appreciated by some runners. 
This shoe offers a natural, bouncy ride, said a user. 
4 reasons not to buy
A few testers reported that they felt pain on the top of their foot while running in a pair of the New Balance Cush+ District Run. 
Some people complained that the tongue of this shoe doesn’t open wide and it makes the shoe difficult to get on. 
A consumer mentioned that the strap that goes across the shoe makes it narrower.
One reviewer explained that the top strap that holds the shoelace broke after a few times wearing the shoes.
Bottom line
New Balance Cush+ District Run garnered mostly positive feedback from those who have tried it. People are happy with this affordable running shoe’s cushioning and lightweight structure. The flexible outsole and breathable upper were also given praise by many purchasers. Though there are some buyers who have expressed disappointments toward this running shoe’s narrow opening and durability, others still recommended the New Balance District Run for its performance. "
New Balance FuelCore Rush v3, New Balance,85.0,,154.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 7.3oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The FuelCore Rush v3 delivered a super smooth transition, almost like rocking forward, according to a reviewer.
One tester shared that the mesh upper was breathable, and the lack of overlays allowed the material to stretch more, making the shoe feel a bit wider and more comfortable.
A couple of buyers confirmed they were satisfied with the shoe’s lightness and reliability on extended running
The shoe promoted proper posture and balance while running, stated a user.
It had excellent cushioning and adequate arch support, as mentioned by a commenter.
4 reasons not to buy
Several runners thought the shoe was similar to other options from New Balance, stating that it was nothing special.
The expected responsiveness was not present in this shoe, wrote a reviewer.
A user was disappointed that the ride and the overall feel weren’t very agreeable.
A few buyers complained that this running shoe ran small despite having many width profiles available.
Bottom line
The FuelCore Rush v3 was a welcome addition to the roster of New Balance, as expressed by some users. Many were impressed by the efficacy of this shoe’s features. However, others thought it paled in comparison to other running shoes from the brand."
Merrell Move Glove,,76.0,,22.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 6.5oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Some testers claim that they are able to properly connect with the surfaces on which they are stepping because of the low stack height of the Merrell Move Glove.
The various color schemes that are available for this running shoe are generally well-received.
The overall quality of this product’s materials is appreciated by those who desire a long-lasting shoe.
A couple of purchasers have noted that the fabrics of the upper unit are comfortable and non-irritating.
A runner is happy because of this minimalist running shoe allows for both running sessions and casual walks to be effortless activities.
The barrier-like external pad is deemed protective and able to repel hazards on the paths.
2 reasons not to buy
A few testers believe that they aren’t able to fully take advantage of foot flexibility because the in-shoe experience is a bit restrictive.
The absence of a lace pocket is lamented because the long shoelaces are perceived as a bit annoying.
Bottom line
The overall feedback of people for the Merrell Move Glove has been positive. This road running shoe is welcomed because of its flexible and accommodating design, as well as its close-to-the-ground configuration. Near-barefoot runners are wholly appreciative of what it has to offer. On the other hand, some have perceived the in-shoe feel to be restrictive while others find the too-long shoelaces cumbersome.
Fans of neutral running shoes that are designed for the asphalt are the target market of the Merrell Move Glove."
Brooks Glycerin 13,,93.0,84.0,974.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 9.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Brooks Glycerin 18,"8 reasons to buy
A great number of runners described the Brooks Glycerin 13 as a comfortable shoe to wear daily.
Several reviewers wrote that the design and general durability of this model were above its predecessors; it remained efficient for them, even after many uses.
Many runners have taken a liking to the color schemes this shoe, saying that they heightened its visual appeal.
The mid-sole was able to support the arch of those with supinated foot motion, balancing their stance and stabilizing their gait.
A lot of testers noted that the underfoot experience was very agreeable, that the platform was able to prevent knee & muscle aches when running.
One reviewer commended the Glycerin 13’s lacing system, which stayed snug and didn’t unravel even after long running sessions.
Some consumers were able to use this shoe for casual purposes and they said that it didn’t disappoint.
Runners stated that this shoe performed exceptionally well on the pavement.
3 reasons not to buy
A tester commented that the foam cushioning wasn’t as long-lasting as they thought.
The outsole rubber wasn’t very efficient on wet surfaces, according to a few runners.
A reviewer reported that the fit was too narrow; blisters have started to appear on their toes after six miles of running.
Bottom line
Many runners were satisfied with the 13th version of the Glycerin from Brooks. They lauded its efficient features, from its pleasant upper cover system to its stability mechanics. The underfoot experience was comfortable for a great number of them, as well. But according to a reviewer, the fit was too narrow. Another one panned its cushioning system because it didn’t last long. Despite these negative comments, the Glycerin 13 still gained favor as a reliable road running shoe."
Mizuno Wave Inspire 12,,90.0,83.0,1015.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Mizuno Wave Inspire 16,"7 reasons to buy
The AIRmesh is the fabric of the Inspire 12 and it offers breathable and comfortable coverage.
Most reviewers appreciated the Stitched Overlays that are located in the lateral and medial sides, giving a snug yet secure fit.
The Ortholite Sock Liner gives additional cushioning, moisture wicking and anti-microbial protection.
The U4ic is a mid-sole material that is shock absorption, durability, and responsiveness.
Moderate over-pronation of the foot is handled by the added mid-sole components, such as the Wave tech and the Smooth Ride system.
X10 is an outsole unit that is super durable and efficient when dealing with wear and abrasion.
The Wave Inspire 12 has systems that improve the natural flexibility of the foot.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners noticed that it was a bit narrow in the forefoot area, making the toes clump uncomfortably close together.
There were testers who noted that it didn’t offer as much stability as the previous version.
This running shoe has a slightly expensive price.
Bottom line
The Wave Inspire 12 from Mizuno is a daily running companion that is efficient and trustworthy. The shoe garnered quite the popularity from runners who search for a running shoe that offers responsible stability and control. Though a few have some issues with the shoe, it is still considered by some success a successful update to the Wave Inspire line."
Hoka One One Mach,,94.0,88.0,6982.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.2oz , Women: 6.7oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,, Hoka One One Mach 3,"7 reasons to buy
A couple of runners found the Hoka One One to be a lightweight shoe.
Some users were surprised that the underfoot platform saved the knees from tension or discomfort.
A satisfied wearer commended the effortless energy return of the Mach.
Several reviewers were happy that the shoe did not give them blisters. One user was mostly contented that the arch blisters that they used to get in the Clayton were no longer in the Mach.
As claimed by some, the fit was snug but yet able to accommodate a comfortable toe-splay.
A lot of wearers gave positive remarks to the forefoot cushioning and responsiveness.
Many runners reported a comfortable wear right out of the box.
6 reasons not to buy
A disappointed user disliked the poor shock absorption of the sole unit.
Some wearers felt the Mach had a stiffer cushioning than the Clayton, which was its predecessor.
A customer wrote that the mushy underfoot resulted in poor proprioception.
The tongue was too thin, according to many users.
The ride was neither soft nor bouncy and lacked the “race feeling,” a buyer lamented.
Several consumers reported that the fit was too narrow; there wasn’t enough room for the foot to relax.
Bottom line
Although the Hoka One One Mach received many satisfactory reviews, others could not help but compare it in favor of its predecessor, the Clayton. While most of the Mach’s users admired the design and structural elements, and many others found it pleasant to wear, some found faults in the shoe’s fit and feel. Overall, the Mach was a comfortable shoe, but some improvements are necessary for a completely praiseworthy performance."
Asics Gel Kayano 21,,92.0,84.0,2244.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 13mm,,, Asics Gel Kayano 27,"6 reasons to buy
The FluidFit® upper makes use of multi-directional stretch mesh and reinforcements to provide a glove-like coverage.
An exoskeletal heel counter keeps the rear of the foot in place, preventing accidental shoe removal.
The shock absorbing nature of the gel-like unit in the mid-sole was appreciated by many runners.
Over-pronated foot motion is staved off because of mid-foot stability mechanisms.
Durable rubber technologies make the outsole of the Asics Gel Kayano 21 formidable against wear and tear.
The sock liner gives additional underfoot cushioning while also bringing moisture management.
2 reasons not to buy
The Asics Gel Kayano 21 has an expensive price.
A few runners noted that the interior lining tore apart after a few months.
Bottom line
High-tier technologies make the Asics Gel Kayano 21 a solid option for those who want to run in a comfortable and efficient way. Stability and support are given to the wearer because it has systems that balance out the running gait. Fluid motion on the roads are given in droves by this shoe."
Brooks Dyad 11,,88.0,90.0,6.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.6oz , Women: 10.7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A lot of people appreciated the comfort that the Brooks Dyad 11 provides. 
this shoe is flexible, based on some reviews. 
Several users like the roomy toe box of the Brooks Dyad 11. 
The majority of the wearers love the shoe’s overall quality. 
It can keep the foot comfortable even when worn for extended periods, a tester observed. 
Many buyers testified that this running companion is orthotic friendly. 
It offers a better fit compared to its predecessors, several consumers claimed.
3 reasons not to buy
The sole unit of the Brooks Dyad 11 is too firm, said some purchasers. 
A few wearers commented that this shoe is heavier compared to other running shoes. 
It is not supportive enough, according to several reviewers.
Bottom line
The Brooks Dyad 11 is a road running shoe that is suitable for neutral runners or those who supinate. This running partner is also designed to give a more accommodating fit that meets the needs of flat-footed runners who are using orthotics. Despite the shoe’s minimalist design, it is created to deliver excellent cushioning and boost running performance. It incorporates highly durable materials and advanced technologies, which deliver a well-protected and comfortable running experience.
 "
Asics Gel Moya, Asics,90.0,,467.0,,, Road, Neutral,,, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
One reviewer commented that the Gel cushioning of the Asics Gel Moya was very noticeable in its added comfort in the midsole.
Some users were happy with the Ortholite insole used by the shoe.
Many buyers of the Gel Moya remarked on how comfortable it was on foot.
The shoe helped relieve one wearer’s knee pains.
The shoe’s colorways were appreciated by many, and several claimed it goes well with everything.
A number of customers agreed that the Gel Moya is affordable.
A commenter wrote that the shoe was lightweight and breathable, which was especially useful during warm weather.
2 reasons not to buy
A user complained that the shoe was too wide and too long for their foot. Another was also disappointed with the incorrect sizing schemes.
The Gel Moya did not offer much arch support, according to a wearer.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Moya has fruitfully marketed itself as a running shoe to consumers who are looking for an affordable yet functional running companion. Many positive reviews come from users’ experience with comfort, style, and satisfaction with the shoe’s construction. Although some thought there were issues with sizing and support, the overall reception for the Gel Moya was favorable."
Hoka One One Evo Jawz,,84.0,82.0,32.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 7.2oz , Women: 6oz, Men: 3mm , Women: 3mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The grip capability of the outsole unit impressed many consumers.
The weight of the Hoka One One Evo Jawz was deemed to be surprisingly and fittingly light.
A few people observed that this running shoe drained water well.
Several individuals felt that the cushioning unit was able to suitably absorb impact shock.
According to a few users, the Evo Jawz has a durable construction.
3 reasons not to buy
The lack of a protective plate in the sole unit was lamented by many.
The outside of the upper tended to make an annoying crackling sound whenever the foot bent for the toe-off, some people noted.
The fit was a bit narrow, according to a few people.
Bottom line
The reception for the Hoka One One Evo Jawz trail running shoe was mixed to negative. Though it was lauded for being a useful option for outdoor adventures, some detractors felt that it lacked some of the necessary components that make off-road shoes more lucrative. The chief complaint that people had was the bleeding blue tint of the interior sleeve; they were unhappy with their blue feet and blue socks."
Adidas Terrex Agravic Flow,,85.0,80.0,8.0,,," Trail, Road", Neutral, Men: 11.5oz , Women: 10.4oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Several runners claim that the Adidas Terrex Agravic Flow is very comfortable. 
The running shoe offers sufficient support, observed quite a few wearers. 
According to many users, the neutral shoe has grippy traction.
Various testers hail the versatile function of the trail running shoe.
It has a great fit, expressed multiple buyers. 
Majority of the reviewers appreciate the bouncy cushioning of the platform.
3 reasons not to buy
The toe area of the shoe is too wide, observed numerous athletes. 
Some customers have stated that the outsole of the running shoe is too thin. 
There are a few commenters who find the midfoot wrap too tight.
Bottom line
Ready to conquer both road and off-road terrains, the Terrex Agravic Flow from Adidas is a trail running shoe that boasts of ultimate support and grip. Embodying the typical characteristics represented by an Adidas running shoe, the platform supplies smooth and seamless transitions. With the glove-like wrap offered by the neutral running shoe, racers are geared with surefootedness, regardless of surface textures and conditions."
Nike LunarSolo, Nike,93.0,90.0,171.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.5oz , Women: 7.2oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
A reviewer wrote that the shoe helped correct their posture.
Many customers thought the LunarSolo was an affordable shoe.
A lot of commenters said the shoe is lightweight.
The LunarSolo was a comfortable shoe, according to several users.
The shoe did fantastic on the treadmill and during high-intensity interval training (HIIT) workouts, cited a wearer.
One runner claimed the shoe offered adequate arch support.
3 reasons not to buy
Various wearers found the sizing to be small.
The shoe was not as secure as expected, a buyer mentioned.
The upper material has gotten stained with sweat, a couple of runners complained. Another user experienced the same after running in the rain.
Bottom line
With numerous wearers commending the shoe for its comfort and support, it could be said that the Nike LunarSolo has been true to its claims. Several runners agreed that the shoe was a suitable option for everyday runs, except for some who experienced fit and sizing issues. In summary, as a lightweight, versatile, and affordable shoe, the LunarSolo was a quality purchase."
Adidas Energy Boost 3,,92.0,80.0,1097.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
The Adidas Energy Boost 3 looked visually endearing to a lot of runners.
This shoe was versatile enough that it enabled many users to wear it for running sessions, workouts and casual walks.
The mid-sole unit was able to deliver reliable and responsive cushioning, noted a runner.
Some testers noticed that the technology used in the mid-sole really caused each step to be springy.
A reviewer wrote that the mid-foot support unit in the platform helped them in achieving a smooth and stable gait.
Several runners thought that the Energy Boost 3 was an example of a perfect marriage of support and cushioning.
The grip of the outsole was reliable, according to testers.
Reviewers lauded the overall quality and durability of this shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
The rigid plastic stripes or overlays that are placed on the upper unit caused the fabrics to rub against the skin of some testers, causing discomfort.
A runner commented that the lacing system wasn’t able to reach the ball of the foot; they felt that they weren’t able to adjust the fit securely enough.
The tread of the outsole wore off on a few runners, thus exposing the mid-sole to abrasion and reducing traction.
Bottom line
Many runners were able to get quality service from the Adidas Energy Boost 3. For them, it’s a reliable option for their running sessions. It looked appealing and it felt great for their feet. Inversely, some testers observed that the upper unit was a bit uncomfortable, and a few felt that the durability of the outsole left a lot to be desired. But this neutral road shoe generally performed well for the majority of consumers."
Salomon Sonic 3 Balance,,88.0,94.0,9.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.9oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
The majority of the users commented that the Saucony Sonic Balance 3 is comfortable.
Several testers agreed that the shoe is well-cushioned.
According to those who have tried it, the running footwear is lightweight in structure.
Based on reviews, the shoe is responsive.
The shoe has a wide toe box, as noted by many buyers.
It is durable upper, according to those who have bought it.
The shoe is best used for half marathons as well as road and trail running activities. 
A lot of consumers loved its perfect fit.
2 reasons not to buy
One of the users commented that the Salomon Sonic 3 Balance took a few runs to break in.
It was not breathable, a few testers noted.
Bottom line
Overall, with the perfect combination of features and technologies incorporated into the Saucony Sonic 3 Balance, the majority of the consumers were appreciative, proud, and satisfied. The 3rd installment of the shoe collected positive feedback from the wearers. The right blend of cushioning, wide toe box, and excellent fit have enabled runners to perform excellently and successfully. It’s lightweight structure and durability are proofs of its superb construction. The Saucony Sonic 3 Balance is the right choice for runners with neutral foot mechanisms who want to take their running performance to the next level."
New Balance Cypher Run,,89.0,84.0,277.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.4oz , Women: 6.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, New Balance Cypher Run v2,"6 reasons to buy
A good number of consumers said that the shoe was very comfortable and supportive.
A lot of runners commented that the New Balance Cypher Run was breathable and lightweight in structure.
Many runners loved its nice-looking design. It was stylish, according to them.
Some testers were happy with the different color options.
The shoe was reasonably-priced, according to most of those who have tried it.
Many reviewers agreed that it was not only suitable for walking and running sessions, but also for casual activities and gym exercises.
3 reasons not to buy
One of the users commented that the shoe was too narrow for his foot.
A buyer said that he had a hard time putting the shoe on. According to him, the opening was small.
A user was disappointed because the rubber at the bottom of the shoe started to fall off after only several uses.
Bottom line
Many runners loved the New Balance Cypher Run because of its different color options. They commented that it was lightweight, supportive, comfortable and breathable. They agreed that the shoe worked well on running, walking, gym and casual activities. Although one of those who tested it noted that the shoe was too narrow for his foot, others still recommended the New Balance Cypher Run, mainly because of the amount of grip it provided during the running session."
Nike Free RN Flyknit,,88.0,82.0,7923.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.6oz , Women: 6.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Nike Free RN Flyknit 3.0,"7 reasons to buy
Many were impressed by Nike Free RN Flyknit’s breathable upper coverage.
A number of runners mentioned that the cushioning is just right.
The outsole provides reliable traction while enhancing flexibility.
Many runners applauded the design of the shoe.
A significant number of runners said that the shoe is comfortable.
The shoe is available in different color options.
It is lightweight.
3 reasons not to buy
A handful of runners mentioned that they experienced blisters around the heel area.
Some users were disappointed with the shoe’s durability. The upper material wore out quickly after a few use.
Some runners found the shoe to be too narrow for their preferences.
Bottom line
A neutral shoe designed for road running, the Free RN Flyknit offers flexibility and responsiveness. Some users were impressed by the shoe's breathability, traction and comfort while others have issues with its durability and narrow fit. Overall, the shoe is still a reliable partner for daily training and short distance road running."
Jordan React Havoc,,90.0,90.0,10.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The impact protection afforded by the midsole foam is lauded by those who like a shoe that is able to properly mitigate the foot-landings.
Several testers consider the Jordan React Havoc as a highly versatile running shoe that can handle active lifestyles and fashion-focused activities.
The underfoot platform is deemed efficient when it comes to doling out lateral steadiness, particularly during speed training sessions that involve sideways movements.
Some purchasers consider the price to be congruent to the robust design and quality of materials.
The traction capacity of the outsole is appreciated by active wearers who move a lot.
The thermoplastic heel clip in the midsole and external counter on the upper maintain in-shoe steadiness, according to most runners.
2 reasons not to buy
A few consumers have complained of some difficulty wearing the Jordan React Havoc because of the one-piece upper.
A couple of people have noted the perimeter of the collar rubbing uncomfortably against the skin.
Bottom line
The overall response of people towards the Jordan React Havoc has been mostly positive. This road running shoe is apparently a comfortable product that gives a desirable and responsive ride. The cushioning system and the upper are particularly highlighted for helping to secure the foot in place and encourage natural movement. On the other hand, the slip-on design of the opening is criticized for being irritating and difficult to widen.
Fans of neutral running shoes that are for flat surfaces are going to appreciate the React Havoc."
New Balance 680 v4, New Balance,93.0,,159.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 10.3oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
It’s comfortable to wear even on long-distance runs, according to a lot of users.
Most buyers admired the 680 v4 for its lightweight nature.
One user mentioned that the heel part of the shoe was well-crafted and that it allowed a secure fit.
According to a couple of wearers, the shoe provided plenty of ventilation.
A few runners commended the shoe’s cushioning and how it aided their underpronation.
Some users were impressed by the 680 v4’s durability.
4 reasons not to buy
According to some users, the shoe felt uncomfortable after the first few uses due to apparent deterioration.
The shoe’s sole unit felt like hard and cheap rubber, according to the reviews of some wearers.
Several runners did not feel adequate support from the shoe, particularly at the arch and rearfoot.
Many of the users think the 680 v4 is too narrow.
Bottom line
The New Balance 680 v4 features a no-sew material that prevents irritation and provides remarkable durability that can withstand the routine, no matter the intensity. Use this shoe for road running, walking, and daily training. This shoe is ideal for runners with neutral pronation."
Asics Gel Cumulus 17,,86.0,79.0,3320.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.4oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Cumulus 22,"7 reasons to buy
A tester commented that the Asics Gel Cumulus 17 was able to provide comfort for their feet, even when worn for the entire day.
The various color schemes available for this model gained recognition from those who wanted to have visually endearing running gear.
There were consumers who wrote that the cushioning systems in this running shoe were responsive, efficient and unfailing.
Runners welcomed the ComforDry™ Sock Liner, which kept the interior environment healthy and odor-free through its antimicrobial properties.
The supportive mechanisms in the mid-sole were well-received; runners felt that they were aptly assisted in achieving a smoother gait.
Reviews were agreeable when it came to the outsole unit’s durability and capability to provide traction.
A tester noted that they weren’t able to experience any foot cramps or knee aches when they used the Asics Gel Cumulus 17 for their running sessions.
3 reasons not to buy
Several testers reported that the upper wasn’t as durable as they hoped; holes have started to appear in the forefoot area.
A runner noted that the rubber compound used in the outsole started to come off after a few months.
Others noted that the toe area was too tight; it rubbed uncomfortably against the skin and caused blisters.
Bottom line
The feedback for the Asics Gel Cumulus 17 road shoe was generally positive. There were those who felt the agreeable and responsive components of this model. Many welcomed its appealing color schemes. And as usual, the cushioning systems gained favor. It was touted as a solid option for the neutral runner. But there were negative reports about the durability of its upper and outsole units. Others simply wrote that the previous version was more comfortable."
Saucony Peregrine 8,,88.0,82.0,464.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Saucony Peregrine 10,"5 reasons to buy
Several testers welcomed the breathable upper of the Saucony Peregrin 8.
According to some people, the midsole was able to deliver comfort and support to the underfoot.
The grip of the outsole unit’s traction lugs proved to be efficient, a few runners noted.
According to a few users, the shoe feels lighter compared to other trail shoes.
Several runners mentioned that the Peregrin 8 offers reliable underfoot protection for trail running.
3 reasons not to buy
Most runners didn’t like the removal of the rock plate which served as a protective layer against sharp surfaces and debris.
A few mentioned that the midfoot area is too snug.
The Saucony Peregrine 8 is not durable.
Bottom line
The response for the Saucony Peregrine 8 is mixed. It is true that more than several people were happy with the underfoot platform, the outsole configuration, and the well-ventilated upper. But a lot of people had some gripes with this trail running shoe, as well. They felt that it was too narrow for their liking. They also had something to say about its limited color schemes, the unfortunate removal of the rock plate, and the hefty weight. It’s a conflict-ridden update for a well-known series."
Asics Gel Nimbus 18,,92.0,86.0,3988.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 13mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
The Gel® Cushioning System was loved by many because it was really able to attenuate the impact shock generated by striking the foot on the ground.
A lot of testers commended the visual flair that is present in this model; the different color schemes offered style.
Most runners recognized its full-length cushioning platform, which, for them, was adequately responsive.
The Gel Nimbus 18 was able to stay durable even after long running sessions, noted a tester.
The mid-foot support system garnered praise from runners who needed enhanced gait efficiency.
The word ‘comfortable’ was used by a lot of runners when it came to describing their time with this running shoe.
There were consumers who lauded its upper unit, which kept their feet cool and dry on hot days.
The fit was accurate, wrote numerous testers.
Wearing the Asics Gel Nimbus 18 helped in staving off the knee and back pain that a tester was experiencing.
4 reasons not to buy
A handful of runners commented that the Asics Nimbus 18 felt uncomfortably tighter than what they were used to.
The toe box was a bit narrow for some who tried it.
Holes have started to appear in the inner heel area, a tester reported; these worn-off sections irritated their skin.
The mid-sole felt stiff for some users; they said that it caused some discomfort to their feet and legs.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Nimbus 18 was enjoyed by a lot of runners. They recognized the strength of the Gel® Cushioning, the smoothness of the upper fabrics, and the quality performance that it generally gave them. But there were those who were disappointed because it felt tight and narrow, particularly in the forefoot area. Others wrote that the platform was stiff and unwieldy. Though there were polarizing comments, this road running shoe became popular among neutral runners."
New Balance FuelCore Sonic v2,,91.0,,60.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.3oz , Women: 7.2oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
A few users mentioned that the New Balance FuelCore Sonic v2 is a very comfortable running shoe.
According to some reviews, the shoe feels like a sock.
Several wearers admired the Boa system of the Sonic v2; they said it is easy to adjust.
The slip-on design of the shoe gained positive feedback; some runners mentioned that it facilitates the shoe’s easy on and off.
Some buyers said that the shoe runs true to size.
The shoe has a breathable upper coverage, said some reviews.
A few wide-footed runners lauded the wide sizing of the FuelCore Sonic v2.
The New Balance FuelCore Sonic v2 is a nice-looking shoe, based on some comments.
1 reasons not to buy
One user disliked the midfoot strap because it created a tight and painful wrap on the top of the foot.
Bottom line
The New Balance FuelCore Sonic v2 has managed to meet the expectations of the users in terms of comfort, performance and fit. Positive comments were made regarding the shoe’s good-looking design, lacing system, and the availability of wide sizing. Overall, the customers are truly happy with the 2nd version of the FuelCore Sonic. To them, it is a worthy purchase."
Adidas Supernova Glide Boost 8,,97.0,91.0,632.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A lot of runners felt well-supported by the Supernova Glide Boost 8.
Based on the remarks of a large number of runners, this shoe was aptly comfortable to use.
Most testers considered this as an excellent trainer as well as a great option for long-distance runs.
The foam platform of this shoe allowed the foot to take smooth and well-paced steps, a user commented.
The boost™ technology was welcomed by consumers because it was able to attenuate impact responsibly during landings and add a boost of energy to the toe-off.
For a lot of runners, the cover system fit adequately; they didn’t feel any hot spots or incidences of the fabric rubbing uncomfortably against their skin.
The toe box of the Glide Boost 8 was roomy and it enabled the toes to splay naturally, some users noted.
2 reasons not to buy
A reviewer was a bit disappointed that it didn’t come in other optional widths.
Some runners wrote that they needed respectable mileage to break-in the shoe.
Bottom line
Adidas stuffed the Supernova Glide Boost 8 with some of its best technologies from top to bottom. The quality and performance of this shoe really worked well for runners. They have perceived it to be very responsive to their movements. Many pointed out that they highly recommend this neutral road shoe for those who want to have a great running experience."
Nike Zoom Streak 6,,82.0,86.0,43.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.4oz , Women: 6.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Nike Air Zoom Streak 7,"8 reasons to buy
The new foot-shaped last and inner midfoot wrap make running at top speed in the Streak 6 very comfortable, according to most reviews.
It is a very light racer.
Several reviewers noted that the price tag is very acceptable for a versatile racing flat.
A handful noted that there is much better responsiveness in the latest version of the Zoom Streak.
Though designed as a racing flat, a good number of comments mentioned that the shoe can also be used for high-mileage runs.
The arch support is better in this version of the Nike Streak.
Some runners noted the dependable traction of the Zoom Streak 6.
The breathability is first-rate, as cited in many of the reviews.
2 reasons not to buy
A few stated that it is just a bit too firm than what they are accustomed to in the Streak series.
A significant number of runners were disappointed with the shoe’s durability.
Bottom line
The Nike Zoom Streak 6 is an exceptionally versatile racing flat. It has sufficient cushioning for long runs and more than enough responsiveness for quick sessions or fartleks. The improvements in the last, the addition of the midfoot plate, and inner midfoot wrap offer runners a more form-fitting fit and added spring. For those who plan to take the shoe for middle to long-distance runs, there responsiveness of the Pebax plate and the Zoom air unit in the heel are just what the doctor ordered."
Reebok Fast Flexweave,,91.0,86.0,458.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 4mm, Mar 2018,,,"8 reasons to buy
Many consumers mentioned that the fit was exceptional.
Some of the users agreed that the shoe was comfortable.
A good number of wearers noted that the appearance was striking.
The Reebok Fast Flexweave was lightweight, according to those who have tried it.
The majority of the buyers commented that the shoe provided the right amount of arch support.
Some reviewers loved its flexibility.
A consumer noted that the shoe was not only good for running sessions, but also for CrossFit, walking and gym workouts.
Based on some reviews, it was breathable.
3 reasons not to buy
Several purchasers said that the shoe has a narrow toe box.
Some of the runners commented it runs small.
One of the users noted that the Reebok Fast Flexweave was hard to clean.
Bottom line
Overall, a good number of consumers agreed that the Reebok Fast Flexweave was one of the most supportive and comfortable shoes they have ever worn. Aside from its structure, they lauded its breathability and flexibility. Although some runners have issues with its narrow toe box and size, others still recommend the shoe because of its exceptional fit and performance. The Reebok Fast Flexweave is a good investment for those who are looking for a lightweight, visually-appealing and versatile running shoe."
La Sportiva Bushido,,89.0,84.0,313.0,,, Trail, Stability, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 9.1oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,, La Sportiva Bushido II,"6 reasons to buy
The high level of support in the upper makes sure that the foot stays in place and gets enough ventilation.
The Bushido features an internal slip-on construction for a more sock-like feel.
Moderate cushioning is handled by the Compression Molded MEMIex mid-sole.
Protective components add a layer of anti-debris mechanics that function well on soft and hard surfaces.
Many were impressed by the FriXion XT, a sticky compound that holds onto many types of terrain.
The Impact Brake System reliably provides traction when climbing and going down paths.
3 reasons not to buy
The Bushido has a moderately heavy weight.
Some reviews noted that the TPU Toe Cap was not as efficient as advertised because they still felt the hard surfaces pound their toes.
Some runners thought that the heel cup needed improvement in order to prevent slippage.
Bottom line
The La Sportiva Bushido is a running shoe that offers a perfect combination of responsiveness, stability and comfort. You can expect adequate protection and traction from this shoe, especially when running on technical terrain. This is great for daily training and long distance runs."
Saucony Kinvara 7,,89.0,83.0,722.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.7oz , Women: 6.6oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Saucony Kinvara 11,"7 reasons to buy
Based on some reviews, the Kinvara 7 has a breathable and comfortable upper coverage.
The welded thin-film overlays called the Flex Film secures the foot in a snug fit.
Runners generally welcomed the moisture-wicking qualities of the RUNDRY Collar Lining.
The SSL EVA is a midsole component that’s durable, lightweight and responsive.
The EVERUN Heel Insert assists in returning energy to the wearer during heel striking.
The outsole was durable enough for road running, according to user reviews.
The Saucony Kinvara 7 is available in 7 different color options.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners felt that it was a bit tight in the midfoot area.
Others experienced the sole unit remain inflexible even after wearing it a few times.
The testers said that the midsole wasn’t as comfortable as the previous version.
Bottom line
The Kinvara 7 from Saucony is a running shoe that provides adequate service to those who want a comfortable running experience. It can handle up-tempo running and daily training, which are great activities for beginners and advanced athletes. Based on the reviews, the Kinvara 7 has been positively accepted by the users."
Salomon Sense Ride GTX Invisible Fit,,86.0,,59.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Salomon Sense Ride 3 GTX Invisible Fit,"5 reasons to buy
Several consumers liked the lightweight build of the Salomon Sense Ride GTX Invisible Fit.
The underfoot cushioning system was liked because it was responsive.
The upper unit was lauded for being able to hug the foot securely and comfortably.
Purchasers welcomed the waterproof upper, stating that it acted as a wall against water infiltration.
The durability of the materials was appreciated by runners.
1 reasons not to buy
The tongue easily let debris in the foot-chamber, a few people claimed.
Bottom line
People were mostly happy with the Salomon Sense Ride GTX Invisible Fit. They felt that this trail companion offered superb performance and quality. The GORE-TEX® upper and the midsole cushioning system were elements that garnered praise. Overall, this neutral running shoe was seen as a worthy addition to Salomon’s roster."
Reebok Zig Pulse, Reebok,93.0,87.0,260.0,$90,$75 (save 17%), Road,,,,,,, Normal | Normal, Reebok Zig Pulse 3,"8 reasons to buy
The Reebok Zig Pulse was extremely comfortable, several users reported.
The upper enabled the foot to stay cool even during warm days, a tester observed.
The shoe had a snug fit and was effective in keeping the foot secure, wrote a buyer.
One commenter said the midsole worked well in absorbing impact.
A vast improvement from first generation Zig shoes, a wearer remarked.
Many users thought that the Zig Pulse was an affordable shoe.
The shock-absorbing property helped reduce fatigue, a reviewer stated.
The shoe was lightweight and aided running for longer miles, some users said.
4 reasons not to buy
Some users felt that the Reebok Zig Pulse was too narrow.
The ankle collar was too low and offered very little support, according to a wearer.
A buyer complained that the upper material was difficult to clean.
A handful of customers mentioned that the shoe broke quickly.
Bottom line
The Reebok Zig Pulse garnered a lot of positive reviews from consumers, which were mostly about the features and the performance. Criticisms, on the other hand, were few, but quite significant, as these were consistently towards the shoe’s quality. In conclusion, the Zig Pulse was an okay running shoe, but maybe average at best."
New Balance 610 v5,,91.0,89.0,770.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The 610 v5 is a great pair of cushioning shoes with a 4E size availability, which is rare to find, according to some runners.
The fit of this shoe is perfect for runners who need wider width and bigger size, as commented by reviewers.
It has very nice aesthetics and design that complement both male and female runners.
It is a shoe with great stability and support, while keeping the responsiveness is exceptional.
It is a protective shoe on trails, even or uneven grounds.
It has a very excellent traction on tough trails and soft mud based on the reviews of several runners.
Available in several color options.
3 reasons not to buy
It has a wide fit and some runners find it too large.
The shoe laces are quite longer as complained by testers.
The upper is not durable as mentioned in some reviews.
Bottom line
The New Balance 610v5 is a great trail running shoe designed with treads for soft or tough trails. The comfort and protection are well-engineered for better running, and it has a great fit for wider feet. Stability and responsiveness are also given emphasis, which make this shoe a great option for training and for a variety of activities. At its fair price, this shoe is worth spending for."
Inov-8 Roclite 325,,77.0,80.0,23.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.5oz , Women: 11.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Most reviewers said that the Inov-8 Roclite 325 was comfortable once it was broken in.
Several users said that it was supportive yet lightweight for a hiking shoe.
A lot of testers appreciated the simplicity of the shoe’s design.
Some runners were thankful for the above ankle support provided them.
The majority of reviewers mentioned that the shoe worked on any terrain. One user even said that the sole was efficient, even on uneven ground.
Plenty of testers said that the upper was sufficiently breathable.
2 reasons not to buy
A few users said that the Roclite 325 still needed quite some time to break in.
One user expressed that the eyelets of his shoe ripped after only six weeks of use.
Bottom line
With its versatile grip, the Roclite 325 is fit for fast-packing, mountain running, and trekking. It’s protective upper, built around the natural anatomy of the foot, ensures that runners have a sense of freedom, comfort, and safety while on the trail. Those looking for an adaptable trail running shoe for different outdoor adventures should check this out."
Nike Air Zoom Terra Kiger 4,,89.0,92.0,35.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Nike Air Zoom Terra Kiger 5,"8 reasons to buy
The majority of the runners mentioned that the Nike Air Zoom Terra Kiger 4 is very comfortable.
The fit was just right for some runners who have tried the shoe.
Several users admired the wider toe-box, which allowed their toes to move comfortably.
The Terra Kiger 4 is a versatile shoe; not only did a few people use it for trail running, but also in the gym and as a casual shoe.
The shoe provided enough amount of foot protection while running on the trail, said a few users.
According to some comments, this running shoe offered great traction on varied surfaces.
The mid-sole felt a lot softer compared to the previous version, based on a few comments.
Most of the users mentioned that the Terra Kiger’s 4th iteration had reliable durability.
3 reasons not to buy
The collar is too loose, which allows debris to enter the shoe, some users complained.
The heel cup is soft and feels unstable, according to a couple of reviewers.
A few were disappointed with the lace-loops that blew out easily after a few days of use.
Bottom line
The Nike Air Zoom Terra Kiger 4 is a neutral trail running shoe that offers a combination of reliable traction, durability, and comfort. Generally, many users were impressed by the updates of this version. With all the technologies incorporated into the shoe, there is no doubt that the shoe is able to offer value for money."
New Balance Fresh Foam 1080 v6,,89.0,80.0,416.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 8.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, New Balance Fresh Foam 1080 v10,"8 reasons to buy
A runner noted that the New Balance 1080 v6 kept their feet comfortable, even when they were using it all day.
The upper fabrics gained praise for its capability to wrap around the contours of the foot snugly and securely.
Several runners commented that the toe box was roomy enough to accommodate the natural splaying of the toes.
Its weight profile was welcomed by many because it felt agreeably light to them.
The underfoot experience felt responsive and springy to a lot of testers.
Even after many uses, the mid-sole unit of this model actually stayed efficient and robust for many of those who tried it.
Traction was reliable, according to users.
A reviewer stated that even though the New Balance 1080 v6 was expensive, its efficient components and features made it a great investment.
3 reasons not to buy
A runner observed that the instep had rough edges that cut through socks and caused some blistering.
The stitched overlays were too hard, according to several testers; they actually wrote that these add-ons caused the mesh to rub uncomfortably against the skin.
This model felt a little too tight for a few reviewers.
Bottom line
The 6th version of the New Balance 1080 was able to provide a great number of neutral runners with quality service and performance. They felt secure and comfortable when they wore it. Some of them even used this road shoe for long periods of time and they didn’t report any issues. But such wasn’t the case for some testers. For them, it was too narrow and some of its components rubbed uncomfortably against their feet."
Adidas Fluidflow, Adidas,83.0,,9.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
The midsole unit of the Adidas Fluidflow is welcomed because it is springy and supportive.
Using this running shoe in the gym for treadmill jogging and general exercise is a boon for shoe enthusiasts.
Flexibility is a trait that people have come to appreciate from the underfoot platform.
The aesthetics of this product has been welcomed by those who desire a shoe that can perform and look appealing.
Several individuals are happy with the traction capacity of the outsole unit.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners have mentioned that the midfoot part of the upper unit is a bit restrictive.
A few consumers are claiming that a break-in period of a few uses is needed before the upper unit and midsole can become comfortable.
Bottom line
The Fluidflow is touted as a product that can handle a variety of activities. This Adidas running shoe has a versatility that encompasses many tasks because it has a lightweight and flexible build that accommodates the natural movement capacity of the human foot. Fans of entry-level road shoes for neutral pronation can have fun with this offering from the three-stripe brand."
Puma Carson 2, Puma,84.0,63.0,1334.0,$60,$50 (save 17%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
Many users were happy with the shoe’s affordability and decent quality.
It provided the perfect amount of arch support for neutral pronators, as mentioned by a purchaser.
It was comfortable enough to wear even for daily use, stated a consumer.
The midsole delivered well, and running felt like stepping on the clouds, wrote a reviewer.
One user commented about the shoe’s considerable ankle support.
Several wearers found the upper to be very breathable and snug on foot.
The cushioning was found to be plush and not at all bulky or substantial.
4 reasons not to buy
A user commented that the shoe was too stiff and not as durable as expected.
The fit is a bit tight and uncomfortable, according to a wearer.
The shoe felt flimsy and unable to support running or any similar physical activities, a buyer complained.
The outsole was criticized because it lost all its grip in less than a month of use.
Bottom line
With its uncomplicated and no-nonsense design, the Puma Carson 2 was a winner for most of its users. They were happy with its simple features and their capacity to deliver a performance expected from a brand they trust. It touted to satisfy the needs of an everyday runner who isn’t looking for extravagant wear."
Puma Speed 600 Fusefit,,97.0,95.0,32.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11oz , Women: 9.8oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Users appreciated the comfort that the Puma Speed 600 Fusefit provides. 
A lot of reviewers highlighted the shoe’s overall quality. 
This shoe is suitable for long runs and marathons, said some consumers.
A few wearers mentioned that it offers a good grip on paved surfaces. 
Some commenters praised this running companion’s lightweight structure. 
It offers excellent cushioning, according to a couple of buyers. 
Many purchasers love the color combination of the Speed 600 Fusefit.
2 reasons not to buy
A handful of runners noted that the Speed 600 Fusefit is a bit narrow.
One tester complained that the outsole of the shoe started to wear off after only a few uses.
Bottom line
The Puma Speed 600 Fusefit is a neutral running shoe that is suitable for runners and athletes who do not overpronate. This shoe features a progressive design and uses high-quality materials, helping the users achieve optimal performance.  It is ideal for walking, road running, and gym sessions."
Asics GT Xpress,,93.0,,141.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The Asics GT Xpress was a comfortable running shoe, according to many users. Others mentioned that the shoe did not require a break-in period because it felt comfortable right from the start.
Several users agreed that the shoe had a stylish and modern appearance.
One reviewer shared that the toe box gave plenty of room.
The GT Xpress provided a stable ride all throughout the run, said a buyer.
The shoe helped with shin splints and other pains, according to a satisfied runner.
1 reasons not to buy
The support and cushioning were gone after only a month of usage, a user complained.
Bottom line
With the Asics GT Xpress, many runners felt their performance was exceptional while still feeling cozy and comfortable. The various positive reviews from consumers praised all the components of the shoe – from structure to appearance to wear experience. Overall, the GT Xpress has fruitfully wowed the market with its reliability and functionality."
New Balance 690 v2 Trail, New Balance,86.0,80.0,397.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Most customers admired the light weight of New Balance 690 v2 Trail.
Many runners found the pair highly comfortable, even after spending a considerably longer time on trails.
Most purchasers supported the extra cushioning in the heel region since it made running on the particularly rough terrains more exciting.
The users liked how the shoe felt against their feet: soft and silken.
A few people also highlighted the great traction of 690 v2 Trail.
The users praised the overall design and look of the upper.
A few customers appreciated this running shoe’s apparently reasonable price.
The runners also noted the bright colors of the shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
A purchaser felt that the shoe was made using ‘cheap’ materials.
A runner was dissatisfied with the level of cushioning throughout the midsole since his feet hurt during trail running.
Bottom line
The light weight, clever cushion and the great aesthetic look of the New Balance 690 v2 Trail have earned the pair its popularity in the market. Also, being very reasonable in price, the shoe has become the choice of most neutral trail runners who fancy bright colors in their footwear."
Hoka One One Hupana,,88.0,85.0,499.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.2oz , Women: 6.3oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,, Hoka One One Hupana 2,"11 reasons to buy
A lot of consumers appreciated the lightweight nature of the Hoka One One Hupana, stating that it didn’t drag their feet down.
Several purchasers wrote that the upper was able to give a locked-in feel in the mid-foot.
Those who have tried this shoe were able to use it for many kinds of activities, even casual walks; they noted that it remained efficient throughout.
The underfoot cushioning was firm yet responsive to the movements of the foot, some runners commented.
This running shoe looked visually appealing, according to some reviewers.
A heavyset tester was happy that the cushioning system was durable and long-lasting, noting that it was a winner for those with heavier weights.
Runners praised the traction-capability of the RMAT platform; they felt that it held the ground well.
The price is very reasonable based on its performance and durability.
The first Hoka shoe that does not look ridiculous, based on the comments of many reviewers.
The versatility of the Hupana includes speed work, fartleks, and high-mileage running.
A handful of expert reviewers were amazed by the smooth transitions, including a very nice toe-off phase from this shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
The toe-box was uncomfortably narrow, noted a dissatisfied runner.
Some runners noticed that the upper is quite stiff all throughout the shoe.
A handful of expert reviewers and some runners found the upper to lack breathability.
Bottom line
A lot of runners enjoyed the Hoka One One Hupana. They welcomed its simple yet eye-catching design, as well as its comfortable cushioning. Neutral runners were happy that it was able to allow them to move naturally without compromising the cushioning. The lightweight nature of this road shoe also received positive recognition. Inversely, some runners had some complaints about the width, as well as the construction of the upper."
Salomon S-Lab Sonic 2,,93.0,91.0,12.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.6oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
The shoe was very reliable in long-distance runs, according to an impressed user.
The Salomon S-Lab Sonic 2 offered consistent comfort both during and after races, an athlete commented.
The open mesh upper successfully kept the foot cool, said a runner.
A customer appreciated the midsole that was well-cushioned and responsive.
A reviewer liked how the shoe moved with the foot and made their gait effortless.
Many buyers thought the S-Lab Sonic 2 was a lightweight shoe.
The shoe’s contoured fit resulted in a balance of cushion, support, control, and spring, a runner stated.
There was excellent ankle support, mentioned a user.
The outsole delivered plenty of traction and durability, as written by a reviewer.
3 reasons not to buy
One wearer found the shoe to be narrow.
Some buyers thought the shoe was expensive.
The shoe did not provide a secure fit, considering it was made for racing, a reviewer pointed out.
Bottom line
The Salomon S-Lab Sonic 2 was able to amaze many of its users, as evident in their positive comments. The shoe’s various features, cushioning, and performance were all praised. There were some who encountered fit issues, but, overall, this neutral running shoe is a clear winner among consumers."
Nike Air Zoom Structure 19,,88.0,84.0,527.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,, Nike Air Zoom Structure 22,"8 reasons to buy
Many runners used the word ‘comfortable’ to describe their experiences while wearing the 19th version of the Nike Air Zoom Structure.
Many runners used the word ‘comfortable’ to describe their experiences while wearing the 19th version of the Nike Air Zoom Structure.
A consumer with a stress fracture in the Achilles region was able to run without discomfort or pain while wearing this shoe.
The mid-sole unit was responsive, and users noted that it delivered smooth transitions through the gait cycle.
The overall durability was commended by a lot of runners; they were able to use it frequently and the materials didn’t break down on them.
The traction capability of the outsole was lauded by those who have tried it.
The traction capability of the outsole was lauded by those who have tried it.
It came in a variety of widths, which satisfied consumers who had wide or narrow foot-dimensions.
3 reasons not to buy
The medial support unit of this shoe caused some pressure on the lateral side of a runner’s foot, resulting in some discomfort.
It felt heavy, according to some displeased testers.
A runner noted that the wider version only felt more accommodating in the forefoot area; the mid-foot and rear sections still felt tight for them.
Bottom line
The 19th version of the Nike Air Zoom Structure was able to deliver quality service to a lot of runners who have over-pronated foot motion. They felt the mid-foot support unit as it prevented their feet from rolling inwards during each step. The general presentation, construction and efficacy of this model received high praise, as well. A few users weren’t very impressed with it; nonetheless, this road shoe had become quite popular for many."
Hoka One One Clifton 2,,90.0,86.0,994.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.7oz , Women: 6.6oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,, Hoka One One Clifton 6,"7 reasons to buy
Most runners liked the lightweight no-sew construction of the Clifton 2, which enabled a next-to-foot wearing experience
The Structural Overlays supports the mid-foot area without compromising the look and the weight of the shoe itself.
The Clifton 2 has a new padded tongue for added comfort.
The HIP CMEVA midsole protects the foot from impact while adding stability.
The Early Stage Meta-Rocker design allows better transitioning from the heel to the toe area.
This running shoe comes in many color schemes, which makes it visually endearing to many athletes.
It feels light and fast, as noted in some reviews.
4 reasons not to buy
Some runners noticed that the 2nd version of the Clifton was a bit stiffer and not as comfortable as the original version.
Its forefoot area was narrow to some runners.
The Clifton 2 wears out quickly after a few months of use.
A few didn’t like the bulky look of the sole unit.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Clifton 2 is a road running shoe that offers plenty of cushioning. It received mixed reviews from the users but the positive ones weigh more than the negative. It is very lightweight, durable and more comfortable than the original version. This shoe is a great partner for your daily training."
Asics GT 2000 7 Trail,,95.0,95.0,77.0,,, Trail, Stability, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 8.7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics GT 2000 8 Trail,"6 reasons to buy
One user wrote positively about the support and cushioning of the Asics GT 2000 7 Trail.
Several runners noticed the durable yet flexible outsole of the shoe.
A reviewer mentioned the shoe provided relief to their plantar fasciitis and neuroma.
The design of the GT 2000 7 Trail was appreciated by many wearers.
A lot of buyers appreciated the shoe’s performance during long distances.
Some commenters reported a well-ventilated feel from the seamless upper construction of the GT 2000 7 Trail.
4 reasons not to buy
Some users are disappointed with the shoe’s limited width options. Others found that the sizing is too small.
A couple of wearers encountered blisters while wearing the Asics GT 2000 7 Trail.
A few testers reported that the collar is too tight around the ankle.
The shoe’s lack of a rock plate is disappointing to some trail runners.
Bottom line
In summary, the Asics GT 2000 7 Trail was able to meet runners’ expectations in terms of performance and stability. Some found the features of the shoe to be highly reliable, while some felt improvements were needed regarding how it fits. Despite the negative comments, the GT 2000 7 remains to be an average shoe that is still worth a try."
Vibram FiveFingers V-Trail,,92.0,88.0,570.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 6.4oz , Women: 6.4oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,, Vibram FiveFingers V-Trail 2.0,"9 reasons to buy
Many users thought the Vibram FiveFingers V-Trail was extremely comfortable and breathable.
One reviewer was amazed that the shoe provided a tight and secure grip on slick surfaces.
Several runners agreed that it felt great on the foot and it fit them comfortably well.
The shoe was durable enough and did not show any signs of wear even after many months of usage, according to a user.
It provided a subtle amount of cushioning that was just right for a five-fingered shoe, as stated by a reviewer.
One buyer mentioned the shoe helped relieve their pain from walking.
A majority of runners claimed there was adequate protection from the shoe against sharp rocks and roots.
A couple of runners said the shoe was comfortable enough to be worn without socks.
A reviewer said the V-Trail allowed them a more efficient running experience and has brought less strain on the knees compared to ordinary running shoes.
5 reasons not to buy
A number of users found that the colors of the shoe bled and stained their sock and foot.
The shoe needed quite a long time to break in, as observed by a couple of runners.
Some buyers said that the shoe felt tight and narrow.
The heel bed was narrow and the toe part caused abrasions, according to one user.
One reviewer pointed out that the shoe was not easy to put on or take off because of its unique foot-shaped design.
Bottom line
The V-Trail is a minimalist off-road shoe that is suitable for runners and racers who are relatively experienced in barefoot running. It is designed to handle rough trails, including slush and muck that is usually brought about by winter conditions. The structure of this shoe is made to withstand tough use by adventurous wearers."
Puma Speed 500,,90.0,,36.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
The majority of the wearers commented that the Puma Speed 500 is comfortable to wear.
Some of the users mentioned that the running shoe is lightweight.
One of the consumers said that the running footwear is breathable.
According to those who have tried it, the shoe is flexible.
Based on reviews, the Puma Speed 500 is supportive.
As noted by some buyers, the shoe is stylish.
Several purchasers love how the shoe perfectly hugs the foot.
It is best used for jogging, running, walking and gym workouts, agreed by some users.
2 reasons not to buy
A wearer commented that the Puma Speed 500 has a narrow toe box.
As noted by a consumer, the sock-like upper of the shoe rubs on the back of the heel area.
Bottom line
The Puma Speed 500 was loved and appreciated by the majority of its testers. The shoe’s flexibility, lightweight structure, and comfort level become its most reliable features. With the positive feedback of a good number of users, the shoe's outsole, midsole, and upper construction are proven and tested to be excellent. With that said, many people agreed that the shoe release in the market is successful in making them happy and satisfied."
Mizuno Wave Sonic,,86.0,83.0,94.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 6.7oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Mizuno Wave Sonic 2,"7 reasons to buy
The majority were very happy with the excellent cushioning of the Mizuno Wave Sonic.
The purchasers appreciated the reasonable price of the shoe.
The customers found out that the shoe was very durable since it remained in a good condition, even after many miles of running.
Many runners thought that this shoe was ‘well ventilated’ since it kept their feet dry and cool, even on longer runs.
A number of testers appreciated the remarkable traction that they experienced when tackling unpredictable terrains, such as steep slopes and rugged paths.
A few people mentioned that the look of the Mizuno Wave Sonic was very fashionable.
For one individual, this running shoe was able to reduce a year-old pain in the shin.
2 reasons not to buy
A runner thought that the Mizuno Wave Sonic was not as fast as other running shoes on the market.
Another user mentioned how the lack of cushioning and arch support made it difficult to run for longer periods of time.
Bottom line
According to a majority of those who have tried it, the Mizuno Wave Sonic is a neutral pair of trail running shoes that have all-around qualities, as well as a decent price. Its lightweight nature, the breathable construction, the firm grip inside and outside the shoe, and the optimal comfortability make it a wise choice for most runners who are looking for a sturdy running shoe to try on the asphalt."
Skechers GOrun 3, Skechers,92.0,83.0,84.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7oz , Women: 5.2oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Skechers GOrun 7+,"5 reasons to buy
Some testers mentioned that the shoe if very light and fast.
The shoe provides right amount of support and cushioning.
Many runners were amazed by the durability of the shoe.
Considering the performance of the shoe, the price is really reasonable.
Available in different color options.
2 reasons not to buy
The shoe is too narrow for some runners.
Some noticed that the shoe is not comfortable enough for running.
Bottom line
The Skechers GOrun 3 is a road running shoe designed for neutral foot movement. It is made with a great combination of support, comfort and protection. As a fast and light shoe, it is best for daily running and long runs."
Nike Flex Run 2014, Nike,86.0,,1231.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 6.8oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
The inner sleeve and soft cushioning give a very comfortable ride in the 2014 version of the Flex Run.
It is a bang for the buck shoe.
It is very light.
It is very flexible.
The open mesh is very breathable.
Some runners appreciated its ability to be a race day shoe or as a high-mileage trainer.
10 trendy color options.
A good number of runners have used this as an all-day shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
Several mentioned that rubber fell off quickly in the Flex Run 2014.
Quite a number of comments were disappointed that the outsole attracts small stones.
Bottom line
The Nike Flex Run 2014 is a versatile trainer that can handle almost all types of distances at varying speeds. There is sufficient arch support, cushioning, and breathable coverage for runners of all levels to enjoy. The really nice looks and affordable price make it a great shoe."
Adidas Supernova ST,,90.0,73.0,456.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The looks of the Adidas Supernova ST gained positive feedback from many of those who have tried it.
Runners generally described their time wearing this shoe as ‘comfortable’.
Consumers welcomed the option to choose from a variety of colorways.
The entire shoe felt suitably lightweight, according to those who have tried it.
The stable platform was apparently able to help those with pronation concerns.
The outsole’s grip capability received praise for being efficient on the asphalt.
2 reasons not to buy
A runner reported some slipping in the ankle area due to apparently getting less support from the collar.
The midsole's boost™ wasn’t as noticeable a feature as expected, according to a tester.
Bottom line
The Adidas Supernova ST was able to impress many of those who have tested it. Runners were generally satisfied with its performance, its features and its stability mechanics. They thought that it was efficient on the roads. But there were some who weren’t able to acclimate well to it, reporting some quirks in its design and components."
Brooks Launch 4,,93.0,88.0,1807.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Brooks Launch 7,"10 reasons to buy
The 4th iteration of the Brooks Launch is impressively comfortable, according to a large number of reviewers.
It drops almost an ounce of weight compared to the earlier model.
There are more flex grooves that are also deeper than before for better flexibility and excellent toe off.
Most runners consider the $100 price as a bargain because of the shoe’s impeccable performance and durability.
Some runners valued the Launch 4’s versatility as it can handle daily training together with tempo runs.
A handful of reviewers loved the responsiveness of this shoe.
A few runners observed that it is even smoother than the past version.
An expert reviewer noted how the upper holds the foot in comfort and security.
Some runners were extremely happy with the color combinations and sleek look of this shoe.
More than a handful of reviewers were satisfied with the shoe’s breathability.
2 reasons not to buy
The midfoot, due to the Midfoot Transition Zone, made the area stiffer than what some fans of the Launch were used to.
No optional widths.
Bottom line
The changes made by Brooks in the Launch 4 catapults the shoe as one of the early contenders for the shoe of the year. It feels agile, runs smoothly, and bridges training and speed work with ease. The shoe has excellent arch support, loads of comfort, and very versatile. To top it off, the price tag makes it even more attractive for all sorts of runners. This is one shoe that is going to find a place in the shoe rack of many runners."
Reebok Zig Pulse 3, Reebok,93.0,,320.0,$90,$51 (save 43%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
A lot of users have noted that the Reebok Zig Pulse 3 provides excellent comfort during their runs.
Most wearers like the invigorating design update that the shoe went through.
Some users said that the Zig Pulse 3’s upper is well ventilated.
A fair number of purchasers mentioned how they appreciated the energy return provided by ZigTech technology.
The shoe's performance and support are consistent even with everyday use, several runners noted.
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of users questioned the build quality of the Reebok Zig Pulse 3.
The outsole has quickly worn apart after only a couple of uses, according to some wearers.
A few wearers compared the shoe’s durability to that of the overall strength of the Adidas Pure Boost when it comes to its materials and components.
Bottom line
The Reebok Zig Pulse 3 is a road running shoe designed for neutral runners.  The shoe was mostly developed for active walking and low-mileage runs.  The Zig Pulse 3 has an innovative ZigTech outsole that enhances cushioning for a better comfortable ride.  It also has a two-tone mesh upper that is responsible for making the shoes well ventilated and breathable. Most runners like these features of Reebok Zig Pulse 3 but then again, some few purchasers were put off by the shoe’s durability.  Despite the naysayers, the Reebok Zig Pulse 3 still holds its own when it comes to its positive reviews, and most users still choose it because of the comfort it provides whether used at the gym or out on the track."
Hoka One One Elevon 2,,84.0,83.0,9.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The majority of the testers noted that the Hoka One One Elevon 2 has excellent cushioning.
Its lightweight structure is loved by many consumers.
According to those who have tried it, the running shoe is supportive.
Based on reviews, the running footwear is stable.
Most of the buyers commented that the Elevon 2's laces tend to hold tight when tied.
Its attractive color options are appreciated by several testers.
The shoe is suitable for both walking and running activities.
2 reasons not to buy
A user commented that the Hoka Elevon 2's heel construction makes it difficult to run.
Some reviewers said that the running shoe feels hard on foot.
Bottom line
According to the majority of the reviews, the Hoka One One Elevon 2 successfully made a lot of users happy and satisfied. Because of its excellent construction, wearers can experience a more efficient and enjoyable ride. Overall, the functionality of the running shoe became a relevant part of the runner's improved performances. With the support, fit, cushioning, and stability it provides, fans and enthusiasts claim that the Elevon 2 is a successful release from Hoka One One running shoes. "
Skechers GOmeb Razor 2,,93.0,93.0,47.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.1oz , Women: 4.7oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Several people appreciated the lightweight nature of the Skechers GOmeb Razor 2.
The cushioning was lauded for being supportive, even during extended running sessions.
Most of those who have tried it felt that it was true-to-size.
A runner noticed that the foam had a mild stiffness that enabled faster-propelling motion, as well as a bounciness that guaranteed responsible shock attenuation.
This running shoe looked visually endearing, most purchasers affirmed.
2 reasons not to buy
The thin tongue unit apparently caused some discomfort on the instep of some reviewers.
A few runners reported that the midfoot part of the upper felt stiff.
Bottom line
Many people loved the performance given by the Skechers GOmeb Razor 2. They were happy with its lightweight nature, its reliable cushioning system and its correct sizing scheme. The design also captured their attention. But several runners felt that this neutral shoe had a flimsy tongue and a stiff fabric upper."
Salomon S-Lab Sonic 2,,93.0,91.0,12.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.6oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
The shoe was very reliable in long-distance runs, according to an impressed user.
The Salomon S-Lab Sonic 2 offered consistent comfort both during and after races, an athlete commented.
The open mesh upper successfully kept the foot cool, said a runner.
A customer appreciated the midsole that was well-cushioned and responsive.
A reviewer liked how the shoe moved with the foot and made their gait effortless.
Many buyers thought the S-Lab Sonic 2 was a lightweight shoe.
The shoe’s contoured fit resulted in a balance of cushion, support, control, and spring, a runner stated.
There was excellent ankle support, mentioned a user.
The outsole delivered plenty of traction and durability, as written by a reviewer.
3 reasons not to buy
One wearer found the shoe to be narrow.
Some buyers thought the shoe was expensive.
The shoe did not provide a secure fit, considering it was made for racing, a reviewer pointed out.
Bottom line
The Salomon S-Lab Sonic 2 was able to amaze many of its users, as evident in their positive comments. The shoe’s various features, cushioning, and performance were all praised. There were some who encountered fit issues, but, overall, this neutral running shoe is a clear winner among consumers."
Inov-8 Roclite 290,,93.0,90.0,156.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
A number of runners noted that they really felt comfortable while wearing this trail running shoe.
Runners were generally satisfied with the performance given by this shoe; they stated that it allowed them to be more confident and secure while traversing the off-road paths.
A reviewer felt that its lightweight nature was adequate and agreeable for his adventures in the great outdoors.
The upper was able to hug the foot in a snug and secure manner, according to a tester.
The outsole’s grip capability was reliable, a runner noted.
The general durability of this shoe received some praise from those who have tried it.
A purchaser commented that the toe cap was able to prevent forefoot stubbing.
Inov-8’s strategic placement of the lugs keeps mud from clinging to the outsole.
It scored points in the opinions of a handful of runners for its flexibility.
3 reasons not to buy
A handful of reviewers wanted a gusseted tongue to keep trail debris out.
It felt too narrow for a few runners.
The ventilation is compromised because of the dense and tightly-woven upper, according to a few reviewers.
Bottom line
Many runners were able to enjoy the performance of the Inov-8 Roclite 290. They commented that it was efficient and capable when it came to their adventures in the great outdoors. They liked the looks of this neutral shoe, as well as its comfortable mid-sole and its moderately aggressive outsole. There were those who had some concerns with it, but the nitpicks didn’t lessen the overall happy experience of consumers."
Nike Air Zoom Structure 19,,88.0,84.0,527.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,, Nike Air Zoom Structure 22,"8 reasons to buy
Many runners used the word ‘comfortable’ to describe their experiences while wearing the 19th version of the Nike Air Zoom Structure.
Many runners used the word ‘comfortable’ to describe their experiences while wearing the 19th version of the Nike Air Zoom Structure.
A consumer with a stress fracture in the Achilles region was able to run without discomfort or pain while wearing this shoe.
The mid-sole unit was responsive, and users noted that it delivered smooth transitions through the gait cycle.
The overall durability was commended by a lot of runners; they were able to use it frequently and the materials didn’t break down on them.
The traction capability of the outsole was lauded by those who have tried it.
The traction capability of the outsole was lauded by those who have tried it.
It came in a variety of widths, which satisfied consumers who had wide or narrow foot-dimensions.
3 reasons not to buy
The medial support unit of this shoe caused some pressure on the lateral side of a runner’s foot, resulting in some discomfort.
It felt heavy, according to some displeased testers.
A runner noted that the wider version only felt more accommodating in the forefoot area; the mid-foot and rear sections still felt tight for them.
Bottom line
The 19th version of the Nike Air Zoom Structure was able to deliver quality service to a lot of runners who have over-pronated foot motion. They felt the mid-foot support unit as it prevented their feet from rolling inwards during each step. The general presentation, construction and efficacy of this model received high praise, as well. A few users weren’t very impressed with it; nonetheless, this road shoe had become quite popular for many."
Adidas Purebounce+ Street,,87.0,,160.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.7oz , Women: 10.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
People have considered the underfoot platform of the Adidas Purebounce+ Street to be comfortable.
Casual shoe enthusiasts liked the versatility of this Adidas running shoe, stating that it functioned well as footwear for urban walks.
The width profiles of both the men and women’s iterations were lauded for following the expectations of users.
The price of a pair of the Purebounce+ Street was deemed affordable by most consumers.
According to a handful of runners, the midsole unit was bouncy enough to energize each step.
The slightly raised sidewalls of the midsole helped to steady the foot in the interior compartment, some testers commented.
Based on several reviews, the upper unit had a lightweight and breathable nature that contributed to the overall comfort.
1 reasons not to buy
A few purchasers felt that the fit was a bit narrow.
Bottom line
The majority of people who have tested the Adidas Purebounce+ Street claimed that it was an accommodating product. The cushioning system was highlighted for its comfortable structure and supportive sidewalls. The upper unit was also praised for being secure and breathable, as was the apparently affordable price. On the other hand, the feedback for the width profiles was mixed because some people considered it to be narrow while others did not.
The Purebounce+ Street is a neutral running shoe that’s designed for flat surfaces like the asphalt."
Hoka One One Clifton 2,,90.0,86.0,994.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.7oz , Women: 6.6oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,, Hoka One One Clifton 6,"7 reasons to buy
Most runners liked the lightweight no-sew construction of the Clifton 2, which enabled a next-to-foot wearing experience
The Structural Overlays supports the mid-foot area without compromising the look and the weight of the shoe itself.
The Clifton 2 has a new padded tongue for added comfort.
The HIP CMEVA midsole protects the foot from impact while adding stability.
The Early Stage Meta-Rocker design allows better transitioning from the heel to the toe area.
This running shoe comes in many color schemes, which makes it visually endearing to many athletes.
It feels light and fast, as noted in some reviews.
4 reasons not to buy
Some runners noticed that the 2nd version of the Clifton was a bit stiffer and not as comfortable as the original version.
Its forefoot area was narrow to some runners.
The Clifton 2 wears out quickly after a few months of use.
A few didn’t like the bulky look of the sole unit.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Clifton 2 is a road running shoe that offers plenty of cushioning. It received mixed reviews from the users but the positive ones weigh more than the negative. It is very lightweight, durable and more comfortable than the original version. This shoe is a great partner for your daily training."
New Balance Fresh Foam Zante v4,,91.0,87.0,677.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.6oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
According to several runners, the shoe was lightweight.
A few testers lauded its perfect fit.
A lot of purchasers said that the shoe was comfortable.
Many buyers commented that the New Balance Fresh Foam Zante v4 was supportive.
A good number of testers said that the width was just right for them.
The majority of the buyers agreed that the shoe was best for long and short distance walking and running sessions.
3 reasons not to buy
Based on observations, the insert slides down when running on wet surfaces. As a result, runners need to stop and fix the insert before continuing with their activities.
Some runners said that the plastic shell located at the side of the platform was so stiff. As a result, they felt a little pain while running.
The shoe was not durable, according to one of the purchasers.
Bottom line
The New Balance Fresh Foam Zante v4 has made many runners contented and happy because of its impressive fit and width. Aside from its lightweight structure, the shoe also provides the right amount of support and comfort. While others have problems on the sliding insert and durability, others still lauded the shoe because of its excellent performance. Overall, the New Balance Fresh Foam Zante v4 is a good option for runners who are seeking a comfortable, supportive and versatile running shoe."
Nike FS Lite Run 4,,92.0,,172.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 3mm , Women: 3mm, Feb 2017,,,"11 reasons to buy
The 4th version of the FS Lite Run is considered by many as very comfortable.
A lot of those who have bought this shoe stated that it had an affordable price.
More than a handful of runners do their gym workouts in this shoe as well.
Its lightweight nature received positive remarks.
Some runners took the shoe for a ride right out of the box and were very satisfied with its performance.
Purchasers generally appreciated its design and color schemes.
More than a few mentioned that it runs true to size.
It is surprisingly durable, based on the reports of some runners.
There are many color options.
The Breathe Tech upper is as breathable as advertised.
Several runners use it as an everyday shoe for work or for just running errands.
2 reasons not to buy
A handful of reviewers had issues with the flat tongue as it caused rubbing or irritation.
The midfoot section of the platform was apparently too high for a user that it caused some discomfort to the underfoot.
Bottom line
Nike scores a home run in the FS Lite Run 4. This cheap shoe for running is based on the principle that back to basics works like a dream if it is done right. While it does not bring extra accessories, it works as a functional, lightweight trainer with moderate arch support and has the kind of looks that will easily generate compliments from people. It is extremely comfortable, breathable, and has an unbelievable price tag."
Skechers GOrun 3, Skechers,92.0,83.0,84.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7oz , Women: 5.2oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Skechers GOrun 7+,"5 reasons to buy
Some testers mentioned that the shoe if very light and fast.
The shoe provides right amount of support and cushioning.
Many runners were amazed by the durability of the shoe.
Considering the performance of the shoe, the price is really reasonable.
Available in different color options.
2 reasons not to buy
The shoe is too narrow for some runners.
Some noticed that the shoe is not comfortable enough for running.
Bottom line
The Skechers GOrun 3 is a road running shoe designed for neutral foot movement. It is made with a great combination of support, comfort and protection. As a fast and light shoe, it is best for daily running and long runs."
Saucony Omni 16,,87.0,88.0,248.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A lot of runners commented that the sole unit provided excellent shock absorption.
Some of the testers mentioned that the Saucony Omni 16 was lightweight and comfortable.
A good number of consumers said that the shoe was true to size.
According to some reviewers, the tongue unit felt great. It was best suited for any workouts and running activities.
A few runners loved the stylish design of the Saucony Omni 16.
Some of the buyers mentioned that the shoe was durable and breathable.
According to those who have tried it, the cushioning system of the shoe was responsive.
3 reasons not to buy
A small number of runners said that the shoe was expensive.
Saucony Omni 16 has limited color schemes, according to a few reviewers.
Based on some reviews, the Omni 16 has poor quality when compared to the previous models.
Bottom line
Many users commented that the Saucony Omni 16 was breathable and comfortable. They appreciated the shoe's responsiveness and shock absorption. With its durability, they agreed that the Omni 16 was ideal for different types of running sessions. Although some users mentioned that it has limited color options, others still recommended this stability road shoe because of its stylish look and versatility."
Brooks Beast '20,,85.0,,7.0,,, Road, Motion control,,,,,,,,"8 reasons to buy
The majority of the users commented that the Brooks Beast '20 is comfortable.
Several testers said that the running shoe has a good amount of cushioning.
It is supportive, noted by many reviewers.
The shoe is lightweight in structure, according to most of the purchasers.
Many buyers observed that this running footwear is stable.
It has a wide toe box, based on some reviews.
The shoe is sturdy, according to those who have tried it.
Many consumers said that the shoe is best for different walking and running activities.
3 reasons not to buy
Most of the reviewers commented that the Brooks Beast '20 is expensive.
One of the testers commented that the rubber sole of the has collapsed after several uses of daily walking around.
Some of the wearers wished there were additional color options.
Bottom line
The Brooks Beast '20 is a well-cushioned, lightweight, and supportive running shoe that is intended for different paved surfaces. With the features, technologies, and materials employed in the shoe, it is definitely successful in aiming to deliver an enjoyable and comfortable running experience to the user. This stability running shoe is best used for different walking and running activities. This version claims to be lighter than ever and continues to be an excellent option for those who are seeking more support, stability, and sturdiness in a running shoe."
Nike Flex Run 2014, Nike,86.0,,1231.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 6.8oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
The inner sleeve and soft cushioning give a very comfortable ride in the 2014 version of the Flex Run.
It is a bang for the buck shoe.
It is very light.
It is very flexible.
The open mesh is very breathable.
Some runners appreciated its ability to be a race day shoe or as a high-mileage trainer.
10 trendy color options.
A good number of runners have used this as an all-day shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
Several mentioned that rubber fell off quickly in the Flex Run 2014.
Quite a number of comments were disappointed that the outsole attracts small stones.
Bottom line
The Nike Flex Run 2014 is a versatile trainer that can handle almost all types of distances at varying speeds. There is sufficient arch support, cushioning, and breathable coverage for runners of all levels to enjoy. The really nice looks and affordable price make it a great shoe."
Nike Free Hyperfeel,,93.0,82.0,420.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.1oz , Women: 5oz, Men: 3mm , Women: 3mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The Flyknit’s elastic threads and synthetic mesh components offer a soft and agreeable wrap as agreed by a large majority of runners.
The Dynamic Flywire offers a custom fit that’s adjustable.
The lightweight and responsive Lunarlon cushioning system is directly exposed to the foot, making it great for a naturally stable underfoot experience, according to some testers.
The narrower toe box is great for those with narrow feet.
The outer area of the sole unit has waffle lugs, which are responsible for providing a better grip on surfaces.
The Hyperfeel has a very light weight.
3 reasons not to buy
Some reviewers didn’t like the loud colors used in the upper.
Others noticed that it had a very narrow toe box.
The Hyperfeel has a very expensive price.
Bottom line
The Free Hyperfeel from Nike is a great shoe for those who want a near-barefoot running experience. It’s lightweight, very responsive, durable, and has minimal arch support. This is a running shoe that minimalists would love to have for their daily training."
Asics GT 2000 7 Trail,,95.0,95.0,77.0,,, Trail, Stability, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 8.7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics GT 2000 8 Trail,"6 reasons to buy
One user wrote positively about the support and cushioning of the Asics GT 2000 7 Trail.
Several runners noticed the durable yet flexible outsole of the shoe.
A reviewer mentioned the shoe provided relief to their plantar fasciitis and neuroma.
The design of the GT 2000 7 Trail was appreciated by many wearers.
A lot of buyers appreciated the shoe’s performance during long distances.
Some commenters reported a well-ventilated feel from the seamless upper construction of the GT 2000 7 Trail.
4 reasons not to buy
Some users are disappointed with the shoe’s limited width options. Others found that the sizing is too small.
A couple of wearers encountered blisters while wearing the Asics GT 2000 7 Trail.
A few testers reported that the collar is too tight around the ankle.
The shoe’s lack of a rock plate is disappointing to some trail runners.
Bottom line
In summary, the Asics GT 2000 7 Trail was able to meet runners’ expectations in terms of performance and stability. Some found the features of the shoe to be highly reliable, while some felt improvements were needed regarding how it fits. Despite the negative comments, the GT 2000 7 remains to be an average shoe that is still worth a try."
Under Armour Fat Tire GTX,,88.0,83.0,221.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 18oz , Women: 18oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
This running shoe utilizes textile and foam to provide snug foot wrap.
Many reviewers greatly appreciated the inclusion of the reliable GORE-TEX waterproof membrane in the upper.
The Boa System is a lacing technology that makes it easy for runners to adjust the fit & closure of the shoe.
Runners received the Charged Cushioning system well because it gives a burst of energy with every step.
The Michelin® Wild Gripper outsole performs like the tire of a racing vehicle; it’s responsible for traction, grip and responsiveness over the surface.
The unique design of the Fat Tire GTX appealed to many testers.
4 reasons not to buy
This running shoe is very heavy.
Because of the presence of some of the high quality components, the Fat Tire GTX has a very high price.
Some runners weren’t too excited when the outsole started squeaking a lot.
Others felt it was a bit narrow for their feet.
Bottom line
An award-winning shoe, the Fat Tire GTX from Under Armour brings performance and comfort to the next level. It is a neutral running gear that many runners can appreciate because of its unique components and its effectivity. Though considered by some as heavy and pricey, the Under Armour Fat Tire GTX is still a successful release."
Nike Air Zoom Odyssey,,95.0,88.0,209.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.2oz , Women: 9.3oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Nike Air Zoom Odyssey 2,"5 reasons to buy
The Air Zoom Odyssey features the Flymesh and Flywire upper for unmatched comfort.
Most runners noted the amazing fit of the shoe, not too loose and not too tight.
The Odyssey has a roomy toe box for wide or large-footed runners.
The Nike Air Zoom Odyssey offers excellent stability and support as mentioned in some reviews.
This shoe is very comfortable even on long distance runs.
2 reasons not to buy
Moderately high-priced shoe.
This shoe is slightly heavy.
Bottom line
The Nike Air Zoom Odyssey is a great running shoe for those runners who are looking for responsive cushioning, comfortable support and stability. It is a stability running shoe that performs well on the road. It is a great partner for your daily running activity."
New Balance Fresh Foam Hierro v3,,91.0,94.0,128.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.6oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, New Balance Fresh Foam Hierro v5,"5 reasons to buy
The Fresh Foam Hierro v3 was a lightweight, yet well-cushioned shoe, a reviewer cited.
Many runners thought the outsole was very grippy, even on rocky and wet surfaces.
Several users liked the heel tab and thought that it was a convenient feature.
Some wearers found the fit to be true to size.
The cleatie construction efficiently provided a secure fit, a reviewer observed.
5 reasons not to buy
The outsole was not wholly adequate on muddy surfaces, said a runner.
Even with various width options, the shoe was still too narrow, according to some wearers.
While comfortable, the upper offered very little air flow, a reviewer mentioned.
The toe bumper was too rigid and bothersome, a tester commented.
A user stated that the shoe was more massive compared to the previous version.
Bottom line
Although already on its third update, the Fresh Foam Hierro has not yet achieved a total success as it still gathered mixed reviews from consumers. An almost equal number of positive and negative comments surround the shoe’s structure, features, and performance. With that said, there is room for improvement for this shoe."
Jordan Air Zoom 85 Runner, Jordan,93.0,98.0,9.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,, Jan 2020,,,"6 reasons to buy
Many users agree that the Jordan Air Zoom 85 Runner is comfortable to wear.
This running shoe is lightweight, according to numerous commenters. 
A few runners appreciate the durability of the shoe. 
It is also suitable for casual walks, based on reviews. 
Consumers are happy that the price for a pair of this shoe is affordable. 
People love the stylish design of this running partner.
2 reasons not to buy
A tester has noted that the Air Zoom 85 Runner is not supportive enough for running. 
One buyer, who prefers plush cushioning, felt pain while running in this shoe.
Bottom line
Featuring an ultralight design, the Jordan Air Zoom 85 Runner is a responsive running shoe that is intended to enhance speed and comfort. It is ideal for neutral runners or those who do not overpronate. This shoe is a good option for runners seeking a combination of style and performance."
Brooks Hyperion,,91.0,83.0,2826.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.4oz , Women: 5.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The upper unit of this running shoe features a stretchable fabric that’s also very breathable.
The sock liner that’s included here isn’t very thick, but it adds more cushioning to the immediate underfoot.
The upper unit is stitched to the full length cushioning insole board called the Cushsole S-257, and they work together in order to provide a flexible and comfortable running experience.
The mid-sole foam has been tuned to follow the needs of the wearer, even conforming to the shape, movement and weight of the foot.
Flex grooves enhance the mid-sole unit’s capability to move naturally with the foot.
Runners appreciated the propulsion pods on the outsole, which propel the foot forward during the toe off phase.
The Brooks Hyperion is very lightweight.
1 reasons not to buy
A few runners thought that this shoe’s platform needed more stability mechanics in order to provide support to those who need it.
Bottom line
The Brooks Hyperion is a versatile running shoe that’s meant to function well on races and on regular running sessions. Its durable construction and flexible design allow it to deliver natural movement and responsive cushioning that lasts. Neutral runners are going to enjoy what this one has to offer."
Puma Cell Descend, Puma,91.0,,60.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Several testers have welcomed the comfortable cushioning system of the Puma Cell Descend.
People like the design of this running shoe, stating that the facade is appealing to the eyes.
The price of this product is hailed as affordable by many of those who have bought it.
The knitted exterior of the upper unit is lauded for being flexible and able to maintain a well-ventilated in-shoe experience.
Some users report that the inner sleeve of the silhouette doesn’t irritate the skin.
The versatility of this model is praised by those who like to have a mix of stylishness and performance-centered construction.
2 reasons not to buy
A few consumers claim that the insole that is supposed to add extra cushioning is thin and has a tendency to slip towards the front of the foot-chamber.
Numerous wearers feel the shoe is too narrow, especially in the forefoot section.
Bottom line
The overall feedback for the Puma Cell Descend has been mostly positive, with several comments emphasizing the comfortable and versatile design. Cushioning from the midsole is deemed accommodating while the upper is considered dutifully breathable and pleasant around the foot. On the other hand, the included insole is criticized for being flimsy and uncomfortable, while the fit has been unacceptable to some.
Fans of road running shoes that are designed for neutral foot pronation are the ones who are going to enjoy the Puma Cell Descend."
New Balance Summit KOM GTX,,72.0,,48.0,,, Trail, Neutral,,,,,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Various users were pleased with the effectiveness of the waterproof feature of the New Balance Summit KOM GTX.
The shoe helped with reducing foot fatigue from constant walking and running, according to a customer.
The shoe was stable and adequately cushioned, a couple of runners claimed.
The shoe was versatile enough to be used for hiking, some users had certified.
Many reviewers commended the lightness of the shoe.
5 reasons not to buy
A lot of users complained that the shoe was narrow in the toe area. One, in particular, wrote that their big toe was cramped against the cap of the shoe.
The Summit KOM GTX felt stiff during running, a couple of buyers attested.
Some wearers reported getting blisters from wearing the New Balance Summit KOM GTX.
The outsole has separated from the rest of the shoe quicker than expected, said a reviewer.
The tongue was too thin, according to some commenters. Another purchaser also wrote that the tongue was slippery and kept on moving.
Bottom line
The New Balance Summit KOM GTX falls on middle ground as it has received mixed reviews from customers. On one hand, the shoe’s sole unit proved efficient as users praised its stability, versatility, and comfort level. Weight and waterproofing were also part of the shoe’s positive factors. On the other hand, one of the major disappointments echoed by purchasers was the fit of the shoe, which included various issues with wearing the shoe. Despite this, many still felt that the New Balance Summit KOM GTX was worth a try."
Skechers GOrun 4,,90.0,84.0,105.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 5.3oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,, Skechers GOrun 7+,"7 reasons to buy
Synthetic mesh offers lightweight and breathable wrap that’s made from environmentally friendly materials.
Most runners appreciated the Quick-Fit Portal heel tab for easier foot insertion, the Vari-lock lacing system for better security, and the stitched overlays for added overall support.
A few took note of the flexibility of the Skechers GOrun 4.
Some runners mentioned that the 4th version has a great fit just like the previous version.
Runners get the Resalite mid-sole compound, which is flexible and has memory retention qualities for better underfoot cushioning.
The M-Strike Technology allows runners to do more midfoot striking, which is much more balanced.
The GOrun 4 has a very small weight.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners felt that it is stiffer than the previous version.
Others thought that it was narrower along the toe area.
Bottom line
The Skechers GOrun 4 is a popular update and it is welcomed by many runners. The improvements done for this shoe make it more robust for neutral runners during their daily running and athletic activities. Though a few had issues with the fit and sizing, overall, the GOrun 4 is still a winning update."
Nike Air Zoom Winflo 4,,94.0,93.0,161.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Nike Air Zoom Winflo 7,"7 reasons to buy
Almost every user mentioned that the shoe was very comfortable.
The runners appreciated the sufficient room available in the forefoot section, which accommodated natural toe-splay.
The purchasers admired the sleek and stylish look of the shoe.
The runners liked the snug fit of the Nike Air Zoom Winflo 4 since their feet did not slide inside the shoe during their runs.
A few customers seemed very pleased with the color schemes.
Some users were very happy with their purchase since the shoe felt like ""foamy soft cloud.""
A purchaser expressed happiness over the affordable price of the shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
A runner felt that the arch was rather narrow.
A user found the shoe a little loose in the heel area but too tight around his toes.
An individual thought that the pair was a little bit heavy since his feet got very tired after only 2 miles of running.
Bottom line
The Nike Air Zoom Winflo 4 offers a nice responsive ride in a very well-cushioned environment for the feet at an unbeatable price. Look-wise, it is sleek and stylish and comes in very ‘decent’ colors. It is a neutral running shoe most suitable for runners looking for high comfortability and great durability in a shoe."
New Balance 880 v6,,88.0,82.0,39.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, New Balance 880 v7,"6 reasons to buy
The mix of synthetic and mesh in the upper unit provides a reliable and breathable coverage for the wearer.
Runners appreciated the minimal stitching in the upper as it helps to extend the longevity of the material.
A lot of testers noted that the 880v6 retained its durability even after months of use.
The different color options make it more appealing to those who want to have a running shoe that has heightened aesthetics.
The fit was just right for a lot of runners who have tried it.
More padding in the collar and tongue helps to secure the foot and lock it down well.
3 reasons not to buy
There were some testers who felt that the 6th version of the 880 was a bit tight when initially worn and that it didn’t undergo the “breaking” period until after a few uses.
Some runners noted that it was a bit stiff for daily training.
Others thought that the toe box was narrow, causing blisters to those who have wider forefeet areas.
Bottom line
The 880 v6 from New Balance takes runners to new horizons with improved components in the forefoot area, a more open fabric in the upper for breathability, and reliable cushioning for well-supported trainings. It’s a solid choice for neutral runners."
New Balance Summit Unknown GTX,,83.0,,9.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,
Saucony Excursion TR 12,,91.0,,712.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Saucony Excursion TR 14,"7 reasons to buy
One user said they were delighted with the perfect fit and comfort brought by the Saucony Excursion TR 12.
The mesh upper was very soft and breathable in favor of the foot, a wearer commented.
The shoe provided an immediate comfort and did not require a break-in period, claimed a couple of runners. Others stated it was twice as comfortable as other running shoe models from Saucony.
Some buyers appreciated the design of the Excursion TR 12.
A number of customers agreed that the shoe was affordable.
The toe box provided plenty of room, according to several users.
The knobby tread design grips well on loose and uneven surfaces, said a runner.
2 reasons not to buy
A runner remarked that the Excursion TR 12 was not as durable as the earlier editions. Another user experienced the shoe falling apart after only less than 30 miles.
The outsole did not have a lot of grip on indoor surfaces, a reviewer wrote.
Bottom line
The Saucony Excursion TR 12 has impressed numerous consumers as evidenced by the positive comments outweighing the negative ones. Many users have mentioned buying a second pair because of how satisfied they were with the shoe’s performance and style, and have claimed that the Saucony Excursion TR 12 was a valuable purchase."
,,,,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.4oz , Women: 9.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,
Brooks Ricochet 2 LE,,85.0,,5.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Some runners have mentioned that the traction given by the outsole unit of the Brooks Ricochet 2 LE is reliable.
A few consumers believe that the one-piece upper helps in keeping the foot in place.
The stitched-on panels of the upper unit added some steadiness, according to a user.
The pull tab at the back of this running shoe is welcomed because it eases the on-and-off process.
Forefoot lifts are enabled because of the convex front part of the platform, some runners have noted.
2 reasons not to buy
According to several purchasers, the stretchy band that serves as the wraparound collar has a tendency to irritate the skin.
The upper unit’s close-weave design leaves the foot sweaty, based on a couple of reviews.
Bottom line
People are mixed about the Brooks Ricochet 2 LE. This neutral running shoe offers accommodating performances on the roads, but some argue that the platform is a bit lacking in form while the upper is somehow not-so-secure. It is apparent that having a comfortable time with this product is determined by every unique foot-shape.
Fans of Brooks running shoes can have fun with the Ricochet 2 LE."
Adidas Pureboost All Terrain,,92.0,88.0,951.0,,, Trail, Neutral,,,,,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Many users praised the outsole of the shoe: some mentioned that it delivered more grip compared to other Pure Boost iterations, while others said the tread was aggressive and was reliable for running on the wet ground.
Most runners were impressed with the water-repellent feature of the Pure Boost All Terrain.
Several wearers reported a comfortable ride because of the shoe’s lightweight nature.
One reviewer liked the lateral support provided by the shoe.
A buyer observed that directional movement was faster because of the boost™ technology.
4 reasons not to buy
The lack of an insole did not help with maintaining proper pronation, according to a reviewer.
A couple of testers stated that the shoe had a chunky appearance which did not look good on-foot.
The laces were stiff and problematic to tie, one buyer commented.
Some runners did not like how the multi-layered tongue design was uncomfortable and distracting.
Bottom line
The Adidas Pure Boost All Terrain garnered mostly positive feedback from consumers. Most users were satisfied with the comfort and versatility that the trail running shoe brings, yet there were a few who thought that some of the design elements were not efficient and should be improved."
Brooks Beast 16,,88.0,83.0,991.0,,, Road, Motion control,,,,,,, Brooks Beast '20,"10 reasons to buy
A lot of consumers wrote that the Brooks Beast 16 was comfortable.
Many purchasers appreciated the supportive mid-sole unit of this running shoe.
Several runners welcomed the design of this model, stating that it was handsome to look at.
This running shoe was able to provide relief for testers who had plantar fasciitis.
The traction-capability of the outsole was lauded by a lot of runners.
The cushioning system received great remarks from consumers who noted that it was supportive and comfortable.
Some testers were able to use this for a variety of activities—even casually—and they wrote that they didn’t have any issues with it.
The different width profiles of this shoe were able to accommodate those who have different foot-dimensions, and they appreciated such an inclusion.
There were runners who wrote that, through the recommendation of their podiatrists, they were able to get great service from the Brooks Beast 16.
The consumers who suffered from over-pronated foot motion lauded the stability mechanics that are present in this model.
5 reasons not to buy
A runner didn’t like the available color schemes for this model; he thought that they were too bland and not very endearing.
The fabric in the forefoot area tore off after only a few months of use, stated a tester.
A consumer reported that the outsole tread has already started to wear off after only 150 miles.
For some testers, even when opting the correct size and width this running shoe still felt a bit too tight, particularly in the forefoot section.
Many comparisons were made between the Beast 16 and its previous iteration from 2 years ago, the Beast 14; many wrote that the predecessor outshone the new one in terms of comfort, fit and style.
Bottom line
Many runners took a liking to the Brooks Beast 16. They have considered this to be a solid motion control shoe very much like the Beast 18, because it was supportive and it gave them reliable stability. Much praise was also given to the way that it was constructed; the testers noted that it was comfortable and reliable. Inversely, there were purchasers who had concerns with regards to the durability of its upper, as well as its durability."
Adidas Supernova Sequence Boost 8,,92.0,83.0,117.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.9oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Adidas Supernova Sequence Boost 9,"7 reasons to buy
A sizeable number of runners were amazed by the Boost midsole’s performance in the Sequence Boost 8.
Some users really loved the support and cushioning it gives that they have used it for other activities aside from running.
The cushioning, while just moderate, is incredibly plush and comfortable as observed by several testers and runners.
Runners have a plethora of stylistic options provided by the 6 different color combinations.
Exceptional transitions were found in a handful of remarks concerning the Adidas Sequence Boost 8.
A significant number of runners appreciated the shoe’s durability.
The Continental rubber compound delivers sticky traction as noted by many runners.
2 reasons not to buy
The Supernova Sequence Boost 8 needs to be broken in, according to a handful of users.
It is somewhat heavy and a bit expensive.
Bottom line
The Adidas Supernova Sequence Boost 8 is designed for runners with mild overpronation. It delivers superb ride quality while the cushioning is a masterful blend of softness and responsive features. Though the shoe gained a few negative feedback from unhappy users, the majority still consider the shoe as a successful update."
Saucony Virrata 2,,92.0,88.0,314.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.5oz , Women: 6oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The quick-drying mono mesh wicks off moisture while maintaining a well-ventilated environment for the foot noted several runners.
The interior cleatie construction of the Virrata 2 makes the fit sock-like, thus enabling a more comfortable wearing experience, according to some testers.
The added heel support was welcomed by many runners because it helped them secure their feet more responsibly.
Some reviewers appreciated the lightweight nature of this running shoe.
The Ethylene vinyl acetate compound that’s used in the mid-sole is 18mm thick and very capable when it comes to providing great underfoot cushioning.
Better range of motion of the foot is given by a flexible platform.
The 2nd version of the Virrata has an affordable price.
2 reasons not to buy
The toe box of this update is narrow.
There were testers who noted that it wasn’t as resistant to the elements such as water or dirt.
Bottom line
The Saucony Virrata 2 is a reliable road running shoe. It offers service that is dependable to runners who need flexibility, a bit of arch support, and responsive underfoot protection. This shoe is a good option for neutral runners who are looking for affordable and quality running shoes."
Adidas Supernova Sequence Boost 9,,94.0,89.0,360.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.5oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"11 reasons to buy
The plush interior and great cushioning combine to give the Supernova Sequence 9 a very comfortable ride, according to a large number of comments.
It is very durable, based on several comments.
Some runners noted that the shoe is quite stylish.
Breathability is another aspect that was appreciated by many.
It runs light, noted a few.
There is a nice mix of cushioning and stability in the Sequence Boost 9.
A good number of reviews loved the smoothness of the ride.
It is significantly lighter than the earlier model.
The upper is more accommodating in the latest edition of the Adidas Sequence Boost 9.
A moderate number of runners valued the roomy toe box.
The traction provided by the Continental rubber is excellent.
5 reasons not to buy
The price point of the Adidas Supernova 9 is a bit stiff for many.
It needs a little break-in period.
The outsole is not as durable as before, based on the opinions of more than a handful of runners.
Reflective details are not as prominent as before.
A few runners said that the shoe felt a little bulky, especially when doing high mileage runs.
Bottom line
The Supernova Sequence Boost is one of Adidas’ most popular stability and cushioning lines. While runners should not be breaking their PRs with this shoe, the 9th iteration clearly delivers the needed arch support for mild to moderate overpronators and the kind of cushioning that makes long-distance running doable."
New Balance Fresh Foam Kaymin, New Balance,89.0,,339.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Several consumers noted that the New Balance Fresh Foam Kaymin offered a comfortable experience.
Some runners lauded the midsole unit for attenuating impact shock well.
The general durability of the materials was deemed by testers to be reliable.
The aesthetics of this running shoe were appreciated by many of those who have tried it.
A tester welcomed the lightweight nature of the product.
1 reasons not to buy
The cushioning was apparently too hard in the heel area, according to a disgruntled purchaser.
Bottom line
The New Balance Fresh Foam Kaymin was welcomed by many neutral pronators. They loved the comfortable in-shoe experience, the agreeable underfoot platform, and the eye-catching design. For them, it’s a trendy new shoe for the roads. But some people had gripes with the heel part of its midsole and the inconsistent sizing scheme."
New Balance 1400 v4,,89.0,86.0,44.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.3oz , Women: 6.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, New Balance 1400 v6,"7 reasons to buy
Some runners commented that they were able to use the New Balance 1400 v4 for activities other than running, saying that it remained efficient and agreeable for their feet.
The color schemes were visually striking, wrote several consumers; they received compliments while wearing this shoe.
This version felt incredibly lightweight, according to those who have tried it; they were able to dole out speedy performances because of it.
According to many reviewers, the underfoot experience was comfortable and responsive.
A few commenters touted this shoe as a solid option for those who are just getting into running.
The limited use of stitching and the smoothness of the fabrics prevented it from looking bulky, a tester observed.
An expert reviewer wrote that this running shoe was simple and uncomplicated, but those were the things that made it fun to run in.
4 reasons not to buy
Some runners reported that the toe box was a bit tight.
A reviewer reported that this running shoe had gotten less comfortable over time, and that it had caused him to develop plantar fasciitis in his left arch.
A consumer wrote that the underfoot platform felt stiff, which removed the feeling of going naturally through the stride.
The sides of the upper unit tended to rub against the skin uncomfortably, a tester noted.
Bottom line
The New Balance 1400 v4 was able to perform within the expectations of a majority of those who have tested it. It was certainly lightweight and they pointed it out as a positive feature. Most of the comments & reviews didn’t really cause an explosion of praise for this model, but they were an indication that most neutral runners did welcome this entry-level road running shoe."
Altra Instinct 4.0,,83.0,82.0,239.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"10 reasons to buy
Generally, runners were very happy with the comfortable ride of the Instinct 4.0.
There is a natural space for the placement of the foot.
The new version is significantly more breathable than the past model, based on several opinions of reviewers.
Some runners loved its long-mileage capacity.
More than a handful were very happy with its ability to be a gym option.
There were those who said that the shoe was light enough for speed runs and for piling on the miles.
The 6th iteration of the Altra Instinct (starts with 1, 1.5, 2, 2.5 etc.) is very smooth and well-cushioned, according to some runners.
The price is bang for the buck, as appreciated by a good number of runners.
Excellent grip on different surfaces is also mentioned by a moderate number of runners.
It looks much better than the past model, as commented by a handful of reviewers.
2 reasons not to buy
The forefoot and toe box is a bit too loose, according to some runners.
A few said that the upper is a bit sloppy.
Bottom line
The Altra Instinct 4.0 is the Intuition’s (women’s only) equivalent for the men’s version. It offers many of Altra’s renowned technologies like the ZeroDrop and the FootShape technologies. With the 6th instalment of the Instinct, runners can get a shoe that has ample protection for many miles on the road, intense workouts in the gym, and easy recovery sessions. It is a versatile workhorse that can take on different tasks, especially for those who are working around a budget."
Nike Flyknit Air Max 2015,,93.0,80.0,311.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.2oz , Women: 10.3oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The Flyknit Air Max 2015 immediately stands out in a crowd because of its blend of vibrant colors.
The Flyknit upper, according to several testers, make the shoe more breathable than ever.
A responsive ride is in the offing for those who try this shoe based on the remarks of a couple of testers.
Unanimously considered in reviews as a lifestyle shoe because of its design and cool look.
Oversized and plush cushioning appears frequently in most comments.
Tons of comfort is provided by this shoe as experienced by a large majority of runners.
3 reasons not to buy
It has a very heavy weight.
The Flyknit Air Max 2015 is also very expensive.
More than a few runners were quite concerned about the ultra-high heel offset for the men’s version.
Bottom line
The combination of the Flyknit upper and the tried and tested Air Max cushioning system serves as excellent features for the Flyknit Air Max 2015 from Nike. Still, despite the use of the lightweight Flyknit upper, it remains to be very heavy. Runners who love sufficient arch support, oversized cushioning, and an insanely comfortable ride should get a pair right away."
On Cloud Edge Moonlight, On,85.0,95.0,5.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.1oz , Women: 6.5oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Several testers find the On Cloud Edge Moonlight very comfortable. 
According to a number of racers, the shoe is very breathable. 
It permits versatile use, commended quite a few users. 
Various buyers hail the lightweight composition of the running shoe. 
Customers appreciate the reflective properties of the neutral running shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
Some reviewers state that the On shoe is not very durable. 
A number of critics have remarked that the running platform is quite expensive.
Bottom line
A special edition shoe, the On Cloud Edge Moonlight is a model patterned after the Cloud Interstellar. The design principle behind the running shoe is centered on generating maximum comfort with a touch of style. Because of the reflective materials implemented on the upper, the road running platform is ideal for running during the day or night."
Hoka One One Vanquish 2,,91.0,84.0,371.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,, Hoka One One Vanquish 3,"5 reasons to buy
Many testers appreciate the durable construction of the Hoka One One Vanquish 2.
It provides more cushioning as compared to the original version.
It is available in different color options.
Many runners found the upper built breathable and comfortable.
A few attested that the shoe runs true to size.
2 reasons not to buy
Ultra expensive.
Based on some reviews, the shoe feels too tight and narrow.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Vanquish 2 is a road running shoe that provides maximum cushioning for impact protection and resilient ride. The shoe gained positive and negative comments but the negative ones are not enough to overshadow the positive comments. It is ideal for daily running, walking and for long distance runs."
Brooks Transcend 3,,91.0,83.0,248.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Brooks Transcend 7,"7 reasons to buy
The Element Mesh ensures breathable support and moisture management.
Synthetic and Microfiber overlays secures the foot in a snug and efficient manner.
The Element Lining and Super DNA Sock Liner ensure a comfortable inner environment feel.
The Transcend 3 has mechanisms and features that mold themselves to the natural shape of the foot, thus making the wearer feel more in tune with the fit and the overall cushioning.
A smoother and controlled transition from the heel to the toe is handled by segmented components that work together.
The outsole is durable and it offers a reliable amount of traction over the ground.
The 3rd version of the Transcend is a great shoe for those who need additional support for the pronation of their feet.
4 reasons not to buy
The Transcend 3 has an expensive price.
There were runners who felt that it was a bit bulky and stiff.
Others noted that it had a narrow toe box.
Some noticed that it had a difficult break in period, which meant that their feet took longer to acclimate into the shoe and vice versa.
Bottom line
The Transcend 3 is a very supportive stability running shoe that many have enjoyed. Some users loved the shoe’s flexibility, comfort and cushioning but there are also a few who disliked the shoe’s narrow toe box and bulky look.  It has some of the most robust set of technologies and components for those who need underfoot cradling during daily athletic activities."
Under Armour SpeedForm Gemini 3,,87.0,85.0,274.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
There were runners who thought that the Under Armour SpeedForm Gemini 3 was pleasantly lightweight for their feet.
A tester reported that the upper unit was able to mold naturally to the shape of the foot, resulting in a glove-like coverage.
The fabrics easily allowed air to enter the shoe and keep the foot cool and dry, stated a number of consumers.
The contemporary design and aesthetics of this shoe received positive remarks.
A runner regaled that he didn’t need to break in the shoe; it felt comfortable and responsive from the first use.
Many shoe enthusiasts lauded the cushioning system of the Gemini 3, stating that it felt efficient and capable.
A majority of those who have tried this shoe were happy with its general performance on the roads.
This shoe was efficient as a running shoe and as a casual option, a number of purchasers wrote.
4 reasons not to buy
The back of the upper unit felt rough and it tended to rub uncomfortably against the skin, some testers observed.
The front portion of the shoe felt a bit tight, according to several consumers.
Some runners complained that the underfoot platform seemed a bit stiffer than the previous iterations.
A few people weren’t enthusiastic about the looks of the Gemini 3; they stated that the previous versions looked more pleasing.
Bottom line
Many runners were able to appreciate what the Under Armour SpeedForm Gemini 3 had to offer. To them, this neutral road running shoe was efficient and agreeable for their feet. They felt that the components just worked in a cohesive way. But there were those who had some gripes about it, noting some missteps and missed opportunities that would’ve elevated it from the shadow of the Gemini 2 and the original Gemini."
Asics FuzeX Knit,,75.0,,40.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.6oz , Women: 6.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Several under-pronators felt that the cushioning that’s offered by the midsole of the Asics FuzeX Knit was suitable supportive.
The lightweight nature of this running shoe’s components was noticed and welcomed by testers.
Some consumers liked the color schemes; they felt that the colors popped.
A few people were happy with the spacious foot-chamber as it accommodated custom orthotics.
The outsole unit’s traction capacity was deemed as dependable.
2 reasons not to buy
According to a disgruntled purchaser, the lining of this shoe’s interior rubbed uncomfortably against the skin, causing irritation.
A tester complained that the fit was a bit narrow.
Bottom line
People who have tried the Asics FuzeX Knit were mostly happy with what it had to offer. There was positive feedback regarding the cushioning system, the lightweight design, the roomy interior space, and the traction-ready outsole. But there were negative reviews, as well. There were gripes about the irritating interior lining and inconsistent shoe-dimensions."
Puma Speed 600 2,,85.0,76.0,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The cushioning system of the Puma Speed 600 2 is well-liked because it is responsive.
Impact mitigation is a trait that people have come to appreciate from this neutral running shoe.
The breathability of the upper unit is lauded by those who have tested this product.
Some users believe that the traction given by the outsole unit is reliable, particularly when improving foot-to-surface control.
Heel security is appreciated because of the collar padding and the external heel counter.
2 reasons not to buy
Several consumers have claimed that this shoe is a bit heavy.
A few testers believe that the forefoot section has a tendency to restrict natural toe-splay.
Bottom line
The Puma Speed 600 2 aims to become a racing companion for those who desire a speedy option for their extended rungs. The design of this road running shoe is similar to many similar products, with a sporty silhouette mixing with a smooth structure that graces many modern-day shoe designs. Step-energizing technologies allow neutral pronators to enjoy an enabled performance."
Asics Gel Venture 4,,89.0,84.0,3189.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 8.7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Venture 7,"6 reasons to buy
The breathable mesh used in the upper unit of the Asics Gel Venture 4 makes the cover system comfortable.
Synthetic overlays adjust with the lacing system to deliver a snug and secure fit.
Appealing color schemes make this shoe visually striking.
The cushioning system was adequate for many users.
The trail-specific design of the outsole makes it formidable against a variety of terrain.
It has an affordable price.
2 reasons not to buy
The insole was hard and sharp for some runners, and it caused irritation to the underside of their feet.
A few runners noted that the loops of the lacing system tore off after a few uses.
Bottom line
The trails are going to be easy to traverse with the Asics Gel Venture 4. The fourth version of this series brings comfort and sure performance on the unpredictable terrain. Its approachable price makes it appealing to casual trail runners and shoe enthusiasts."
New Balance Minimus Trail v3,,94.0,90.0,558.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 7.2oz , Women: 5.8oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, New Balance Minimus Trail 10,"7 reasons to buy
Many runners value the versatile nature of the Minimus Trail v3 as it runs very well on both the trails and the roads.
New Balance offers 5 different color options for the Minimus Trail v3.
Most runners were impressed by the shoe’s incredible grip on different surfaces.
Outsole durability is another strong point in this shoe, according to a good number of runners.
It is a quick-drying shoe based on the results done by a couple of testers.
It is very flexible, as noted in some reviews.
A significant number of runners mentioned that the shoe feels light and fast.
3 reasons not to buy
The outsole rubber material tore away for some users when they used it on more difficult trails.
Some noted blisters when they tried to wear this without socks.
Others felt that it was narrow in the forefoot area.
Bottom line
A lightweight and great looking shoe with just enough stability is the best way to describe the Minimus Trail v3 from New Balance. This shoe was built for speed, but with enough arch support and protection when the run calls for more mileage."
Mizuno Wave Ultima 11,,94.0,,67.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 9.3oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Several people consider the overall performance of this running shoe as satisfying.
The price of a pair of the Wave Ultima 11 is deemed affordable by several testers.
The cushioning system of this product is welcomed by those who desire a responsive underfoot experience.
‘Comfortable’ is a word that many have used to describe their time wearing this model.
Some reviewers claim that the breathability of the upper unit is noticeable, particularly during those extended runs.
The flexibility of the Wave Ultima 11 is welcomed by many consumers.
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of people have reported a tight forefoot construction which prevented the natural splaying of the toes.
According to some testers, the Mizuno Wave Ultima 11 needed a break-in period of a few uses before becoming fully comfortable.
Bottom line
The Wave Ultima 11 is considered by its testers as a worthy update to the long-running dynasty neutral running shoes from Mizuno. The highlighted accouterments include the reactive and comfortable cushioning, the breathable upper, the flexible construction, and the wallet-friendly price. On the other hand, the not-so-spacious forefoot and the need for a break-in period have become the points of disdain from testers.
Fans of road running shoes that are stylish yet ready to dole out solid performance are the target market of the Mizuno Wave Ultima 11."
Adidas Cosmic 2.0 SL, Adidas,90.0,79.0,1041.0,$70,$38 (save 62%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
Almost all testers commented on how comfortable the shoe was. Most used it for daily activities that required standing for a long time. They reported that their feet did not hurt at all.
Plenty of runners said that the construction felt substantial.
The overall design was described as stylish and clean by a lot of users.
Many runners commended the breathability of the upper.
A lot of users were pleased that the weight felt light.
A majority of testers mentioned that they felt supported during their runs.
A great number of consumers were surprised that the price was reasonable.
3 reasons not to buy
One runner got an ankle cut after wearing her pair for the first time. Another user experienced stone bruising, while others had blisters. The Adidas Cosmic 2.0 SL required breaking in based on some reviews.
One user mentioned that the outsole made a squeaking sound on hardwood floors which was bothersome.
Another tester observed that the rubber on the outsole was coming off after four weeks of gym usage.
Bottom line
The Adidas Cosmic 2.0 SL, just like the popular Adidas Ultraboost 19 is a neutral road running shoe which was found to be comfortable, lightweight, and breathable. Plenty of users used it for daily activities, as well as work, without experiencing any pain. Some exceptions were saying that the shoe needed to be broken in. Despite this, many still agreed that the second version of the Cosmic SL was an affordable choice for a versatile trainer fit for daily use."
Arc'teryx Norvan LD,,77.0,90.0,13.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,, Arc'teryx Norvan LD 2,"8 reasons to buy
According to numerous reviewers, the Arc’teryx Norvan LD delivers a smooth and comfortable ride. 
The fit of the shoe is excellent, some users claimed. 
Numerous runners commend the sticky grip delivered by the shoe
The shoe has a highly versatile and aggressive traction, remarked many testers. 
A lot of reviewers state that the shoe is able to withstand various wearing elements; it has reliable protection. 
Various runners appreciate the stable ride delivered by the shoe. 
The lacing system is secure and clean, expressed many wearers. 
The Norvan LD is highly durable; it is a long-wearing shoe, many experts observed. 
3 reasons not to buy
The shoe is slightly heavy for a lightweight running shoe, as commented by some experts. 
Some users have expressed their dismay over the shoe’s stiff underfoot. 
The Arc’teryx Norvan LD is quite expensive, a few people pointed. 
Bottom line
The Norvan LD is the embodiment of a premium trail running shoe, claimed many experts. It features superior cushioning, delivering maximum all-day comfort that a lot of the runners appreciate. The sticky grip of the shoe has been one of the most lauded qualities of the shoe, allowing the shoe to basically tread through any type of terrain. Being put under different terrain tests, the shoe has been able to withstand harsh elements and has received various praise for maintaining durability. "
Hoka One One Napali,,86.0,94.0,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.6oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"11 reasons to buy
A handful of buyers noted that the footwear was comfortable.
Many users commented that the Hoka One One Napali was responsive.
According to some reviewers, the shoe was supportive.
Several runners lauded its perfect fit.
A handful of buyers said that the footwear was flexible.
A lot of reviewers loved its well-constructed upper.
It was breathable, according to some consumers.
The price of the show was affordable.
The well-cushioned shoe was appreciated by many testers.
It was true to size, according to some runners.
The Hoka One One Napali has a wide toe box, based on some reviews.
3 reasons not to buy
One of the testers commented that the side mesh easily torn apart after several uses only.
The Hoka One One Napali easily gets wet even on mild rains, according to a reviewer.
A consumer commented that the outsole was not durable.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Napali made a lot of buyers satisfied and overjoyed because of its well-constructed upper and wide toe box. Aside from the structure, they admired the footwear's breathability, affordable price, perfect fit and sizing. Even though some of the testers have issues with its durability, others still lauded the shoe because of the flexibility, responsiveness and comfort it provides. Overall, the Hoka One One Napali is a good option for those who are seeking a lightweight, comfortable and supportive running shoe at a reasonable price."
Merrell Bare Access Arc 4,,93.0,85.0,509.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 5.7oz , Women: 4.5oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The upper coverage of this running shoe comes from the Synthetic Leather & Air Mesh.
Most reviewers appreciated this 4th version’s overall comfortable design and unbulky nature.
The lightweight disposition of the Bare Access Arc 4 is a positive feature for testers.
It’s a running shoe that’s effective for many activities, such as running, exercising or even walking.
The durability of the individual parts is also very dependable.
The minimal cushioning is able to offer protection, comfort and surface control for the runner.
4 reasons not to buy
There were complaints with regard to the Merrell Bare Access Arc 4 being a bit narrow for the feet.
There is little support for the arch, therefore it’s not the best option for over-pronators.
Some runners noted that the aesthetic of this shoe was too similar to the previous versions.
Some reviewers felt that the upper unit wasn’t able to snugly wrap their feet properly.
Bottom line
The Bare Access Arc 4 from Merrell is a running companion that many athletes and casual individuals can enjoy. It’s a neutral running shoe that’s catered to minimalist enthusiasts. Its durability is superb and the underfoot comfort is adequate, but it doesn’t have arch supports."
Inov-8 Trail Talon 235,,92.0,89.0,119.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.3oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Most of the runners agreed that the Inov-8 Trail Talon 235 is a great running shoe for obstacle course races because of its design and performance. 
Several buyers lauded the superb quality of the shoe; they said it is very durable.
A few users mentioned that the shoe has a visually-appealing design.
According to a few user comments, this trail running shoe offers reliable grip on wet surfaces.
The shoe is relatively lightweight as compared to other premium trail shoes.
One tester highlighted the breathable and comfortable upper of the Trail Talon 235.
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of users mentioned that the shoe takes some time to break in.
Some disappointed runners said that the poor underfoot padding provides limited rock protection.
Bottom line
Users gave the Inov-8 Trail Talon 235 mixed reviews. Some runners admired the shoe's durability, grip, and comfort, but others are unhappy because it lacks underfoot protection. Despite the mixed feedback, in general, the Trail Talon 235 is still a wonderful trail shoe. Runners who are looking for an affordable and relatively lightweight shoe for off-road running should give this shoe a try."
Mizuno Wave Rider 19,,89.0,83.0,1893.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.6oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Mizuno Wave Rider 23,"9 reasons to buy
The word ‘comfortable’ was utilized frequently by runners to illustrate their time wearing the Mizuno Wave Rider 19.
The colorful designs of this model appealed to a lot of its testers.
The upper unit was liked by runners because, for them, it was able to wrap around their feet in a nonirritating way.
The collar of this version wasn’t stiff like the previous model, stated a tester; it felt soft and it didn’t dig into their ankle.
A reviewer wrote that this version was more durable than the previous iterations; for them the fabrics and components didn’t break down easily.
The underfoot cushioning system felt great for numerous reviewers; it carried their feet well and it didn’t cause any discomfort, even after long running sessions.
A tester noted that the mid-sole unit felt more robust and substantial than the previous iteration, effectively giving a more cushioned feeling.
The platform was very responsive for a majority of those who tried it, and they said that they actually felt a boost when lifting off the ground.
The outsole’s traction capability was generally well-received.
3 reasons not to buy
A tester said that there was a literal ‘popping noise’ when the mid-sole unit popped off the ground during the toe-off phase, and it annoyed them.
The mid-sole didn’t sit well for a consumer because it caused them calf pain and toe cramps.
A runner noted that the heel area was a bit loose and that it tended to result in some accidental shoe removals.
Bottom line
The 19th version of the Mizuno Wave Rider was lauded by neutral runners, especially those who thought that it was significantly more superior to its predecessors. The colorful upper design received a lot of praise, as did the smooth fabrics. For them, the cushioning was also reliable. But there were testers who didn’t acclimate well to this road shoe. They felt that some of its components were uncomfortable and inconsistent."
Brooks Adrenaline GTS 16,,89.0,84.0,2823.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Brooks Adrenaline GTS 20,"8 reasons to buy
The segmented design of the crash pad assisted in cushioning the landing impact, many runners noted.
Those who have tried the Brooks Adrenaline GTS 16 generally agreed that it felt lightweight.
‘Comfortable’ was a word that runners listed as a part of this model’s ‘Pros’.
A lot of users stated that the mid-sole unit was able to support the arch and correct over-pronation.
According to a lot of reviewers, this running shoe felt true to its size.
Many testers appreciated the fact that this version came in different widths—narrow, medium, wide and extra wide.
Some runners were able to use it on both the pavement and on light trails; they didn’t feel short-changed in terms of performance and durability.
There were reviewers who wrote that the materials used in this running shoe were reliable and consistent.
3 reasons not to buy
A tester felt that it had too much padding; it caused some discomfort to their feet.
The mid-sole unit felt stiff for one runner.
The toe box was narrow for several runners; the fabrics rubbed uncomfortably against the toes, resulting in blisters.
Bottom line
Runners stated that the 16th version of the Brooks Adrenaline GTS mostly delivered. They felt that this versatile running shoe was durable, that its cushioning systems were comfortable, and that its pronation control feature was effective. Also, the accommodating width choices made it easy for consumers to get a more relaxed fit. Still, some complained that the coverage felt uncomfortable, and that the mid-sole felt unwieldy."
Nike Free 5.0,,89.0,83.0,4057.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.3oz , Women: 6.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
The upper unit was agreeable to the shape of the foot, stated a runner; it was able to stretch in order to accommodate the foot well.
The breathability of the upper fabrics satisfied runners who wanted to keep their feet cool and dry throughout the running session.
Many testers used the word ‘comfortable’ to describe this running shoe’s components and its general performance.
Some users have been able to use it frequently and they wrote that it was long-lasting.
Several consumers noted that the Nike Free 5.0 was suitably lightweight.
The cushioning system was responsive and springy, according to many reviewers.
A lot of runners welcomed the flexible nature of the underfoot platform, which permitted them to move more naturally through the gait cycle.
Wearing this running shoe staved off any instances of foot or muscle pain, reported a number of consumers.
2 reasons not to buy
Some of the testers felt that the mid-sole of this shoe wore off quickly.
The shoelaces were too long for a tester; they ended up slipping them in the collar, which added a bit of discomfort.
Bottom line
The Nike Free 5.0 performed well for a lot of runners. Most of them welcomed the flexible mid-sole unit, while others adored the comfortable fabrics of the upper. Some of them were able to use it frequently, and they were happy that it looked visually endearing. Though a few had some qualms about some of its components, a lot of neutral runners still appreciated this road shoe."
Adidas Alphabounce RC,,91.0,,1337.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Adidas Alphabounce RC 2.0,"9 reasons to buy
A good number of wearers appreciated the affordable price of the Adidas Alphabounce RC.
A few testers lauded its breathability and flexibility.
Many buyers commented that the shoe was well-padded.
A lot of reviewers admired its stylish design.
According to those who have tried it, the Adidas Alphabounce RC has an excellent fit.
The majority of the consumers noted that the shoe provided enough traction on a wide variety of paved surfaces.
The shoe was lightweight, based on some reviews.
The Adidas Alphabounce RC was supportive, according to many testers.
A handful of purchasers agreed that the shoe was comfortable.
2 reasons not to buy
Some of the users said that the shoe was narrow.
Based on observations, the shoe was not suitable for high volume training activities because its construction was not meant for rigorous and uneven terrains.
Bottom line
A good number of purchasers commented that the Adidas Alphabounce RC was a well-padded running shoe. They were contented with the shoe's stylish design and color variations. They loved the perfect fit and quality. Although several of them said that it was not best for high-level training activities, others still recommended the shoe because of its breathability and flexibility. Some were also disappointed with its smaller shoe measurements. Overall, the majority of the wearers said that the Adidas Alphabounce RC was a good option for those who want a supportive and comfortable yet lightweight and affordable running shoe."
Arc'teryx Norvan SL,,80.0,86.0,8.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 6.5oz , Women: 5.6oz, Men: 7mm , Women: 7mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The lightweight structure of the Arc'teryx Norvan SL is lauded by those who have tested it.
Some purchasers are happy because the upper unit of this running shoe is breathable enough to maintain a cool in-shoe hug.
The rubber compound of the outsole unit is welcomed because it is suitably grippy and confident in its purpose.
Several runners have shown their appreciation for the midsole’s cushioning capacity, saying that it’s suitable and not too cumbersome.
The seamless construction of the facade is accommodated by runners who don’t like bulky-looking footwear.
The various colorways that are available are said to be eye-catching.
2 reasons not to buy
A handful of consumers have claimed that the outsole unit has a tendency to wear off quickly.
The snap-ring loop that’s situated at the back of the collar irritates the skin, according to some testers.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of people towards the Arc'teryx Norvan SL has been mostly positive. This trail running shoe is apparently a solid choice for daily runs and adventures on the trails. The uncluttered upper construction, the outsole traction, and the lightweight materials are the highlighted elements. On the other hand, the quick-to-wear-off rubber of the outsole and the irritating loop on the rear are the negative points.
Fans of neutral running shoes that are meant for the off-road paths are the target market of the Arc'teryx Norvan SL."
Saucony Zealot ISO,,92.0,85.0,403.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.5oz , Women: 7.2oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Saucony Zealot ISO 3,"6 reasons to buy
The ISOFIT comfortable sleeve provides stretchable, breathable and comfortable coverage.
Many runners appreciated the diverse color options for the Zealot ISO as it broadens the appeal.
The moderately light weight of this shoe was welcomed by reviewers.
The PWRGRID+ underfoot platform offers 20% more cushioning that’s durable and responsive.
A support frame holds the heel in place while giving it structure, noted a handful of runners.
Durable rubber is found on the outsole and it gives effective traction for the wearer.
3 reasons not to buy
For some of the testers, the upper got easily torn after a few uses.
Some criticized the rear section of the upper because it was too tight for them.
The Zealot ISO has an expensive price tag.
Bottom line
The Saucony Zealot ISO is a popular running shoe that many runners have come to enjoy. It looks great and it functions well, making it a superb choice for daily exercises and training. Given all the positive praises, the shoe is indeed considered by wearers as a dependable running shoe."
Adidas Kanadia Trail,,86.0,82.0,441.0,,, Trail, Neutral,,,,,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Several consumers are happy with the sizing scheme of the Adidas Kanadia Trail; they say that it’s right to size.
The price of a pair is considered by many to be affordable and competent enough to accompany the quality of the materials.
The traction capacity of the outsole is praised for being highly adherent to the unpredictable nature of the off-road.
Runners find the quality of this Adidas trail running shoe to be highly dependable; they have not observed any unsavory structural wear-and-tear.
Some people are happy with the cushioned collar and tongue of this product, stating that these parts of the façade are able to support upper segments of the foot.
A few testers have noted that the outsole’s perimeter lugs are able to steady their position relative to the uneven ground.
2 reasons not to buy
The shoelaces come undone quickly, according to a couple of wearers.
The upper area has poor stitching, which looks like it would come apart easily, said a reviewer.
Bottom line
Those who have tested the Adidas Kanadia Trail are happy with what this shoe has to offer. The positive feedback highlights the reliable traction capability of the outsole, the durability of the materials, and the secure construction of the upper unit. On the other hand, the sizing scheme has earned split reviews because while some people found the options to be adherent to expectations, others stated that it was half-a-size bigger than the usual.
Fans of neutral running shoes and trail apparel are the ones who are likely to acclimatize with the Adidas Kanadia Trail."
Saucony Guide ISO 2 TR,,81.0,70.0,39.0,,, Trail, Stability, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The Saucony Guide ISO 2 TR is a comfortable trail running shoe, said some users.
According to most wearers, the shoe offers a high level of support and stability.
A couple of users mentioned that it helps them solve their knee pain problems.
This Saucony shoe has a wide toe box, mentioned in some user reviews.
Several users agreed that it offers an impressive grip on the road and varied trail surfaces.
One buyer mentioned that the tongue prevents trail debris and small stones from entering the shoe.
1 reasons not to buy
A couple of users said that the cushioning is too firm for their liking.
Bottom line
The Saucony Guide ISO 2 TR is a lightweight stability shoe designed for the trail. It gained positive reviews from casual and professional runners because of its stability, grip, and fit. Though a few felt the cushioning to be too firm, in general, the shoe is a worthy investment.
The Guide ISO 2 TR is a good option for those who are looking for a lightweight and comfortable trail running shoe."
Altra Paradigm 4.0,,89.0,87.0,264.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.2oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,, Altra Paradigm 4.5,"8 reasons to buy
The Altra Paradigm 4.0 immediately relieved underfoot soreness because of its terrific cushioning, an impressed reviewer wrote.
Several users were pleased with the luxurious feel offered by the Paradigm 4.0.
Some runners claimed the fourth iteration as much improved from its predecessor, regarding stability, as well as responsiveness.
A great shoe for people with bunions, a commenter stated.
The EGO™ midsole felt solid yet wonderfully bouncy, according to a wearer.
The Paradigm 4.0 was more flexible compared to previous versions, a couple of users reported.
The heel fit was much more accurate than other running shoes from Altra, said a reviewer.
A number of buyers found the toe box to be spacious.
3 reasons not to buy
One wearer observed that there was excessive cushioning, which caused a slight limpness.
The sides and rear of the shoe have zero breathability, a customer noticed.
Some buyers thought the shoe looked clunky.
Bottom line
The Altra Paradigm 4.0 has fruitfully satisfied its users by being an exceptional running shoe that has delivered all that it claimed to do. With many of its consumers noting functional improvements and reliable performance with the Paradigm 4.0, it could be said that the shoe is a worthy upgrade."
New Balance FuelCore Nitrel Trail, New Balance,89.0,,513.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 7.5oz,,,," Normal, X-Wide | Normal, Wide", New Balance FuelCore Nitrel v2,"11 reasons to buy
A good number of buyers noticed that it was supportive.
According to several runners, the shoe has an affordable price.
A few testers lauded its stretchable upper fabric.
A lot of reviewers said that the shoe was comfortable.
Many purchasers commented that the New Balance FuelCore Nitrel Trail was lightweight.
Various consumers said that the toe box was protective.
A good number of testers said that it is true to size.
Aside from running, it is also best for hiking and walking.
A handful of wearers admired the New Balance FuelCore Nitrel Trail because it fitted perfectly on them.
Several runners loved its attractive color variations.
Many testers said that the shoe provided excellent grip on a wide variety of surfaces.
3 reasons not to buy
Based on some reviews, the toe box was narrow.
Several runners said that the shoe was not durable.
The insole did not provide enough cushioning, according to one of the purchasers.
Bottom line
The New Balance FuelCore Nitrel Trail has made a lot of runners satisfied because of its fit and structure. Aside from its design, the shoe also provides the right amount of grip, support, and comfort. While others have issues with durability and narrow toe box, others still recommended the shoe because of its versatility. In general, the New Balance FuelCore Nitrel Trail is an affordable shoe for runners who are seeking a protective, comfortable, supportive yet affordable footwear."
Nike Free RN,,88.0,82.0,3043.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.3oz , Women: 7.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Nike Free RN 5.0,"7 reasons to buy
The engineered mesh upper brings flexible, supportive, and breathable coverage.
Durable Flywire cables deliver and adaptive fit that’s tuned to the preference of the wearer.
The minimal sock liner provides contoured support to the underfoot, making the running experience more comfortable.
Responsive cushioning and impact distribution is afforded by the lightweight foam unit in the mid-sole.
The outsole is able to expand naturally in different directions, making sure that the runner is able to move more freely.
The many color schemes allow runners to have more choices when it comes to the Nike Free RN’s visual style.
This running shoe doesn’t have a heavy weight.
2 reasons not to buy
There were a few runners who noted that the upper unit wore out on them after a few months of use.
Some user comments revealed that the minimalist design of this shoe didn’t allow it to last longer.
Bottom line
The Nike Free RN gained generally positive feedback from users. The shoe offers natural flexibility, breathable coverage, lightweight design, and responsive cushioning to the wearer. Made from high-quality components, this neutral shoe is sure to be as comfortable as possible when used for running and for other activities."
Under Armour SpeedForm Fortis,,91.0,82.0,104.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.4oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Under Armour SpeedForm Fortis 2.1,"6 reasons to buy
The upper unit offers a durable, stretchable, lightweight and breathable coverage to the foot.
Many testers appreciated the next-to-skin support of the upper to enhance the comfort of the wearer.
The 4D Foam is a reactive layer in the sock liner that conforms to the natural shape of the foot, making the fit more precise to the user.
The Charged Cushioning mid-sole sponges the impact energy from landing on the ground, then converts it to an energy that the runner can use.
Durable rubber can be found in crucial parts of the SpeedForm Fortis, which protects it from wear and abrasion.
This is a very lightweight running shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners felt that the heel area isn’t quite supported because they experienced a bit of discomfort.
Others experienced their foot slide forward easily while wearing it.
A few had cases of blistering around the ankle area.
Bottom line
The SpeedForm Fortis from Under Armour provided many runners with a robust running experienced, albeit through a lightweight, durable and responsive design. It gained both negative and positive feedback from users. In summary, the SpeedForm Fortis is a great option for daily running experiences of those with a neutral gait."
Asics Gel Noosa Tri 9,,91.0,82.0,4132.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Noosa Tri 12,"7 reasons to buy
The open mesh used in the upper provides comfort and breathable coverage.
A seamless construction reduces irritation caused by seams and stitches.
The color schemes of the Asics Gel Noosa Tri 9 are appealing to look at.
Glow-in-the-dark details make it more visible during nighttime runs.
The Solyte® mid-sole gives responsive cushioning and support to the runner.
The stability given to the mid-foot was appreciated by those who needed it.
Traction on wet surfaces is enhanced because of the Wet Grip® outsole.
2 reasons not to buy
This running shoe has an expensive price tag.
The interior wasn’t comfortable enough for a few runners because it gave caused them blisters.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Noosa Tri 9 brings comfortable cushioning, stability and breathable coverage to enable the runners to enjoy their running sessions. It’s a great-looking stability shoe that’s sure to capture the attention of many because of its striking visual flair. Its functionality is dependable, though."
Nike Renew Rival Shield, Nike,91.0,75.0,72.0,,, Road, Neutral,,, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Those who have tried the Nike Renew Rival Shield felt that it had a suitably lightweight build.
Consumers noted that this running shoe had an affordable starting price.
People were generally happy with the aesthetics of this neutral shoe, stating that the colors were pleasing to the eyes.
The sizing scheme apparently followed the usual expectations of purchasers.
The inner sleeve was smooth enough that it prevented hot spots and blisters, according to some runners.
1 reasons not to buy
Pebbles tended to get stuck in the tread of the outsole, most people observed.
Bottom line
People liked the Nike Renew Rival Shield and what it had to offer. This neutral shoe’s looks were lauded because they generated compliments. Also, the lightness of the components, the agreeable price, and the true-to-size measurements gained positive feedback. On the other hand, the outsole of this road-companion was criticized for being a stone-magnet."
Asics Gel DS Trainer 23,,88.0,89.0,251.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 8.4oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel DS Trainer 25,"7 reasons to buy
The upper unit of the Asics Gel DS Trainer 23 wrapped around the foot surely and securely, stated several consumers.
Some runners noted that wearing this shoe for various running sessions and gym training felt agreeable.
Most testers revealed that the in-shoe experience was instantly comfortable, that it didn’t need a break-in period.
The lightweight nature of this product gained some fans who desired functionality and style in an insubstantial package.
According to several users, it worked admirably as both a trainer and as a racer.
The durability was lauded as it resisted wear and tear satisfactorily.
A purchaser reported that the upper’s secure yet uncomplicated fit permitted lateral movements.
1 reasons not to buy
Some people lamented the drought of colorways; they would’ve preferred more options when it came to the visuals of this shoe.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel DS Trainer 23 received mostly positive reviews from consumers. They welcomed the snug and locked upper of this stability running shoe, emphasizing its capacity to accommodate lateral foot-movements. People also lauded its versatile design, functionality, and durability. There were a few complaints about the lack of additional colorways, but that didn’t deviate the shoe’s status as a worthy update to the long-running DS Trainer series of road running shoes."
New Balance 1340 v2,,76.0,,234.0,,, Road, Motion control, Men: 13.5oz , Women: 11.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, New Balance 1340 v3,"6 reasons to buy
Most runners liked the new look of the New Balance 1340.
It has a multi-density polyurethane insert that gives support, flexibility and comfort.
The 1340 features a blown rubber outsole for impressive grip.
The shoe utilizes a rubber compound for durability especially in high wear parts.
It has extended web technology that gives additional midfoot support, additional stability and average pronation control.
Some runners liked the wider toe box of the New Balance 1340 v2.
3 reasons not to buy
An expensive pair of shoe for some runners.
Others found the New Balance 1340 v2 heavy.
Some runners felt that the upper is not as breathable as the previous versions.
Bottom line
The New Balance 1340 v2 is a running shoe designed for overpronators. It has impressive motion-control technologies that help runners survive mile after mile of rigorous training. With this shoe, long-distance runners will be comfortable and in control while running. However, there are also a few aspects of the shoe that needs to be improve. In summary, the New Balance 1340 v2 is an average-performing motion control shoe."
Under Armour Fuse FST, Under Armour,87.0,,226.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.9oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"12 reasons to buy
Most observed that the upper and the underfoot platform was comfortable.
Many people appreciated the minimalist design of the Under Armour Fuse FST.
A majority of users expressed that the price is decent for the quality.
The shoe felt light according to most testers.
Some runners said that the fit was true to size.
Based on several reviews, the upper was stretchable enough to accommodate a wide foot.
One user said that she did not feel any foot pain, even after standing the entire day.
Another user said that the design and construction were fit for the “Athleisure” trend.
The upper was sufficiently breathable, says a few users.
One user appreciated that all the components smoothly moved together with the runner’s foot.
A runner said that he was happy that he found a stylish shoe with a wide width option.
Plenty of users used it for different purposes – for work, exercising, walking, and casual use.
4 reasons not to buy
A few female users found the shoe to be a tad narrow.
One runner observed that there was a lack of padding in the forefoot, thus causing some pressure on the toes.
A tester strongly expressed that it was not supportive and comfortable enough for running.
After two months, a user observed that the toe area had worn out.
Bottom line
The Under Armour Fuse FST is an excellent neutral running shoe that’s ready to be worn for different purposes. Many testers appreciated the versatility of the construction and design. Also, plenty of reviewers were able to use it as an everyday sneaker and as apparel for exercise. There were some who noticed a lack of padding and support, but many still agreed that its adaptability and price makes it a shoe of good value."
Nike Air Zoom Streak LT 3,,87.0,85.0,39.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 5.3oz , Women: 5.3oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Nike Air Zoom Streak LT 4,"5 reasons to buy
Many runners took note of the lightweight construction of the Nike Air Zoom Streak LT 3.
It has breathable mesh and arch band that provide efficient foot lock down.
Some runners felt the updated technology in the forefoot provides enhanced toe spring.
The outsole has blown rubber waffle for added durability and cushioning.
The Streak LT 3 is affordable to most runners.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners did not like the light colors of the Streak LT 3.
Others felt that the traction is not really improved especially when running on wet and soft surfaces.
Bottom line
The updated version of the Nike Air Zoom Streak LT offers enhanced responsiveness, arch support, and has a wider forefoot for improved toe spring. Most runners applauded the durable and comfortable construction of the shoe. It is great for daily running, walking and even on light trail runs."
Salomon S-Lab XA Amphib,,90.0,89.0,48.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 7.6oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Salomon S-Lab XA Amphib 2,"8 reasons to buy
The lugs are heavy-duty without being clunky, according to one user.
Several runners agree that the shoe is very comfortable to wear even without socks.
A couple of buyers said the shoe fits true to size.
It performs greatly on technical trails and even muddy terrain, as stated by a reviewer.
Many buyers were impressed with the lightweight disposition of the S-Lab XA Amphib.
A number of people admired the excellent drainage system by the shoe.
Another user observed that the XA Amphib did well in both wet and dry conditions; it apparently didn’t cause discomfort or hotspots to the foot.
The heel box is snug and fits perfectly without any unnecessary movements, one user noted.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners mentioned the shoe has a tight entryway and is difficult to get the foot on and off
One user was not satisfied with the traction delivered by shoe on rocky terrain.
Bottom line
Efficient in adapting to the running environment, the S-Lab XA Amphib is made to deliver a fast ride and a precise support from wet to dry ground. The lugs do a decent job of providing grip where needed, while the upper is reliable in keeping the foot dry and ventilated."
Nike Zoom All Out Low 2,,83.0,,166.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12oz , Women: 10.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Dec 2017,,,"5 reasons to buy
The Zoom All Out Low 2 has proven to be durable enough to be used every day as a workout shoe, according to a wearer.
The shoe was comfortable enough that wearing it felt like “walking on a cloud,” according to a pleased buyer. Another person compared their wear experience to “walking on springs.”
The Zoom All Out Low 2 offered exceptional midfoot support, a user stated.
Several customers thought the shoe was affordable.
The heel portion provided plenty of cushioning, a wearer commented.
5 reasons not to buy
One user was unhappy with the limited color options of the shoe. Another was disappointed that the color did not look the same as advertised.
One shoe went flat after only two weeks of usage, a buyer lamented.
The shoe made the heel sank inward during landing, which resulted in soreness, a confused wearer reported.
The Zoom All Out Low 2 was too narrow, a user observed.
The shoe felt tight around the toes, as experienced by a customer.
Bottom line
The Nike Zoom All Out Low 2 garnered mixed reactions from its market. Many users have felt that the shoe’s cushioning, performance, comfort, and price, all deserved positive feedback. However, the shoe was not problem-free for all, as some expressed their issues on fit, quality, and appearance. In summary, the Zoom All Out Low 2 was an average shoe, which may not cater to everyone’s tastes."
Jordan 88 Racer, Jordan,87.0,,169.0,$100,$80 (save 20%), Road, Neutral,,,,, Aug 2018, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Those who have tested the Jordan 88 Racer were happy with its lightweight build.
People liked the multitude of color schemes, stating that the hues were visually appealing.
The cushioning unit was able to support the foot properly, according to several testers.
The price is affordable.
A few admired the shoe's breathable upper coverage.
3 reasons not to buy
Several consumers claimed that the Jordan 88 Racer was very narrow.
The medial side of the forefoot section was observed to rip apart after only several uses.
The sole unit separated from the upper, according to a few testers.
Bottom line
Most of those who have tried the Jordan 88 Racer didn’t have a lot of positive things to say about its narrow width profile and its smaller-than-usual sizing scheme. They felt as if they wouldn’t be able to wear and show off this product without feeling too restricted in the foot-chamber. Furthermore, the durability of the upper was disliked as the fabrics were observed to tear apart after only a few uses. On the other hand, the lightweight nature and the endearing looks of this road shoe were praised."
Adidas Adizero Sub 2,,93.0,86.0,6940.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 5.6oz , Women: 5.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
A lot of people welcomed the lightweight build of the Adidas Adizero Sub 2.
The flexible nature of the underfoot platform was much appreciated by consumers.
Many testers were happy that the width option followed their needs.
The durability of the outsole unit was lauded; some runners claimed that it didn’t show signs of wear, even after many miles.
There were no not spots felt while wearing the Adizero Sub 2, according to a couple of testers.
1 reasons not to buy
Some testers complained that the underfoot cushioning wasn’t as efficient as they expected. For them, it didn’t bring the responsiveness that’s anticipated of running shoes.
Bottom line
The Adidas Adizero Sub 2 was able to capture the attention of elite athletes who want to take on races and other high-tier running sessions. Most of them liked the insubstantial weight of this neutral shoe while others lauded the upper unit’s smooth nature. And though some people weren’t happy with the midsole unit, it didn’t become a universal gripe."
Hoka One One Clayton,,84.0,84.0,134.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.3oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Hoka One One Clayton 2,"4 reasons to buy
Many runners liked the lightweight construction of the Hoka One One Clayton.
The shoe features the Pro2Lite Midsole that delivers soft cushioning in the heel and firm cushioning in the forefoot for propulsion.
Based on some reviews, many appreciate the RMAT outsole that provides high rebound cushioning and reliable traction.
The Clayton is breathable and comfortable to wear based on some reviews.
3 reasons not to buy
The Clayton is an expensive shoe.
Available in limited color options.
According to some testers, the treads wore out quicker than expected.
Bottom line
The Clayton is a neutral running shoe that offers a breathable and comfortable ride. The lightweight construction made it ideal for uptempo training. Despite being expensive, many testers still appreciate how fast the Clayton is. Overall, the Clayton is an average running companion that still needs a few improvements."
Asics Gel Fortitude 7,,92.0,92.0,297.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.2oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Fortitude 8,"6 reasons to buy
Several runners admired the cushioning system of the Asics Gel Fortitude 7.
It is unbelievably comfortable as based on several comments.
A significant number of runners loved the traction the Asics Fortitude 7 provides.
The shoe is a bargain for its price.
Some runners were pleasantly surprised by the Fortitude 7’s relative flexibility.
Adequate ground feedback is another great asset in this shoe, according to a few runners.
2 reasons not to buy
The shoe is quite heavy, said a few users.
Mainly limited as a sturdy training partner.
Bottom line
The Gel Fortitude series finds a unique place in the hearts of neutral runners with flat feet. With better ground feedback, tons of comfort, and unbelievable overpronation measures, runners with flat arches, inflexible feet, or fallen arches are on their way to more fun on the road in the Fortitude 7."
New Balance 890 v5,,91.0,83.0,742.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, New Balance 890 v8,"6 reasons to buy
Considered by a good number of runners as a versatile running shoe because of the various activities that they can do with the New Balance 890 v5.
For better traction, especially on wet surfaces, the 5th version of the New Balance 890 also includes a tough rubber compound as noted by a few runners.
The FantomFit technology, a skeletally engineered upper made of mesh and synthetic layers enhance the fit and breathability of the 890 v5.
The REVlite midsole foam makes the heel to toe transition more responsive, which results in better heel strikes, observed a handful of users.
Many liked the seamless upper of the shoe that promotes an irritation-free environment for the foot.
A significant number of users found the New Balance 890 v5 to be lightweight and fast enough for uptempo training.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners say this shoe has a narrow fit because of its small toe box, which results in limited forefoot flexibility.
It takes time before finally feeling comfortable running in it.
The New Balance 890 v5 is not durable.
Bottom line
The New Balance 890 v5 is a neutral running shoe perfect on the road, gravel and track terrains. Most often, it is used for daily running and other general fitness activities. Runners who are mild pronators are the ones who will most likely benefit from this shoe."
Under Armour SpeedForm Apollo 2,,91.0,84.0,222.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 5.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The SpeedForm Apollo 2 is very comfortable, according to some testers.
The upper construction of the shoe is very breathable and durable based on some runners’ reviews.
The Apollo 2 features an arch reinforcement construction for foot guidance and precise fit.
Some runners took note of the shoe's responsive ride and cushioned support due to the dual-layer midsole.
The anatomical rubber outsole adds flexibility and durability.
A significant number of users mentioned that the shoe feels light and fast.
A reasonably-priced shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
According to some reviews, the tread of this shoe is not holding up longer compared to the previous version.
The 2nd version of the SpeedForm Apollo is heavier than the old version.
Bottom line
The Under Armour SppedForm Apollo 2 has gathered many reviews in its favor. The shoe proved to be an efficient runner with promising qualities, but a few users thought that the shoe still needs some improvement. The updated version of Under Armour SpeedForm Apollo offers durability, flexibility and well-cushioned ride. It is a neutral running shoe perfect for uptempo pace training and for competition."
Hoka One One Clifton 1,,95.0,90.0,203.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.7oz , Women: 6.6oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"10 reasons to buy
Many runners mentioned that the Hoka One One Clifton 1 is the best Hoka shoe they have ever worn.
A lot of runners admired the shoe’s lightweight design.
Many users appreciated the breathable coverage of the Hoka Clifton 1.
Runners with wide forefoot admired the shoe’s wide toe box; they said it gives enough room for toe splay.
A significant number of runners remarked that the cushioning of this road running shoe is very comfortable.
According to some satisfied runners, the Clifton 1 has a very responsive cushioning.
Several testers highlighted the shoe’s responsive cushioning.
The shoe runs true-to-size, said some wearers.
Some users mentioned that the running shoe is great for half and full marathons.
A few who got the shoe agreed that buying it is getting value out of their money.
3 reasons not to buy
A few narrow-footed runners were disappointed because of the shoe’s sloppy forefoot fit.
Some runners were unhappy with the shoe’s flimsy tongue unit.
The insole of the Hoka One One Clifton 1 is too thin and keeps on sliding around, according to some purchasers.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Clifton 1 managed to get high marks from runners. Many users positively accepted the shocking come back of the first ever Clifton running shoe. It received few criticisms, but the users believe there is still room for improvement for the Clifton 1. Overall, as a lot of people considered the Hoka One One Clifton 1 as the best Hoka running shoe of all time."
Nike Flex RN 2015,,86.0,,1389.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.4oz , Women: 6.7oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Nike Flex RN 2017,"8 reasons to buy
A lot of testers welcomed the style of the Nike Flex RN 2015, which, for them, was cool and elegant.
The general durability of this model was lauded by a number of runners; they said that the components didn’t wear off easily.
It felt adequately lightweight, according to some users.
The flexibility of the underfoot platform was given praise because it allowed the runners to move their feet more naturally through the gait cycle.
The cushioning system was recognized by many for its capability to carry the foot responsibly and cushion impact during the landing phase.
Most reviewers appreciated the upper unit, which is a mix of mesh and foam that enhanced the fit and breathability.
The outsole held onto the ground with ease and sureness, as noted by some testers.
It was an affordable shoe, according to those who have tried it.
1 reasons not to buy
Some of the testers felt that it was a bit tighter than what they were used to.
Bottom line
The Nike Flex RN 2015 was able to offer great service to neutral runners, both new and advanced. Many of them felt that it was comfortable, secure and responsive. The cover system and the cushioning unit received a lot of praise. But the fit wasn’t as agreeable to some because they stated that it was a bit tight."
Puma Jamming, Puma,93.0,88.0,29.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,, Nov 2017," Normal | Normal, Wide",,"5 reasons to buy
Most of the users lauded the great design of the Puma Jamming; some mentioned they get compliments when wearing the shoe.
Many runners mentioned that the shoe is very comfortable.
Some wearers mentioned that the Jamming has a great quality.
The running shoe runs true to size, a few users mentioned.
The Puma Jamming fits perfectly, based on some comments.
1 reasons not to buy
The shoe has an expensive price.
Bottom line
The Puma Jamming is road running shoe with a street-ready design. According to some reviews, the shoe is superb when it comes to comfort, looks, and quality. Though it is expensive, many users still recommend the shoe for those who are looking for a fashionable running shoe."
Brooks Cascadia 10,,85.0,81.0,92.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.6oz , Women: 9.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Brooks Cascadia 14,"6 reasons to buy
The Brooks Cascadia 10 features a breathable and comfortable mesh material in the upper.
This shoe utilizes a seamless construction which reduces skin irritation.
Runners appreciated the outsole, which delivered reliable traction and protection against wear.
A Rock Protection Plate protects the underfoot from jagged surfaces and other debris.
Many of the testers welcomed the mid-sole, which was able to support the contours of their feet.
This shoe has an affordable price.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners noted that the upper tore apart after only a few months of use.
Others felt that it was a bit narrow for their feet.
Bottom line
The Brooks Cascadia 10 like the Cascadia 13 is a trail running shoe that delivers quality service to adventures and off-the-road explorers. It’s a running companion that also gives adequate amounts of support without sacrificing freedom of movement. Though some people were disappointed because the shoe lacks durability, others are still happy with how the shoe performs on the trail."
Asics Gel FujiTrabuco 7,,95.0,87.0,92.0,,," Mud, Trail", Neutral, Men: 12.7oz , Women: 9.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Asics Gel FujiTrabuco 8,"6 reasons to buy
The Asics Gel FujiTrabuco 7 performed excellently on wet surfaces, according to several users. One person, in particular, said it had better grip than its previous version.
One buyer described the design of the shoe as “phenomenal,” while another said it looked “like a boss.”
Many runners agreed that the FujiTrabuco 7 fit perfectly on their foot.
A couple of reviewers liked that the shoe is lightweight.
The upper material kept the foot well-ventilated, a user described.
One customer mentioned that the shoe fared well in road-to-trail transitions.
1 reasons not to buy
The toe cap was too rigid, according to a couple of wearers.
Bottom line
Majority of those who bought the Asics Gel FujiTrabuco 7 described the shoe as worth their money, and some even surmised that everyone who is on their feet all day would enjoy wearing the shoe. Based on reviews regarding comfort level, features, and design, it is safe to say that most are happy with their purchase."
New Balance 840 v4, New Balance,93.0,,346.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.6oz , Women: 10oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The shoe provided excellent support, even when not used for running, according to a satisfied buyer.
The midsole felt more cushioned than its predecessor, a runner claimed. Another person noticed its flexibility and adequate arch support.
One user said the insole included with the 840 v4 provided a durable underfoot cushioning.
Many wearers felt an improvement in the shoe’s balance and medial
The New Balance 840 v4 offered a long-lasting comfort even during an all-day wear, as mentioned by a customer.
3 reasons not to buy
The 840 v4 was too tight, and the foot did not fit in very well, a user complained.
The material of the shoe felt hotter and looked cheaper compared to the previous version, a disappointed customer said.
The shoe did not work well with custom orthotics, a dismayed buyer lamented.
Bottom line
Despite the numerous and quite noticeable improvements of the 840 v4 from its predecessor, many users were happy that the shoe has retained the dynamic and solid performance it provides. Many consumers have expressed their satisfaction with the purchase and thought that the 840 v4 was a worthy investment."
Newton BoCo AT 4,,85.0,92.0,8.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 8.7oz, Men: 3mm , Women: 3mm,,, Newton BoCo AT,"5 reasons to buy
A lot of the runners laud the grippy traction of the Newton BoCo AT 4. 
Many commend its versatility. 
A number of the athletes appreciate the water-resistant upper of the shoe. 
It is highly breathable, commented some. 
Several admire the shock absorption qualities of the shoe. 
2 reasons not to buy
Quite a few don’t like the discomfort it causes. 
According to some, it’s a little too stiff, especially on the underfoot. 
Bottom line
Built to withstand harsh conditions, the Newton BoCo AT 4 boasts durability and unrivaled traction. With this trail running shoe, expect an efficient and a high level of energy return with each stride. Grippy, comfortable, and secure- these are among the many features of the Newton BoCo At 4. "
New Balance 1540 v2,,84.0,67.0,3775.0,,, Road, Motion control, Men: 14.7oz , Women: 11.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, New Balance 1540 v3,"5 reasons to buy
Many runners took note that the New Balance 1540 v2 is well ventilated.
This shoe provides improved arch support, as mentioned in some reviews.
It has blown rubber outsole for added durability in high wear areas.
The upper construction of the shoe is highly breathable and runners liked how comfortable this shoe felt.
It has a roomy toe box that made most wide-footed runners happy.
3 reasons not to buy
For some runners, this shoe is slightly expensive.
Available in limited colors.
The 1540 v2 is heavy.
Bottom line
The New Balance 1540 v2 is a motion control road running shoe that offers incredible comfort. Although there were negative feedback about the price, limited colors and weight, the 1540 v2 is still a worthy investment. It has much improved design, cushioning, and durability that will allow runners to pound their way to their goals. "
Asics Gel Sonoma 5,,78.0,,7.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 12oz , Women: 11oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The materials used for the Asics Gel Sonoma 5is lauded for being durable.
Some users have mentioned that the upper unit’s overlay system can help the steadiness of the foot.
The price of this trail running shoe is considered affordable.
A handful of runners have noted that the midsole unit can properly cushion the footfalls.
According to some purchasers, moving through the trails is a confident affair because of the trail-optimized outsole.
2 reasons not to buy
Several people have mentioned that the forefoot section restricts the natural splaying capacity of the toes.
A few people have noted that the fabric near the ball of the foot is quick to tear apart.
Bottom line
The overall reaction towards the Gel Sonoma 5 has been mostly positive. This Asics running shoe is apparently a solid choice for adventures on the great outdoors. The durable construction, the affordable price, and the traction-ready external pad are highlighted. Conversely, some have noted some fabric tearing while others have noticed a restrictive in-shoe feel.
Those who enjoy running shoes for the outdoors can welcome the Gel Sonoma 5."
Topo Athletic Fli-Lyte 2,,90.0,91.0,33.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.4oz , Women: 6.9oz, Men: 3mm , Women: 3mm,,, Topo Athletic Fli-Lyte 3,"6 reasons to buy
Some runners commended the breathable and flexible nature of this running shoe.
A good number of testers agreed that they experienced a smooth and highly responsive ride.
Several reviewers mentioned that the lightweight structure of the Topo Athletic Fli-Lyte 2 was agreeable for all-day running sessions.
According to some consumers, the shoe provided enough traction on slick pavements and asphaltic surfaces.
A lot of runners loved the shoe’s spacious toe box.
Many testers agreed that the shoe was affordably-priced.
3 reasons not to buy
One of the runners said that the tongue unit was a little bit bulky.
Some runners complained that the laces easily unraveled by themselves.
A small number of buyers commented that there was a seam that rubbed and went over their big toes. This resulted in the painful cuts on both toes.
Bottom line
Many neutral runners agreed that the Topo Athletic Fli-Lyte 2 was able to offer a soft, flexible, and responsive ride. The new upper material gained fans as it delivered a comfortable and breathable coverage. Suffice it to say that it was generally welcomed as an efficient shoe that excels in a variety of speeds and distances. Although some had noted a few cuts on their big toes, others still recommended this shoe because of its roomy toe box and reasonable price."
Brooks Pureflow 6,,90.0,81.0,495.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.9oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Brooks Pureflow 7,"11 reasons to buy
A runner reported that the Brooks PureFlow 6 performed like a dream; the running experience was apparently satisfying.
The lightweight nature of this shoe was appreciated by many consumers.
The underfoot cushioning system was comfortable and responsive, according to a lot of those who have tried it.
A number of runners wrote that the upper unit was able to conform to the shape of the foot with ease, allowing a snug and secure coverage.
The visual aesthetics of this shoe received some positive recognition from those who welcomed its style.
The outsole’s grip capability was welcomed by runners; it didn’t easily allow them to slip on the ground.
Based on user comments and reviews, the Brooks PureFlow 6 was able to deliver a better running experience than its predecessors.
There were purchasers who were able to use this shoe for casual purposes; it worked well for them.
Several runners use the shoe for gym workouts.
More than a handful of reviewers welcomed the soft tongue as this is considered as a big improvement over the past version’s stiff construction.
A large number of Pureflow fans thanked Brooks for bringing back the wide toe box in this shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
The upper wasn’t as breathable as expected, several testers noted.
Several runners mentioned that optional widths would have made them extremely happy.
Bottom line
The Brooks PureFlow 6 was able to perform well, according to many of those who have tried it. Their running sessions on the roads was apparently better than the previous iterations. Some were even able to wear it casually. A number of consumers weren’t as impressed by some of its features."
Under Armour Scorpio 2,,90.0,83.0,54.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Very comfortable is often the first and most common description that a significant number of runners use to describe the Scorpio 2.
Some reviews noted that it is ultra-durable.
The Under Armour Scorpio 2 got countless thumbs up for its cool design and style.
The flat mesh upper of the 2nd installment of the Scorpio gives great ventilation for cool and dry runs.
The adequate arch support is loved by a lot of runners who often go to the gym or mix their trainings.
A sizeable number of runners appreciated the slight reduction in weight.
3 reasons not to buy
The shoe is overpriced, according to a handful of runners.
A few runners noted that it needs break-in time.
Several reviewers issued notice that it runs a bit small.
Bottom line
The Under Armour Scorpio 2 initially stands out for its very sophisticated and trendy design. Casual or seasoned runners will realize that this is more than just a cool-looking shoe. The superb comfort and decent cushioning translate to longer and more enjoyable training sessions. Slight overpronators will love the solid arch support without being intrusive."
Nike Air Relentless 6,,90.0,,252.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Many runners agreed that the Nike Air Relentless 6 looked cool and endearing.
‘Comfortable’ was a word that many of the testers used to describe their time while wearing this running shoe.
The price of this model was lauded by a lot of runners because it was affordable.
A number of consumers appreciated the padding in the rear section of the upper because it helped in securing their feet and preventing unintentional shoe-removals.
The weight of this shoe was suitably light for a lot of testers.
The underfoot experience was agreeable, according to those who have tried it; one of them even wrote that other shoes felt like walking barefoot in comparison.
The midsole generally stayed efficient for many consumers, even after they’ve used this shoe many times.
The outsole’s grip capability didn’t disappoint the runners.
5 reasons not to buy
The forefoot section of the upper unit felt weird for a tester because their big toe kept sticking out as an outline against the apparently thin fabric.
The shoe looked like it was made with cheap materials, complained a runner.
A dissatisfied purchaser claimed that the mid-sole unit broke down after only 3 runs.
Within an hour of wearing, the heel padding had caused blistering on the heel of a tester.
According to some runners, the lack of arch support made it difficult to use this shoe for long running sessions.
Bottom line
The Nike Air Relentless 6 was generally welcomed with open arms by those who have tried it. Many neutral runners felt that its cushioning was dependable, that its cover system was secure, and that the outsole was able to dole out traction responsibly. A few warned that it was a bit smaller in terms of size; another felt that the upper fabric was too thin. But that didn’t stop this road running shoe from gaining favor from purchasers."
On Cloudflow 2.0,,92.0,95.0,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.3oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
Several testers have praised the lightness of the On Cloudflow 2.0. 
According to many runners, the shoe increased their speed. 
Quite a few purchasers laud the comfort of the running shoe. 
It is very responsive, claimed multiple buyers. 
The neutral running shoe is sturdy, commended a number of reviewers. 
Various shoppers appreciate the snug fit of the upper. 
The road running shoe is very breathable, remarked some experts. 
Many of the customers state that the running platform is highly flexible. 
A few commenters hail the sticky grip of the shoe.
4 reasons not to buy
Some users are disappointed with the lightweight shoe's classic lacing system.
The running shoe lacks support, expressed some wearers. 
Quite a few athletes have observed that the road running shoe caused abrasions
A number of runners are upset because rocks get in between the cuts on the outsole.
Bottom line
Transforming impact into speed—that is one of the goals of the On Cloudflow 2.0. With an updated midsole composition and a re-engineered outsole design, the running shoe maintains a perfect blend of comfort and flexibility. Packed with innovative technical elements, the neutral shoe offers support and smoothness to the runner without employing so much bulk. With the Cloudflow 2.0 from On, athletes are sure to experience maximum traction and security."
New Balance 775,,92.0,,104.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.6oz , Women: 6.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Some runners were satisfied with the shoe's upper built that is highly breathable and the no-sew overlays offer a comfortable foot coverage.
A comfortable inner fabric, as well as a padded collar & tongue,  ensure a non-irritating experience for the foot.
The mid-sole foam that offers a lightweight yet durable underfoot platform gave some runners satisfaction.
Most runners appreciated the neutral construction of the 775, from its 8mm drop to its non-bulky platform.
Many reviewers appreciated the inclusion of rubber components in the outsole, which helps in providing protection against wear and tear.
The New Balance 775 feels light and fast based on some reviews.
A significant number of runners noticed the flexibility of the shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners complained that it was a bit narrow in the forefoot area.
Others thought that it was a bit rigid, limiting the natural movement of their feet.
Bottom line
The New Balance 775 is an affordable and lightweight road running shoe designed for neutral runners. Many runners have acclimated to the New Balance 775 because of its neutral platform, the durable materials, the cool look and the reliable upper coverage. It is a great choice for daily exercises and races."
Reebok Zig Pulse 3, Reebok,93.0,,320.0,$90,$51 (save 43%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
A lot of users have noted that the Reebok Zig Pulse 3 provides excellent comfort during their runs.
Most wearers like the invigorating design update that the shoe went through.
Some users said that the Zig Pulse 3’s upper is well ventilated.
A fair number of purchasers mentioned how they appreciated the energy return provided by ZigTech technology.
The shoe's performance and support are consistent even with everyday use, several runners noted.
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of users questioned the build quality of the Reebok Zig Pulse 3.
The outsole has quickly worn apart after only a couple of uses, according to some wearers.
A few wearers compared the shoe’s durability to that of the overall strength of the Adidas Pure Boost when it comes to its materials and components.
Bottom line
The Reebok Zig Pulse 3 is a road running shoe designed for neutral runners.  The shoe was mostly developed for active walking and low-mileage runs.  The Zig Pulse 3 has an innovative ZigTech outsole that enhances cushioning for a better comfortable ride.  It also has a two-tone mesh upper that is responsible for making the shoes well ventilated and breathable. Most runners like these features of Reebok Zig Pulse 3 but then again, some few purchasers were put off by the shoe’s durability.  Despite the naysayers, the Reebok Zig Pulse 3 still holds its own when it comes to its positive reviews, and most users still choose it because of the comfort it provides whether used at the gym or out on the track."
Adidas Questar TND,,90.0,,658.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Many people felt comfortable wearing the Adidas Questar TND for their running activities.
According to several reviewers, the upper offered reliable breathability and security.
A lot of purchasers noted that the price was affordable.
The overall design and look of this running shoe were deemed visually appealing.
Some casual shoe-enthusiasts noted that it worked well as a daily walking shoe.
Wearing the Questar TND for an entire day didn’t cause any discomfort or fatigue to the foot, based on several reviews.
1 reasons not to buy
Some consumers stated that the façade looked awkwardly bulky.
Bottom line
The Adidas Questar TND was much appreciated for its appealing looks, its affordable price, and its apparently reliable functionality. People were even glad that it served well as a choice for fashion apparel. While some thought that this neutral running shoe looked bulky, most people still felt that it was a dependable partner for the roads."
Reebok Forever Floatride Energy 2,,84.0,95.0,6.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The aesthetics of the Reebok Forever Floatride Energy 2 are welcomed by consumers who appreciate cool-looking performance shoe-facades.
The underfoot cushioning system of this neutral running shoe is appreciated because it is responsive and able to attenuate impact shock properly.
Breathability is an aspect of the upper unit that has been adored by most testers.
People are generally considering this performance footwear as a lightweight option for all-day use.
According to most users, the overall in-shoe experience is soft and form-welcoming.
2 reasons not to buy
Some users have claimed that the inner sleeve has a tendency to irritate the skin.
A few purchasers have experienced some slipping during their runs; they are claiming that the traction is inconsistent.
Bottom line
A clean yet sporty look governs the design of the Forever Floatride Energy 2. The in-shoe experience is tasked with delivering a comfortable wrap, though caution is advised as irritation can occur because of the inner sleeve. Still, cushioning, weight, and visual appeal are highlighted as positive elements. Inversely, the traction might be inconsistent, so it is best to perform with both grace and own awareness of foot-to-surface balance."
La Sportiva Tempesta GTX,,86.0,97.0,14.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The Tempesta GTX stayed dry, even when treading in creeks, a commenter wrote.
Several wearers liked that the outsole worked perfectly on hillsides and muddy paths.
Some users found this shoe to be useful in winter; the outsole apparently held onto snowy surfaces with ease.
The Gore-Tex® upper was useful in providing an impermeable coverage against water, mud, and snow, many users relayed.
Several users praised the midsole for its minimal weight that enabled a natural transition through the gait cycle.
Many reviewers agreed that the Tempesta GTX was true to size.
Some people were happy with the comfort level afforded by the cushioning system.
4 reasons not to buy
It was not as breathable as other running shoes with Gore-Tex®, a user observed.
A few buyers thought the La Sportiva Tempesta GTX was expensive.
Some users claimed the shoe was hard to find in their local stores.
The shoe was a bit narrow at first and needed a break-in period, a couple of wearers experienced.
Bottom line
With its functional features and efficient performance, the La Sportiva Tempesta GTX was a well-admired shoe by many users. Most reviewers found the shoe to be a harmonic balance between a rugged trail gear and a fast and flexible running wear. Although it may be expensive for some, the Tempesta GTX has achieved its status as a recommendable shoe for outdoor runners."
Saucony Triumph ISO 3,,88.0,84.0,680.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Saucony Triumph ISO 5,"9 reasons to buy
A runner stated that even though they had the Saucony Triumph ISO 3 for some time, it still felt fresh and comfortable, like wearing it for the first time.
A tester commented that the platform felt just as plush as the previous version.
The responsiveness of the mid-sole unit was enjoyed by many.
Several consumers wrote that the toe box had enough room to accommodate natural toe-splaying.
The upper unit’s breathable nature was appreciated by the consumers.
A lot of runners agreed that this shoe was true-to-size.
A reviewer reported that the underfoot experience didn’t make them feel as if they were sinking into the cushioning system; it was smooth yet reliable.
According to a runner, it was versatile enough to handle tempo runs and those long, slow sessions on the road.
Based on the feedback of purchasers, wearing this shoe was a generally comfortable affair.
2 reasons not to buy
According to a tester, the tongue of this running shoe was too thin, causing lacing pressure to transfer directly to the skin.
Some runners felt that this shoe’s price was a bit expensive.
Bottom line
The Saucony Triumph ISO 3 was a success, according to the feedback of many of those who have used it. It delivered a smooth and comfortable ride, which agreed with neutral runners. The responsiveness of its components gained some praise, as well. Conversely, it didn’t fit well for a few testers."
Skechers GOrun Air - Stratus, Skechers,86.0,,10.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 7.6oz , Women: 6.4oz,,,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
A lot of the users admire the breathability that the Skechers GOrun Air - Stratus offers. 
According to some runners, the shoe is able to withstand abrasive elements; it is highly durable. 
The shoe is very comfortable to wear, remarked several customers. 
Many of the reviewers have commented that the shoe is true to size. 
The shoe has received numerous praise from different customers for its stylish design, promoting versatility as it can be used for running and other day-to-day activities.
2 reasons not to buy
The GOrun Air - Stratus required a lengthy break-in period, several runners stated. 
One reviewer says that the shoe is overpriced. 
Bottom line
The Skechers GOrun Air - Stratus received a mixed response from the public. Although there have been some concerns raised regarding the shoe needing a break-in period, many were satisfied by the durability of the shoe. Many have expressed their contentment with the breathability it offered, which has been one of the highlighted features of the GOrun Air - Stratus. With this given, many of the reviewers and runners claim that they will surely recommend this lightweight running shoe to their peers. "
Nike Air Zoom All Out Flyknit,,86.0,76.0,89.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.7oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The Flyknit material used for the upper feels comfortable and non-irritating.
A secure lockdown fit is provided by a gartered mid-cut collar.
The ¾ Zoom Air Unit flexes on contact and gives reliable cushioning with every step.
Mid-foot security and support is given by the Dynamic Flywire cables that are integrated with the lacing system.
The Translucent Waffle rubber outsole was appreciated by runners because it delivers durable protection and sure traction over the roads.
Flex grooves in the forefoot area ensure the runner’s natural toe-off motion.
2 reasons not to buy
There were those who felt the rear section of the shoe chafe their heels because it didn’t have padding or a smoother fabric.
A few felt that the mid-foot and rear areas of the shoe was uncomfortably narrow.
Bottom line
Natural motion and flexibility are afforded by the Nike Air Zoom All Out Flyknit. This running shoe offers comfortable coverage, durable protection from wear, and responsive cushioning, which are all helpful when doling out great running performance on the roads."
Inov-8 X-Talon 212,,89.0,86.0,545.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 7.5oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,, Inov-8 X-Talon 212 v2,"6 reasons to buy
The shoe is very flexible and fast, based on some reviews.
Some runners found this shoe very versatile.
Runners were impressed with the grip of the shoe, which is effective on soft and hard surfaces.
The Synthetic mesh in the upper, coupled with a Met Cradle webbing, secures the foot well while maintaining a well-ventilated interior environment.
It has the DWR coating that’s water repellant, keeping the foot dry while running on wet surfaces.
The mid-sole unit delivers responsive cushioning and propelling mechanics to make each step more empowered.
3 reasons not to buy
The X-Talon 212was too narrow to some testers.
It has a slightly expensive price.
The medium level of cushioning left some runners wanting more because they apparently experienced discomfort during extended use.
Bottom line
The Inov-8 X-Talon 212 is a racing shoe that can handle both soft and hard terrain. Aside from being a reliable mid-range racing shoe, this shoe doesn’t disappoint when it comes to hiking and obstacle running. It offers a good combination of durability, speed and protection that’s reliable and competent."
Nike Air Zoom Terra Kiger 4,,89.0,92.0,35.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Nike Air Zoom Terra Kiger 5,"8 reasons to buy
The majority of the runners mentioned that the Nike Air Zoom Terra Kiger 4 is very comfortable.
The fit was just right for some runners who have tried the shoe.
Several users admired the wider toe-box, which allowed their toes to move comfortably.
The Terra Kiger 4 is a versatile shoe; not only did a few people use it for trail running, but also in the gym and as a casual shoe.
The shoe provided enough amount of foot protection while running on the trail, said a few users.
According to some comments, this running shoe offered great traction on varied surfaces.
The mid-sole felt a lot softer compared to the previous version, based on a few comments.
Most of the users mentioned that the Terra Kiger’s 4th iteration had reliable durability.
3 reasons not to buy
The collar is too loose, which allows debris to enter the shoe, some users complained.
The heel cup is soft and feels unstable, according to a couple of reviewers.
A few were disappointed with the lace-loops that blew out easily after a few days of use.
Bottom line
The Nike Air Zoom Terra Kiger 4 is a neutral trail running shoe that offers a combination of reliable traction, durability, and comfort. Generally, many users were impressed by the updates of this version. With all the technologies incorporated into the shoe, there is no doubt that the shoe is able to offer value for money."
New Balance 720 v3,,88.0,,243.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.6oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, New Balance 720 v4,"7 reasons to buy
A mesh material with synthetic overlays provides a breathable and soft cover for the foot.
The no-sew material application brings a non-irritating inner sleeve in which the foot can relax.
Runners generally welcomed the IMEVA injection-molded mid-sole material, which offers a flexible yet firm underfoot cushioning.
Many reviewers appreciated the streamlined and contemporary look of the 720 v3.
It runs lighter than the weight shows, according to some runners.
The New Balance 720 v3 is affordable.
Available in several colors.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners noticed that it was a bit narrow in the forefoot area.
A few experienced the forefoot tip section of the outer layer peeled off after a few months of use.
Bottom line
The New Balance 720 v3 is a reliable running shoe for daily use. Runners have enjoyed the 3rd version of the New Balance 720 because of its comfortable upper, good arch support, responsive mid-sole and traction-capable outsole. It received negative comments with its sizing but overall, users still consider the shoe as a successful update of the older version."
Adidas Ultraboost Guard,,84.0,85.0,9.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Most people who have tested the Adidas Ultraboost Guardare saying that the lightweight build is great for all-day use.
The underfoot cushioning is considered by testers as a comfortable foam for extended running sessions.
Several users have noted that the traction given by the outsole is dependable.
The durability of the materials is appreciated by those who like a sturdy shoe-build.
The heel counter and overlays of this Adidas trail running shoe are lauded for securing the foot at all times.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people have noted that the inner sleeve has a tendency to irritate the skin.
The in-shoe experience is a bit stifling for a couple of testers.
Bottom line
The Adidas Ultraboost Guard is a trail running shoe that is designed for those who like to quickly transition from the off-road paths to the roads with little to no worry. Purchasers praise the overall design and build-quality of this product, with some highlighting the lightness of the materials and the lockdown-nature of the fit. With its energized cushioning, runners can expect a balance of comfort and performance."
Asics GT 3000 5,,84.0,98.0,41.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Runners liked the overall design and available colorways of the Asics GT 3000 5.
Some people highly applauded the versatility of the shoe; they have also used for walking and exercises in the gym.
Impact absorption was greatly felt by the majority, and it helped those with injuries to easily get back to running.
A few commented that they experienced extreme comfort while wearing the shoe.
Though lightweight as compared to other stability shoes, a handful of users commended the support offered by this running shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners noted that the midsole was stiffer than expected, so it prompted them to use gel inserts to avoid foot sores after running.
A few preferred the wider width of the shoe’s predecessor, the GT 3000-4. It was also emphasized that the shoe’s toe box is a bit small.
Bottom line
The Asics GT 3000 5 is one of the best trainers for those with late-stage overpronation. It features sufficient support and comfortable cushioning without slowing the runner down. While highly recommended for beginners and even experienced runners who need stability throughout the gait cycle, the stiff midsole might be a downside and can result in occasional blisters."
Vibram FiveFingers KMD Sport,,90.0,81.0,310.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.7oz , Women: 5oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The upper of the KMD Sport is made up of Polyester Fabric + Nylon Mesh.
It features the XS TREK compound that offers flexibility, stability and comfort.
The quick lacing system and locking buckle promote custom fit quickly and easily.
It features the AEGIS Microbe Shield that helps control odors.
The polyurethane footbeds of the Vibram FiveFingers KMD Sport lessen underfoot friction.
2 reasons not to buy
The upper is not really breathable, according to some reviews.
Some runners were having durability issues with the KMD Sport.
Bottom line
The Vibram FiveFingers KMD Sport is a minimalist running shoe that encourages natural midfoot or forefoot strike. It offers lightweight construction, minimal arch support, flexibility and comfort. Though some have minor issues when it comes to breathability and durability, it is still regarded by some as a reliable shoe. The KMD Sport is a great shoe for racing and fitness workouts."
New Balance Fresh Foam Zante v2,,89.0,86.0,292.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.6oz , Women: 7.2oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,, New Balance Fresh Foam Zante v4,"6 reasons to buy
A generous amount of padding is noticeable around the heel for added comfort, according to some runners.
Nice and plush insole is great and comfortable, as noted in most reviews.
The New Balance Fresh Foam Zante v2 offers a great barefoot-like running, but maintains a nice underfoot cushioning as observed by some testers.
There is a seamless and irritation-free upper that enhances the comfortable feel.
The changes in the forefoot and toe box area, and in the geometry design, are quite impressive according to several users.
Plenty of colors to choose from.
4 reasons not to buy
It is not technically made for racing.
The tightness in the mid-foot wrap is felt and caused some blisters.
It is not as fast and snappy as the first version as complained by some testers.
Too narrow for some runners.
Bottom line
The New Balance Fresh Foam Zante v2 is a great shoe with efficient design and performance. It is a reliable running shoe for training, tempo runs, and for long miles as well. It can handle different work outs and running routines as well. The shoe delivers a fresh running experience in the comfort, arch support, and protection that it offers."
Nike Air Max Advantage,,85.0,,96.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
One user commented that the shoe helped minimize their hip pain and plantar fasciitis.
Many buyers were satisfied with the appearance of the shoe as well as the various color choices available.
A majority of wearers stated they liked the light weight and the relaxed fit.
Some runners reported a comfortable wear even during extended periods of time.
Several purchasers praised the affordable price of the shoe.
A lot of reviewers observed the competent shock absorption capability of the Max Air system.
5 reasons not to buy
Several users noted it was a very narrow shoe and that it was uncomfortable to wear for long-distance runs.
The insole looked cheap, flimsy, and did not give the impression of durability, wrote a reviewer.
One buyer said it was too snug around the ankles.
The shoelaces that were included were too short and hard to tie, according to a consumer.
A couple of users complained that the rubber outsole was noisy and bothersome.
Bottom line
The Nike Air Max Advantage has gathered mixed reviews from users. For some, the midsole delivered a reliable performance, while others were not won over by various design elements. Overall, many were able to attest that the shoe was consistent with other releases from the Air Max series with its signature cushioning system and overall structure."
Altra King MT 2,,92.0,86.0,11.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.7oz , Women: 7.3oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The traction capacity of the Altra King MT 2 is welcomed by many runners.
Some testers have noted that the material used for the external pad is durable.
Several purchasers who have had some foot discomfort while trail running claim that the platform of this product alleviates knee and calf pain.
The upper unit is welcomed for being soft against the skin.
Breathability is an aspect of this product that people are appreciating.
2 reasons not to buy
Some consumers have noted that the underfoot platform isn’t very supportive, particularly on extended running sessions.
Based on a small number of reviews, the in-shoe experience is a bit confining and unable to accommodate the natural, relaxed shape of the foot.
Bottom line
The overall response towards the Altra King MT 2 has been welcoming. People are happy that this shoe can take them through the trails with ease. The traction-ready outsole, the breathable upper, and the general durability are highlighted. In this updated model, runners can expect an improved drainage system, as well as enhanced strength and performance.
Fans of neutral running shoes optimized for trails can enjoy the King MT 2."
Under Armour SpeedForm Apollo Vent,,92.0,81.0,195.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.8oz , Women: 6.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"4 reasons to buy
It has a breathable lightweight mesh upper made up of fast-drying fabric.
Expect zero distraction with its SpeedForm technology.
Most testers are impressed with the SpeedForm Apollo Vent molded foot bed that conforms to the shape of your feet and prevents slippage.
Most of the runners love the design of the shoe.
4 reasons not to buy
Most of the runners are disappointed with the shoes’ durability.
Some complaint about the hard plastic on the instep of the shoe that rubs horribly.
Most runners complain that that shoe has a narrow fit.
The contour portion of the shoe causes discomfort especially when you tighten the laces.
Bottom line
The Under Armour Apollo Vent is an affordable and lightweight road companion. It provides the runners the natural feel and great comfort. It is a great minimalist shoe that can still offer stability and support. The shoe is perfect for speed workouts without worrying about slippage."
Brooks Ravenna 6,,93.0,88.0,828.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Brooks Ravenna 11,"7 reasons to buy
The Ravenna 6 is very comfortable to run in, according to most reviews.
There is a very nice blend of support and cushioning as noted by several runners.
A handful of runners with plantar fasciitis welcomed the relief from discomfort after wearing the 6th version of the Ravenna.
Flexibility remains to be quite decent for a shoe with great cushioning and moderate support.
Some runners loved the way the tongue works, as it never slides and offers protection against lace pressure.
A good number of runners marvelled at the smoothness of the ride.
The traction is excellent, noted some users.
3 reasons not to buy
The price point is too high for a shoe with upper durability issues, based on several reviews.
Most of the negative comments were directed at how narrow the toe box is.
More than a few experienced hotspots, particularly in the forefoot.
Bottom line
The Brooks Ravenna 6 sits as an excellent choice for those who are looking for a nice mix of cushioning and support. This Brooks running shoe has all the makings of a solid high-mileage trainer with superb transitions for forays on the road, gravel, and even groomed trail."
Salomon X Mission 2,,92.0,86.0,1358.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Salomon X-Mission 3,"5 reasons to buy
Great traction that that stands out, especially on wet surfaces, according to a large majority of runners.
The 2nd version of the Salomon X Mission offers a roomy toe box that does not only make runners comfortable, but also gives a secure fit.
The X Mission 2 includes a Stretch Air Mesh that maximizes the comfort and breathability of this trail shoe.
Some runners gave credit to its lacing system that lets the laces stay tight throughout the duration of their run.
The Salomon X Mission 2 is a great choice for long distance trail running.
3 reasons not to buy
Has a stiff material that makes the midsole too rigid.
According to a few runners, after a few months of normal wear, the shoe's mesh developed holes on it.
Some of its color combinations are just a bit off.
Bottom line
The Salomon X Mission 2 is a trail running shoe that perfectly caters to the needs of adventurous trail enthusiasts. The shoe received several positive comments from users but there are also who are not happy. Overall, the Salomon is still a reliable lightweight trail companion."
Asics Gel Quantum 180 2 MX,,86.0,,190.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.3oz , Women: 10.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Many consumers considered the Asics Gel Quantum 180 2 MX to be comfortable right out of the box.
The underfoot cushioning system gained positive remarks for being agreeable, even after all-day wear.
Runners mostly thought that this running shoe offered great value for its price.
A person observed that the back parts of the upper and the cushioning unit were steady enough to handle the striking phase of the running cycle.
Based on several reviews, the design was vibrant and cool-looking.
2 reasons not to buy
A few purchasers complained that the fabric of the collar tended to rub against the ankles, causing them to get irritated.
Several wearers claim that the shoe is bulky.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Quantum 180 2 MX gained the favor of road runners, most of whom welcomed its apparently comfortable silhouette, delightful underfoot experience, and affordable price. Inversely, there were those who noted that this neutral shoe’s upper rubbed irritatingly against the ankles and that the sizing scheme was inconsistent."
Hoka One One Stinson 3,,88.0,80.0,178.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
The cushioning system that’s present in the Hoka One One Stinson 3 was generous and efficient, a happy purchaser commented.
The softness of the mid-sole made some testers feel like they were running on clouds.
According to several commenters, the Meta Rocker design was able to help them transition through the gait cycle with ease and comfort.
Many runners appreciated how the mid-sole was able to cushion landing impacts well.
Some consumers reported that they remained secure and comfortable, even after wearing this shoe for long periods of time.
This shoe didn’t cause any strain on the knees and the muscles of the leg and feet, according to a number of wearers.
A good number of runners with lower back, hip, and knee problems were really able to enjoy their runs in this shoe.
Some people who are up on their feet for hours on end really loved the support and cushioning of the 3rd edition of the Stinson.
The RMAT midsole/outsole is amazingly durable.
6 reasons not to buy
Many runners stated that the Hoka One One Stinson 3 was narrow for their feet.
The arch support in this shoe was poor that it seemed to cause some underfoot discomfort for several consumers.
According to a tester, the outsole wasn’t very efficient when it comes to delivering traction.
A consumer reported that this running shoe was unstable to run and walk in; performing in this running shoe apparently sprained his ankle.
The upper wasn’t as breathable as expected, noted a purchaser.
For a few runners, the designs of this version weren’t as appealing as the previous iteration’s.
Bottom line
The response towards the Hoka One One Stinson 3 was generally mixed. Many were able to enjoy the quality of this shoe’s cushioning, as well as its efficient performance. They felt that it was comfortable and enjoyable to use for long periods of time. But there were also consumers who felt that it was a step back from the previous iteration. They reported some issues that prevented from fully appreciating this version."
Saucony Echelon 5,,91.0,83.0,279.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.7oz , Women: 10oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Many reviewers and testers applauded the underfoot comfort that’s given by this 5th version of the Echelon series.
Runners were allured by the contemporary design and the look of the shoe, making it appealing to casual and advanced athletes.
Those with wider feet will be able to get a wider option for this because it has a more accommodating platform.
The individual facets of this running shoe truly speak of its capability to last long and stay sturdy even after many uses.
The plush cushioning was generally appreciated by testers, particularly those who desire more underfoot comfort.
The Echelon 5 is a neutral running shoe that has an intermediate platform with a standard drop of 8mm.
5 reasons not to buy
Some testers said that the platform of the Saucony Echelon 5 was too wide for their tastes.
Others were disappointed at the lack of stability and supportive mechanics that would assist their idle and running stances.
The flexibility of this shoe isn’t too prominent, largely because of its feature-filled sole unit.
A bit pricey.
The Echelon 5 also has an overabundance of overlays.
Bottom line
Great reviews became testaments to the plush cushioning, superb durability and reliable upper wrap that the Echelon 5 offers. It’s created for the neutral runner who doesn’t need stability mechanics, but it’s also great for daily use."
New Balance 860 v5,,94.0,89.0,190.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.7oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, New Balance 860 v10,"10 reasons to buy
The 860 v5 feels very comfortable right out of the box, based on most comments.
The price is well within the normal range for a shoe of this kind.
It has 5 different color combinations.
A good number of runners loved its trendy style.
The mesh is very breathable, according to several reviews.
An additional midfoot loop enhances midfoot security.
Quite a number of overpronators loved the thermoplastic shank beneath the arch.
The cushioning is very noticeable right at the first go, as noted by a handful.
Observation from a group of runners praised the grip of the 5th edition of the 860.
Some mentioned that it can effortlessly be used a casual and everyday footwear.
3 reasons not to buy
A small number of runners experienced tongue slide in this shoe.
Almost non-existent reflectivity coming from a shoe of this price.
The outsole durability is a bit frustrating to some.
Bottom line
The New Balance 860 v5 is a much-sought after trainer because of its superb stability, comfort, and cool looks. Besides the stability, mild to moderate overpronators can get their kicks out of the responsive cushioning, serious traction, and breathable coverage. It is a shoe that nails the right balance between cushioning and stability."
Brooks Ghost 8,,94.0,89.0,1971.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Brooks Ghost 12,"8 reasons to buy
The Brooks Ghost 8 was described as comfortable by many runners who have tried it.
A reviewer wrote that the mid-sole foam delivered just the right amount of cushioning without being too heavy for her feet.
The underfoot platform of this running shoe was able to attenuate impact shock during the landing phase of the gait cycle, noted its testers.
A lot of runners agreed that it was true to its sizing scheme and its available widths.
The outsole rubber gained appreciation because it delivered reliable traction on the pavement.
Many testers commended its components and features because they were sturdy and they didn’t wear off easily.
The upper unit was able to hug the shape of the foot with ease and comfort, wrote some reviewers.
Several runners felt that the toe box of the Brooks Ghost 8 was roomy enough for the toes to relax.
3 reasons not to buy
The shoe laces were a bit short for one tester.
A runner who preferred to run in low-light conditions commented that there wasn’t enough reflective coating on the upper, which was supposed to make the shoe more visible.
Some consumers weren’t able to sit well with the mid-sole, which, for them, was stiff.
Bottom line
The Brooks Ghost 8 impressed runners who needed responsive cushioning and comfortable coverage. Many commended its durability because it lasted a long time and remained efficient through many uses. This road shoe’s mid-sole had some split comments because some runners felt that it was a bit stiff. Still, it became popular among neutral runners and shoe enthusiasts."
Vivobarefoot Ultra 3 Bloom,,85.0,87.0,56.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 6.7oz , Women: 5.3oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The Ultra 3 Bloom was surprisingly relaxing to wear, a satisfied wearer said. Another one mentioned the comfort level was like that of a second skin.
The shoe was very easy to take on or off, even with a wet foot, according to a user.
One runner liked how the algae-based foam upper was very supple.
Several buyers were pleased with the brilliant lacing system of the Ultra 3 Bloom.
Some customers praised the shoe for using vegan materials.
A few buyers stated the shoe was affordable.
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of runners felt the shoe needed a break-in period.
One customer thought the sizing was inaccurate.
Bottom line
Many of the comments received by the Vivobarefoot Ultra 3 Bloom were leaning towards the positive – users liked the ingenious construction and competent features. While some encountered issues about fit and sizing, it was, overall, a success for the Ultra 3 Bloom, as runners felt the shoe was worth the purchase."
Under Armour Charged Bandit 4 Team,,85.0,,140.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Some reviewers mentioned that the shoe fit great and is true to size.
Most testers appreciated the comfort that the platform delivered.
Plenty of users were able to use their pair for different activities – daily use, working out, and walking.
A lot of testers mentioned that the design of the shoe was eye-catching.
The shoe was lightweight which some were glad about.
One runner was happy to share that the insole was removable making the insertion of custom orthotics easier.
6 reasons not to buy
A few users noticed that some areas of the shoe wrinkled up when worn.
One tester mentioned that the shoe felt clunky.
A good number of reviewers noticed that some areas on the upper rubbed on specific spots of the foot which resulted in skin irritation.
One user mentioned that she had to break the shoe in for three days.
Some runners said that the support and cushioning weren’t enough for long-distance running.
A few reviewers were not pleased that the colorways were limited.
One user expressed that the shoe aggravated her knee problem.
Bottom line
The Under Armour Charged Bandit 4 Team is a neutral running road shoe that was used for different purposes. Some reviewers only used it as a daily sneaker. There were also those who used it for light workouts and short runs since many were not convinced that the support it gave was enough for serious running. Despite this, plenty of testers still appreciated the upper’s design. Those who are looking for a good-looking and versatile shoe should check the Under Armour Charged Bandit 4 Team out."
Asics Gel Kayano 26 SP,,95.0,,57.0,,, Road, Stability,,, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The durability of the materials is lauded by those who have tested the Asics Gel Kayano 26 SP.
The bright color schemes of this running shoe are welcomed by most consumers.
Most testers are happy because the stability mechanisms are effective at delivering underfoot stability.
The underfoot experience feels like standing on clouds, based on a handful of reviews.
Impact attenuation is a trait that the midsole of this shoe doles out in spades, according to several purchasers.
2 reasons not to buy
A few consumers believe that the price of a pair of Gel Kayano 26 SPs is a bit expensive.
A couple of people have claimed that the in-shoe experience is a bit too restrictive and irritating to the skin of the foot.
Bottom line
The overall feedback of people towards the Asics Gel Kayano 26 SP has been positive. This stability running shoe apparently offers reliable performances throughout the running session. The underfoot experience is particularly highlighted by many users as the source of steadiness and agreeable steps.
Fans of road running shoes that are for overpronated motion can enjoy the Gel Kayano 26 SP."
Asics GT 1000 5, Asics,88.0,81.0,3306.0,$100,$40 (save 60%), Road, Stability, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Oct 2016," Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Normal, Wide", Asics GT 1000 9,"12 reasons to buy
Amazingly comfortable, according to most of the reviewers.
The GT 1000 5 is significantly lighter than the past model.
It looks better and more sophisticated than the prior version.
The price is very reasonable.
There are 5 different color options.
It is very stable without compromising weight, based on the comments of several runners.
A handful noticed that the toe box has more room in the 5th version of the GT 1000 than earlier editions.
Breathability is excellent, as remarked by more than a few.
The overall support is improved in the 5th iteration of the GT 1000, as observed by several runners.
A small number of runners have used it for gym workouts.
Durability is quite good in this shoe, as reported by more than a few reviewers.
The interior has adequate volume to accommodate different kinds of orthotics, based on the comments of more than a few reviewers.
5 reasons not to buy
A handful noted that it runs a bit small.
A few had to give the shoe a break-in period.
The forefoot is rather tight, according to a small number of runners who have tried the earlier models of this series.
A handful of runners found the 4E and 2E options as too narrow.
Some runners experienced rubbing on their big toes.
Bottom line
The Asics GT 1000 5 is a middle to high-mileage stability trainer that works as designed. While it may not be as popular as some of Asics’ flagship stability shoes, it delivers a firm and responsive ride that slight to moderate overpronators should be very comfortable with. With average price point, runners can expect a durable shoe with lots of comfort and reliability for the rigors of day to day running."
Nike Zoom Pegasus Turbo 2 Rise, Nike,77.0,,8.0,$180,$109 (save 39%), Road, Neutral, Men: 7.2oz , Women: 7.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, May 2019, Normal | Normal,,"9 reasons to buy
According to several runners, Nike Zoom Pegasus Turbo 2 Rise is great for jogging on hard surfaces. 
Purchasers have lauded the ability of this Nike running shoe to support the foot when jumping or doing strenuous activities. 
The lightweight structure of this running shoe can help increase running speed, a couple of consumers observed. 
The shoe is very comfortable and bouncy, said a commenter. 
One reviewer felt that this running gear’s upper unit can hold the foot securely without being restricting.
People appreciated the stylish design of Nike Zoom Pegasus Turbo 2 Rise.
Many buyers expressed that this shoe is perfect for running, walking and workout sessions. Some people also mentioned that its beautiful enough to be used for casual walks. 
A lot of users like the cushioning system of this running companion. The midsole is very soft, making the running experience worthwhile.
A few buyers said that this running companion is worth their money. 
1 reasons not to buy
The upper unit of Nike Zoom Pegasus Turbo 2 Rise showed some signs of tear after normal usage, a tester complained. 
Bottom line
Generally, the consumers' feedback for the Nike Zoom Pegasus Turbo 2 Rise is mostly positive. People praised this neutral running shoe’s cushioning system and lightweight construction. A lot of them also appreciated the shoe’s overall design and responsive performance. The upper section is a  highlighted component because while some say that it can hold the foot securely without being restricting, others disliked that it is not durable enough.  "
Adidas Terrex Agravic XT GTX, Adidas,91.0,86.0,71.0,$200,$85 (save 57%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 12oz , Women: 10.8oz, Men: 7mm , Women: 7mm,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Many users considered the Adidas Terrex Agravic XT GTX to be a comfortable trail running shoe.
According to a commenter, the Terrex Agravic XT GTX was one of the most stylish trail running shoe currently in the market.
The shoe was comfortable enough even for long, brisk walks, a buyer stated.
A lot of customers thought the shoe had a precise fit.
A few runners claimed they were pleased with the lightness of the shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
One runner mentioned that the outsole of the Terrex Agravic XT GTX was too stiff. Another one said it was too rigid to be used in a running shoe.
Some purchasers agreed that the shoe was expensive.
Bottom line
The Adidas Terrex Agravic XT GTX gained positive comments from various trail runners who were impressed with its comfortable fit and reliable features. Many users also enjoyed the waterproofing benefits delivered by the shoe. Although some had criticized the price, the Terrex Agravic XT GTX was a shoe that most buyers considered to be worth the purchase."
Altra Torin 3.5 Knit, Altra,93.0,89.0,144.0,$135,$82 (save 90%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9.1oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm, May 2018," Narrow, Normal | Normal",,"5 reasons to buy
Some people felt that the underfoot experience offered by the Altra Torin 3.5 Knit was soft and responsive.
Wearing this running shoe for long periods didn’t cause any underfoot discomfort, according to several work-focused shoe enthusiasts.
The toe box was deliberated to be sufficiently spacious enough for natural toe-splay.
The durability of the upper unit was lauded; the material apparently didn’t tear apart as quickly as the previous models’ fabrics.
People liked that this shoe felt lightweight for extended use and casual purposes.
3 reasons not to buy
The knit material on the upper unit was considered to be a bit warm compared to standard mesh.
The ankle collar caused some skin irritation, according to some testers.
A few consumers observed the blown rubber outsole getting torn after only several weeks of use.
Bottom line
Most consumers were happy with the performance of the Altra Torin 3.5 Knit. This neutral road shoe covered most of the basics when it comes to efficient foot apparel for daily use: a lightweight configuration, a roomy toe box, a responsive underfoot platform, and appealing aesthetics. Several complaints were noted, including a blister-causing collar and a not-so-durable outsole."
Puma Ignite EvoKNIT, Puma,91.0,83.0,180.0,$130,$43 (save 67%), Road, Neutral, Men: 11.9oz , Women: 10.1oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm, Jul 2016, Normal | Normal, Puma Ignite EvoKNIT 2,"9 reasons to buy
A majority of the reviews noted how it feels really good right out of the box the Ignite EvoKNIT is.
Several were highly-appreciative of the shoe’s excellent color combinations.
The latest upper design from Puma offers a sock-like fit like never before in its line.
Outsole durability is one of its best features, based on the comments of several runners.
The Puma Ignite EvoKNIT works well for gym workouts, according to a handful of users.
A handful of runners were impressed by the traction of this shoe, even in wet conditions.
Some reviewers were pleasantly surprised by the flexible sole.
The awesome style makes it a very popular casual or lifestyle shoe, according to a large number of reviewers.
There are several color options and combinations to choose from.
4 reasons not to buy
The Puma EvoKNIT is quite expensive.
More than a few noted that it lacks the support they need as a running shoe.
It feels a bit sloppy, according to some runners.
There were others who badly wanted different width options.
Bottom line
Puma jumps into the latest craze among shoe companies, which is the production of premium knit-like upper. In the Ignite EvoKNIT, runners are in for a shoe that tries to mix fashion and sports featuring an innovative mid-height upper that hugs the foot unlike previously provided by Puma. It has enough arch support, a surprisingly flexible ride, and tons of comfort for those looking for a stylish shoe that shines up to 10Ks."
Mizuno Wave Prophecy 9, Mizuno,83.0,,10.0,$210,$155 (save 38%), Road, Neutral, Men: 13.2oz , Women: 11.3oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
Many consumers testified that the Mizuno Wave Prophecy 9 is comfortable. 
Several runners appreciated the shoe’s durability. 
It offers great shock absorption, according to some commenters. 
This shoe is also suitable for everyday use, based on reviews. 
A lot of buyers recommended this shoe because of its cushioning performance. 
People appreciated this shoe’s stylish design. 
The shoe is flexible, said some reviewers.
2 reasons not to buy
A few users noted that the shoe is heavier compared to other running shoes. 
The shoe is a bit expensive, according to a few buyers.
Bottom line
The Mizuno Wave Prophecy 9 is a high performance running shoe that is ideal for long-distance runs. It is made up of highly durable materials, aiming to provide a dynamic and protective platform. This shoe is designed to support runners and athletes with neutral gaits or those who do not overpronate. Its stylish design is also suitable for daily use and casual walks. "
Reebok Hexaffect Run 4.0 MTM,,84.0,,48.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 3mm , Women: 3mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
A few runners mentioned that the Hexaffect Run 4.0 MTM is quite comfortable.
The price is wallet-friendly.
A handful noted that the cushioning is good for long runs.
Some reviews mentioned that it looks more sophisticated than the earlier version.
A small group of users used it for gym workouts.
2 reasons not to buy
Quite a small number remarked that it is a bit heavy.
Outsole durability is questionable, according to a few.
Bottom line
The Hexaffect Run 4.0 MTM is a level-entry shoe that blends style with functionality. It is a reliable trainer that has decent arch support, soft cushioning, and plush interior. This is a no-fuss kind of shoe that is quite versatile as it can be a good option for gym days. The very affordable price makes it a ready option for those looking for a serviceable trainer with lots of comfort."
New Balance 510 v2,,82.0,,625.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 9.1oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"4 reasons to buy
Highly affordable, thus, perfect for runners who are budget-conscious.
The 510 v2 enables runners to run the challenging trail and mountain roads as it is very comfortable, according to some testers.
Other than the trails, this shoe is suitable for other on and off-road terrains since it features the AT Tread® all-terrain outsole.
An injection molded EVA material covers the midsole section that creates and provides better support and cushioning when running.
3 reasons not to buy
The New Balance 510 v2 is not suitable for runners with slightly wider feet.
Not the ideal shoe to use for long hours and long distances since it is heavy.
A few runners say that the shoe’s insole is terrible and provides very little cushioning.
Bottom line
The 2nd version of the New Balance 510 is a trail running shoe that is recommended for runners with medium to high arches. It is a workhorse trainer that can slog through very challenging and uneven terrains. The shoe has received negative and positive reviews from users. In summary, the 510 v2 has still some room for improvement."
Saucony Peregrine 6,,92.0,86.0,217.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.4oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Saucony Peregrine 10,"7 reasons to buy
It is a lightweight shoe that provides flexibility, especially in the mid-sole section.
Most runners were impressed with the durable outsole of the Peregrine 6.
The 6th version comes with a mesh material that is comfortable and non-irritable to the skin.
Reflective sections improve the visibility of this shoe in low lighting conditions.
The premium sock liner of this footwear has anti-odor and anti-microbial properties.
It has an improved cushioning system that greatly surpasses the previous versions.
The trail-specific build of the Saucony Peregrine 6 makes it ideal for treks on the unpredictable paths.
3 reasons not to buy
Runners usually complain of having blisters because of its back heel plate, especially when climbing hills.
The shoe has a moderately high price tag.
There were runners who wanted the Saucony Peregrine 6 to have a bit of stability for proper foot pronation and support for the arch.
Bottom line
The Peregrine 6 is a running shoe that’s created for the various off-road trails. It is a running shoe that is designed for taking on the harsh nature of the outside environment. It’s sturdy, reliable and comfortable to wear. It’s a great running shoe for neutral runners."
Nike Flex 2016 RN Shield,,91.0,,606.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.2oz , Women: 6.5oz, Men: 7mm , Women: 7mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Most users were so impressed by the comfortable feel of the Nike Flex 2016 RN Shield.
A large number of users also wear this shoe to the gym.
A majority of the reviews mentioned how stylish and cool the shoe looks.
Runners generally thought that this shoe was suitably lightweight.
The upper adjusts to the runners’ feet very well, based on a few observations from users.
The water resistant upper of this version of the Nike Flex 2016 RN is geared for inclement weather running
According to a few reviewers, the traction capability of the outsole is efficient, even in wet conditions.
Some testers noted that it has an affordable price.
3 reasons not to buy
It runs narrow, according to a significant number of users.
A handful of runners experienced rubbing in their heels.
The outsole is a rock magnet, as observed by a moderate number of users.
Bottom line
Nike consistently comes up with shoes that push the boundaries between lifestyle and sports. In the Flex 2016 RN Shield, Nike delivers a lightweight shoe that offers reliable performance with the kind of looks that are usually associated with many of its most expensive and popular shoes. This has a water-resistant upper to go along with a very comfortable ride and just enough arch support. It has already gained a huge following, especially for those who are looking for an affordable, but a seriously good-looking shoe with just enough performance on the road."
On Cloud 50/50,,83.0,,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.5oz , Women: 6.5oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The lightweight structure of the On Cloud 50/50 has received many positive reviews from consumers.
According to several testers, the interior of this On running shoe is roomy enough to secure the foot without being too restrictive.
The underfoot cushioning system is praised for being responsive and comfortable.
Most purchasers have welcomed the unique visual design of this running shoe, stating that the pod-like sole unit and the split color scheme of the upper are eye-catching.
Some reviewers commented on the efficacy of the upper unit, noting that the fabrics are breathable enough to allow for all-day wear.
The flexibility of this shoe is valued by people who like the encouragement of their natural movement capacity.
1 reasons not to buy
Rocks tend to get wedged into the holes of each of the CloudTec® pods.
Bottom line
The overall reaction for the On Cloud 50/50 is exceptionally favorable. Those who have tested this neutral running shoe appreciate the lightweight and non-restrictive construction, as well as its comfortable and flexible underfoot experience. Moreover, its appealing and breathable design is highlighted as a selling point. On the other hand, some users have lamented the stone-sucking gaps that are prominent in the CloudTec® pods.
Those who are fans of stylistic running shoes that are for neutral pronation and the roads are likely to welcome the On Cloud 50/50 to their rotation."
Newton Distance S 9, Newton,91.0,92.0,7.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 6.8oz, Men: 2mm , Women: 2mm,," Narrow, Normal | Normal, Wide",,"7 reasons to buy
A significant number of users said that the Newton Distance S 9 is comfortable.
Some testers agreed that the shoe is stable.
Based on the reviews, the road running shoe is responsive.
It is supportive, according to those who have tried it. 
Many consumers love its lightweight structure.
According to those who have bought it, the shoe is durable.
Several buyers admire its snug fit.
2 reasons not to buy
Some users wish for more color options to choose from.
A few consumers commented that the Newton Distance S 9 is not stylish and fashionable.
Bottom line
This road running shoe, the Distance S 9, was well-loved by the majority of the users who have tested it. Many of them felt that the responsiveness, comfort level, and lightweight structure of the shoe helped them in improving their performance. With the utilization of materials and technologies incorporated in the outsole, midsole, and upper section of the shoe, quality, and enjoyable runs were experienced by most users. The fit, durability, and stability it provides during the running session were highlighted as key contributors to the success of this release from Newton."
Skechers Flex Appeal,,93.0,86.0,1780.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,, Skechers Flex Appeal 2.0,"7 reasons to buy
Synthetic overlays offer a bit more customized fit as they react to the adjustments done on the lacing system.
Runners generally welcomed the padded tongue and collar, which present a more security for the foot.
A Memory Foam insole is added to help the Flex Appeal to acclimate more to the shape of the runner’s foot.
Reviewers appreciated the FlexSole, a lightweight midsole, which ensures shock absorption and responsive cushioning.
According to some runners, the Skechers Flex Appeal feels light and fast, making it ideal for competition.
The soft fabric lining impressed some runners since it provides a more comfortable and irritation-free environment.
Available in 4 different colorways.
2 reasons not to buy
This shoe is exclusively made for women, so male runners won’t be able to enjoy this comfortable running shoe.
A few noted that the Memory Foam made the underfoot platform a bit stiff.
Bottom line
The Skechers Flex Appeal managed to get impressive remarks from users. Several admired the shoe's lightweight design, responsive midsole, and comfortable fit. It received very little criticism, but the users believe there is still room for improvement. Overall, many users considered the Flex Appeal a successful release. It is a solid footwear for women who want to gain as much comfort and protection when they run or do any athletic activity. It looks great and it functions well for neutral runners."
Skechers GOrun 5, Skechers,93.0,85.0,256.0,$100,$26 (save 100%), Road, Neutral, Men: 7.5oz , Women: 6oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm, Jan 2017, Normal | Normal, Skechers GOrun 7+,"9 reasons to buy
A lot of consumers agreed that the Skechers GOrun 5 looked appealing.
Many testers wrote that this shoe felt comfortable to their feet.
It felt adequately lightweight, commented several runners.
Some purchasers have used it for casual purposes; they noted that it remained efficient and capable throughout.
The general durability of this running shoe was lauded by a number of runners.
The mid-sole felt a bit softer and more responsive than its predecessor, a tester reported.
A user wrote that the underfoot platform was suitably flexible.
The Quick Fit pull-tab gained some positive recognition because it made putting on and removing the shoe much easier.
Several reviewers lauded the upper unit’s supportive and breathable nature.
2 reasons not to buy
The outsole grip wasn’t able to satisfy several reviewers; to them, it felt lacking.
It was a bit narrow in the midfoot section, according to a consumer.
Bottom line
The Skechers GOrun 5 was welcomed by a lot of those who have tried it. They liked its comfortable construction, its colorful design, and its apparently impressive mid-sole foam unit. Casual shoe enthusiasts also enjoyed this running shoe. Inversely, there were complaints about it being a bit narrow; traction seemed to be inconsistent, too."
Adidas Springblade 3.0, Adidas,74.0,66.0,489.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 13.1oz , Women: 12oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The 16 polymer blades are an eye-catching design unlike any other.
The Springbade 3.0 comes in different color schemes for exceptional variety.
Some runners noted that it has decent propulsion.
Several runners loved the comfort that the Adidas Springblade 3.0 offers.
A few testers liked its flexibility.
The Springblade 3.0 is ready for a run right out of the box, based on the observation of a handful of runners.
It looks great according to some reviews.
4 reasons not to buy
An ounce or two off of the weighing scale would have made the Springblade 3.0 more appealing, performance-wise.
It is expensive.
Runs a bit small.
Accidental contact with the blades may cut the runner.
Bottom line
Adidas’ use of a mechanical midsole is something that has been done before. What makes the Springblade series stand out is how aesthetically-pleasing the 16 blades are. Most of the runners did not find any dramatic difference in this concept, which still means great, but douses cold water on the company’s claim of unmatched propulsion. The Springblade 3.0 is a neutral running shoe that has sufficient arch support, superior comfort, and out of this world fashion style."
Hoka One One Infinite,,86.0,82.0,375.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"4 reasons to buy
The Hoka One One Infinite is breathable as mentioned in some reviews.
Some testers applauded the generous amount of cushioning for impact protection.
Based on some reviews, the shoe provides impressive durability.
The shoe has enough room for toe splay.
2 reasons not to buy
The Infinite is not comfortable enough for long runs as mentioned in some reviews.
It is available in slightly expensive price.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Infinite provides a great combination of stability, cushioning and durability. This road running shoe features a wider platform to accommodate a wide range of foot sizes. This shoe is ideal for daily running and short-distant runs.The Hoka One One Infinite provides a great combination of stability, cushioning and durability. This road running shoe features a wider platform to accommodate a wide range of foot sizes. This shoe is ideal for daily running and short-distant runs."
Saucony Excursion TR 11, Saucony,90.0,,599.0,$70,$50 (save 29%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 9.8oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,," Normal, Wide | Normal, Wide", Saucony Excursion TR 14,"6 reasons to buy
The majority lauded the high comfortability of the Saucony Excursion TR 11.
Many users admired the glove-like fit of the footwear which prevented their feet from sliding uncomfortably inside the shoe.
Several runners commented that the shoe was fairly light which helped them in doing extra miles easily.
According to the majority, the shoe had a sturdy and durable build.
A few runners said that they liked the color choices of this latest version of the Saucony Excursion TR.
Some purchasers mentioned that the shoe was really breathable which made their rides on the trails more fun.
2 reasons not to buy
For a few users, the sides of the shoe started to tear after some days.
A runner mentioned that the shoe’s outsole performed very poorly, especially on wet surfaces.
Bottom line
The Saucony Excursion TR 11 has caught the attention of many professionals in the running community owing to its sturdy build, optimal cushioning and a decent choice of colors. The shoe also has a flexible insole which allows the runner to adopt the natural running gait without having to compromise on the shoe’s quality."
Inov-8 Mudclaw G 260, Inov-8,87.0,92.0,14.0,$150,$120 (save 33%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,," Narrow, Normal | Narrow, Normal",,"6 reasons to buy
The upper unit of the Inov-8 Mudclaw G 260 was considered to be supportive and protective.
Reviewers liked the outsole unit of this running shoe, emphasizing the sturdy and grippy nature of the lugs.
Many runners claimed that the foot remained steady on the trails, thanks to the even and stable placement of the aggressive outsole.
The underfoot cushioning was appreciated because it provided comfort throughout the run.
The color scheme and the design were lauded; runners thought that the aesthetics were spot-on.
The lightweight nature of this product was praised by a lot of those who have tried it.
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of users say the shoe's upper tend to crease around the top of the forefoot area causing some discomfort.
The shoe's tongue is quite short when first laced up, commented one tester.
Bottom line
The Inov-8 Mudclaw G 260 was welcomed by many off-road running enthusiasts and competitive athletes who enjoy obstacle course racing. The underfoot platform was said to be comfortable while the outsole was praised for being highly efficient. The design and construction of the façade were also given high regard. There were some issues with the upper, but people didn’t let that become a deterrent to the overall experience."
Asics Gel Nimbus Lite, Asics,90.0,90.0,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 13mm, Feb 2020," Narrow, Normal | Normal",,"8 reasons to buy
People are pleased with how comfortable the Asics Gel Nimbus Lite was. 
Many consumers are satisfied with the overall quality of the shoe. 
This running shoe is fast and lightweight, according to a lot of runners. 
A few reviewers mentioned that this running companion is breathable. 
Several wearers testified that this shoe is responsive. 
The recycled upper is built to last, a buyer claimed. 
It offers a soft and bouncy ride, based on reviews. 
A purchaser noted that the Asics Nimbus Lite is suitable for both slow and tempo runs.
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of users complained that the Asics Nimbus Lite is a bit tight. 
One tester described the shoe as overly flexible.
Bottom line
Featuring an eco-friendly design and excellent bounce-back properties, the Asics Gel Nimbus Lite is a lightweight running shoe created to provide a soft and responsive ride. It is made from a combination of recycled materials and Asics’ cutting-edge technologies, which are working together to deliver lasting comfort, breathability, flexibility, and durability. This shoe is ideal for runners and trainers with neutral gaits or those who do not overpronate."
Adidas Supernova ST, Adidas,90.0,73.0,456.0,$130,$84 (save 35%), Road, Stability, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Mar 2017," Normal | Normal, Wide",,"6 reasons to buy
The looks of the Adidas Supernova ST gained positive feedback from many of those who have tried it.
Runners generally described their time wearing this shoe as ‘comfortable’.
Consumers welcomed the option to choose from a variety of colorways.
The entire shoe felt suitably lightweight, according to those who have tried it.
The stable platform was apparently able to help those with pronation concerns.
The outsole’s grip capability received praise for being efficient on the asphalt.
2 reasons not to buy
A runner reported some slipping in the ankle area due to apparently getting less support from the collar.
The midsole's boost™ wasn’t as noticeable a feature as expected, according to a tester.
Bottom line
The Adidas Supernova ST was able to impress many of those who have tested it. Runners were generally satisfied with its performance, its features and its stability mechanics. They thought that it was efficient on the roads. But there were some who weren’t able to acclimate well to it, reporting some quirks in its design and components."
Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 34 FlyEase, Nike,90.0,,322.0,$110,$61 (save 90%), Road, Neutral, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Nov 2017," Normal, X-Wide | Normal, Wide", Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 35 FlyEase,"5 reasons to buy
The availability of both a medium and wide width options was well-liked by broad-footed purchasers.
The zipper system of the heel section helped in securing the foot and allowing a comfortable on-and-off experience, based on a handful of reviews.
A couple of consumers welcomed the stylish design of the Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 34 FlyEase.
A few admired the shoe's lightweight construction.
According to a few user reviews, the upper is breathable.
4 reasons not to buy
Some runners observed that the outsole didn’t give adequate traction; it apparently caused some slipping, even on mildly wet surfaces.
Many testers lamented the non-adjustable lacing system of the Pegasus 34 FlyEase, which caused the fit to be too loose.
The underfoot platform had a curve that caused the shoe to tilt back and up in an awkward manner, a person reported.
Some people felt the outline of the zipper rubbing against the skin uncomfortably.
Bottom line
The Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 34 FlyEase didn’t leave a completely good impression on many runners. While some liked the multiple width options, the unique zipper construction at the heel, and the stylish looks, many weren’t very optimistic about the change. They claimed that the FlyEase bungee-cord-and-zipper system diminished the potential of a secure fit."
New Balance 1500 v2,,88.0,87.0,147.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 7.9oz , Women: 6.7oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,, New Balance 1500 v6,"7 reasons to buy
It is an outstanding shoe according to some testers.
It has a lot of cushioning for a racing shoe as commented by some reviewers.
There is no need for inserts, which is quite different from other running shoes as what some runners say.
It has just the right amount of cushioning that is perfect for marathons.
It gives a nice, glove-like fit that enhances the feeling of comfort, according to a handful of runners.
It feels fast and responsive with the Revlite midsole technology, based on the observation of the same testers.
The roomy toe box was appreciated by few runners.
3 reasons not to buy
The logo printed on the insole fades out quickly and leaves residue around the insole is one complaint mentioned by some runners.
The low ground feel in the arch area is not pleasant because it gives a hard feel that hurts the foot as noted by a few testers.
Some runners have durability issues with the shoe especially when used for long distance runs.
Bottom line
The New Balance 1500 v2 is a racing flat that offers a closer ground feel that is comfortable enough for long distances. When it comes to protection, support, and great fit, this shoe has it all, making it a popular shoe to many runners."
,,,87.0,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 8.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,
Hoka One One Clifton 4, Hoka One One,88.0,82.0,1208.0,$130,$125 (save 4%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9.3oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm, Jul 2017," Normal, Wide | Normal, Wide", Hoka One One Clifton 6,"11 reasons to buy
Most users are pleased with the updates made on the Clifton 4.
A number of users said that the shoe is ideal for long-distance running and training.
Several users commented that this new version is more comfortable than its predecessor.
One user said that he felt like the shoe is well made and looks durable.
The shoe offered more support than the previous version said some reviewers.
The update on the design was gladly welcomed by a majority of runners.
Most reviewers said that running in the shoe did not cause them pain despite having foot and knee problems.
A majority of reviewers mentioned that the shoe fits true to size.
One tester was appreciative of the high arch support the shoe provided.
Most users said that there is enough room in the toe box.
A lot of runners agree that the shoe is very comfortable.
5 reasons not to buy
One runner mentioned that the arch on the midfoot felt too high. This caused a bit of pressure on his instep, resulting in a blister.
After 200 miles, a user said that he felt the cushioning of the shoe disappear. As a result, he experienced a bit of pain during his long runs.
The shoe felt stiffer compared to its former version, according to a few testers.
Some users mentioned that the ride on this new shoe version was much harder.
A few users voiced their opinions about the shoe not having the amount of cushioning that they expected.
Bottom line
The Clifton 4 is a moderately priced, neutral road running shoe that has received premium updates from Hoka One One. The comfort and in-shoe feel has been reinvigorated and so has the ride and the rebound of the shoe. Overall, this latest version of the Clifton will be at the top of the list of both Hoka fans and new users."
Nike Air Zoom Structure 20, Nike,89.0,84.0,94.0,$120,$100 (save 17%), Road, Stability, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 9.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Sep 2016," Normal, X-Wide | Normal", Nike Air Zoom Structure 22,"9 reasons to buy
The Nike Air Zoom Structure 20 is very breathable and comfortable to wear, as mentioned in some reviews.
Some runners highlighted the good stability feature of the shoe.
A significant number of users liked the shoe’s soft but responsive cushioning.
The shoe has a durable outsole.
It comes in different color options.
It is available in wide and extra wide widths.
The luxurious inner sleeve is mentioned in a couple of reviews as the feature that provides most of the comfort and added level of support.
A handful of users loved the adequate volume of the toe box.
The new Flymesh delivers support and comfort, according to some reviewers.
3 reasons not to buy
A few number of runners experienced heel slippage.
No reflectivity for low-visibility running.
A handful noted that the 20th version of the Structure isn’t as friendly to serious overpronators as the previous model.
Bottom line
The Nike Air Zoom Structure 20 is a reasonably-priced shoe best for road and light trail running. The shoe gained mixed reviews, but the negative comments are not significant enough to overshadow the positive ones. Delivering a good combination of breathability, comfort, and durability, this shoe is a great choice for long and easy runs."
Topo Athletic MT-2, Topo Athletic,93.0,87.0,53.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7.3oz, Men: 3mm , Women: 3mm, Nov 2015, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Some runners commented that the shoe was flexible, breathable and grippy.
A good number of reviewers mentioned that the Topo Athletic MT-2 was best for rod and rugged trail running sessions.
According to some testers, the was comfortable and lightweight.
A lot of consumers loved the roomy toe box of the shoe.
Several buyers said that the shoe had an agreeable fit, especially for those who have narrow feet.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners experienced outsole durability issues. It easily tore apart after only several uses.
A tester mentioned that the shoe retained water when soaked. It took a couple of days before it totally dried.
Bottom line
A lot of runners were impressed with the Topo Athletic MT-2’s breathability and flexibility. It was also lightweight and comfortable to use, according to them. The roomy toe box and the secure fit also gained praise. Although some users were disappointed with the ostensibly inconsistent durability of the outsole, this shoe was still able to gain recognition as a solid option for rugged trail running activities."
Adidas Supernova Trail, Adidas,90.0,84.0,21.0,$140,$85 (save 39%), Trail, Stability,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
The Supernova Trail gripped well on muddy surfaces, said a reviewer.
The shoe enabled a stable stride despite its minimal weight, a wearer commented.
A user praised the shoe’s performance under any weather.
The dual-density midsole of the Supernova Trail delivered comfort and support simultaneously, a satisfied user noted. Another mentioned that is offered enduring comfort during long-distance runs.
Many runners found the outsole to be durable and ideal for technical trails.
The shoe has an overall padded feel which helped relieve leg pains, a buyer remarked.
Some users agreed regarding the sturdiness of the upper.
1 reasons not to buy
The mesh of the Supernova Trail was less ventilated compared to other trail running shoes from Adidas, according to a reviewer.
Bottom line
The Adidas Supernova Trail is a reliable stability shoe. Many users were pleased with the Adidas Supernova Trail, citing positive remarks about its useful features, comfort level, and reliable performance. With very little criticism, the Supernova Trail has proven to be a fantastic trail running shoe."
Asics Gel Super J33 2, Asics,86.0,80.0,72.0,$100,$65 (save 35%), Road, Stability, Men: 7.3oz , Women: 6.2oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
The Open Mesh upper offers breathable coverage that’s comfortable and lightweight.
A Seamless Construction ensures a sock-like fit, which is great when the runner chooses to wear the shoe without socks.
The Gel Cushioning System in the heel area affords shock absorption when landing the foot on the road.
The Solyte mid-sole unit offers responsive cushioning with heightened durability based on the remarks of several runners.
A Guidance Line improves the efficacy of the gait while Flex Grooves encourage the natural movement of the foot.
The AHAR or Asics High Abrasion Rubber provides a durable layer of protection in the outsole, according to a handful of testers.
The average weight lets men and women acclimate well to the shoe as it doesn’t drag them down.
2 reasons not to buy
There were runners who experienced the upper unit get torn after a few uses.
A few noted that the insole wasn’t able to add comfort to their feet and that the upper skidded with the ends of their toes.
Bottom line
The Gel Super J33 2 from Asics offers lightweight performance to runners who need it. It’s a running shoe that can work well when it comes to tempo training. Some stability mechanics allow it to support the gait of the wearer, making it ideal for many activities."
Nike Wild Trail,,87.0,70.0,260.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 7.2oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The upper of the Wild Trail is made up of leather and soft textiles for support and breathable coverage.
Most reviewers welcomed the trail-ready upper, which composed of a gusseted tongue and the Ghillie lacing system for staving off debris.
The heel and toe areas have been reinforced to improve protection and durability against debris.
The mid-sole features dual-density Phylon, which is a premium cushioning system that can function well for trail runners.
The outsole unit has flex grooves and gripping lugs, which are able to provide flexibility and grip onto the surfaces, respectively.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners thought that it was a bit too narrow for their feet.
A few noticed that the sides of the upper began to peel off after a few uses.
Bottom line
The Wild Trail from Nike has been tested and appreciated by many a trail runner and hiker because of its robust midsole, reliable outsole, and comfortable upper. It’s a trail shoe that can do a lot of service for its wearer for many hiking and running sessions."
Adidas Nova Flow, Adidas,85.0,,6.0,$65,$15 (save 99%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 7.8oz,,,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
People have noted that the overall design and material construction of the Adidas Nova Flow make it versatile.
The cushioning system of this product is lauded by several users.
The price is said to be wallet-friendly, with some stating that the Nova Flow is an agreeable yet cheap running shoe.
Runners are generally happy with the breathability of the upper unit.
The surface grip that is afforded by the outsole unit is welcomed by purchasers.
2 reasons not to buy
The forefoot section of this product is restrictive, according to some users.
Several testers lament the absence of some arch support for comfortable, all-day runs.
Bottom line
Anyone can enjoy the Nova Flow. This product is a neutral pronator’s companion that can be used for any task. The silhouette follows the sporty look of most of Adidas’ options, with an upper that is uncluttered yet secured by synthetic prints and a midsole that offers lightweight and responsive cushioning. The rubber-shielded external pad has been slightly deconstructed to heighten impact attenuation while also encouraging smooth heel-to-toe motion."
,,,76.0,,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral,,, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,
Asics Gel Kayano 26 MX, Asics,92.0,,34.0,$160,$96 (save 40%), Road, Stability,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
Support: The majority of the reviewers express that the Asics Gel Kayano 26 MX is supportive. 
Comfort: This running companion is comfortable, according to a lot of users. 
Durability: Several buyers have testified that this shoe is built to last. 
Upper: The form-fitting upper has gained favor from many satisfied wearers. 
Weight: Some runners said that the shoe is fast and lightweight. 
Cushioning: Numerous buyers observe that the Gel Kayano 26 MX offers excellent cushioning. 
Style: Multiple consumers love the stylish design of this running partner.
2 reasons not to buy
Fit: A couple of users feel that the Asics Gel Kayano 26 MX is a bit tight. 
Price: A few commenters think that this shoe is too expensive.
Bottom line
Featuring a contemporary design, the Asics Gel Kayano 26 MX offers a balance of style and performance. This running shoe is equipped with stability features, which help minimize the impact of overpronation while guiding the foot for a more efficient toe off. It is suitable for consumers seeking a comfortable and durable stability running shoe."
Skechers GOrun MaxRoad 3 Ultra,,87.0,75.0,33.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.9oz , Women: 6.7oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
A lot of consumers welcome the lightweight configuration of the Skechers GOrun MaxRoad 3 Ultra, stating they can enjoy speedy performances because of it.
Some runners have observed that the underfoot cushioning has a springiness that’s reliable and consistent.
The max cushioning unit of this running shoe has gained some fans who appreciate extra support that accommodates the calves, the knees, and the joints.
The upper unit of the GOrun MaxRoad 3 Ultra has a bevy of runners lauding its softness and breathability.
When it comes to size, people generally feel that this product is adherent to the regular expectations.
1 reasons not to buy
Several testers don’t like the aesthetics of this running shoe, claiming that the colors and the overall design are bland and uninteresting.
Bottom line
The overall feedback for the Skechers GOrun MaxRoad 3 Ultra is welcoming. Those who have tested this road running shoe appreciate its reactive and pleasant underfoot experience, as well as its breathable upper and accommodating in-shoe hug. On the other hand, the visual aspect apparently held a low bar compared to many other options in the market.
Roadsters and fans of neutral running shoes are the ones who are welcome to enjoy this product from Skechers."
On Cloudrunner, On,90.0,86.0,70.0,$150,$109 (save 27%), Road, Neutral, Men: 11.7oz , Women: 10.3oz, Men: 7mm , Women: 7mm,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
First thing runners noticed was the extra room around the toes, which is good for wider feet.
The Cloudrunner is built for multiple uses: for endurance, for triathlon, and for races.
Attractive aesthetics as observed by many testers.
The On Cloudrunner has great and quality feel according to many runners.
The CloudTec really gives that enjoyable cloud-like feeling when running, according to many runners who already tested it.
Springiness is felt during runs.
The overall construction is of high quality.
4 reasons not to buy
Protection in the heel area is lacking as complained by testers.
Laces that are too long are not ideal in a running shoe.
Stability is also lacking in the Cloudrunner.
A bit pricey.
Bottom line
The ON Cloudrunner is a multi-purpose running shoe built on the CloudTec technology. It offers comfort and style while holding up short or long runs on road trails. The combination of impressive aesthetics with the technologies used resulted in a very appealing shoe. A possible deal-breaker is the price, which is a bit high for many runners."
Adidas Terrex Skychaser GTX, Adidas,95.0,92.0,385.0,$200,$182 (save 24%), Trail, Stability, Men: 12.5oz , Women: 11oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm, Mar 2016, Normal | Normal,,"8 reasons to buy
The runners who have tried the Adidas Terrex Skychaser GTX generally appreciated the inclusion of GORE-TEX® waterproof fabric in the upper unit.
Wearing this running shoe felt very comfortable, noted a lot of testers.
This product was visually appealing, according to several consumers.
The boost™ mid-sole received some praise from runners who stated that it was aptly responsive and reliable.
The supportive mid-sole add-on kept the foot stable and secure, commented several purchasers.
According to a number of testers, this shoe had a suitably lightweight nature.
‘Comfortable’ was a word that was used to describe this shoe and its performance.
The trail-optimized outsole gained the favor of trail runners; they wrote that it was precise and dependable.
2 reasons not to buy
A runner commented that it lacked flexibility; for them, it was stiff and unwieldy.
The bottom sole came off after only three months of use, reported a disgruntled purchaser.
Bottom line
Feedback for the Adidas Terrex Skychaser GTX was generally positive. Those who needed more support during their trail running sessions claimed that it was really able to function responsibly and surely. For many of them, it was a surprising product that’s reliable and efficient."
361 Degrees Kroozer, 361 Degrees,81.0,,24.0,$40,$30 (save 25%), Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 10oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,," Normal, Wide | Normal, Wide",,"8 reasons to buy
A couple of reviewers stated that the 361 Degrees Kroozer is very comfortable to wear for running, walking, and non-strenuous activities. 
One tester commented that this running gear was able to maintain a brand-new look even after several hundred miles. 
Several runners mentioned that this running partner feels light and fast. 
Many people noted that the midsole unit of this road running shoe is very responsive to the foot and offers just the right amount of cushioning.
The 361 Degrees Kroozer offers excellent arch support, a consumer claimed. 
Some users love the stylish design of the shoe. 
The toe box was lauded by a few buyers for being able to keep the pebbles out of this running companion.
Runners were happy because the price of 361 Degrees Kroozer was affordable.
2 reasons not to buy
One commenter, who prefer flat shoelaces, dislike the round shoelaces of the 361 Degrees Kroozer. 
One reviewer mentioned that the forefoot feels a bit narrow.
Bottom line
Runners have testified about the excellent performance of the 361 Degrees Kroozer. The running gear has amazed many users with the level of comfort and support it provides. People are also happy with the shoe’s stylish design, affordability, durability, cushioning quality and lightweight construction. Only a few testers complained about the shoelaces and narrow forefoot section.  "
New Balance Fresh Foam Lazr Sport, New Balance,74.0,50.0,405.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm, Mar 2018," Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Normal, Wide",,"5 reasons to buy
Several consumers reported that the New Balance Fresh Foam Lazr Sport was well-built.
The midsole unit was appreciated because it was flexible and responsive.
The design and color schemes of this model appealed to many runners.
Many people liked the price of this running shoe.
Most of those who tried this model commented that its weight was adequately light.
3 reasons not to buy
Some people stated that the close-fitting midfoot section tended to destabilize the foot’s position on the ground.
Several heavyset consumers lamented the midsole’s incapacity to support their weight.
The back part of the upper rubbed against the ankle uncomfortably, a runner complained.
Bottom line
The New Balance Fresh Foam Lazr Sport was much appreciated by consumers who wanted a great-looking neutral shoe for their daily activities. Its sturdiness was lauded, as well as its versatile construction. Moreover, the price was considered to be accommodating. On the other hand, some weren’t very happy with this road shoe, emphasizing an abrasive heel fabric and an inconsistent underfoot experience."
,,,88.0,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,
Mizuno Wave Creation 21,,92.0,,35.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 13.6oz , Women: 11.6oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Many users commented that the Mizuno Wave Creation 21 is comfortable to use.
A lot of the testers mentioned that the shoe is lightweight in structure.
Based on customer ratings, the running footwear is flexible.
Several reviewers noted that the shoe adapts perfectly to the foot.
The majority of the consumers agreed that the shoe has excellent quality.
Most of the buyers said that the shoe is best used for hiking and everyday wear.
2 reasons not to buy
One of the purchasers commented that the shoe is slippery on wet floors.
A tester complained that the Mizuno Wave Creation 21 feels tight during the running activity.
Bottom line
In general, a significant number of users were satisfied with how the Mizuno Wave Creation 21 was constructed. A lot of them considered it as a lightweight and comfortable running footwear. With the technologies and features integrated into the shoe, excellent quality is experienced by the users. They appreciate the materials utilized in making the shoe, helping the users to perform well in their various activities. Although some have issues with its fit and grip, others still recommend the shoe because of its adaptability and flexibility. Many agreed to recommend the shoe to those who are looking for a perfect partner in the roads.
 "
Asics FuzeTora, Asics,87.0,,52.0,$90,$35 (save 61%), Road, Neutral, Men: 7oz , Women: 5.7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
People liked the lightweight build of the Asics FuzeTora.
The design of this running shoe was thought to be similar to casual sneakers; most consumers liked wearing it casually.
The underfoot cushioning system was appreciated for offering a feeling of stepping on clouds.
Some testers claimed that the slip-on design made for a comfortable on-and-off experience.
The sizing scheme adhered to expectations, based on consumer feedback.
1 reasons not to buy
A few testers claimed that the inner walls of the Asics FuzeTora tended to rub irritatingly against the skin of the foot.
Bottom line
The Asics FuzeTora came to the market with a well-mannered salvo, with people welcoming its street-ready design and seamless construction. Neutral pronators also loved the soft cushioning system and the lightweight nature of the materials. A trickling of complaints was directed at the uncomfortable inner lining of the upper, but they’re not too deal-breaking."
Asics Gel Kahana 7,,87.0,,342.0,,, Trail, Stability, Men: 11.9oz , Women: 9.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Kahana 8,"8 reasons to buy
The Kahana 7 is not as heavy or as bulky as the previous model.
It has the 3M reflectivity as a safety precaution in low-visibility areas.
A large majority of runners really liked the Gel Kahana 7’s comfortable fit.
Some runners appreciated the Asics Kahana 7’s superior breathability as it still manages to keep most trail debris off.
A few testers noted that it passed with flying colors when used as a trail/road combo shoe.
It is very affordable.
The cushioning is plush, according to many runners.
Runners with wide feet can avail of the wide or double wide options.
4 reasons not to buy
Several runners were bogged down by the shoe’s weight.
Some runners did not like the narrow fit of the Gel Kahana 7.
Many runners felt let down by the lack of ground feedback.
A few runners also noted durability issues in different parts of the shoe.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Kahana 7 is built as a superbly reliable training partner with lots of arch support, tons of comfort, and great traction. It seamlessly moves the runner from his doorsteps to the trail. Finally, the very affordable price makes it automatically a very attractive option for countless runners."
Under Armour Drift, Under Armour,87.0,80.0,114.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal, Under Armour Drift 2,"5 reasons to buy
The Under Armour Drift is lightweight.
This shoe is very affordable.
Some reviews mentioned that this shoe is very comfortable to wear.
True to size.
According to some runners, this shoe has the right amount of cushioning.
2 reasons not to buy
The sole of the shoe wears out quickly.
The upper is not breathable as expected.
Bottom line
The Under Armour Drift is a road running shoe that delivers the right amount of cushioning, durability and traction. This shoe is great for runners with neutral foot motion and it is best for daily training and short distance runs."
Skechers GOrun 5, Skechers,93.0,85.0,256.0,$100,$26 (save 100%), Road, Neutral, Men: 7.5oz , Women: 6oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm, Jan 2017, Normal | Normal, Skechers GOrun 7+,"9 reasons to buy
A lot of consumers agreed that the Skechers GOrun 5 looked appealing.
Many testers wrote that this shoe felt comfortable to their feet.
It felt adequately lightweight, commented several runners.
Some purchasers have used it for casual purposes; they noted that it remained efficient and capable throughout.
The general durability of this running shoe was lauded by a number of runners.
The mid-sole felt a bit softer and more responsive than its predecessor, a tester reported.
A user wrote that the underfoot platform was suitably flexible.
The Quick Fit pull-tab gained some positive recognition because it made putting on and removing the shoe much easier.
Several reviewers lauded the upper unit’s supportive and breathable nature.
2 reasons not to buy
The outsole grip wasn’t able to satisfy several reviewers; to them, it felt lacking.
It was a bit narrow in the midfoot section, according to a consumer.
Bottom line
The Skechers GOrun 5 was welcomed by a lot of those who have tried it. They liked its comfortable construction, its colorful design, and its apparently impressive mid-sole foam unit. Casual shoe enthusiasts also enjoyed this running shoe. Inversely, there were complaints about it being a bit narrow; traction seemed to be inconsistent, too."
Salomon Speedcross Pro, Salomon,90.0,83.0,136.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.5oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal, Salomon Speedcross Pro 2,"7 reasons to buy
The upper of the Speedcross Pro features the anti-debris mesh and mud cover technology.
Most runners took note of the all-surface grip feature of the shoe.
Some reviewers applauded the lightweight construction of the Salomon Speedcross Pro without affecting comfort and flexibility.
This shoe features the Quicklace Technogy that gained positive reviews from most runners.
Some runners were satisfied with this shoe because it is impressively aggressive.
The outsole of the Speedcross Pro is designed for slippery and wet terrains.
The Salomon Speedcross Pro has an impressive well-cushioned heel.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners were not happy with the shoe’s small toe box.
Some observed that the Speedcross Pro felt clunky and too hard when landing on non-trail runs.
Expensive running shoe.
Bottom line
Considered by some as an expensive trail shoe, the Salomon Speedcross Pro was able to get the approval of the majority of its users. This aggressive trail running shoe features comfort, impressive ground traction and flexibility. This shoe won't disappoint on technical and wet trails."
Merrell Trail Glove 2,,90.0,87.0,268.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 6.7oz , Women: 5.5oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,, Merrell Trail Glove 5,"8 reasons to buy
The 2nd edition of the Trail Glove has a soft upper and a cozy lining for comfortable runs on the trails.
The price is very reasonable.
It is very light.
A significant number of runners valued the noticeable ground feedback with just enough protection provided by the rock plate.
It is very flexible.
The Trail Glove 2 has some serious traction, according to many reviews.
Some runners appreciated the upper’s ability to dry off.
A majority of runners loved the new sleek and sophisticated look.
3 reasons not to buy
A handful of runners noted that the arch is a bit too snug.
The contour of the snug arch takes some break-in time.
Works mostly for those who have extensive experience with minimalist shoes.
Bottom line
The Trail Glove line is one of Merrell’s most popular shoes and should continue to be so for experienced minimalist runners. With an improved upper and roomier toe box, getting that much closer to barefoot running is capably provided by the 2nd instalment of this series. It feels agile and has tons of traction in basically all off-road terrain."
Asics Metarun, Asics,88.0,86.0,125.0,$250,$135 (save 46%), Road, Stability, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Comfort ranks as one of the best assets of the Asics Metarun due to the plush fabric of the interior and the well-padded midsole.
Breathability is guaranteed by the new jacquard mesh.
Asics introduces a new stability system that gives it a much stable run than their flagship stability shoe.
The new midsole is amazingly 55% lighter than standard EVA for lightweight and responsive cushioning.
Delivering great heel support is an external heel counter that does not feel too stiff, according to numerous comments.
A huge majority of runners are enamored by the cool and ultra-sophisticated design.
2 reasons not to buy
The Metarun is an ultra-expensive shoe.
It comes in very limited edition.
Bottom line
Asics introduces a “concept shoe” that will feature for the first time several never-before -released technologies in its arsenal. Without sparing the cost, the Metarun has ultra-superior quality, comfort, support, and stability that is not jarring. The sky-high cost is matched only by the performance as it is substantially better than any of Asics’ most expensive and popular shoes."
Nike Air Max 2015, Nike,87.0,77.0,400.0,$190,$180 (save 5%), Road, Neutral, Men: 13.2oz , Women: 11oz,,,, Normal | Normal, Nike Air Max 2017,"7 reasons to buy
The seamless construction and a plush inner sleeve take the runner for miles and miles of comfort in the Air Max 2015.
One of the best-looking shoes in the market, according to most runners.
There is a noticeable smoothness in the transition, based on several reviews.
It is significantly lighter than the previous model.
A good number mentioned that the midfoot wrap is better than the earlier version of the Air Max.
Reflective materials in the logos for low-light running.
The 2015 version of the Air Max has gender-specific flex grooves.
3 reasons not to buy
Nike’s most expensive shoe.
Durability is not enough considering the price range, as mentioned in many comments.
Traction could certainly be a lot better noted a handful.
Bottom line
The iconic Air Max line remains to be a yardstick in the 2015 model where great aesthetic appeal and decent performance go. Nike never fails to stretch the boundaries between performance and lifestyle, particularly in this model. While it is undeniably a great-looking shoe, it offers decent cushioning and responsiveness only. The arch support is moderate with a less than average traction. It lacks the performance of a shoe carrying a $200 price tag."
Salomon Alphacross GTX, Salomon,88.0,80.0,187.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.6oz , Women: 9.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"9 reasons to buy
The stylish and robust design of Salomon Alphacross GTX is praised by several consumers. 
This Salomon trail running shoe fits well and is very comfortable to wear, according to many reviewers. 
Salomon Alphacross GTX’s gripping ability is good in both wet and dry surfaces, some runners mentioned. 
A few commenters appreciated this running gear’s shock absorption ability. 
This running shoe is also good for workouts and casual walks, many users claimed. 
Salomon Alphacross GTX’s lightweight structure gained positive feedback from several runners who have tried it. 
People lauded the breathability of this shoe’s upper unit. 
Numerous wearers commented that the midsole is supportive and responsive to the foot’s movement. 
A couple of reviewers explained that the shoe offers just the right amount of cushioning, not too soft nor too firm. 
3 reasons not to buy
The insole of the Salomon Alphacross GTX is not soft enough, according to a tester. 
A purchaser reported that the shoe doesn’t perform well in mud.
The shoe is expensive, some buyers state. 
Bottom line
The general feedback for the Salomon Alphacross GTX has been positive. Consumers are mostly happy with this trail running shoe’s responsiveness, breathability, and lightweight construction. People also appreciated the shoe’s cushioning system, durability, and gripping ability. The shoe is also good for workouts and casual walks. Only a few consumers dislike that shoe is a bit expensive and the insole is too firm. "
Nike Renew Rival, Nike,77.0,55.0,267.0,$85,$60 (save 29%), Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
People were generally happy with the aesthetics of the Nike Renew Rival; they noted that the colors were eye-catching.
Many runners thought that the upper unit offered suitable support.
The majority of consumers believed that the sizing scheme of this running shoe accommodated their expectations.
The cushioning capability of the midsole unit was trusted by those who have tested it.
According to some purchasers, this shoe didn’t need a break-in period; it was agreeable from the start.
The slip-on design made the Renew Rival effortless to put on.
1 reasons not to buy
Some rare instances yielded a few disgruntled consumers who didn’t like the underfoot experience of the Nike Renew Rival.
Bottom line
The Nike Renew Rival received many positive remarks from consumers. They considered this road running companion to be a reliable option during quick running sessions and urban adventures. It’s as though they welcomed it primarily as a part of their fashion apparel. There were complaints about the midsole being a bit uncomfortable, but such claims were uncommon."
Nike LunarGlide 6, Nike,94.0,86.0,351.0,$125,$90 (save 28%), Road, Stability, Men: 9.6oz , Women: 8.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal, Nike LunarGlide 9,"6 reasons to buy
The seamless mesh construction makes the upper unit of the Nike LunarGlide 6 feel very comfortable and skin-friendly.
The Dynamic Fit and Flywire are made to deliver a snug and secure fit that’s like a glove.
The average weight was appreciated by runners because it didn’t make them feel as if their feet were dragged down.
The platform was able to provide stability by utilizing a dual-density foam, which supports the medial midfoot section.
Durable rubber protects the contact points in the outsole.
The quality of this shoe is worth its affordable price.
3 reasons not to buy
One complaint was about the heel section, which was a bit narrow for the tester.
The stitching on the tongue is uncomfortable against the skin, a couple of wearers claimed.
Several users lamented the outsole's poor traction and durability.
Bottom line
The Nike LunarGlide 6 offers smoother running experiences that are well-supported by a platform that corrects the rate of pronation of those who need such a feature. It doesn’t have a hefty weight, which is refreshing to the performance of the wearer."
Nike Air Max Sequent 3, Nike,80.0,,780.0,$100,$57 (save 43%), Road, Neutral, Men: 12oz , Women: 8oz,,,," Narrow, Normal | Normal", Nike Air Max Sequent 4.5,"5 reasons to buy
The design of the Nike Air Max Sequent 3 appealed to many consumers who wanted style and functionality in a single package.
Several testers observed that the weight was suitably light.
The underfoot cushioning system gained favor for being comfortable and responsive.
Some purchasers stated that the price was affordable.
The durability of this model was lauded; many people deemed the construction to be of high quality.
2 reasons not to buy
Some people noted that the Nike Air Max Sequent 3 was too narrow.
The platform apparently had a raised arch that caused some discomfort, according to a reviewer.
Bottom line
Many people were able to appreciate the Nike Air Max Sequent 3. They believed that this neutral running shoe delivered comfort and style in a single package. Runners and casual shoe enthusiasts alike were even appreciative of its apparently high-quality construction, as well as the relatively inexpensive price. On the other hand, there were those who thought that it was narrow while some had complaints about the construction of the underfoot platform. Nevertheless, the Sequent 3 was deemed a worthy successor to a relatively fresh yet well-regarded series."
Saucony Breakthru 4, Saucony,84.0,78.0,2869.0,$100,$45 (save 55%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8.6oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Jan 2018, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
The toe box of the Saucony Breakthru 4 was broad enough for toe-splay, several users commented.
The available colorways for this running shoe were visually endearing, some people noted.
Most consumers welcomed the price tag, stating that it’s affordable.
The lightweight nature of this product gained the favor of its testers.
The sizing scheme followed most people’s expectations.
2 reasons not to buy
A few testers complained that the midsole was stiffer and less responsive than the previous version.
According to a consumer, there was a lump in the sole unit that tended to grab the arch uncomfortably.
Bottom line
The Saucony Breakthru 4 came into the industry with grace, but not with a bang. While neutral runners were positive about its affordable price, it’s lightweight build, and its appealing color schemes, some of them felt that its midsole wasn’t as comfortable. One person even claimed that something was causing some discomfort to the arch of the foot."
Saucony Breakthru 3, Saucony,89.0,90.0,476.0,$100,$28 (save 72%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8.7oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Jan 2017, Normal | Normal, Saucony Breakthru 4,"6 reasons to buy
Some testers commented that the cushioning was great for a fast running shoe.
A lot of runners mentioned that the shoe was very breathable and versatile.
Some reviewers said that the shoe provided a good amount of underfoot support.
Few buyers mentioned that the Saucony Breakthru 3 offered a responsive ride.
A lot of reviewers agreed that the shoe was a great option for neutral pronators.
A good number of runners noted that the shoe was comfortable and lightweight.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners mentioned that the heel-to-toe transition of the shoe felt a little bit rough and uncomfortable.
One of the testers commented that the midsole lacked flexibility.
According to some reviewers, this shoe’s platform was not able to not provide enough cushioning.
Bottom line
A good number of testers agreed that the Saucony Breakthru 3 is a comfortable and lightweight running shoe. They commented that it proved agreeable for runners who do not excessively pronate. Although some testers mentioned that it apparently lacked a quality cushioning, others still recommended the Saucony Breakthru 3 because of its breathability and versatility on the roads."
New Balance 560 v6,,81.0,,1889.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
A mix of mesh and synthetic materials make up the comfortable & breathable upper unit.
The stitched-on overlays enhance the fit to be customizable as the shoelaces are being adjusted.
Runners appreciated the Injection molded Ethylene vinyl acetate mid-sole foam that offers a strong, but pliable cushioning.
The outsole has a layer made up of a protective rubber component, which makes sure the sole unit doesn’t easily suffer from abrasion.
Testers noted the durability of the 6th version of the New Balance 560 to be reliable.
4 reasons not to buy
There were complaints that this running shoe was a bit small.
Some reviewers thought that the New Balance 560 v6 could have benefited from a waterproofing mechanic.
A few testers felt uncomfortable because their toes hit the roof of the upper easily.
This shoe has a moderately heavy weight.
Bottom line
The 560 v6 from New Balance is actually a beloved running shoe because it can function well for many testers, even for those who need some support in the mid-foot area. The cushioning is balanced, the durability is top-notch, and the overall quality of the shoe stands out."
Asics Gel Cumulus 16,,94.0,89.0,1061.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Cumulus 22,"6 reasons to buy
The mesh material has an open construction for breathability.
The stitched-on overlay system is lightweight but durable and dependable.
The colorways and design schemes of this shoe are appealing to look at.
The underfoot cushioning system was robust and efficient for many users.
Impact protection is afforded by the Gel® Cushioning System, which is placed in both the forefoot are rear sections of the sole unit.
The Asics Gel Cumulus 16 has an affordable price.
2 reasons not to buy
A few runners noted that the mesh material in the upper was a bit thin, and it easily absorbed water.
Some felt that the cushioning in the Cumulus 16 wasn’t as full-bodied as its predecessor.
Bottom line
The 16th iteration of the Asics Gel Cumulus brings comfort and security to the runner. It features technologies that ensure cushioning, stability and protection to the foot, keeping it running in a sure and confident manner. It’s a solid option for casual running and even those who participate in competitions."
Adidas Ultraboost ST Parley,,94.0,90.0,1236.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.5oz , Women: 10.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The color scheme of the Adidas Ultraboost ST Parley was lauded by many consumers for being eye-catching.
People generally liked the high-quality build of this running shoe.
‘Comfortable’ was a word that was frequently used to describe the experience while wearing this product.
The use of recycled plastic on the upper unit was appreciated by environment-conscious runners.
Wearing this shoe for extended periods didn’t cause any discomfort, according to several purchasers.
3 reasons not to buy
A few testers claimed that the fit was a bit narrow.
Some overpronators felt that the underfoot support system wasn’t as prominent as other stability options.
There were complaints that the price was too costly.
Bottom line
The Adidas Ultraboost ST Parley was well-received as a running shoe that has an effect on the environment. The use of recycled plastic was liked by consumers and shoe-enthusiasts. Most of the testers were also happy with the comfortable performance of its parts, the appealing design, and the overall quality of the materials. On the other hand, there were gripes about this stability option, such as the narrow width, the less-supportive platform, and the high price."
Adidas Questar TND, Adidas,90.0,,658.0,$90,$40 (save 56%), Road, Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Many people felt comfortable wearing the Adidas Questar TND for their running activities.
According to several reviewers, the upper offered reliable breathability and security.
A lot of purchasers noted that the price was affordable.
The overall design and look of this running shoe were deemed visually appealing.
Some casual shoe-enthusiasts noted that it worked well as a daily walking shoe.
Wearing the Questar TND for an entire day didn’t cause any discomfort or fatigue to the foot, based on several reviews.
1 reasons not to buy
Some consumers stated that the façade looked awkwardly bulky.
Bottom line
The Adidas Questar TND was much appreciated for its appealing looks, its affordable price, and its apparently reliable functionality. People were even glad that it served well as a choice for fashion apparel. While some thought that this neutral running shoe looked bulky, most people still felt that it was a dependable partner for the roads."
Reebok Fusium Run, Reebok,88.0,,152.0,$90,$35 (save 61%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal, Reebok Fusium Run 2,"5 reasons to buy
Those who have tried the Reebok Fusium Run felt that the affordable price made it more appealing.
The width profiles followed most users’ expectations.
Some consumers felt that the underfoot cushioning offered comfort and responsive
The impact attenuating capacity of the platform was deemed sufficient by a couple of runners.
A handful of purchasers who used the Reebok Fusium Run for casual purposes believed that it blended well with daily attire.
2 reasons not to buy
Several testers noted that the upper unit separated from the midsole after only a few uses.
The upper unit caused some blistering when running without socks, a few people noted.
Bottom line
Those who have tested the Reebok Fusium Run welcomed its affordability and useful components. Many reported on a comfortable underfoot platform, a right-fitting coverage, and street-ready aesthetics. On the other hand, several people felt that the sizing scheme was off, while others complained of poor durability and an irritating inner sleeve."
New Balance 1260 v5,,91.0,85.0,322.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.4oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, New Balance 1260 v4,"6 reasons to buy
The 1260 v5 features the Abzorb crash pad that improves the stability and motion control attributes of the shoe.
Most runners felt that the New Balance 1260 v5 is more comfortable than the previous version.
Overpronators were satisfied with the shoe's arch support and they reported reduced knee pain.
The outsole is durable enough for road running, as mentioned in some reviews.
The cushioning and flexibility of the shoe made some runners satisfied.
The upper coverage of the shoe provides impressive fit and breathability as noted in some reviews.
3 reasons not to buy
This shoe is slightly expensive.
Some felt that this shoe is a bit heavy.
Many felt that the 5th version of the New Balance 1260 is much wider than the previous model.
Bottom line
Runners can run with confidence in the New Balance 1260 v5. It offers plenty of cushioning, support, stability, and motion control. The upgraded materials and various technologies make this shoe an ideal stability shoe for daily training. Though some considered the shoe expensive and heavy, the majority believed that the shoe is a worthy investment."
Adidas Response Boost 2, Adidas,91.0,82.0,184.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Aug 2015, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
The word ‘comfortable’ was used many times by those who were satisfied with the quality of the Adidas Response Boost 2.
The color schemes of this model were lauded by the testers.
Some runners perceived the feeling of running on pillows because the mid-sole felt aptly soft and responsive.
The boost™ mid-sole technology was praised by runners because they said that it actually added a boost of energy to the toe-off.
There were consumers who said that it was suitably lightweight, and that they didn’t feel as if it dragged their feet down.
The durability of this model was appreciated by a lot of reviewers; they said it held up well even after many uses.
The testers noted that it was great for many types of activities, from running sessions to casual walks.
2 reasons not to buy
Some of the testers didn’t like the shiny—almost plastic—look of the upper as it made the material seem unappealing.
A few noted that it was a bit too snug in the heel section.
Bottom line
The 2nd version of the Response Boost from Adidas greatly impressed runners. Many comments were directed at its responsive and comfortable mid-sole technology. Consumers found it to be adequately lightweight and durable, too. Contrariwise, its overly shiny façade made it look unattractive for some, and others felt that the sizing was a bit off. But this neutral road running shoe was able to make a majority of runners satisfied."
Brooks Transcend 2,,91.0,79.0,76.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.9oz , Women: 9.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Brooks Transcend 7,"7 reasons to buy
An extremely comfortable shoe in every way is a common comment from a large number of runners.
A significant number of runners with previous knee and lower back issues can’t say enough about the support and stability of the 2nd iteration of the Transcend.
A handful of reviews loved the snug fit that just adds to the supportive ride of the Transcend 2.
The shoe is very breathable.
The cushioning is soft with a hint of responsiveness.
Several reviews mentioned that it looks more sophisticated than the previous model.
An inner sleeve and soft mesh give excellent feel and comfort.
2 reasons not to buy
The very expensive price is too much for most.
Quite a few runners found it too heavy.
Bottom line
The Transcend 2 is a stability road running shoe that is lodged squarely in the support category in Brooks’ line of shoes. It delivers a very supportive ride because of a snug upper, a firmer midsole, and an all-encompassing Guide Rails that provides on-call overpronation deceleration. The Transcend 2 also has a very smooth ride that belies its significant weight."
Under Armour Surge 2, Under Armour,83.0,,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.6oz , Women: 7.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
The cushioning system that is present in the Under Armour Surge 2 has been lauded by those who have tested it.
Some users have mentioned that the breathability of the upper unit is reliable.
Several consumers believe that this road running shoe has a suitably lightweight build that can handle all-day use.
The traction capacity of the outsole unit is welcomed by runners who appreciated responsible surface control.
‘Versatile’ is a word that some people have used to describe this product as it can apparently handle different activities.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people have noted that the forefoot section restricts the natural splaying of the toes.
A handful of testers have stated that the upper unit is susceptible to tearing.
Bottom line
The Surge 2 is an Under Armour running shoe that is meant to accommodate those who are fans of road running. The silhouette is uncluttered, with breathable mesh and printed overlays governing the overall design. A springy performance is afforded by the full-length, industry-standard cushioning unit. Anyone can use the Surge 2 for any task that they fancy."
Adidas Alphabounce Beyond 2.0, Adidas,84.0,85.0,8.0,$100,$42 (save 58%)," Road, Treadmill", Neutral,,,,, Feb 2020, Normal | Normal,,"8 reasons to buy
Comfort: Many users agree that the Adidas Alphabounce Beyond 2.0 is comfortable.
Cushioning: A lot of runners claim that the underfoot cushioning is responsive to moments. 
Support: This running shoe is supportive, according to multiple commenters. 
Grip: The outsole offers excellent traction in different conditions, a few testers observe. 
Moisture-repelling: A lot of buyers appreciate the moisture-resistant feature of the shoe. 
Flexibility: This running partner is flexible, based on some reviews. 
Style: Numerous consumers admire the overall aesthetics of the shoe. 
Price: People love that the Alphabounce Beyond 2.0 is budget-friendly.
4 reasons not to buy
Upper: A few testers mention that the upper stitching rubs against the ankle, causing pain and irritation.
Weight: The shoe is too bulky and heavy, according to a couple of wearers. 
Heel: Several purchasers feel that the heel section of the shoe is a bit narrow.
Firmness: A couple of users observe that the Bounce midsole is firmer compared to Boost cushioning.
Bottom line
Featuring a moisture-repellent upper, the Adidas Alphabounce Beyond 2.0 is designed to keep the foot dry and comfortable even in wet weather conditions. This stylish neutral running shoe is ideal for runners with normal gaits or those who do not overpronate. It is also a perfect option for consumers seeking a breathable, flexible, and versatile running companion."
Nike Flex RN 2016, Nike,88.0,82.0,2979.0,$80,$72 (save 10%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8.2oz , Women: 6.5oz, Men: 7mm , Women: 7mm,," Normal | Narrow, Normal", Nike Flex RN 2017,"12 reasons to buy
Many of the reviewers loved the comfortable ride of the Flex RN 2016.
The price tag is very affordable.
It is very flexible, according to some.
The 2016 Flex RN runs very light, as noticed by more than a few.
Most of the comments noted that it is quite durable.
Several runners living in hot-weather areas valued its excellent breathability.
Its lightness is appreciated by a handful.
A moderate number of runners liked the color of the new Flex RN.
Several runners loved the colorways and stylish appeal of the shoe.
A handful of users had a great time wearing the shoe right out of the box.
Despite being very light and minimal, more than a handful of runners use it for gym workouts.
Many were quite surprised by the grip of this shoe, even on wet pavement.
3 reasons not to buy
The fit can be too tight for those with more than average foot dimensions, remarked several.
The outsole sucks small stones, based on the comments of some runners.
A significant number of users who prefer to walk had irritation in their heels because the back part of the Nike 2016 Flex RN is a little too high.
Bottom line
The Nike Flex RN 2016 is a no-nonsense trainer that is quite light, but has decent cushioning to handle daily training. It has adequate arch support, superior breathability, excellent comfort, and nice looks. For a very affordable price, runners can get a really functional shoe that looks more than its price tag."
Brooks Addiction 14, Brooks,83.0,,9.0,,, Road, Motion control, Men: 12.6oz , Women: 11.4oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm, Jan 2020," Narrow, Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Narrow, Normal, Wide, X-Wide",,"6 reasons to buy
Runners who want to put custom orthotic inserts into the Brooks Addiction 14 claim that they are able to do so seamlessly.
The stability mechanisms that are present in this road running shoe are welcomed by severe overpronators.
The toe box is welcomed by most because it is roomy and accommodating of natural toe-splay.
Some heavyset consumers believe that the underfoot platform is able to support hefty body weights.
This Brooks running shoe does not require a break-in period, according to a couple of testers.
The breathability of the upper is appreciated by most consumers.
2 reasons not to buy
A few consumers have reported that the underfoot platform is a bit stiffer than previous iterations.
The Addiction 14 is a bit heavy for some testers.
Bottom line
Many runners have taken a shine to the Brooks Addiction 14. This motion control running shoe is welcomed by those with heavy body weights and those who require foot stability on their runs. The upper unit’s breathable fabrics and the roomy in-shoe construction that effortlessly accommodates custom orthotic inserts are are highlighted.
Fans of running shoes that target severe overpronation can enjoy this update to the revered series."
Altra Lone Peak 3.0 NeoShell Mid, Altra,88.0,83.0,191.0,$160,$81 (save 91%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 13.3oz , Women: 10oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
A number of users applauded the Polartec NeoShell lining that effectively keeps the foot dry while running on wet condition.
Many testers mentioned that the Lone Peak 3.0 NeoShell Mid has an excellent grip.
Some took note of the comfortable fit and impressive cushioning of the shoe.
The outsole of the Lone Peak 3.0 NeoShell Mid is durable, as noted in some reviews.
The TrailClaw outsole delivers an exceptional traction on varied surfaces.
Several Altra fans liked the roomy toe box of the Lone Peak 3.0 NeoShell Mid.
4 reasons not to buy
Few users noticed that the upper was not breathable due to the abrasion-resistant waterproof mesh.
The men’s version is quite heavy.
One runner disliked the thick tongue and over-padded collar.
It is expensive.
Bottom line
The Altra Lone Peak 3.0 NeoShell Mid is a trail running shoe designed for extreme weather conditions. It provides a perfect blend of traction, comfort, support and stability. Though this mid-cut running shoe is considered by some as expensive and heavy, it will not disappoint while running both uphill and downhill."
Adidas Pureboost X, Adidas,89.0,78.0,1096.0,$120,$92 (save 23%), Road, Neutral,,,,, Feb 2016, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
The textiles used on the upper unit are soft and breathable.
Synthetic sidewall panels that connect to the lacing system provide additional security.
A good number of runners appreciated the sock-like arch support, which allowed the upper to fully encompass their feet.
The Adidas Pure Boost X was designed to follow the contours of women’s feet.
The mid-sole unit features the boost™ technology, which handles cushioning, impact protection, and energy-return.
The outsole unit has a grid design that works with the mid-sole in adapting to the ground and delivering control over the surfaces.
Its components and features are well worth its $120 price tag.
2 reasons not to buy
Padding in the collar and tongue might help in adding a bit of cushioning to the dimensions of the foot.
A few testers felt that the heel section was too high for their liking.
Bottom line
Whether for running or for casual urban treks, the Pure Boost X from Adidas is going to deliver comfortable and durable service to its wearers. Featuring a women-specific design, this neutral running shoe offers sock-like security, responsiveness, and support for long-term running sessions."
Nike Air Max 2016, Nike,89.0,80.0,593.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 13.3oz , Women: 11.4oz, Men: 13mm , Women: 13mm, Nov 2015, Normal | Normal, Nike Air Max 2017,"9 reasons to buy
The Nike Air Max 2016 was suitably lightweight for many testers.
The variety of colors that are available for this model made it aesthetically appealing, noted some runners.
Many took note that this running shoe was ‘comfortable’.
Several users wrote that the upper unit’s fabrics were smooth and non-irritating to the skin.
It had an adequate width and length, according to a number of reviewers; their feet acclimated well to it.
The 2016 model was more superior compared to its predecessor when it came to its features and service, some runners commented.
The underfoot cushioning gained praise for its springy and responsive performance.
A reviewer wrote that the shoe was a bit heavy, but not cumbersome.
Some testers stated that with the responsive mid-sole, the heel-to-toe transitions became smooth and effortless.
2 reasons not to buy
The Nike Air Max 2016 looked awkwardly bulky for several testers, and they wrote that the bulky look didn’t make it visually endearing.
Some runners reported that the Air Max unit of this shoe burst, rendering the mid-sole unit virtually unusable.
Bottom line
The Nike Air Max 2016 was trusted by many runners with neutral gaits and under-pronated foot motion. For them, the mid-sole supported their feet and gave adequate cushioning. They were able to run comfortably using this product. The upper also received great reviews because of the smoothness of the coverage. But it wasn’t very endearing to a number of testers. They stated that it wasn’t a great investment because the Air Max platform burst on them, as if it was made from cheap materials."
New Balance Vazee Rush, New Balance,88.0,76.0,305.0,$90,$50 (save 44%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8.1oz , Women: 6.4oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm, Jul 2015, Normal | Normal, New Balance Vazee Rush v2,"8 reasons to buy
Many runners were able to use the New Balance Vazee Rush for a variety of activities, including running and training.
This shoe looked visually endearing to those who have tried it.
The upper unit received praise because it allowed air into the foot-chamber, which kept the wearer cool and dry.
It had a lightweight nature, but it was dependably sturdy, commented a user.
The underfoot cushioning system was able to responsibly absorb impact shock during the landing phase of the gait cycle, noted a tester.
Several runners commented that this model held up well, even when used frequently.
This shoe was affordable and its general quality was very agreeable, wrote a lot of consumers.
According to numerous reviewers, the grip of the outsole was reliably precise.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners felt that the mid-sole unit wasn’t able to provide long-term underfoot cushioning during long races.
Others noted that it was a bit stiff, thus preventing them from achieving better freedom of movement.
A few noticed that the outsole tread wore off after only a few months of use.
Bottom line
The New Balance Vazee Rush became a popular running companion for those who needed smooth coverage, comfortable cushioning and reliable surface traction. The general durability of this road shoe was lauded, and though the outsole rubber wore off on some testers, it didn’t overshadow its efficacy as a go-to shoe for those with active lifestyles. Neutral runners still gave it solid reviews."
Under Armour Threadborne Slingwrap, Under Armour,88.0,,129.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 7.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
A majority of reviewers commended the shoe for being comfortable. Most mentioned that they were on their feet for a long period of time without experiencing any pain.
Some runners were glad that the weight was light.
One user observed that he could easily slip his custom orthotics inside with ease.
Most testers mentioned that the shoe performed well during short runs and light workouts.
Many noticed that it was usable right out the box. There was no need to break it in.
A good number of users were happy about the Under Armour Threadborne Slingwrap’s multi-functionality.
2 reasons not to buy
One female tester hoped that there were more color options for women.
Another user noticed that the shoe easily received scuffs and marks.
Bottom line
The Under Armour Threadborne Slingwrap is a neutral running shoe that had impressive versatility. A majority of reviewers were able to use the shoe in activities other than running – going to the gym, walking in the park, and for working. Runners, on the other hand, felt that they performed best on short runs or tempo workouts. Nevertheless, the shoe still proved to be a good option for those searching for multi-function footwear."
Brooks T7 Racer,,92.0,88.0,170.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.4oz , Women: 5.4oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Brooks Hyperion,"6 reasons to buy
Breathable coverage is handled by the Air Mesh upper.
Most reviewers appreciated the synthetic overlays, which offer security and snug upper support.
The Ortholite Sock Liner has anti-microbial properties, which present a healthy inner environment for the foot.
Runners noted that the Hyper Pod Configuration of the mid-sole makes it flexible and responsive.
The T7 Racer has an affordable price.
This running shoe has a lightweight nature
3 reasons not to buy
There were runners who were disappointed by the laces since they slip away easily from the knot.
The stitching of the upper made some runners’ feet irritable and uncomfortable.
Others felt that the mid-sole needed more cushioning to provide a better underfoot platform, even if it’s a minimalist shoe.
Bottom line
The Brooks T7 Racer is a neutral road running shoe that garnered many respectable reviews because of its low-profile design, flexibility, and responsiveness. Though there are a few issues with the sizing and comfort, users still recommend the shoe. The T7 Racer is a solid option for mid-tempo running and regular exercise activities."
Nike Air Zoom Elite 8, Nike,92.0,82.0,119.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 8.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Jul 2015, Normal | Normal, Nike Air Zoom Elite 10,"8 reasons to buy
A lot of runners welcomed the versatile nature of the Nike Air Zoom Elite 8, which allowed them to run, train and walk with comfort.
Many acclimated well to the different color schemes of this shoe, noting that they enjoyed its appealing design and eye-catching hues.
The cloth-like upper unit felt snug, but not too tight as to feel restrictive or unwieldy, according to a number of reviewers.
Runners appreciated the EVA sock liner, which delivered contoured support by following the natural shape of the heel and arch.
The underfoot experience was springy yet balanced, wrote several testers.
A user commented that wearing the Air Zoom Elite 8 didn’t cause their heel to feel any pain, citing its responsive yet firm mid-sole as the reason for it.
It was agreeably lightweight, noted many consumers.
The outsole’s traction capability received recognition from satisfied runners.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners noted that the platform wasn’t very flexible, essentially limiting natural foot-movement.
A few noted that the forefoot area of the mid-sole wasn’t very agreeable to the underside of the foot, writing that they felt some pain in the foot-pad when attempting a toe-off.
Bottom line
The Nike Air Zoom Elite 8 was enjoyed by many of its testers. A lot of them appreciated the efficiency of its individual parts. For them, it was able to deliver a solid underfoot experience that’s reliable and definite. Though some felt that its mid-sole was a bit unwieldy, this road shoe ultimately gained the favor of a great number of neutral runners."
Mizuno Wave Tenjin,,92.0,,36.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.3oz , Women: 7.7oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
The ultra-plush comfort of Lamborghini cars is brought for the first time in a shoe in the Mizuno Wave Tenjin, according to many testers.
Hands down, superior durability is one of its best features, noted several users.
The mesh offers maximum breathability.
A good number of runners noted how smooth the transition is from the heel to the forefoot because of the full-length Infinity Wave.
Some runners noted that it runs lighter than its weight.
The traction is excellent, based on most comments.
4 colorways representing Automobili Lamborghini.
A significant number of runners call the Tenjin stunning.
3 reasons not to buy
The Wave Tenjin is an ultra-expensive shoe.
It is a limited edition.
The 12mm heel drop was too much for several runners.
Bottom line
Mizuno’s collaboration with Lamborghini brings the best features of the vehicle, Huracan, into a shoe that is now called the Wave Tenjin. The sleek look, plush comfort, durability, decent arch support, and quick transitions are all there for the taking in one of Mizuno’s most expensive and super high-quality shoes."
New Balance Cypher Run v2, New Balance,88.0,90.0,26.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,," Normal, Wide | Normal, Wide",,"5 reasons to buy
People generally liked the durability of the Cypher Run v2, stating that its various parts didn’t wear off after only a few uses.
The design of this road running shoe was considered to be contemporary and visually appealing.
Those who were in cold weather claimed that the upper unit kept the foot warm and cozy.
The in-shoe feel of the upper unit felt snug yet movement-friendly, based on a couple of reviews.
Several testers stated that the underfoot experience was comfortable and reactive to natural movement.
2 reasons not to buy
Several users said the shoe does not offer much comfort for its price range.
The height of the collar was too high for a tester; shoe felt the fabrics rubbing against the ankles, causing irritation.
Bottom line
Those who have tried the New Balance Cypher Run v2 were happy with its construction and general quality. They lauded this road shoe’s secure upper unit, the responsive midsole foam, and the appealing looks. On the other hand, some consumers believed that the shoe is not as comfortable as expected, while a solitary purchaser experienced some skin chafing due to the high-top design."
Nike Zoom Strike, Nike,83.0,71.0,206.0,$80,$46 (save 97%), Road, Neutral, Men: 7.4oz , Women: 6oz, Men: 3mm , Women: 3mm,, Normal | Normal, Nike Zoom Strike 2,"7 reasons to buy
Many runners described the Nike Zoom Strike as a lightweight shoe.
The lacing system with Flywire cables was effective in keeping the foot snug and secure, a user stated.
One wearer noted that the thick heel padding helped with foot stability.
The featherweight mesh upper maintained foot comfort, a reviewer mentioned. Another user liked how it stretched to accommodate the foot shape proficiently.
A runner noted that the shoe did not give bruises even at the first wear.
Majority of purchasers found the Zoom Strike to provide moderate arch support.
The upper delivered maximum air circulation, a commenter
2 reasons not to buy
While the shoe’s length was accurate, the fit was still disappointing because of the limited width options, according to a wearer.
The tongue kept folding over the edges during running and consumed a lot of time putting it back into place, a user experienced. Another said it could have used more fabric in its design.
Bottom line
Although many purchasers commended the Nike Zoom Strike for its attractive appearance, comfortable fit, and functional details, there were not a lot of comments regarding the shoe’s performance. Meanwhile, some found flaws in the structural elements and sizing, yet still none about their running experience. Overall, the Zoom Strike might be a solid choice for wearers who are after comfort first and all other factors in second."
Saucony Excursion TR 9, Saucony,89.0,,899.0,$70,$58 (save 100%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal, Saucony Excursion TR 14,"6 reasons to buy
The mesh and synthetic upper maintain breathable coverage that’s comfortable at the same time.
The soft fabric lining and padded interior secure the foot and make it easier for the foot to stay in place, according to some testers.
The Molded IMEVA makes up the bulk of the mid-sole cushioning system, which is responsible for the lightweight underfoot support and shock absorption.
A significant number of runners noticed the reliable impact protection in the heel area.
The outsole unit of the Excursion TR 9 was able to provide durable protection and traction over the trails based on some comments.
The Saucony Excursion TR 9 is affordable.
4 reasons not to buy
The men’s version of the Excursion TR 9 is moderately heavy.
Some runners noted that it was stiffer than the previous version.
Others criticized the low-quality stitching, which easily got loose.
A few felt that it was a bit narrow in the forefoot area.
Bottom line
The Excursion TR 9 from Saucony offers durability, comfort and breathable coverage to trail runners. The trail-specific outsole delivers reliable traction on technical terrains and impressive underfoot protection while the upper of the shoe wraps the foot comfortable while giving support throughout the run. This trail running shoe is designed for neutral runners."
Under Armour Charged Toccoa 2, Under Armour,89.0,,133.0,$70,$40 (save 43%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
The majority of the users said that the Under Armour Charged Toccoa 2 is comfortable to wear.
Some of the testers commented that the shoe provides a perfect fit.
One of the buyers agreed that the running shoe has excellent traction.
According to a user, the shoe is best used for hiking and street walking.
A reviewer appreciated the color of the running shoe.
A consumer loves its simple laces.
It was stylish, based on the reviews.
2 reasons not to buy
A consumer commented that the shoe is better if it provides more arch support.
Some wearers found the durability of the shoe to be inadequate.
Bottom line
Overall, the comfort level and simple design of the Under Armour Charged Toccoa 2 made the majority of the users happy and contented. In addition to its design, they admired the excellent fit of the running footwear. Although one of the users was not satisfied with its arch support, others still recommend the shoe because of its performance on different walking, running, and hiking activities."
Brooks Adrenaline GTS 18, Brooks,94.0,91.0,7191.0,,, Road, Motion control, Men: 10oz , Women: 8.6oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm, Nov 2017," Narrow, Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Narrow, Normal", Brooks Adrenaline GTS 20,"9 reasons to buy
A lot of runners thought that the substantial cushioning was terrific and was balanced well with the arch support.
Numerous wearers appreciated the new, sleeker design of the Adrenaline GTS 18.
According to a tester, the shoe was lightweight and capable of enabling a comfortable ride.
A majority of buyers agreed that it was true-to-size.
One purchaser observed the shoe dried quickly after running under heavy rain.
Several buyers liked that there were various color options available.
The new streamlined upper gave a firm hold yet a non-irritating fit, said a reviewer.
Various consumers commended the shoe’s performance on long recovery runs.
Many users felt that it was comfortable enough right out of the box.
4 reasons not to buy
A hole formed in the toe box after only a week of use, one user commented.
A couple of buyers were not amazed by the heel design; one said that it did not give a secure fit, while another stated that it kept pulling the sock down while running.
One wearer felt it had less brace and padding compared to the previous version.
Another expressed that the upper mesh looked like a cheap material.
Bottom line
The Brooks Adrenaline GTS 18 has kept the established reputation of its predecessor by delivering a ride and performance that most users have praised. However, some may not have been impressed by the durability and design elements. Overall, this stability running shoe was approved by consumers as a motion-control option with features that work well for its function."
Newton Distance 9, Newton,88.0,90.0,6.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.6oz , Women: 6.6oz, Men: 2mm , Women: 2mm,," Narrow, Normal | Normal",,"7 reasons to buy
Newton Distance 9 is built to go fast, according to a lot of runners. 
Many wearers praised the lightweight construction of this shoe. 
The majority of the users expressed that it is comfortable to wear. 
It offers just the right amount of cushioning, said some commenters. 
This running partner is breathable, based on reviews. 
A couple of buyers noted that the tongue helps offer a snugger fit. 
Several reviewers appreciated the roomy toe box of the shoe. 
3 reasons not to buy
A runner said that Newton Distance 9 does not offer stability when running on uneven surfaces. 
The rubber outsole has durability issues, a tester observed. 
One purchaser mentioned that it is more expensive compared to other shoes with comparable performance.
Bottom line
Designed to meet the high standards of runners and athletes, Newton Distance 9 delivers a combination of energy-efficient and lightweight ride. It features a minimalistic design using advanced technologies for enhanced speed and comfort. This road running shoe works best for runners with neutral gaits or those who do not overpronate."
Mizuno Wave Rider 18, Mizuno,90.0,80.0,1379.0,$120,$50 (save 67%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,," Normal | Normal, Wide", Mizuno Wave Rider 23,"7 reasons to buy
The general consensus from a good number of reviews show that the 18th version of the Rider is a comfortable shoe.
It is a value for the money investment.
Many comments focused on the spacious toe box for plenty of toe splay.
It has excellent arch support.
The Rider 18 is relatively lightweight for a neutral trainer.
A handful loved the pop coming from the midsole.
The heel to toe transition is quick, according to several runners.
3 reasons not to buy
Quite a few runners saw the soles of the Rider 18 getting separated from the upper.
Several disliked the firmness of the ride.
Some were disappointed because it required a break-in period.
Bottom line
One of Mizuno’s most popular lines goes back to what worked for them in this version of the Rider. With a more form-fitting upper, runners will get to experience again the superb arch support, firm and responsive cushioning, and efficient movement through the gait cycle. This is a very solid option for those looking for a high-mileage trainer that has noticeable stability and shock-absorbing features."
Salomon Speedtrak, Salomon,90.0,81.0,171.0,$115,$90 (save 22%)," Trail, Mud", Neutral, Men: 8.6oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm, Aug 2016," Normal | Normal, Wide",,"9 reasons to buy
Most of the runners who found the right fit found the Speedtrak to be very comfortable.
It is a worthy investment, according to a handful.
The shoe is extremely durable, based on the observations of more than a few.
Very aggressive and multi-directional lugs provide grip on rugged surfaces.
Several obstacle course racers loved the combination of traction, and durability in the Salomon Speedtrak.
Some users mentioned that the upper dries fairly quick and easy to clean.
A few noted that the interior of their shoes was very clean after a tough run on dirty off-road trail.
The QuickLace system offers effortless cinching that does not untie or loosen.
Several runners appreciated the QuickLace system for its ease of use and utility.
5 reasons not to buy
Most of the negative reviews were about how narrow the toe box is.
A handful of obstacle course enthusiasts remarked that it is a bit heavy.
Some runners felt that the ride was a bit jarring on hard ground due to the aggressive and very substantial lugs.
A small number of obstacle course participants wanted drainage holes in the shoe as it is one of Salomon’s biggest market for this shoe.
It runs small, according to several expert reviewers.
Bottom line
Salomon offers the Speedtrak as an update to the Fellraiser. It does, however, bring many of the features that have made the Fellraiser quite a popular choice among runners and obstacle course racers. The Speedtrak has unbelievable traction, excellent durability, and a no-brainer of a choice for muddy or wet running on rugged and difficult outdoor surfaces."
Asics FuzeX Lyte 2, Asics,90.0,,385.0,$85,$55 (save 35%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Apr 2017, Normal | Normal,,"9 reasons to buy
Many wearers claimed that the Asics FuzeX Lyte 2 was lightweight.
One buyer remarked that the shoe was so comfortable, it could “almost be worn to bed.” Meanwhile, others likened the shoe to “walking on a mattress.”
Several users stated the shoe fit them snugly.
The FuzeX Lyte 2 reduced shin issues, a runner expressed.
Various reviewers admired the design of the shoe. Others mentioned it looked simple yet elegant, while some thought it had a fresh and clean look.
The shoe also worked well at the gym, and on grassy paths, aside from road surfaces, a customer wrote.
The heel cushioning was incredible, noticed a buyer.
A lot of consumers agreed the shoe was inexpensive.
The FuzeX Lyte 2 did a great job of correcting underpronation, according to numerous wearers.
3 reasons not to buy
The tongue rubbed against and irritated the skin of the foot, said a wearer. Another said they were bothered by having to adjust the position of the tongue repetitively.
Some users found the shoe sizing to be small.
The collar hit the ankle bone at times, which was uncomfortable, a reviewer noted.
Bottom line
The FuzeX Lyte 2 is a road running shoe design for neutral runners. The shoe received both negative and positive feedback. The overwhelming number of positive comments has proven that the Asics FuzeX Lyte 2 was satisfactory to a lot of runners. The shoe’s features, performance, and fit have all gathered praises, while very few issues were found on some of the upper elements. With that said, most customers have enjoyed using the shoe and therefore were happy with their purchase."
Reebok All Terrain Craze, Reebok,88.0,,210.0,$80,$64 (save 20%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.4oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal,,"9 reasons to buy
The sock liner held the foot well, a runner stated.
The outsole had a fantastic grip on mud and loose dirt, a user remarked.
One wearer praised the shoe’s performance in sprints, and another was impressed with its cross-country capabilities. Meanwhile, few other users claimed the shoe was perfect for obstacle-course racing.
Various customers described the All Terrain Craze as comfortable.
Many users admired the shoe’s design and said it was stylish.
The Reebok All Terrain Craze was defined as lightweight by several runners
The shoe provided a steady ride even on steep surfaces, a commenter
One user was pleased that the upper drained water quickly.
A couple of purchasers found the shoe to be affordable.
5 reasons not to buy
The shoe sizing was a bit longer than standard, a user observed.
The heel cup was stiff, said a buyer.
Some runners felt the show needed breaking in before getting comfortable
The gusseted tongue gave a fit that was too tight, a reviewer claimed.
The midsole of the All Terrain Craze lacked arch support, stated a wearer.
Bottom line
The Reebok All Terrain Craze has managed to amaze majority of its users based on the extensive list of positive comments towards it. The various commendations range from the shoe’s construction to its performance, to even its price and appearance. Only a handful of consumers found issues with fit and support, but on the overall, the shoe proved right to its claims as an outstanding trail runner."
Saucony Hurricane ISO 2, Saucony,86.0,82.0,623.0,$160,$79 (save 95%), Road, Stability, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 8.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Jan 2016," Normal, Wide | Normal, Wide", Saucony Hurricane ISO 5,"6 reasons to buy
The ISOFIT technology makes the upper unit more flexible, breathable and responsive to the movements of the foot.
The Support Frame locks the heel in place, making sure that slips are prevented.
Runners generally appreciated the RUNDRY Collar Lining, which offers moisture wicking and security.
The EVERUN and PWRGRID+ makes the mid-sole unit more robust and responsive.
Runners welcomed the X-900 carbon rubber material and the Injection Blown Rubber in the outsole for more durable traction and protection.
The Hurricane ISO 2 is a very flexible running shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
There were complaints saying that the overlay system was too tight and uncomfortable.
This running shoe has a high price.
Some runners said that the cushioning was a bit firmer and not bouncy enough.
Bottom line
The Saucony Hurricane ISO 2 is a stability shoe designed for road running. It is a popular running shoe because of its reliable components and responsive design. From the upper to the sole unit, any runner who needs comfort and moderate stability is well-serviced."
Adidas Response Trail X, Adidas,85.0,,5.0,$75,$50 (save 33%), Trail, Neutral,,,,,," Normal | Normal, X-Wide",,"5 reasons to buy
The traction capacity of the Adidas Response Trail X’s outsole unit is welcomed by those who appreciate precise surface control.
People have stated that this product is a suitably lightweight running shoe for all-day use.
The underfoot cushioning system of this model is appreciated by runners who desire comfort on the trails.
Some testers believe that the price of the Response Trail X is affordable.
The in-shoe wrap of the upper is lauded for not irritating the skin.
2 reasons not to buy
Some users have noticed the fabrics surrounding the lace-holes starting to rip apart after merely a few uses.
According to more than a few consumers, the forefoot section is a bit too loose.
Bottom line
The goal of the Adidas Response Trail X is to become the beginner’s trail running shoe. The straightforward design of this product can assist the wearer when it comes to tackling the unpredictable outdoor paths. A reinforced upper unit works with a lightweight midsole foam and a trail-optimized outsole foam to deliver confident performances."
Mizuno Wave Daichi 3, Mizuno,87.0,,27.0,$130,$72 (save 45%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,, Normal | Normal, Mizuno Wave Daichi 4,"6 reasons to buy
Some runners commented that the shoe was comfortable.
A significant number of buyers agreed that the Mizuno Wave Daichi 3 was best for road and trail running.
Some users mentioned that it was attractive.
One of the consumers felt no rubbing on foot during the running session.
The shoe was durable, according to those who have tried it.
Many buyers admired its fit.
2 reasons not to buy
One of the wearers commented that the shoe was bulky.
Several consumers thought that the Mizuno Wave Daichi 3 was too narrow for their feet.
Bottom line
The Mizuno Wave Daichi 3 was admired by a lot of users because of its excellent fit.  Its ability to perform well on both roads and trails has made them happy and contented. Although several of them have issues on its bulky appearance, others still recommend the shoe because of the comfort it provided. In general, the Mizuno Wave Daichi 3 has gained appreciation for its attractive design, durability and performance."
Dynafit Ultra 100, Dynafit,85.0,,7.0,$140,$98 (save 95%)," Trail, Mud", Neutral, Men: 11.6oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,, Normal | Normal,,"8 reasons to buy
Runners testify that the Dynafit Ultra 100 offers excellent grip on various surfaces. 
This running shoe is suitable for mixed conditions, some wearers claim. 
It offers reliable protection, according to many users. 
Several consumers mention that it is lighter compared to other trail running shoes. 
This running companion is comfortable to wear, based on reviews. 
A few commenters said that the shoe is responsive. 
The Ultra 100 offers just the right amount of cushioning, some buyers observed.
Numerous purchasers appreciate the stylish design of this shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of testers reported that the Dynafit Ultra 100 is a little stiff. 
One user complained that the shoelaces take longer to do up and tuck away compared to normal laces.
Bottom line
The Dynafit Ultra 100 is a highly durable trail running shoe that offers a healthy blend of cushioning and protection. It is a perfect running companion for runners and athletes who want to test the limits of their endurance. This shoe is specifically designed for training and running over challenging terrains. It works best for neutral runners or those who do not overpronate.
 "
Nike Dart 12, Nike,86.0,,1383.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"9 reasons to buy
The Nike Dart 12 was suitably lightweight, according to many of those who tried it.
Several testers noted that it had an adequate fit.
Based on a number of reviews, this model was able to deliver comfort and support to the foot, thus making the running experience more agreeable.
Many testers actually felt the air as it flowed into the foot-chamber and cooled their feet.
Some consumers wrote that wearing this shoe reduced, and even prevented, knee pain.
Though the color schemes were subtle, they still enticed those who have reviewed this version.
The price of the Nike Dart 12 gained many fans and they said that it was affordable.
The underfoot experience didn’t leave a lot to be desired, according to many runners; they felt that it cushioned the foot well.
The rubber compound in the outsole received praise because it didn’t wear off easily, and because it gripped the asphalt with ease.
6 reasons not to buy
Several testers noted that the arch support mechanism in this model wasn’t as efficient as the one in the previous iterations.
The upper fabrics started ripping off after only a few months of use, some runners reported.
The fabrics of the inner sleeve tore off on a consumer, causing some discomfort to their skin while wearing the shoe.
According to a purchaser, the underfoot platform felt stiff and it looked like it was made from plastic.
A tester reported that the cushioning system wore out on them after only a month of use.
A number of runners were actually unsupportive of the general quality of this shoe because its different sections generally fell apart on them over time.
Bottom line
The Nike Dart 12 received praise from runners who appreciated its affordable price, its agreeable underfoot cushioning system, and its overall functionality on the asphalt. Many welcomed its modern look. For them, it didn’t look too overwhelming, but it was able to satisfy their expectations. But such wasn’t the case for some consumers because they felt that it wasn’t durable and that some of its mechanisms felt lacking in terms of efficacy."
Reebok Lite Slip-on, Reebok,75.0,,7.0,$55,$25 (save 55%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
People loved the lightweight structure of the Reebok Lite Slip-on. 
The upper and midsole units are soft and comfortable, said many runners. 
A lot of buyers claimed that it offers a snug fit. 
Several users appreciated the shoe’s flexibility. 
It is suitable for light runs, workouts, and casual walks, based on reviews. 
This running shoe is breathable, according to a few wearers. 
Some users, with plantar fasciitis, said that the shoe is comfortable. 
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners noted that it is not durable enough for running. 
A buyer complained because his heel slips out with every stride. 
It is not suitable for long runs, according to many consumers. 
Bottom line
Featuring a blend of comfort and style, the Reebok Lite Slip-on is a women’s lightweight shoe designed for both jogging and fashion. The shoe’s slip-on construction allows for easy on and off, making it suitable not only for jogging but also for work, school, and other casual walks. This neutral running shoe also utilizes quality materials that enhance comfort, breathability, and durability. "
Nike Air Relentless 4, Nike,90.0,,325.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 7.7oz,,,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
Most reviewers have been very impressed by the comfortable ride of the Relentless 4.
The price is average.
The cushioning is soft with a hint of pop, noted several.
6 amazing color options.
The shoe looks good, that it is often used by many as a lifestyle shoe.
Some have used the shoe as a gym partner for its comfort and support.
Others have used the shoe for sockless running.
3 reasons not to buy
A handful has experienced durability issues in the upper.
The traction needs improvement when used in wet areas.
It emits an annoying squeak when just walking that have embarrassed more than a few reviewers.
Bottom line
The Nike Air Relentless 4 is a simple, functional, and great-looking shoe that works as designed. It has good arch support, a wraparound fit in the upper, and a plush ride. Logging the miles in comfort in a shoe that can readily turn heads best describes the 4th version of the Relentless."
Under Armour Speed Tire Ascent Low,,90.0,,80.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
A lot of runners loved the style and color options of the shoe.
According to some buyers, the Under Armour Speed Tire Ascent Low was comfortable and breathable.
Few reviewers mentioned that the outsole provided enough grip on different types of terrains.
A good number of testers commented that the shoe was suitable for hiking, walking, and running activities.
Many consumers appreciated its durability, versatility, and lightweight structure.
2 reasons not to buy
Some buyers thought the shoe is expensive.
One of the testers as disappointed because the treads wore out easily after only several uses.
Bottom line
A good number of runners agreed that the Under Armour Speed Tire Ascent Low was a good companion for different adventures and running sessions. It provided enough traction on a wide variety of surfaces and conditions. Although some were disappointed with its sizing schemes and price, others still recommended this shoe because of its stylish look, lightweight structure, and versatility."
Arc'teryx Norvan LD 2 GTX, Arc'teryx,82.0,,6.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
Numerous users mention that the Arc'teryx Norvan LD 2 GTX offers a firm grip on various surfaces. 
This running shoe is highly durable, based on reviews. 
It is lighter compared to other trail running shoes, according to many wearers. 
A lot of runners testify that this shoe is comfortable to wear. 
Buyers love the waterproof feature of the shoe. 
This running partner is supportive, several consumers claim. 
Some reviewers highlighted that it is a good option for hiking. 
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of testers observe that the Arc'teryx Norvan LD 2 GTX has a narrow toe box. 
Several purchasers commented that this shoe needs more cushioning. 
Bottom line
The Arc'teryx Norvan LD 2 GTX is a durable running shoe designed to provide comfort and protection when running over challenging terrains. This waterproof running shoe features a minimalist design that is suitable for running rain or shine. It offers a comfortable, lightweight, and well-protected ride. 
 "
,,,,,,, Road, Motion control, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,
Reebok OSR Grasse Road, Reebok,87.0,82.0,7.0,$120,$49 (save 67%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
Many consumers mentioned that the fit was perfect when they tried it.
Some of the users agreed that the product had an affordable price.
A good number of runners commented that the cushioning was great.
According to those who have tried it, the Reebok OSR Grasse Road was very supportive.
The majority of the testers agreed that the shoe was genuinely comfortable to wear.
Some reviewers loved its attractive color combinations.
A consumer noted that the product was not only good for running sessions, but also for gym workouts.
3 reasons not to buy
One user said that the cushioning in the forefoot area was too stiff for a running shoe.
A tester mentioned that he had a blister problem after several uses only. As a result, he experienced a lot of pain and discomfort.
According to one of the consumers, he felt some irritation after 6 miles of running.
Bottom line
Many consumers agreed that the Reebok OSR Grasse Road was one of the most comfortable and supportive shoes they have ever worn. They said that it offered fantastic cushioning. Although several of them felt discomfort after only several uses, others still recommended the product because of its affordable price and appealing color combinations. They loved wearing it for gym workouts and running activities."
New Balance FuelCore Nitrel Trail, New Balance,89.0,,513.0,$75,$57 (save 24%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 7.5oz,,,," Normal, X-Wide | Normal, Wide", New Balance FuelCore Nitrel v2,"11 reasons to buy
A good number of buyers noticed that it was supportive.
According to several runners, the shoe has an affordable price.
A few testers lauded its stretchable upper fabric.
A lot of reviewers said that the shoe was comfortable.
Many purchasers commented that the New Balance FuelCore Nitrel Trail was lightweight.
Various consumers said that the toe box was protective.
A good number of testers said that it is true to size.
Aside from running, it is also best for hiking and walking.
A handful of wearers admired the New Balance FuelCore Nitrel Trail because it fitted perfectly on them.
Several runners loved its attractive color variations.
Many testers said that the shoe provided excellent grip on a wide variety of surfaces.
3 reasons not to buy
Based on some reviews, the toe box was narrow.
Several runners said that the shoe was not durable.
The insole did not provide enough cushioning, according to one of the purchasers.
Bottom line
The New Balance FuelCore Nitrel Trail has made a lot of runners satisfied because of its fit and structure. Aside from its design, the shoe also provides the right amount of grip, support, and comfort. While others have issues with durability and narrow toe box, others still recommended the shoe because of its versatility. In general, the New Balance FuelCore Nitrel Trail is an affordable shoe for runners who are seeking a protective, comfortable, supportive yet affordable footwear."
Nike Flex RN 2019, Nike,81.0,,41.0,$85,$55 (save 35%), Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal,,"8 reasons to buy
A number of buyers praise the Nike Flex RN 2019's good fit.
The running shoe is very comfortable, commended several testers.
It is built with high-quality materials, noted quite a few commenters.
Some experts appreciate the generous cushioning within the foot chamber.
The running shoe is very shock absorbent, expressed some runners.
Many of the customers hail the shoe for its lightness.
According to multiple wearers, the neutral running shoe has great traction.
The shoe's makeup delivers sufficient support, reported some users.
4 reasons not to buy
One customer is skeptical about the sock-like design of the road running shoe.
The running shoe lacks durability, claimed some experts.
A few shoppers have found the shoe too tight.
The running shoe limits foot motions, shared various reviewers.
Bottom line
Embodying the quality of comfort, Nike Flex RN 2019 is designed with premier technical elements. It has the ability to adapt to the movements of the foot, sporting unmatched flexibility. Featuring a reliable outsole composition, runners can expect a grippy performance on a number of surfaces. Offered at an affordable price, the Flex RN 2019 from Nike does not disappoint when it comes to support, lightness, and security."
Saucony Ideal, Saucony,93.0,,399.0,$70,$63 (save 10%), Road, Neutral,,,,, Feb 2017, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
Many liked the lightweight construction of the Saucony Ideal.
The Ideal is a comfortable shoe as noted in some reviews.
The upper mesh is very breathable, according to some users.
The Saucony Ideal is a versatile shoe. Several purchasers have used the shoe not just for running but also for gym workouts.
A few liked the stylish look of the shoe.
A lot of runners liked the affordable price of this shoe.
This shoe cushioning system apparently reduced the occurrence of foot fatigue and discomfort during all-day activities, noted some consumers.
4 reasons not to buy
A few users complained that the toe box was too narrow for them.
Many runners were not happy with the shoe’s poor arch support.
Not great for long-distance runs due to thin sole, according to some reviews.
The material used in the upper unit received a few negative remarks because it apparently ripped apart easily.
Bottom line
The Saucony Ideal is a lightweight running shoe that is best for runners with a narrow forefoot. This neutral running shoe designed for women delivers all-day comfort and breathability for all-around running performance. However, given the mixed reviews, it is safe to say that the Saucony Ideal has not yet achieved total success. "
Merrell MTL Long Sky, Merrell,86.0,87.0,8.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
People are happy to call the Merrell MTL Long Sky a lightweight running shoe for all-day use.
Several users have observed a well-ventilated ride because of the open construction of the mesh upper.
The traction given by the outsole unit is deemed highly efficient and confidence-boosting, particularly on rugged paths.
Consumers are saying that the underfoot experience is stable and agreeable to the foot.
Based on some reviews, the in-shoe wrap is apparently secure and non-irritating to the skin.
2 reasons not to buy
The aggressive nature of the outsole prevents this product from being steady on flat ground.
The individual lugs are quick to wear off, according to a few consumers.
Bottom line
The MTL Long Sky aims to become a reliable ultra marathon shoe that can handle the irregular terrains. This Merrell trail running shoe features an underfoot platform that is ready for the trails. Also, it brings stability into the picture with a medial post that prevents and /or corrects overpronation. A breathable and secure wrap can also be enjoyed when it comes to this model."
Reebok Speedlux 3.0, Reebok,89.0,,159.0,$55,$19 (save 65%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 8.8oz,,,, Normal | Normal,,"4 reasons to buy
Many consumers noted that the design of the Reebok Speedlux 3.0 was both trendy and sporty.
The underfoot cushioning system was responsive and comfortable, some testers reported.
The price was generally considered by runners to be affordable.
Most of the people who have purchased this running shoe were happy with its lightweight build.
3 reasons not to buy
According to some testers, there was an extra layer of cloth inside the toe-box that caused some irritation to the skin.
There were more than a few complaints about the sizing scheme; it was believed to be a bit small.
Based on a handful of reviews, this running shoe’s upper and midsole didn’t offer a lot of support.
Bottom line
The response for the Reebok Speedlux 3.0 was mixed. On the one hand, many were thrilled by the cheap price tag of this shoe, as well as its eye-catching looks and lightweight disposition. But doubters were present, and they complained about the materials being cheap-looking and the unsupportive construction. Suffice it to say that this neutral runner’s companion didn’t become a recipient of acclaim."
Altra Instinct 3.5, Altra,83.0,82.0,387.0,$110,$100 (save 9%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8.1oz , Women: 6.5oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,, Normal | Normal, Altra Instinct 4.0,"6 reasons to buy
Most runners noticed the improve design, more responsive ride and softer upper unit of the newest version of the Altra Instinct.
The Instinct 3.5 has an improved lacing system that gained positive feedback.
This shoe features the Natural Ride System that promotes natural foot movements.
The FootPod Outsole provides a responsive ride and flexibility.
Some runners noticed that this version offered improved cushioning.
The Quick Dry Air Mesh and the seamless design of the upper makes the interior and exterior clean and non-irritating to the skin.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners pointed out that the sole of this shoe was too firm.
Based on some reviews, the heel cup was positioned too high, causing some discomfort to the backs of their feet.
Others noted that the forefoot section of the Instinct 3.5 was a bit narrow.
Bottom line
The Instinct 3.5 from Altra offers a newer look, an improved upper, added cushioning and a more responsive ride. The shoe gained mix reviews from wearers but overall, it is a reliable road running shoe engineered for long-distance running and ultramarathons."
Hoka One One Challenger 2 ATR, Hoka One One,89.0,83.0,232.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,, Normal | Normal, Hoka One One Challenger 5 ATR,"5 reasons to buy
Most testers applauded the reliable cushioning and the good arch support of the Hoka One One Challenger 2 ATR.
Many mentioned that the shoe feels light and fast.
The shoe is comfortable enough to be used on long runs, as mentioned in some reviews.
Most users gave positive feedback of the shoe’s outsole that delivers reliable grip on varied surfaces.
The reinforced heel of the Challenger 2 ATR provides a secure locked down feel.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners found the Challenger 2 ATR too narrow and tight for their liking.
Hoka recommends the shoe for runners below 85kg as the sole may wear off quicker than expected.
Bottom line
The Challenger 2 ATR is a trail running shoe designed for long distance runs. It works perfectly well on dirt, grass and technical terrain. Due to its high stack height, this shoe is not best for overpronators. Overall, the Hoka One One Challenger 2 ATR has proven to be a successful release."
Asics Gel Flux 5, Asics,87.0,80.0,435.0,$80,$40 (save 60%), Road, Neutral, Men: 11.2oz , Women: 9.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,," Narrow, Normal | Normal, Wide",,"5 reasons to buy
The cushioning systems that are present in the Asics Gel Flux 5 were appreciated by those who have tested it.
Most consumers considered this running shoe to be right to size.
The color schemes were lauded because it made the façade more eye-catching.
The weight of this product was considered to be suitably light.
Most purchasers noted that the upper and the sole unit were able to support the shape and motion of the foot.
2 reasons not to buy
Some testers claimed that the Gel Flux 5 required an initial break-in period of a few uses before becoming comfortable.
The durability of the shoe has been disappointing to some, especially when compared to the previous version of the Gel Flux.
Bottom line
Most runners were happy with the performance of the Asics Gel Flux 5. Some of them welcomed the supportive upper and midsole, while others fawned about its eye-catching design. Moreover, this neutral road shoe was deemed lightweight. On the other hand, there were complaints about a need for a break-in period, as well as problems on durability."
Mizuno Wave Catalyst, Mizuno,88.0,83.0,812.0,$120,$90 (save 25%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9.4oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal, Mizuno Wave Catalyst 2,"6 reasons to buy
The AIRmesh makes up the entire upper unit of the Mizuno Wave Catalyst and it keeps the feet cool & dry.
Many reviewers appreciated stretch capability of the upper, as well as the sturdy heel construction.
Runners applauded the many different color options for this running shoe.
There are a variety of widths for this shoe, including wide and narrow.
Its durability is relied upon by many.
The cushioning is consistent and the light stability features make it a very appealing shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
There were runners who felt that the Mizuno Wave Catalyst needed a more prominent stability feature to cradle the underside of the foot.
Others noted that it didn’t do a lot in terms of improvement, so the response was mediocre.
It has a moderately high price tag.
Bottom line
The Wave Catalyst from Mizuno is one of the go-to running shoes for those who want mild underfoot support, dependable durability and just the right amount of cushioning. It looks cool and it’s meant to enhance the performance of the wearer."
Altra Superior 3.5, Altra,89.0,84.0,323.0,$110,$75 (save 32%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.6oz , Women: 8.2oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm, Dec 2017, Normal | Normal, Altra Superior 4.0,"8 reasons to buy
The Altra Superior 3.5 gave a precise fit, various customers stated.
Many users were pleased with the durability of the outsole.
A lot of purchasers admired the traction on technical terrain.
Various revieweres have directed their positive comments on the versatility of the tread pattern.
Numerous runners commended the roomy toe box.
Several wearers responded positively to the shoe’s zero-drop silhouette.
The midsole supplied plenty of cushioning, a customer stated.
The shoe was comfortable even throughout all-day wear, as mentioned by a reviewer. Other people echoed on this opinion by saying the Superior 3.5 delivered comfort right out of the box.
1 reasons not to buy
The StoneGuard was quite bulky and cumbersome, according to some wearers. Others removed it during their runs, while some thought its thickness and weight was distracting.
Bottom line
In summary, the Altra Superior 3.5 has proven itself to be a solid trail running shoe. According to various users, it has ticked all the boxes on what an ideal trail runner should have, as they cited praises about the fit, durability, and other structural factors. For a series that is doing quite well, Altra Superior has nailed it once again with version 3.5."
Altra Olympus 2.5, Altra,86.0,90.0,243.0,$150,$139 (save 7%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.5oz , Women: 9.6oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm, Jul 2017, Normal | Normal, Altra Olympus 3.5,"6 reasons to buy
One tester narrated that he did not need to break the shoe in.
The upper of the Altra Olympus 2.5 felt more structured and supportive, one user stated.
Some consumers felt that the toe box had enough wiggle room.
A few runners commended the grip the shoe provided on dry terrain.
A number of users mentioned that the shoe felt like it had the right amount of cushioning.
The majority of people gravitated toward the Olympus 2.5 because they had foot problems like arthritis or plantar fasciitis. These problems did not become a hindrance when they ran with the shoe.
5 reasons not to buy
A good number of users narrated that the upper of Altra’s Olympus 2.5 gave in to tear after running in the shoe for only 90 miles.
One user observed the inside trim on the ankle part of the shoe falling apart.
Many testers mentioned that the shoelaces were too short.
Chunky and bulky-looking were common adjectives used in some runners’ reviews.
One user explained that the heel cuff of the shoe felt too restrictive. The perceived harshness caused some bruising and pain with each step.
Bottom line
The Olympus 2.5 from Altra is a neutral trail running shoe that offers a redesigned upper, a sticky and durable outsole, and maximum cushioning. The shoe received mixed reviews from the users. Overall, the shoe is best for those who are looking for a comfortable, protective, and stable running shoe.  "
Mizuno Wave Hitogami 2,,93.0,83.0,113.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.9oz , Women: 6.5oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,, Mizuno Wave Hitogami 4,"8 reasons to buy
The soft and minimal upper provides very comfortable next to skin feel, based on most reviews.
The Hitogami 2 is reasonably-priced.
It is very light and flexible.
A good number of runners loved the adequate ground perception provided by the shoe.
Despite the 9mm heel offset, a handful of comments noted how they run lower than the considerable drop.
It works fine as a race day shoe or as a lightweight trainer.
The mesh and the Intercool ventilation in the sole translate to a very breathable shoe.
Traction is superb in the 2nd instalment of the Hitogami.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners found the ride as too hard.
There were several who needed break-in time in this shoe.
A few were disappointed by the upper quality of the Wave Hitogami 2.
Bottom line
The Mizuno Hitogami 2 is a shoe built for tempo runs, marathons, or high-mileage training. With a very stable ride for a lightweight shoe, runners can also pick up the pace because of the responsive forefoot and the smooth transition from heel to toe."
Adidas Climachill Rocket, Adidas,93.0,87.0,197.0,$120,$68 (save 43%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
The word ‘comfortable’ was used by many runners to describe the Adidas Climachill Rocket.
It had an adequately lightweight nature, noted some testers.
The full-length mid-sole was very responsive for a lot of those who tried it.
The testers felt that the cushioning system was able to absorb impact shock with ease.
Runners stated that the upper cover system felt snug, but not too tight.
The ventilation afforded by the upper fabrics made the running experience of the users very agreeable.
Many felt that it was true to its size.
2 reasons not to buy
It was a bit difficult to put on because it lacked an adjustable traditional tongue, stated some runners.
The upper mesh material felt tight, according to a purchaser.
Bottom line
The Adidas Climachill Rocket was very much welcomed by many runners. For many of them, it was a comfortable neutral running shoe to have. They also said that the cushioning system was reliable. But there were those who complained that it was difficult to put on."
Inov-8 Trail Talon 275, Inov-8,81.0,84.0,20.0,$120,$106 (save 29%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,," Normal, Wide | Normal, Wide, X-Wide",,"7 reasons to buy
The upper unit of the Inov-8 Trail Talon 275 breathed well and stayed dry, noted a reviewer.
Many thought that the modern design of this running shoe made it attractive.
Testers were in agreement when they stated that it had an adequate weight that didn’t drag their feet down.
The outsole gripping lugs were efficient at giving reliable grip on the surfaces, wrote an expert reviewer.
The mid-sole cushioning system of this model is a bit more substantial than its sister running shoe, the Trail Talon 250; runners felt that it was a bonus that allowed their feet to handle long running sessions.
The platform of the Trail Talon 275 was responsive and comfortable, as commented by a reviewer.
Testers welcomed the inclusion of a gusseted tongue, which halted debris from entering the shoe.
1 reasons not to buy
An expert reviewer wrote that those who wanted to get excellent ground-feel might not enjoy the Inov-8 Trail Talon 275 because the underfoot experience felt a little too cushioned.
Bottom line
The Inov-8 Trail Talon 275 was created to provide reliable performance on the trails. Runners generally liked the responsive mid-sole, the breathable coverage and the outsole grip. Strong reviews certainly elevated this neutral running shoe’s credibility, making it one to rely on."
New Balance Fresh Foam 1080 v7, New Balance,88.0,72.0,397.0,$150,$100 (save 93%), Road, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Jan 2017," Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Normal", New Balance Fresh Foam 1080 v10,"9 reasons to buy
A tester commented that her feet felt great while wearing the New Balance Fresh Foam 1080 v7.
Natural toe-splay is accommodated thanks to the wide toe box, noted a consumer.
This shoe felt true-to-size, some users stated.
Wearing this shoe all day didn’t cause any discomfort, according to several reviewers.
The shock absorbing capability of the mid-sole gained recognition for being efficient.
A user commented that the underfoot platform had a bouncy disposition, which energized each step through the gait cycle.
Many runners described the 1080 v7 as comfortable.
The aesthetics of this shoe received positive feedback from consumers who liked how it looked.
The outsole worked well for those who were particular about the traction-capability of their pair of running shoes.
2 reasons not to buy
A few runners observed that the coverage was a bit narrow, causing some tightness to be felt.
A purchaser reported that the sole unit had broken down after only 5 weeks of use.
Bottom line
The New Balance Fresh Foam 1080 v7 had many supporters. Runners who wanted an efficient, neutral shoe apparently received it in the form of this update. They welcomed its color schemes, its responsive underfoot platform, and its general performance. On the other hand, there were complaints about sizing, as well as a gripe about the durability of its sole unit."
Asics Gel Foundation 13, Asics,90.0,,305.0,$120,$96 (save 20%), Road, Motion control, Men: 12.3oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,," Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Normal, Wide",,"5 reasons to buy
Many consumers liked the eye-catching aesthetics of the Asics Gel Foundation 13.
Those who had problems with the muscles and tendons of the feet and legs claimed that this running shoe was able to stave off pain and gait deviations.
The cushioning system was lauded because it apparently provided tons of underfoot support.
People liked that the insole can be removed, and that custom orthotics can easily be placed on the platform.
Some purchasers stated that this product worked well as a work-shoe or as a part of casual apparel.
2 reasons not to buy
According to a few people, the forefoot section of this running shoe was a bit tight.
Some people noticed the front part of the upper tearing off after a few weeks of use.
Bottom line
The overall response towards the Asics Gel Foundation 13 was positive. People were mostly happy with what this stability shoe had to offer. They especially praised the supportive configuration of the underfoot platform. The looks and the versatility of the silhouette were also lauded. On the other hand, some weren’t happy with the width profiles while others felt that the upper unit was not durable."
Mizuno Wave Horizon, Mizuno,84.0,83.0,136.0,$160,$90 (save 44%), Road, Stability, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 9.9oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm, Feb 2017, Normal | Normal, Mizuno Wave Horizon 4,"6 reasons to buy
The stability mechanics present in the Mizuno Wave Horizon received praise from a number of reviewers.
The cushioning capability of the mid-sole unit impressed most of those who have tried it.
Landing impact was attenuated by the foam platform, according to purchasers.
This model felt lightweight for a stability shoe, a reviewer observed.
Several consumers liked that the outsole was durable enough to resist wear and tear, even after many uses.
A runner was able to appreciate the flexible forefoot section of the platform, stating that it allowed him to move more naturally through the gait cycle.
3 reasons not to buy
The heel cup was apparently too narrow that it cut into the heel of a tester.
The base of the shoelaces felt a bit too snug for a tester.
A runner observed that though the cushion is soft, it had a tendency to compress at the end of long runs.
Bottom line
The reception given to the Mizuno Wave Horizon was generally positive. Runners welcomed the stability mechanics of this road shoe, as well as its lightweight construction and the generally responsive foam platform. There were a few complaints about it, including a bit of tightness in some sections of the upper."
Brooks Racer ST 5,,92.0,86.0,24.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 8.6oz , Women: 8.6oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A few testers coveted the Racer ST 5’s ability to tackle the long distance runs, as well as speed trainings.
Several runners took notice of how responsive this model was when it came to their performance.
The low profile nature of the forefoot gives the shoe superb ground feedback.
The price is very affordable.
The traction of the Brooks Racer ST 5 is more than adequate on the road based on the reviews of a handful of runners.
The Diagonal Rollbar Technology allows mild over-pronators to enjoy this running shoe without adding weight.
It has an average weight that’s agreeable to the preferences of most runners.
3 reasons not to buy
Most of the reviewers were frustrated by the quality of the laces, which tended to easily become unraveled.
A gender-specific fit is something a large majority of runners would have wanted from the Racer ST 5.
The 12mm heel differential, especially for a racer, did not sit well for forefoot and mid-foot strikers.
Bottom line
The Brooks Racer ST 5 offers excellent arch support and underfoot cradling. It is a very versatile stability running shoe that can easily transform from a race day shoe into a rugged daily trainer that can do both distance and speed training. This shoe is praised by many because it is affordable and reliable."
Skechers GOmeb Speed 5, Skechers,92.0,93.0,12.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 5.8oz , Women: 4.5oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm, Jan 2018, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
The Skechers GOmeb Speed 5 performed well on races and long-distance runs, according to a reviewer.
Many users described the shoe as lightweight.
Various buyers appreciated the design and style of the shoe.
As a racing flat, the GOmeb Speed 5 provided plenty of cushioning, a commenter stated.
The shoe was true to size and had a precise fit, claimed numerous wearers. Others mentioned the shoe fit like a glove.
The FLIGHT GEN™ midsole was very responsive, a runner observed.
2 reasons not to buy
The shoe lacked underfoot protection in the forefoot area, according to a reviewer.
One user experienced poor grip from the outsole during rainy days.
Bottom line
The Skechers GOmeb Speed 5 was undoubtedly a successful release with the unanimously positive feedback it received from users. From the fit to the performance, the GOmeb Speed 5 received winning remarks all around. There were only a few disappointed remarks about the outsole’s functionality. In summary, the shoe was a significant and worthy upgrade from its predecessor."
, 361 Degrees,,87.0,,$110,$24 (save 100%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 8.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal,,
New Balance Fresh Foam Veniz, New Balance,85.0,,95.0,$75,$48 (save 36%), Road, Neutral, Men: 6.4oz , Women: 6.4oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,," Normal, Wide | Normal, Wide",,"7 reasons to buy
Some runners found the New Balance Fresh Foam Veniz to be an affordable shoe.
It was a lightweight shoe that did not scrimp on the cushioning, a reviewer wrote.
The shoe was very easy to get on and off, observed a wearer.
The outsole had a good grip on smooth indoor surfaces, according to a buyer.
A customer remarked that the midsole was firm yet comfortable and that the shoe was excellent for exercise.
One user relayed their pleasant experience on how the shoe helped reduce lower back pain.
The Fresh Foam Veniz was a flexible shoe that performed well, even in obstacle courses, commended a reviewer.
4 reasons not to buy
The shoelaces were too short, a wearer commented.
A couple of runners were dismayed that the shoe was too narrow even with the width options available.
One user thought the midsole did not provide adequate arch support.
The toe area tore apart quickly, a buyer complained.
Bottom line
The New Balance Fresh Foam Veniz was able to get the approval of the majority of its users. Many runners praised the shoe’s performance and structure, notably the midsole. The price and weight were also positively regarded. The adverse reactions were few, and most customers have claimed to look forward to the next release of this shoe."
Nike LunarTempo 2, Nike,86.0,82.0,210.0,$110,$80 (save 27%), Road, Neutral, Men: 7.5oz , Women: 6.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Jan 2016, Normal | Normal,,"8 reasons to buy
A lot of runners welcomed the vibrant look of the Nike LunarTempo 2, and they said that it made the façade very appealing.
Many reviewers appreciated the look of this shoe, which resembled a knitted material that wrapped around the foot like a cloth.
The Flywire cables gained some fans who wanted the upper cover system to feel more snug and secure.
Several testers pointed out how comfortable their experience had been with this version.
Runners noticed the plush underfoot support given by the Lunarlon foam.
This running shoe felt adequately lightweight for many of those who have tried it.
There were consumers who were able to wear this shoe for many types of activities, and they reported no problems with it.
Some reviewers stated that this shoe was able to last long, that it resisted wear and tear even after many uses.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners felt that the mid-sole unit of the LunarTempo 2 was a bit stiff.
A tester reported that the threading on the back of the shoe came apart after only one use.
Bottom line
The Nike LunarTempo 2 was able to satisfy many neutral runners, especially those who needed reliable underfoot cushioning for their running sessions. They welcomed its colorful design, its modern look and its responsive components. Though it wasn’t able to please a few testers, many still touted it to be a solid choice for adventures on the pavement."
,,,,,,, Road, Neutral,,, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,
Saucony Echelon 6, Saucony,77.0,,76.0,$130,$90 (save 31%), Road, Neutral, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,," Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Normal, Wide", Saucony Echelon 7,"5 reasons to buy
Several consumers reported that the Saucony Echelon 6 was able to offer the perfect amount of cushioning.
A lot of people noted that this shoe was true to size.
The toe box was wide enough to accommodate toe-splay, some testers stated.
According to a runner, the foot-chamber was wide enough to allow custom orthotics that didn’t slide forward during the running session.
Most of those who have tried this product found its quality to be top-tier.
3 reasons not to buy
The limited color options didn’t sit well with a couple of runners. They would’ve liked more color schemes.
A tester complained that the laces were too short.
One person was concerned about the sizing scheme being too small for his tastes.
Bottom line
The Saucony Echelon 6 gained fans for its comfortable underfoot experience, its accommodating forefoot construction, and its quality design. The consensus is that it’s an excellent update to the long-running series. But some detractors had their say about this road running shoe, criticizing the lack of various color options, the shortness of the laces, and the inconsistency of the sizing."
Under Armour SpeedForm Apollo 2, Under Armour,91.0,84.0,222.0,$100,$59 (save 41%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 5.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
The SpeedForm Apollo 2 is very comfortable, according to some testers.
The upper construction of the shoe is very breathable and durable based on some runners’ reviews.
The Apollo 2 features an arch reinforcement construction for foot guidance and precise fit.
Some runners took note of the shoe's responsive ride and cushioned support due to the dual-layer midsole.
The anatomical rubber outsole adds flexibility and durability.
A significant number of users mentioned that the shoe feels light and fast.
A reasonably-priced shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
According to some reviews, the tread of this shoe is not holding up longer compared to the previous version.
The 2nd version of the SpeedForm Apollo is heavier than the old version.
Bottom line
The Under Armour SppedForm Apollo 2 has gathered many reviews in its favor. The shoe proved to be an efficient runner with promising qualities, but a few users thought that the shoe still needs some improvement. The updated version of Under Armour SpeedForm Apollo offers durability, flexibility and well-cushioned ride. It is a neutral running shoe perfect for uptempo pace training and for competition."
Adidas Terrex Agravic XT GTX, Adidas,91.0,86.0,71.0,$200,$85 (save 57%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 12oz , Women: 10.8oz, Men: 7mm , Women: 7mm,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Many users considered the Adidas Terrex Agravic XT GTX to be a comfortable trail running shoe.
According to a commenter, the Terrex Agravic XT GTX was one of the most stylish trail running shoe currently in the market.
The shoe was comfortable enough even for long, brisk walks, a buyer stated.
A lot of customers thought the shoe had a precise fit.
A few runners claimed they were pleased with the lightness of the shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
One runner mentioned that the outsole of the Terrex Agravic XT GTX was too stiff. Another one said it was too rigid to be used in a running shoe.
Some purchasers agreed that the shoe was expensive.
Bottom line
The Adidas Terrex Agravic XT GTX gained positive comments from various trail runners who were impressed with its comfortable fit and reliable features. Many users also enjoyed the waterproofing benefits delivered by the shoe. Although some had criticized the price, the Terrex Agravic XT GTX was a shoe that most buyers considered to be worth the purchase."
Hoka One One Clifton 4, Hoka One One,88.0,82.0,1208.0,$130,$124 (save 5%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9.3oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm, Jul 2017," Normal, Wide | Normal, Wide", Hoka One One Clifton 6,"11 reasons to buy
Most users are pleased with the updates made on the Clifton 4.
A number of users said that the shoe is ideal for long-distance running and training.
Several users commented that this new version is more comfortable than its predecessor.
One user said that he felt like the shoe is well made and looks durable.
The shoe offered more support than the previous version said some reviewers.
The update on the design was gladly welcomed by a majority of runners.
Most reviewers said that running in the shoe did not cause them pain despite having foot and knee problems.
A majority of reviewers mentioned that the shoe fits true to size.
One tester was appreciative of the high arch support the shoe provided.
Most users said that there is enough room in the toe box.
A lot of runners agree that the shoe is very comfortable.
5 reasons not to buy
One runner mentioned that the arch on the midfoot felt too high. This caused a bit of pressure on his instep, resulting in a blister.
After 200 miles, a user said that he felt the cushioning of the shoe disappear. As a result, he experienced a bit of pain during his long runs.
The shoe felt stiffer compared to its former version, according to a few testers.
Some users mentioned that the ride on this new shoe version was much harder.
A few users voiced their opinions about the shoe not having the amount of cushioning that they expected.
Bottom line
The Clifton 4 is a moderately priced, neutral road running shoe that has received premium updates from Hoka One One. The comfort and in-shoe feel has been reinvigorated and so has the ride and the rebound of the shoe. Overall, this latest version of the Clifton will be at the top of the list of both Hoka fans and new users."
Inov-8 Trail Talon 290, Inov-8,81.0,84.0,12.0,$125,$40 (save 68%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Many users expressed their satisfaction with the Inov-8 Trail Talon 290 because of its wide toe box.
According to a few user comments, the shoe fits perfectly as advertised.
Some users admired the lightweight design of the Trail Talon 290.
This trail running shoe is well-designed and durable, based on some observations.
A few runners noted that the shoe performs well on rugged surfaces because of its grippy outsole.
Several buyers mentioned that the shoe is very comfortable.
1 reasons not to buy
One user said that the shoe needs more cushioning. 
Bottom line
Based on user reviews, the Inov-8 Trail Talon 290 is well-received by most trail runners. The shoe gained positive feedback when it comes to design, fit, and performance on rugged conditions. Overall, the shoe is an impressive release. It is a great option for runners who are looking for lightweight, affordable, and high-performing running shoe. "
Asics Gel Equation 8,,87.0,,684.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Many noticed the satisfying arch support of the Gel Equation 8.
Some gave thumbs up to the new and updated look of the Asics Gel Equation 8.
This shoe has a plush collar and tongue, according to several runners.
The Asics Gel Equation 8 offers plenty of cushioning, as mentioned in some reviews.
Available in an affordable price.
3 reasons not to buy
Based on some reviews, this shoe is too narrow and not ideal for wide-footed runners.
According to some testers, they felt uncomfortable in this shoe when used in high mileage running.
Some noticed that 8th version of the Gel Equation is not as durable as the other versions.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Equation 8 is a neutral running shoe that is designed for road running. Some runners thought that this shoe is not ideal and durable enough for long runs. This pair of running shoe is great for everyday running and daily training."
Asics Gel Forte,,87.0,85.0,11.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 13.3oz , Women: 10.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A large number of severe overpronators have fallen in love with the Asics Forte.
The cushioning is adequate for shoe built with fortified motion control features, according to several runners.
The Gel Forte is available in extra wide fit.
3M reflective materials are incorporated into the shoe.
Durability is guaranteed in this shoe, based on the observation of many runners.
Comfort is incredible, noted a sizeable number of runners.
Severe overpronators appreciated the dose of flexibility from the Forte.
3 reasons not to buy
The weight of the Gel Forte may be too much for some.
It can be a bit bulky for those who are not used to wearing motion control shoes.
Some runners saw the need to put the shoe through a break-in period.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Forte is a serious beast that is fortified with the best possible reinforcement to curb maximum inward rolling motion. It is a no-hassle kind of neutral running shoe that can last for a reasonably long time and delivers a reliable performance every time the runner takes the road."
Adidas Springblade Solyce,,90.0,,460.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.6oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The well-padded and seamless interior of the Springblade Solyce delivers an incredibly comfortable feel, according to several runners.
Some runners believe that the shoe is built to last based on their observations.
The one-piece upper that is supported by leather and synthetic overlays offer great security and midfoot hold.
Most runners are attracted by the eye-catching design of the springblades.
A good number of reviews consider the Solyce as good enough for casual wear.
The open mesh coverage ensures a breathable and cool run.
3 reasons not to buy
A few runners though the shoe was a bit heavy.
The price is a bit stiff for numerous runners.
The blade limits its usability as it can’t work as well on rocky or graveled paths.
Bottom line
While the performance of the Springblade collection is always up for contention, there is absolutely no doubt about the appeal it offers because of its unique design and style. Runners who would like to turn heads in a neutral running shoe that has moderate arch support, excellent comfort, and breathable upper will find the Solyce a great option."
Nike Free Flyknit 5.0,,88.0,82.0,791.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.6oz , Women: 6.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Nike Flex RN 2019,"6 reasons to buy
The Flyknit is like a fabric that wraps around the runner’s foot in a comfortable and non-irritating manner, according to some testers.
The Flywire cables function with the lacing system to provide a custom fit.
Runners generally welcomed the lightweight construction of the Flyknit 5.0.
The mid-sole unit has lightweight, yet springy foam that is responsive based on the reviews of several runners.
Hexagonal flex grooves allow the foot to move as naturally as possible.
Durable rubber is placed in critical areas where wear and abrasions usually happen.
3 reasons not to buy
The upper unit fell apart easily, based on some runners' comments.
The Free Flyknit 5.0 has an expensive price.
Some of the testers felt that traction isn’t as efficient for this model.
Bottom line
The Nike Free Flyknit series has been well-revered by many and the 5th version certainly steps up in terms of comfort and lightweight performance. Though it has some issues in terms of its quality and arch support, it can still function well for neutral runners."
Hoka One One Vanquish 2,,91.0,84.0,371.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,, Hoka One One Vanquish 3,"5 reasons to buy
Many testers appreciate the durable construction of the Hoka One One Vanquish 2.
It provides more cushioning as compared to the original version.
It is available in different color options.
Many runners found the upper built breathable and comfortable.
A few attested that the shoe runs true to size.
2 reasons not to buy
Ultra expensive.
Based on some reviews, the shoe feels too tight and narrow.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Vanquish 2 is a road running shoe that provides maximum cushioning for impact protection and resilient ride. The shoe gained positive and negative comments but the negative ones are not enough to overshadow the positive comments. It is ideal for daily running, walking and for long distance runs."
Asics Gel Cumulus 17, Asics,86.0,79.0,3320.0,$120,$90 (save 25%), Road, Neutral, Men: 11.4oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Jun 2015, Normal | Normal, Asics Gel Cumulus 22,"7 reasons to buy
A tester commented that the Asics Gel Cumulus 17 was able to provide comfort for their feet, even when worn for the entire day.
The various color schemes available for this model gained recognition from those who wanted to have visually endearing running gear.
There were consumers who wrote that the cushioning systems in this running shoe were responsive, efficient and unfailing.
Runners welcomed the ComforDry™ Sock Liner, which kept the interior environment healthy and odor-free through its antimicrobial properties.
The supportive mechanisms in the mid-sole were well-received; runners felt that they were aptly assisted in achieving a smoother gait.
Reviews were agreeable when it came to the outsole unit’s durability and capability to provide traction.
A tester noted that they weren’t able to experience any foot cramps or knee aches when they used the Asics Gel Cumulus 17 for their running sessions.
3 reasons not to buy
Several testers reported that the upper wasn’t as durable as they hoped; holes have started to appear in the forefoot area.
A runner noted that the rubber compound used in the outsole started to come off after a few months.
Others noted that the toe area was too tight; it rubbed uncomfortably against the skin and caused blisters.
Bottom line
The feedback for the Asics Gel Cumulus 17 road shoe was generally positive. There were those who felt the agreeable and responsive components of this model. Many welcomed its appealing color schemes. And as usual, the cushioning systems gained favor. It was touted as a solid option for the neutral runner. But there were negative reports about the durability of its upper and outsole units. Others simply wrote that the previous version was more comfortable."
Mizuno Wave Enigma 5, Mizuno,88.0,81.0,815.0,$150,$120 (save 20%), Road, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
The breathable upper mesh were noted in some reviews since it offers high levels of ventilation for the foot.
The Ortholite sock liner prevents moisture and maintains a bacteria-free inner environment.
It uses the Mizuno U4ic technology for maximum shock attenuation and a responsive ride.
The mid-sole unit features mechanisms that give extra underfoot support for better performance.
A gender-specific Smooth Ride technology makes each step more fluid and agreeable.
A few runners took note of the shoe’s reliable traction while running on the road.
Available in several color options.
3 reasons not to buy
The Mizuno Wave Enigma 5 is expensive.
According to some reviews, the sole unit wears off quickly.
Some runners noticed that the shoe runs small.
Bottom line
The Mizuno Wave Enigma 5 was designed for high mileage runners. It is a neutral running shoe that gives plenty of cushioning for longer and more efficient performance. Many runners liked the shoe because of its durability and responsiveness, but a few also were disappointed because it runs small and a bit expensive. In summary, the Enigma is a shoe worth recommending to peers."
Mizuno Wave Catalyst 2, Mizuno,89.0,80.0,218.0,$110,$51 (save 99%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Jan 2017, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Several runners noted that the Mizuno Wave Catalyst 2 was suitably lightweight for their activities.
The toe box accommodated natural toe-splay, some consumers wrote.
The collar and heel of the upper secured the food well and prevented slipping, a reviewer observed.
A tester lauded this shoe for being efficient for mid-distance running sessions.
A satisfied purchaser stated that wearing the Catalyst 2 prevented her feet from feeling tired or sore throughout the day.
According to a tester, there’s more support in this shoe than a track flat, which made for great extended exercises.
3 reasons not to buy
The forefoot section of the upper felt a bit narrow, according to some testers.
Some users say that the shoe's upper design is a bit outdated for its price tag.
The shoe's outsole is not thick enough, as noted by some wearers.
Bottom line
The Mizuno Wave Catalyst 2 gained generally positive remarks from runners. They felt that it was a nice update, marked with helpful components and features. They even enjoyed its performance, noting the comfort that they felt during their activities while wearing it. Inversely, there were those who had some gripes with its width and sizing scheme."
Reebok Speed Breeze, Reebok,77.0,,6.0,$60,$34 (save 43%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal, Reebok Speed Breeze 2,"5 reasons to buy
Many consumers lauded the attractive colors and charming design of the Reebok Speed Breeze.
The shoe was breathable according to some testers.
Most of the people who have bought this running shoe were happy because it is very comfortable.
The majority of the purchasers noted that the shoe was supportive.
A significant number of consumers were delighted by the shoe’s lightweight structure.
2 reasons not to buy
There were a few complaints about the shoe's sizing scheme. Users said it runs a bit small than usual.
Based on a review, the toe box of this shoe was narrow.
Bottom line
The Reebok Speed Breeze received a combination of positive and negative reviews. Many were delighted by the comfort and support level of this shoe, as well as its lightweight structure visually-appealing design. Others have issues with the fit and sizing. Overall, the Reebok Speed Breeze has won the hearts of most of the consumers because of its high-quality construction and performance."
Mizuno Synchro MX, Mizuno,89.0,,405.0,$120,$29 (save 76%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm, Jun 2016," Normal | Normal, Wide",,"7 reasons to buy
The Synchro MX is appreciated in most reviews as the most comfortable trainer these users have ever worn.
Some runners gave a thumbs up to the shoe’s durability.
It is quite flexible.
A good number of runners like the way it moves the runner forward after landing.
The cushioning is plush with a decent responsiveness, according to some reviews.
The AirMesh provides excellent breathability.
X-10 in high-impact areas keeps the wear and tear to a minimum.
3 reasons not to buy
The price tag is a little more than what several runners are willing to spend.
Some runners wanted the shoe to have something substantially lower than the 12mm heel drop.
A few others would have opted for other color options.
Bottom line
Mizuno introduces a rather functional shoe that relies mainly on a dual-density foam set up in the midsole as its highlight. The synchronization of the midsole foam provides excellent support, protection, durability, and responsiveness. With the Synchro MX runners get a 12mm heel drop trainer that has good arch support and light enough for long-distance runs."
Salomon XA Elevate GTX,,84.0,,97.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The waterproof nature of the Salomon XA Elevate GTX’s upper unit was lauded by its purchasers.
Several testers noted that this running shoe felt lightweight, even though it was meant for the trails.
The underfoot platform remained steady when on uneven terrain, according to several consumers.
Based on a majority of reviewers, the outsole was able to grip the surfaces with ease.
Many people liked the color schemes of the Salomon XA Elevate GTX.
1 reasons not to buy
The forefoot section of the upper rubbed uncomfortably against the big toe, a tester complained.
Bottom line
The Salomon XA Elevate GTX received mostly positive reviews from its purchasers. For them, this trail companion was reliable and high-performing, with its traction-ready outsole and its waterproof cover system. There was a complaint about the interior of the shoe rubbing against the toe, but it’s an isolated incident."
Skechers GOtrail,,92.0,84.0,54.0,,, Trail, Stability, Men: 9.4oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"12 reasons to buy
Most reviews mentioned the GOtrail’s awesome comfort.
Several noted that the price is average for a trail shoe.
A handful loved the lightweight ride of the Skechers GOtrail.
More than a few were impressed by the shoe’s traction.
It is covered with a highly-water resistant upper.
The breathability is pretty good for a shoe with substantial overlays and water-resistant upper, according to a few comments.
There are 4 color options.
The protection on the trail was very good, based on the reports of a handful of reviewers.
More than a few took the GOtrail for a ride right out of the box without any fit or performance issues.
The quick-drying upper is also very easy to clean, as observed by a few testers.
A handful of expert reviewers welcomed the quick and efficient turnover.
The ample toe box was welcomed by several runners.
3 reasons not to buy
The ride is a bit stiff for a handful.
A few were not happy with the shoe’s durability.
It feels a tad too flexible and plush for technical runs, according to a few expert reviewers.
Bottom line
The GOtrail is a low-level entry shoe based on one of Skechers’ most popular trail shoes. While this may not be as highly-sought as the other Skechers trail shoes, it still offers great comfort, adequate arch support, decent responsiveness, and an upper that can handle slight rains or early morning runs. All in all, this is a shoe that will not break the bank and offers more than average performance outdoor."
Adidas Vigor 6 TR, Adidas,92.0,,500.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 13oz , Women: 9oz,,, Jun 2017, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
The Adidas Vigor 6 TR felt lightweight, stated a good number of consumers; it was able to carry them through the trails with ease.
Many testers noted that this running shoe had a good feel to it, from the upper to the underfoot platform.
The underfoot experience felt like standing or running on clouds, according to several users.
A lot of runners appreciated the available color schemes, stating that such designs made the product more appealing to look at.
The general quality of the materials received positive remarks.
The tread pattern on the outsole gave responsible traction, noted some reviewers.
There were purchasers who reported that the Adidas Vigor 6 TR stayed efficient, even when used for work or for gym exercises.
2 reasons not to buy
The toe box was a bit tight for many users.
The front section of the upper unit tore off after only 2 months, a disgruntled runner complained.
Bottom line
According to a majority of those who have tested it, the Adidas Vigor 6 TR was efficient as a trail running shoe and as a daily option for work and exercise sessions. They were appreciative of its features, its comfortable platform and traction-ready outsole. Conversely, there were detractors and they had a number of cautionary words about this neutral running shoe."
Topo Athletic Runventure 2, Topo Athletic,93.0,87.0,29.0,$110,$79 (save 66%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,, Normal | Normal, Topo Athletic Runventure 3,"10 reasons to buy
Some reviewers loved its grippy outsole.
Many wearers mentioned that the Topo Athletic Runventure 2 was one of the most stable shoes they have ever worn.
Some of the purchasers agreed that the shoe has a roomy toe box.
A good number of wearers commented that the fit was perfect.
The Topo Athletic Runventure 2 was comfortable, according to many runners.
Several testers loved its lightweight structure.
Many consumers noted that the shoe has an excellent cushioning.
The majority of the buyers noted that the shoe provided enough underfoot protection.
Based on some reviews, the Topo Athletic Runventure 2 was breathable.
A handful of testers said that the shoe was great for running and everyday activities.
2 reasons not to buy
Some users commented that the shoe has a stiff midsole.
Based on observations, the Topo Athletic Runventure 2 was not a fast running shoe.
Bottom line
The Topo Athletic Runventure 2 has made many runners satisfied because of its excellent cushioning and impressive fit. Aside from the lightweight structure, the shoe also offers a right amount of stability, comfort, and breathability. While others have issues on the stiff midsole, others still appreciated the shoe because of its performance. Overall, the Topo Athletic Runventure 2 is a good investment for runners who are looking for a lightweight, protective and versatile running shoe."
Skechers GOrun Speed TRL Hyper,,83.0,89.0,7.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The durability of the materials used for the Skechers GOrun Speed TRL Hyper is welcomed by most testers.
Some reviewers have noted that the midsole delivers a bounciness that encourages energized steps.
The even structure of the outsole gripping lugs is welcomed by those who like to transition to flat ground.
This trail running shoe is eye-catching, according to some consumers.
Based on a handful of comments, the breathability of the upper is noticeable and welcome.
3 reasons not to buy
The ankle-locking system is said to cause some mild discomfort and stiffness to the rear part of the foot.
A few people have mentioned that the in-shoe experience is a bit restrictive.
Traction on wet ground is not as efficient as expected, according to several reviewers.
Bottom line
The Skechers GOrun Speed TRL Hyper is a neutral running shoe for off-road paths. Trail running enthusiasts who like a versatile companion for their adventures were able to appreciate the shoe and its features. The breathability of the upper, the durable construction, and the appealing design are highlighted as the positive elements."
Adidas Alphabounce RC, Adidas,91.0,,1337.0,$90,$42 (save 93%), Road, Neutral, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Jan 2017, Normal | Normal, Adidas Alphabounce RC 2.0,"9 reasons to buy
A good number of wearers appreciated the affordable price of the Adidas Alphabounce RC.
A few testers lauded its breathability and flexibility.
Many buyers commented that the shoe was well-padded.
A lot of reviewers admired its stylish design.
According to those who have tried it, the Adidas Alphabounce RC has an excellent fit.
The majority of the consumers noted that the shoe provided enough traction on a wide variety of paved surfaces.
The shoe was lightweight, based on some reviews.
The Adidas Alphabounce RC was supportive, according to many testers.
A handful of purchasers agreed that the shoe was comfortable.
2 reasons not to buy
Some of the users said that the shoe was narrow.
Based on observations, the shoe was not suitable for high volume training activities because its construction was not meant for rigorous and uneven terrains.
Bottom line
A good number of purchasers commented that the Adidas Alphabounce RC was a well-padded running shoe. They were contented with the shoe's stylish design and color variations. They loved the perfect fit and quality. Although several of them said that it was not best for high-level training activities, others still recommended the shoe because of its breathability and flexibility. Some were also disappointed with its smaller shoe measurements. Overall, the majority of the wearers said that the Adidas Alphabounce RC was a good option for those who want a supportive and comfortable yet lightweight and affordable running shoe."
Nike Air Zoom Terra Kiger 3, Nike,91.0,83.0,79.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7.2oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm, Jul 2015, Normal | Normal, Nike Air Zoom Terra Kiger 5,"6 reasons to buy
The Terra Kiger 3’s seamless upper design is valued by most runners as it is less irritating to the foot.
Most runners welcomed the inclusion of the Dynamic Flywire system, which improves the fit by adjusting with the lacing system.
The EVA sock liner follows the shape of the heel and arch, helping to cradle the foot responsibly.
The Zoom Air cushioning system offers low-profile underfoot support by means of pressurized air pockets.
A heel crash pad helps to lessen the impact shock when landing the foot on the ground based on the reviews of some runners.
Dual density outsole with multi-directional lugs offer durable protection and traction.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners felt that it was a bit heavier than the previous version.
Others thought that the Kiger 3 is limited to trail running.
A few noted that the upper unit was thicker, thus making it less breathable.
Bottom line
The Air Zoom Terra Kiger 3 from Nike is a popular trail shoe that gives exceptional service to runners and hikers who want a protective shoe for their adventures. It offers mild stability and a good amount of shock absorption mechanics."
Puma Faas 600 S v2,,85.0,80.0,41.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Some runners liked the upper construction of the Faas 600 S v2 because it provides breathable coverage and a glove-like fit.
It features the EverFit 2.0 lockdown technology for enhanced midfoot security.
The Faas 600 S v2 has the Faas Engineered Stability Zone for a more stable ride.
It is very comfortable to wear, according to some reviews.
This shoe is very affordable.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners were not impressed by the current lacing system of the Faas 600 S v2 because it tended to unravel easily.
The mid-foot area was a bit narrow for others.
Bottom line
The Puma Faas 600 S v2 is an off-trail running shoe perfect for runners who are looking for stability, comfort and lightweight support. This shoe is reliable for fitness trainings, as well as short and long-distance runs. Given the mixed reviews, the shoe still needs some improvement."
Hoka One One Gaviota, Hoka One One,91.0,88.0,279.0,$150,$110 (save 99%), Road, Motion control, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 8.6oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm, Jan 2017, Normal | Normal, Hoka One One Gaviota 2,"10 reasons to buy
Many runners have considered the Hoka One One Gaviota to be a good-looking shoe.
It was able to offer a comfortable ride throughout the running session, several consumers noted.
There were comments describing this product to be a great combination of cushioning and stability.
The thick underfoot foam was able to handle the landing impact very well, according to those who have tried it.
The stability mechanics that are present in the mid-sole gained favor from those who needed more support.
Purchasers noted that the toe box was roomy enough to accommodate natural toe-splay.
‘Comfortable’ was a word that many runners used to describe their time while wearing the Gaviota.
Several testers stated that this running shoe ran true-to-size.
Some reviewers observed that it was noticeably lighter in weight than most motion control shoes on the market.
A consumer noted that the materials used for the upper were supportive, yet lightweight and breathable.
3 reasons not to buy
A runner complained that the underfoot cushioning system wasn’t responsive; it apparently contributed some discomfort to his knees and legs.
The toe box and mid-foot section felt a bit too tight for some testers.
It had an expensive price, according to some runners.
Bottom line
As a new motion control shoe, the Hoka One One Gaviota worked well for those who wanted to have a mix of cushioning and support. For them, it looked appealing and it generally performed well. They felt that it was suitably able to provide reliable service in order to prevent overpronated foot motion. There were some complaints about its build-quality and construction, but it still gained more positive remarks."
Inov-8 Arctic Talon 275, Inov-8,75.0,88.0,10.0,$130,$100 (save 38%), Trail, Neutral,,,,,," Narrow, Normal | Narrow, Normal, Wide",,"5 reasons to buy
This shoe has reliable grip on snowy surfaces.
The ArticTalon 275 provides flexibility and right amount of cushioning.
Many mentioned that this is a fast shoe.
The sole unit is very durable as mentioned in some comments.
It keeps the foot warm while running on snowy conditions.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners felt that the shoe is too narrow for them.
There are testers who experience discomfort while wearing the shoe on long runs.
Bottom line
The Inov-8 ArctictTalon 275 is a reliable running shoe. It is designed for snowy or icy conditions. This shoe is equipped with the necessary technologies to survive extreme conditions. With the closed fitting, this shoe is definitely designed for runners with narrow foot."
Hoka One One Conquest 2, Hoka One One,88.0,,588.0,$170,$150 (save 99%), Road, Stability, Men: 12oz , Women: 10.3oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
This shoe features a Lycra ComfortFrame upper for more breathable and stretchable coverage.
Many reviewers welcomed the No-sew Construction of the upper, which lets runners experience a sock-like fit.
The Conquest 2 uses Rmat High-rebound cushioning technology for rebound and protection against impact forces.
The Soft EVA full-length mid-sole works well with the Early Stage Meta-Rocker design, which provides better toe-offs and transitions through the gait cycle.
Traction and durable protection are handled by the High Abrasion Lightweight Rubber in the outsole.
4 reasons not to buy
The Conquest 2 is an expensive running shoe.
It has a moderately heavy weight.
Some runners observed that the toe box was narrower than the previous version.
Limited color options for both men’s and women’s version.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Conquest 2 is a stability running shoe that offers a balance of responsive ride and underfoot support. Though most users admired its performance, some were disappointed because of its price, weight, and fit. The Conquest 2 is a good option for runners who are looking for a shoe that has an excellent and responsive performance on the roads."
Saucony Endorphin Pro, Saucony,92.0,94.0,5.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.5oz , Women: 6.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Apr 2020, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Spring: According to several runners, the Saucony Endorphin Pro has a good bounce. 
Fit: A number of purchasers hail this road running shoe's snug wrap. 
Lightness: The racing shoe has featherlight bulk, commended multiple buyers. 
Speed: It has helped to increase the pace of many marathoners. 
Ventilation: This neutral running shoe permits sufficient airflow within the foot chamber.
2 reasons not to buy
Support: Some reviewers claim that the Endorphin Pro does not give enough stability.
Cushioning: Quite a few find the shoe's cushioning system a little too firm.
Bottom line
Partaking in the evolution of fast, the Endorphin Pro is Saucony's swiftest shoe yet. To achieve this, the brand's most responsive midsole foam, PWRRUN PB, is engineered into the racing shoe. Sealing the deal, the construction of the shoe is also centered on generating optimal responsiveness without sacrificing its featherlight bulk."
Adidas Adizero Prime Parley, Adidas,92.0,91.0,280.0,$200,$90 (save 63%), Road, Neutral, Men: 4.5oz , Women: 4.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Aug 2017, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
The Primeknit upper fitted snugly and held the foot properly, wrote a tester.
A runner claimed that the ankle collar was exceptionally comfortable.
The boost™ midsole provided enough protection and cushion, according to a reviewer.
The shoe was lightweight enough that it enabled an easy pick up of pace, stated a user.
The unique upper seemed to have been constructed excellently, as it gave the foot a precise fit, commended a reviewer.
One buyer thought the ride was firmer compared to other boost™ running shoes.
3 reasons not to buy
A reviewer mentioned that the toe box was narrow.
Many buyers agreed the Adizero Prime Parley was an expensive shoe.
There was not enough support from the upper during tight turns, said a user.
Bottom line
Although the Adizero Prime Parley has proven its stellar performance, some users thought it was not the most ideal for daily runs because of its tight fit. In fact, several have advised using the shoe only for fast-paced running. Furthermore, with its hefty price tag, the Adizero Prime Parley was not considered an affordable shoe by all markets. Some buyers thought there were less expensive shoes that offer similar features."
Merrell MTL Cirrus, Merrell,80.0,77.0,6.0,$160,$112 (save 41%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.4oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Most people welcomed the appealing color scheme of the Merrell MTL Cirrus, stating that the hues made the shoe pop.
Some consumers claimed that this product had a relatively lightweight structure that’s not known of trail running shoes.
The cushioned platform was lauded for protecting the foot from sharp rocks and unpredictable surfaces.
Traction on wet surfaces was dependable, based on a handful of reviews.
Several testers claimed that the in-shoe fit acclimated to their needs.
The breathability of the upper unit was welcomed by those who have tried this off-road shoe.
1 reasons not to buy
A couple of reviewers felt that the underfoot platform was too stiff and heavy for extended use.
Bottom line
The feedback for the Merrell MTL Cirrus was overwhelmingly positive. People were particularly fond of the bright colorway of the façade, as well as the efficient outsole construction. Traction and underfoot comfort were aspects that worked well for a lot of trail running enthusiasts. On the other hand, a few testers weren’t happy with the stiffness of the underfoot platform.
The Merrell MTL Cirrus caters to neutral pronators who enjoy taking to the trails."
New Balance Summit Unknown GTX,,83.0,,9.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,
361 Degrees Chaser 2, 361 Degrees,89.0,92.0,6.0,$100,$19 (save 81%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8.2oz , Women: 6.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Those who have tried the 361 Degrees Chaser 2 described the shoe as `extremely comfortable`.
Some users lauded the versatility of this running shoe; they said the shoe is also reliable for walking and other sports activities.
Several runners lauded the overall design of the Chaser 2.
According to a few user reviews, the shoe offers a very comfortable fit.
A few buyers highlighted the shoe's durable construction.
Many users were satisfied with the shoe's considerable value for money.
1 reasons not to buy
A few users mentioned that the shoe is too stiff for their liking. 
Bottom line
Most users have shown satisfaction with the performance of the 361 Degrees Chaser 2. They admired the shoe's visually-appealing design, lightweight construction, and versatility. This road running shoe is designed for those who give importance to comfort and price. Overall, the Degrees Chaser 2 has been a successful update."
Vibram FiveFingers Trek Ascent, Vibram FiveFingers,88.0,79.0,798.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 6.3oz , Women: 4.9oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,, Normal | Normal,,"12 reasons to buy
Most reviewers deeply valued the comfortable feel and fit of the Vibram FiveFingers Trek Ascent.
Some runners consider the Trek Ascent is a good value investment.
Runners appreciated the not-so-aggressive outsole as it allowed them to easily traverse both flat and rugged terrains.
Several runners used the shoe for other activities like hiking, gym sessions, and other off-road adventures.
A few expert reviewers noted that this shoe was efficient during long-distance running sessions.
A moderate number of users consider the looks as the sleekest and most sophisticated among all Vibram shoes.
The fabric dries in no time, based on the comments of a handful of reviewers.
The black color allowed a moderate number of runners to wear the shoe without getting strange looks from other people.
The traction given by the outsole unit received positive remarks for being efficient.
The lightweight and flexible form of this shoe generated great feedback from runners.
It’s easy to clean, remarked several consumers.
Some runners loved the Vibram Trek Ascent’s breathable upper.
4 reasons not to buy
A number of testers complained that the FiveFingers Trek Ascent had a tendency to stink.
A few runners observed that it did not have the same ground feedback as the other truly minimalist shoes.
A handful of people experienced some blistering because the cuff apparently rubbed against their skin.
Some consumers noted that the upper fabrics and the thin sole unit broke apart after a few uses.
Bottom line
Vibram took a gamble by discontinuing their hugely popular Treksport and welcomed the FiveFingers Trek Ascent. Based on the feedback, generally, most runners were even more impressed by the new model because of its comfortable, versatile, and barefoot ride with just enough cushioning and protection for long-distance runs. The shoe is designed for summer days as it is breathable and the traction is insane. It is easily one of the most sought-after shoes in Vibram’s list of toe shoes."
Brooks Launch 3, Brooks,90.0,87.0,936.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Jan 2016, Normal | Normal, Brooks Launch 7,"8 reasons to buy
The upper fabrics were able to cover the foot securely and comfortably, wrote testers.
Reviewers generally appreciated the upper unit, which was soft and non-irritating to the skin.
Many runners enjoyed the vibrant color schemes of the Brooks Launch 3, noting that they enhanced its aesthetic appeal.
It felt adequately lightweight for a lot of those who tried it.
This model had become the ‘go-to’ running shoe for runners; they stated that it didn’t mar their performance in any way.
Several testers who frequently complained of knee and muscle pains when running actually commented that wearing this shoe prevented the occurrence of such discomforts.
The cushioning system was sufficiently responsive, according to many reviewers.
Many consumers were happy about the general durability of the Brooks Launch 3.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners noticed that the upper unit began to lose its threading after a few uses.
A number of testers wrote that the toe box was a tad narrow, causing their toes to clump together uncomfortably.
Bottom line
Generally, the Brooks Launch 3 was lauded by its purchasers. It satisfied the cushioning needs of neutral runners. For most of them, it delivered well when it comes to its visual flair and its overall efficacy. But it felt small and narrow for a number of users. Some noted that the durability of the upper fabrics wasn’t able to leave a good impression. Still, a lot of runners were able to enjoy the service of this road shoe."
Skechers GOmeb Speed 5, Skechers,92.0,93.0,12.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 5.8oz , Women: 4.5oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm, Jan 2018, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
The Skechers GOmeb Speed 5 performed well on races and long-distance runs, according to a reviewer.
Many users described the shoe as lightweight.
Various buyers appreciated the design and style of the shoe.
As a racing flat, the GOmeb Speed 5 provided plenty of cushioning, a commenter stated.
The shoe was true to size and had a precise fit, claimed numerous wearers. Others mentioned the shoe fit like a glove.
The FLIGHT GEN™ midsole was very responsive, a runner observed.
2 reasons not to buy
The shoe lacked underfoot protection in the forefoot area, according to a reviewer.
One user experienced poor grip from the outsole during rainy days.
Bottom line
The Skechers GOmeb Speed 5 was undoubtedly a successful release with the unanimously positive feedback it received from users. From the fit to the performance, the GOmeb Speed 5 received winning remarks all around. There were only a few disappointed remarks about the outsole’s functionality. In summary, the shoe was a significant and worthy upgrade from its predecessor."
New Balance Vazee Prism v2, New Balance,92.0,93.0,100.0,$100,$60 (save 40%), Road, Stability, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Jan 2017, Normal | Normal,,"10 reasons to buy
Most of the reviewers valued the comfort of the Prism v2.
The stability is noticeable without being intrusive, according to several runners.
It is more breathable than the original model, based on the comments of a handful of testers.
The toe box gets a little more room with the removal of the forefoot/toe box overlays.
A few experts appreciated the softer heel, which does not compromise the secure fit of the rear section.
It comes in multiple color options.
New Balance continues to offer wide widths for the Vazee Prism v2.
The price is less compared to some of its competitors.
It rides a bit softer, which a handful considered as an improvement over the stiff ride of the earlier version.
Some runners have used it for gym workouts because of the lightweight support.
2 reasons not to buy
It is noticeably heavier than the original model, according to a handful of reviewers.
The midsole foam lacks the responsiveness of many of its competitors, according to a few runners.
Bottom line
The 2nd instalment of the Prism continues to provide the only stability option in New Balance’s Vazee collection of shoes. It is a shoe that still performs a little faster despite the added bulk. Additionally, it becomes a more viable option for those who require lightweight stability when running in half or full marathons. With a very reasonable price tag, the shoe is an excellent value for the money choice for many runners."
Jordan Zoom Tenacity 88, Jordan,91.0,88.0,166.0,$125,$90 (save 28%), Road, Neutral,,,,, Mar 2019, Normal | Normal,,"8 reasons to buy
A lot of users commented that the Jordan Zoom Tenacity 88 is comfortable.
Several testers said that the shoe offers a lot of bounce.
Based on some reviews, the Tenacity 88 is a good-looking shoe.
According to those who have tried it, the shoe is not only reliable for running but also for walking.
The shoe is also suited for the gym and casual wear, some of the buyers noted.
A good number of purchasers loved its well-cushioned construction.
It is responsive, according to the majority of the reviewers.
A significant number of consumers said that the Jordan Zoom Tenacity 88 is lightweight.
2 reasons not to buy
It has a narrow toe box, according to several buyers.
A reviewer said that the heel tab feels too tight on the Achilles tendon.
Bottom line
The majority of the consumers loved the comfort the Tenacity 88 provides throughout the run. The fantastic design makes users happy and satisfied. Aside from the design, they appreciated the lightweight structure of the shoe. Although some of the buyers had an issue with the size and width, others still lauded the shoe because of its good-looking and visually-appealing color schemes. Overall, the Jordan Zoom Tenacity 88 gained positive reviews because of its responsiveness, comfort and excellent performance on different paved surfaces."
Asics GT 2000 8 Trail, Asics,77.0,,10.0,$120,$108 (save 10%), Trail, Stability, Men: 13oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,," Normal, Wide | Normal, Wide",,"7 reasons to buy
The majority of the purchasers commented that the Asics GT 2000 8 Trail is comfortable.
Several users agreed that the shoe is stable.
According to those who have bought it, the running footwear is supportive.
Based on reviews, the shoe is durable. They love the high-quality materials used in making the running footwear.
The shoe is best used for gym activities and general walking and trail running sessions.
It provides a perfect fit, as noted by some consumers.
Many wearers agreed that the running footwear has a wide toe box.
2 reasons not to buy
One of the users commented that the heel area of the Asics GT 2000 8 Trail feels too low. This results in a tight feeling over the arch area of the foot. 
A tester noted that the shoe is not breathable. It provides insufficient ventilation during the running activity.
Bottom line
In General, a good number of consumers admired and appreciated the construction of the Asics GT 2000 8 Trail. The right combination of materials and features integrated into the shoe has made the majority of the wearers happy and satisfied. With the positive feedback received from the users, the success of this running shoe is proven and tested. The perfect blend of support, stability, and comfort made a positive change in the user's overall performance on a wide variety of terrains."
Inov-8 TerraUltra 260, Inov-8,87.0,90.0,27.0,$130,$50 (save 62%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,," Normal | Normal, Wide",,"9 reasons to buy
Several runners think that Inov-8 TerraUltra 260 is a perfect running gear even for rough technical trails. 
Many consumers commented that this shoe suits the needs of daily trainers. 
Inov-8 TerraUltra 260’s offers good traction on both dry and wet grounds, according to a lot of reviewers. 
The majority of the testers welcomed the lightweight structure of this trail running shoe.  
TerraUltra 260 is more flexible and supportive compared to other Inov-8 running shoes, a number of buyers commented. 
One purchaser expressed that the shoe was stable and never felt heavy even when worn for extended periods. 
The rubber outsole was appreciated by many buyers for being grippy and durable. 
This running shoe fits well for users who have wide foot, some reviewers claimed. 
Inov-8 TerraUltra 260 is not super padded and offers just the right amount of cushioning, as mentioned in some reviews. 
3 reasons not to buy
One user reported that Inov-8 TerraUltra 260 has a small toe box and it mashed his toes together.
A few testers complained that the shoe cushioning is not so soft. 
The forefoot area is too roomy, according to a handful of users.
Bottom line
Many consumers admired the Inov-8 TerraUltra 260 running shoe. People praised the shoe’s comfort level and durability. Several trainers and trail runners also appreciated this shoe’s ability to support the foot even on the toughest terrains. Although the cushioning system was not designed to be super soft and the forefoot section is a bit roomy for some testers, it is still lauded by most of the users for its lightweight structure and performance. This shoe is also great for long runs, gym sessions, and casual walks."
Brooks Adrenaline GTS 18, Brooks,94.0,91.0,7191.0,,, Road, Motion control, Men: 10oz , Women: 8.6oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm, Nov 2017," Narrow, Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Narrow, Normal", Brooks Adrenaline GTS 20,"9 reasons to buy
A lot of runners thought that the substantial cushioning was terrific and was balanced well with the arch support.
Numerous wearers appreciated the new, sleeker design of the Adrenaline GTS 18.
According to a tester, the shoe was lightweight and capable of enabling a comfortable ride.
A majority of buyers agreed that it was true-to-size.
One purchaser observed the shoe dried quickly after running under heavy rain.
Several buyers liked that there were various color options available.
The new streamlined upper gave a firm hold yet a non-irritating fit, said a reviewer.
Various consumers commended the shoe’s performance on long recovery runs.
Many users felt that it was comfortable enough right out of the box.
4 reasons not to buy
A hole formed in the toe box after only a week of use, one user commented.
A couple of buyers were not amazed by the heel design; one said that it did not give a secure fit, while another stated that it kept pulling the sock down while running.
One wearer felt it had less brace and padding compared to the previous version.
Another expressed that the upper mesh looked like a cheap material.
Bottom line
The Brooks Adrenaline GTS 18 has kept the established reputation of its predecessor by delivering a ride and performance that most users have praised. However, some may not have been impressed by the durability and design elements. Overall, this stability running shoe was approved by consumers as a motion-control option with features that work well for its function."
Asics Gel Forte, Asics,87.0,85.0,11.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 13.3oz , Women: 10.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
A large number of severe overpronators have fallen in love with the Asics Forte.
The cushioning is adequate for shoe built with fortified motion control features, according to several runners.
The Gel Forte is available in extra wide fit.
3M reflective materials are incorporated into the shoe.
Durability is guaranteed in this shoe, based on the observation of many runners.
Comfort is incredible, noted a sizeable number of runners.
Severe overpronators appreciated the dose of flexibility from the Forte.
3 reasons not to buy
The weight of the Gel Forte may be too much for some.
It can be a bit bulky for those who are not used to wearing motion control shoes.
Some runners saw the need to put the shoe through a break-in period.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Forte is a serious beast that is fortified with the best possible reinforcement to curb maximum inward rolling motion. It is a no-hassle kind of neutral running shoe that can last for a reasonably long time and delivers a reliable performance every time the runner takes the road."
Vivobarefoot Ultra 3, Vivobarefoot,86.0,89.0,61.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 6.7oz , Women: 6.7oz,,, Jul 2017," Normal | Normal, Wide",,"8 reasons to buy
The majority of users liked the minimalist/lightweight feel of the shoe.
Some buyers were intrigued with the unique look of Ultra 3, which was apparently more refined than its predecessor.
The versatility of the shoe was highly commended by runners. Other than trail and road running, they pegged it as a great option for camping, swimming, and hiking.
Some use it casually and, for them, it never felt out of place.
According to a number of testers, the breathability proved perfect for hot days or even just for those with sweaty feet.
Many runners praised the durability of the shoe, which worked well even on rough trails.
Traction is one of the things that runners can’t get enough of the shoe; they felt that it was very efficient.
The roomy toe box was also appreciated by a lot of users, especially since barefoot running required natural toe-splay.
2 reasons not to buy
A few had experienced foot aches and blisters after using the shoe for the first time. They recommended breaking in the shoe first.
Some made comments about the ostensibly inconsistent colorways, though they were not too bothered about it.
Bottom line
The Vivorebarefoot Ultra 3 is an incredible shoe that allows wearers to run strong and fast on wet and wild terrains. Nevertheless, its minimalist yet robust structure is versatile enough to be used for exercise, active sports and even on casual strolls. It is one of the best waterproof shoes on the market with the right balance of flexibility and durability."
Adidas Springblade Solyce, Adidas,90.0,,460.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.6oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
The well-padded and seamless interior of the Springblade Solyce delivers an incredibly comfortable feel, according to several runners.
Some runners believe that the shoe is built to last based on their observations.
The one-piece upper that is supported by leather and synthetic overlays offer great security and midfoot hold.
Most runners are attracted by the eye-catching design of the springblades.
A good number of reviews consider the Solyce as good enough for casual wear.
The open mesh coverage ensures a breathable and cool run.
3 reasons not to buy
A few runners though the shoe was a bit heavy.
The price is a bit stiff for numerous runners.
The blade limits its usability as it can’t work as well on rocky or graveled paths.
Bottom line
While the performance of the Springblade collection is always up for contention, there is absolutely no doubt about the appeal it offers because of its unique design and style. Runners who would like to turn heads in a neutral running shoe that has moderate arch support, excellent comfort, and breathable upper will find the Solyce a great option."
Nike Rise React Flyknit, Nike,83.0,,7.0,$175,$100 (save 43%), Road, Neutral,,,,, Sep 2018, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Those who have tested the Nike Rise React Flyknit that the underfoot experience was highly comfortable.
The aesthetics of this road companion were lauded as people felt that the overall design was fashionable and street-ready.
People reported that the sizing scheme of this running shoe was able to follow their expectations.
Some testers have commented that the upper unit was sufficiently well-ventilated, permitting them to enjoy all-day wear.
The lightweight configuration of the Rise React Flyknit sat well with many consumers who wanted a barely-there in-shoe experience.
1 reasons not to buy
A few purchasers felt that this running shoe was a bit small compared to their usual sizing expectations.
Bottom line
The Nike Rise React Flyknit was mostly well-received. People who have tested this road shoe were happy with what it had to provide for them. They were especially drawn to the cool-looking design of the façade, as well as the comfortable underfoot experience. The standard sizing scheme and lightweight build were also highlighted. On the other hand, there were those who felt that the sizes were a bit smaller than what they were used to."
Nike Free Flyknit 5.0, Nike,88.0,82.0,791.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.6oz , Women: 6.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal, Nike Flex RN 2019,"6 reasons to buy
The Flyknit is like a fabric that wraps around the runner’s foot in a comfortable and non-irritating manner, according to some testers.
The Flywire cables function with the lacing system to provide a custom fit.
Runners generally welcomed the lightweight construction of the Flyknit 5.0.
The mid-sole unit has lightweight, yet springy foam that is responsive based on the reviews of several runners.
Hexagonal flex grooves allow the foot to move as naturally as possible.
Durable rubber is placed in critical areas where wear and abrasions usually happen.
3 reasons not to buy
The upper unit fell apart easily, based on some runners' comments.
The Free Flyknit 5.0 has an expensive price.
Some of the testers felt that traction isn’t as efficient for this model.
Bottom line
The Nike Free Flyknit series has been well-revered by many and the 5th version certainly steps up in terms of comfort and lightweight performance. Though it has some issues in terms of its quality and arch support, it can still function well for neutral runners."
Nike Zoom Flyknit Streak, Nike,79.0,,49.0,$160,$90 (save 44%), Road, Neutral, Men: 6.8oz , Women: 6.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Aug 2016, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Runners found the shoe to be very comfortable and breathable because of the Flyknit upper coverage.
Many applauded the soft cushioning and support the shoe provides.
The Nike Zoom Flyknit Streak has a wide toe box for toe splay.
Some runners were satisfied by how flexible the shoe is.
Based on some reviews, the shoe feels light and fast.
2 reasons not to buy
It is an expensive shoe.
Some users noticed that it is not as durable as the non-flyknit version.
Bottom line
The Nike Zoom Flyknit Streak is a racing shoe that performs well on the road. It provides a great combination of speed, cushioning and flexibility. Despite being expensive and durable, the shoe has still gathered positive comments from users. This running shoe will not disappoint when used in competitions."
Asics Gel Quantum Infinity, Asics,82.0,82.0,44.0,$180,$80 (save 56%), Road, Neutral, Men: 13.8oz , Women: 11.1oz, Men: 7mm , Women: 7mm, Dec 2018, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
The Gel Quantum Infinity is the first shoe from Asics to feature a visible full-length Gel technology midsole from heel to toe giving the shoe incredible comfort and flexibility.
Most of the users are pleased on how comfortable the cushioning on the new Asics Gel Quantum Infinity is saying it gives it a “pillow-soft” feel.
Some runners applauded the fact the shoe is very lightweight.
Also liked by a few users is that the shoe fits snugly with an ample room in the toe-box.
It had been mentioned in some reviews that the shoe fits well even on users with wide feet.
3 reasons not to buy
One of the testers said that his feet felt a little warm towards the end of the run.  
A few reviews said that the shoe does not provide a substantial amount of energy return, especially when compared to running shoes like the Adidas Ultra Boost.
Also noted by a user is that the Gel Quantum Infinity is quite heavier than many running shoes of a similar type.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Quantum Infinity is a stylish-looking running shoe that provides the right amount of cushioning suited for all types of daily activities.  May it be for vigorous runs or just taking a leisurely walk, this well-engineered shoe did not disappoint the users in providing a high level of comfort and stability when they are on the move. Although the shoe’s weight and breathability is something that needs to be improved according to some testers, it does not diminish the fact that the Asics Gel Quantum Infinity is a shoe that needs to be added in a neutral runner’s shoe arsenal."
Reebok Zigwild TR 5.0, Reebok,91.0,,393.0,$115,$84 (save 27%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal, Reebok Zigwild Trail 6.0,"5 reasons to buy
One wearer likened wearing the Zigwild TR 5.0 to “walking on clouds.”
The shoe was a terrific value for money, several customers agreed.
A number of users were happy with the stylish look of the shoe.
The shoe could be worn all day without causing discomfort in the foot, according to a satisfied user.
Many runners found the Zigwild TR 5.0 to be true-to-size.
2 reasons not to buy
There was not as much traction from the outsole as expected, according to a user.
Some buyers commented that the Zigwild TR 5.0 needed breaking in.
Bottom line
The Reebok Zigwild TR 5.0 was a fantastic running shoe that delivered comfort and style all-around, which was agreed upon by many users. Some customers experienced fit issues, but the overall rating for the shoe was favorable, and many runners have found themselves using the Zigwild TR 5.0 repeatedly."
Skechers GOtrail, Skechers,92.0,84.0,54.0,,, Trail, Stability, Men: 9.4oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,, Normal | Normal,,"12 reasons to buy
Most reviews mentioned the GOtrail’s awesome comfort.
Several noted that the price is average for a trail shoe.
A handful loved the lightweight ride of the Skechers GOtrail.
More than a few were impressed by the shoe’s traction.
It is covered with a highly-water resistant upper.
The breathability is pretty good for a shoe with substantial overlays and water-resistant upper, according to a few comments.
There are 4 color options.
The protection on the trail was very good, based on the reports of a handful of reviewers.
More than a few took the GOtrail for a ride right out of the box without any fit or performance issues.
The quick-drying upper is also very easy to clean, as observed by a few testers.
A handful of expert reviewers welcomed the quick and efficient turnover.
The ample toe box was welcomed by several runners.
3 reasons not to buy
The ride is a bit stiff for a handful.
A few were not happy with the shoe’s durability.
It feels a tad too flexible and plush for technical runs, according to a few expert reviewers.
Bottom line
The GOtrail is a low-level entry shoe based on one of Skechers’ most popular trail shoes. While this may not be as highly-sought as the other Skechers trail shoes, it still offers great comfort, adequate arch support, decent responsiveness, and an upper that can handle slight rains or early morning runs. All in all, this is a shoe that will not break the bank and offers more than average performance outdoor."
New Balance FuelCore Nitrel v2, New Balance,89.0,,402.0,$75,$65 (save 13%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,," Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Normal, Wide",,"8 reasons to buy
Many runners praised the shoe for the comfort it provided during their trail runs.
The FuelCore Nitrel v2's responsive performance was also liked by the majority of both trail and road runners.
Many high arched runners appreciated that the shoe provides just the right amount of support that they needed, especially in the heel area.
Plenty of users liked that the shoe is very lightweight to train and run in.
Most wearers of the FuelCore Nitrel v2 like that the shoes' outsole grip is versatile for running in both trail and road.
A lot of positive responses from buyers were mentioned about the shoe coming in both standard and 4E sizes.
The majority of the wearers find the shoes very efficient in providing a comfortable and roomy toe box.
Some buyers liked the different colorway choices that the shoe comes in.
3 reasons not to buy
One commenter noted that he finds there is too much material in the heel collar, causing some discomfort.
A few wearers also mentioned that the FuelCore Nitrel v2 upper material comes off as a bit stiff.
Some purchasers did not like that the shoe was too tight for the fit that they wanted.
Bottom line
The FuelCore Nitrel v2 is a neutral New Balance trail shoe that delivers the right combination of speed, traction, and style. Engineered to tackle challenging trail terrains and rough road surfaces, this shoe is liked by most runners for all the right reasons that it was made for. Although there are a few reviews about the shoe's accuracy with its sizing, same as its predecessor, the FuelCore Nitrel v2 is still recommended by most of its users."
Merrell All Out Rush, Merrell,83.0,68.0,522.0,$120,$59 (save 51%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 9.3oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
The upper for the All Out Rush is made up of breathable and durable air mesh with TPU.
It has protective toe cap that shields the foot from debris when running on rough surfaces.
The Merrell All Out Rush has reflective details for increased visibility while running under low lighting conditions.
The UniFly mid-sole unit is a soft layer of cushioning that’s firm yet responsive.
It features the M Select™ GRIP technology for an impressive traction when use in varied terrains.
Some runners were satisfied with the flexibility of the shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
Based on some comments, this running shoe was not comfortable to wear and some experienced foot pain and blisters.
Some experienced heel slippage.
The toe area was too tight for some runners.
Bottom line
The All Out Rush from Merrell is a trail running shoe that is ideal for light trails and rough terrains. Some of the testers felt that its dimensions were off and that it didn’t provide the most comfortable experience, but this shoe offers great durability, traction and flexibility."
Skechers GOrun Speed TRL Hyper, Skechers,83.0,89.0,7.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm, Oct 2019, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
The durability of the materials used for the Skechers GOrun Speed TRL Hyper is welcomed by most testers.
Some reviewers have noted that the midsole delivers a bounciness that encourages energized steps.
The even structure of the outsole gripping lugs is welcomed by those who like to transition to flat ground.
This trail running shoe is eye-catching, according to some consumers.
Based on a handful of comments, the breathability of the upper is noticeable and welcome.
3 reasons not to buy
The ankle-locking system is said to cause some mild discomfort and stiffness to the rear part of the foot.
A few people have mentioned that the in-shoe experience is a bit restrictive.
Traction on wet ground is not as efficient as expected, according to several reviewers.
Bottom line
The Skechers GOrun Speed TRL Hyper is a neutral running shoe for off-road paths. Trail running enthusiasts who like a versatile companion for their adventures were able to appreciate the shoe and its features. The breathability of the upper, the durable construction, and the appealing design are highlighted as the positive elements."
Puma Faas 600 S v2, Puma,85.0,80.0,41.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Some runners liked the upper construction of the Faas 600 S v2 because it provides breathable coverage and a glove-like fit.
It features the EverFit 2.0 lockdown technology for enhanced midfoot security.
The Faas 600 S v2 has the Faas Engineered Stability Zone for a more stable ride.
It is very comfortable to wear, according to some reviews.
This shoe is very affordable.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners were not impressed by the current lacing system of the Faas 600 S v2 because it tended to unravel easily.
The mid-foot area was a bit narrow for others.
Bottom line
The Puma Faas 600 S v2 is an off-trail running shoe perfect for runners who are looking for stability, comfort and lightweight support. This shoe is reliable for fitness trainings, as well as short and long-distance runs. Given the mixed reviews, the shoe still needs some improvement."
Brooks Ravenna 8, Brooks,85.0,84.0,502.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Jan 2017, Normal | Normal, Brooks Ravenna 11,"11 reasons to buy
A number of runners noted that the shoe has soft and reliable cushioning.
The Brooks Ravenna 8 is a lightweight running shoe.
A couple of runners mentioned that the shoe delivers enough amount of support without being bulky.
It has a comfortable and breathable upper, noted a few runners.
The Ravenna 8 is very responsive.
Many runners appreciated the durable construction of the shoe.
A reasonably-priced shoe.
The fit, right out of the box, was prized by some reviewers.
The sleek and stylish look completely satisfied many buyers.
It is a tad more breathable than the past model because of the new air mesh.
The grip is superior on most surfaces.
4 reasons not to buy
A few runners experienced heel slippage.
A handful of runners expressed their disappointment over the shoe’s durability.
It runs a little smaller and narrower than the past Ravennas, according to a couple of testers.
More color options would have resulted in more satisfied runners.
Bottom line
The Brooks Ravenna 8 received a lot of praises from the users. Many runners liked the springy and lightweight feel of the shoe, but there are also a few who were disappointed by the shoe's durability and overall fit. In summary, the Ravenna 8 is a reliable road running stability shoe that provides the right amount of support, cushioning, comfort, and durability. "
Saucony Endorphin Pro, Saucony,92.0,94.0,5.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.5oz , Women: 6.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Apr 2020, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Spring: According to several runners, the Saucony Endorphin Pro has a good bounce. 
Fit: A number of purchasers hail this road running shoe's snug wrap. 
Lightness: The racing shoe has featherlight bulk, commended multiple buyers. 
Speed: It has helped to increase the pace of many marathoners. 
Ventilation: This neutral running shoe permits sufficient airflow within the foot chamber.
2 reasons not to buy
Support: Some reviewers claim that the Endorphin Pro does not give enough stability.
Cushioning: Quite a few find the shoe's cushioning system a little too firm.
Bottom line
Partaking in the evolution of fast, the Endorphin Pro is Saucony's swiftest shoe yet. To achieve this, the brand's most responsive midsole foam, PWRRUN PB, is engineered into the racing shoe. Sealing the deal, the construction of the shoe is also centered on generating optimal responsiveness without sacrificing its featherlight bulk."
The North Face Endurus TR, The North Face,96.0,84.0,82.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.2oz , Women: 9.6oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm, Jan 2017, Normal | Normal,,"12 reasons to buy
The majority of the users observed that the North Face Endurus TR was comfortable.
Several reviewers admired its great cushioning.
Based on some reviews, the lacing system was excellent.
Some testers agreed that the shoe was supportive.
The shoe provided enough stability, according to a lot of consumers.
Several buyers noted that the North Face Endurus TR has a perfect fit.
Many consumers noted that the shoe was stylish.
Based on some reviews, it provided enough protection from rocks on the trails.
A handful of testers said that the shoe was best used for hiking, walking, and running activities.
According to a lot of runners, they did not experience any blister issues.
A good number of consumers noted that the North Face Endurus TR was true to size.
It provided the right amount of traction on a wide variety of surfaces, according to many users.
3 reasons not to buy
According to some buyers, the shoe was expensive.
The fabrics used in the upper area of the North Face Endurus TR added a lot to its weight, several users commented.
Based on some reviews, the shoe looked bulky.
Bottom line
The North Face Endurus TR has made a lot of runners satisfied because of its incredible support, stability, and fit. Aside from its impressive structure, the shoe also offers the right amount of style, comfort, and traction when running on different types of trails. While others have issues with the price, bulky design, and size, others still recommend the shoe because of its excellent performance. In general, the North Face Endurus TR is a perfect choice for those who are seeking a comfortable, well-cushioned, and high-quality running shoe."
Merrell MTL Cirrus, Merrell,80.0,77.0,6.0,$160,$112 (save 41%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.4oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Most people welcomed the appealing color scheme of the Merrell MTL Cirrus, stating that the hues made the shoe pop.
Some consumers claimed that this product had a relatively lightweight structure that’s not known of trail running shoes.
The cushioned platform was lauded for protecting the foot from sharp rocks and unpredictable surfaces.
Traction on wet surfaces was dependable, based on a handful of reviews.
Several testers claimed that the in-shoe fit acclimated to their needs.
The breathability of the upper unit was welcomed by those who have tried this off-road shoe.
1 reasons not to buy
A couple of reviewers felt that the underfoot platform was too stiff and heavy for extended use.
Bottom line
The feedback for the Merrell MTL Cirrus was overwhelmingly positive. People were particularly fond of the bright colorway of the façade, as well as the efficient outsole construction. Traction and underfoot comfort were aspects that worked well for a lot of trail running enthusiasts. On the other hand, a few testers weren’t happy with the stiffness of the underfoot platform.
The Merrell MTL Cirrus caters to neutral pronators who enjoy taking to the trails."
Vibram FiveFingers Trek Ascent, Vibram FiveFingers,88.0,79.0,798.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 6.3oz , Women: 4.9oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,, Normal | Normal,,"12 reasons to buy
Most reviewers deeply valued the comfortable feel and fit of the Vibram FiveFingers Trek Ascent.
Some runners consider the Trek Ascent is a good value investment.
Runners appreciated the not-so-aggressive outsole as it allowed them to easily traverse both flat and rugged terrains.
Several runners used the shoe for other activities like hiking, gym sessions, and other off-road adventures.
A few expert reviewers noted that this shoe was efficient during long-distance running sessions.
A moderate number of users consider the looks as the sleekest and most sophisticated among all Vibram shoes.
The fabric dries in no time, based on the comments of a handful of reviewers.
The black color allowed a moderate number of runners to wear the shoe without getting strange looks from other people.
The traction given by the outsole unit received positive remarks for being efficient.
The lightweight and flexible form of this shoe generated great feedback from runners.
It’s easy to clean, remarked several consumers.
Some runners loved the Vibram Trek Ascent’s breathable upper.
4 reasons not to buy
A number of testers complained that the FiveFingers Trek Ascent had a tendency to stink.
A few runners observed that it did not have the same ground feedback as the other truly minimalist shoes.
A handful of people experienced some blistering because the cuff apparently rubbed against their skin.
Some consumers noted that the upper fabrics and the thin sole unit broke apart after a few uses.
Bottom line
Vibram took a gamble by discontinuing their hugely popular Treksport and welcomed the FiveFingers Trek Ascent. Based on the feedback, generally, most runners were even more impressed by the new model because of its comfortable, versatile, and barefoot ride with just enough cushioning and protection for long-distance runs. The shoe is designed for summer days as it is breathable and the traction is insane. It is easily one of the most sought-after shoes in Vibram’s list of toe shoes."
Brooks Launch 3, Brooks,90.0,87.0,936.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Jan 2016, Normal | Normal, Brooks Launch 7,"8 reasons to buy
The upper fabrics were able to cover the foot securely and comfortably, wrote testers.
Reviewers generally appreciated the upper unit, which was soft and non-irritating to the skin.
Many runners enjoyed the vibrant color schemes of the Brooks Launch 3, noting that they enhanced its aesthetic appeal.
It felt adequately lightweight for a lot of those who tried it.
This model had become the ‘go-to’ running shoe for runners; they stated that it didn’t mar their performance in any way.
Several testers who frequently complained of knee and muscle pains when running actually commented that wearing this shoe prevented the occurrence of such discomforts.
The cushioning system was sufficiently responsive, according to many reviewers.
Many consumers were happy about the general durability of the Brooks Launch 3.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners noticed that the upper unit began to lose its threading after a few uses.
A number of testers wrote that the toe box was a tad narrow, causing their toes to clump together uncomfortably.
Bottom line
Generally, the Brooks Launch 3 was lauded by its purchasers. It satisfied the cushioning needs of neutral runners. For most of them, it delivered well when it comes to its visual flair and its overall efficacy. But it felt small and narrow for a number of users. Some noted that the durability of the upper fabrics wasn’t able to leave a good impression. Still, a lot of runners were able to enjoy the service of this road shoe."
Vivobarefoot Primus Trail SG, Vivobarefoot,81.0,83.0,43.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 17.6oz , Women: 14.1oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,," Normal, Wide | Normal, Wide",,"8 reasons to buy
The shoe had an efficient water drainage system, a reviewer stated.
A couple of users praised the grippy outsole of the Primus Trail SG.
Some wearers pointed out that the toggle lace feature enabled a convenient use.
The shoe excelled on wet terrain, including grass and soil, a runner mentioned.
A lot of consumers appreciated the lightness of the shoe’s weight.
There was enough room for a comfortable toe splay, a customer remarked.
Many buyers thought this running shoe was worth its price.
The outsole seemed to be durable despite its thinness, a runner cited.
3 reasons not to buy
The collar was too high and was continually hitting the ankle bone, a user commented.
Several runners disliked how the Vivobarefoot Primus Trail SG was too broad to give a relaxed feel.
A wearer said the shoe was not comfortable when worn without a sock.
Bottom line
The Vivobarefoot Primus Trail SG garnered mostly positive reviews from its users, with comments that focused on the shoe’s performance and its numerous features that proved to be effective. There were only a handful of criticisms that stemmed from fit and sizing issues."
Asics Noosa FF 2, Asics,90.0,83.0,291.0,$140,$50 (save 100%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8.4oz , Women: 7.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Jan 2018, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Several consumers felt that the Asics Noosa FF 2 offered a secure and agreeable fit.
The durability was lauded; many stated that the materials were robust and long-lasting.
The open construction of the mesh material gained fans because it helped in ensuring ventilation during hot climates.
A runner noted that its lightweight nature contributed to an excellent performance on the roads.
Wearing this shoe all day didn’t seem to cause any fatigue, stated a few purchasers.
2 reasons not to buy
Some people reported that the underfoot cushioning system was too soft that it caused the foot to hurt.
A few testers believed that the color schemes of the 1st iteration were more appealing than the Noosa FF 2’s.
Bottom line
The Asics Noosa FF 2 was well-received by most runners who desired a road shoe that’s optimized for neutral pronators. They appreciated its durable construction, the breathability of the upper, and the agreeable coverage. Conversely, there were those who complained of underfoot discomfort due to the apparently flimsy midsole, as well as issues regarding the colorways."
New Balance Hanzo S, New Balance,83.0,83.0,50.0,$120,$45 (save 63%), Road, Neutral, Men: 6.6oz , Women: 5.4oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm, Jan 2017, Normal | Normal, New Balance Hanzo S v2,"8 reasons to buy
A handful of runners really like the comfortable fit of the Hanzo S.
It is very light.
It is quite flexible.
The 4mm drop is welcomed by a good number of competitive runners as a great option within the New Balance arsenal.
A few reviewers have used the Hanzo S for fast racing and even half marathons.
There were more than a few runners who were impressed by the shoe’s performance, even just out of the box.
The traction is superb, based on some comments.
A small number of reviewers took notice of the snappy ride.
2 reasons not to buy
Several runners wished for a lower price tag.
One reviewer observed that the outsole showed some early signs of wear.
Bottom line
The Hanzo S is a racing flat with a 4mm heel differential. It is ideally suited for 5Ks and marathons. The shoe has a really minimalist feel, quite aggressive, and very responsive. It also brings really good wraparound fit and security that should be needed when trying to lower personal best times."
Reebok Speedlux 3.0, Reebok,89.0,,159.0,$55,$19 (save 65%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 8.8oz,,,, Normal | Normal,,"4 reasons to buy
Many consumers noted that the design of the Reebok Speedlux 3.0 was both trendy and sporty.
The underfoot cushioning system was responsive and comfortable, some testers reported.
The price was generally considered by runners to be affordable.
Most of the people who have purchased this running shoe were happy with its lightweight build.
3 reasons not to buy
According to some testers, there was an extra layer of cloth inside the toe-box that caused some irritation to the skin.
There were more than a few complaints about the sizing scheme; it was believed to be a bit small.
Based on a handful of reviews, this running shoe’s upper and midsole didn’t offer a lot of support.
Bottom line
The response for the Reebok Speedlux 3.0 was mixed. On the one hand, many were thrilled by the cheap price tag of this shoe, as well as its eye-catching looks and lightweight disposition. But doubters were present, and they complained about the materials being cheap-looking and the unsupportive construction. Suffice it to say that this neutral runner’s companion didn’t become a recipient of acclaim."
Saucony Ride 9, Saucony,83.0,85.0,3635.0,$120,$80 (save 33%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9.3oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, May 2016," Normal | Narrow, Normal, Wide", Saucony Ride 13,"11 reasons to buy
The Saucony Ride 9 impressed most of the reviewers where comfort is concerned.
Many runners consider the price as well worth the investment.
It is lighter than the earlier model.
The new Tri-Flex outsole enhances ground contact and flexibility.
Saucony adds the Everun as the top sole for more consistency in the cushioning.
A good number of runners appreciated the superb traction from this shoe.
It is available in narrow and wide widths.
It has excellent support, according to a handful.
Durability is not compromised despite being a relatively lightweight shoe, according to several testers.
It is a versatile shoe that can handle almost all types of distances under different speeds.
Breathability is another strong point of the Ride 9.
4 reasons not to buy
The fit is a bit narrow, based on some runners’ observations.
Some runners noticed that it runs a bit small.
A moderate number of Saucony Ride fans were hugely disappointed that the spirit and performance of this well-liked shoe are no longer around in this latest version.
Some loyal fans of the Ride were upset that the shoe can no longer accommodate their orthotics.
Bottom line
The Ride 9 is Saucony’s go-to versatile trainer that juggles responsive cushioning, flexibility, support, and smooth transitions in one go. Saucony tweaked some of the things in the latest version of the Ride to give a smoother and more responsive feel than the past instalment. It is light enough for up-tempo runs or for marathon racing, but delivers enough cushioning for everyday running. Several experts are already tipping it to be one of the best trainers of the year."
Asics Gel Exalt 4, Asics,80.0,,508.0,$90,$44 (save 51%), Road, Stability, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
The underfoot experience given by the Asics Gel Exalt 4 was said to be highly comfortable.
Many consumers claimed that the stability mechanisms of this running shoe effectively corrected instances of overpronation.
Some testers who had plantar fasciitis felt that the midsole was able to support the tendons and muscles of the underfoot, effectively easing the strain of taking each step.
Several runners mentioned that the design and color schemes were eye-catching.
The outsole unit’s traction capacity was well-liked by road running enthusiasts.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people noted that the toe box was tight, bunching up their toes awkwardly.
Several testers didn’t feel the pronation correction features of this shoe, stating that they still pronated excessively.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Exalt 4 review accumulation resulted in overall positive feedback. People were mostly happy with what this road running shoe had to offer, particularly when it comes to the underfoot support. But there were some who didn’t feel the stability mechanisms of the midsole. Several individuals also had complaints about the inconsistent sizing and fit. Still, the majority had great things to say about the Exalt 4’s looks, traction, and midsole plushness."
Inov-8 Trail Talon 250, Inov-8,84.0,82.0,35.0,$145,$30 (save 83%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
Reviewers commented that the Inov-8 Trail Talon 250 was suitably lightweight on the trails.
The outsole configuration enabled this running shoe to take on dry trail surfaces with ease, one tester noted.
Traction on wet surfaces was also agreeable for many runners.
Users wrote that the toe-box was not too narrow, that it allowed the toes to splay naturally for comfort and balance.
One running blogger wrote that this feather-light running shoe was fast and that it was a joy to run in.
A professional runner was very positive about the Trail Talon 250, saying that the breathable coverage was top-notch, the tread pattern was efficient, and the forefoot area was well-protected.
A reviewer pointed out that this running shoe had less cushioning than its sister shoe, the Trail Talon 275, but it was still very comfortable on all runs.
1 reasons not to buy
A runner noticed that it was able to perform well on shorter runs because it had a low drop and lesser cushioning than the Trail Talon 275, but it’s not for long off-road adventures.
Bottom line
The Inov-8 Trail Talon 250 was widely praised for its lightweight disposition, its efficient outsole, and comfortable design. Many said that it helped them achieve great performances on the trails. Though one runner noted that it didn’t stay comfortable when taken on longer runs, it still performed admirably as a reliable off-road running shoe."
Merrell All Out Peak, Merrell,90.0,88.0,178.0,$130,$74 (save 43%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 8.6oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
The All Out Peak features a synthetic breathable upper and reflective design for increased visibility especially when running in low light.
Most runners applauded the HyperWrap 360 Degree Fit System of this shoe because it keeps the foot in place for agility and stability.
Majority of the runners took note of the All Out Peak’s comfort and impressive support.
This shoe is true to size.
It features the TrailProtect technology that provides sole protection.
3 reasons not to buy
Moderately high-priced shoe.
The Merrell All Out Peak has a narrow fit, which disappointed some users.
This shoe is not as durable as expected based on some reviews.
Bottom line
The Merrell All Out Peak is a trail neutral running shoe that is stable enough for rough trail runs. Based on some reviews, the shoe still needs some improvement but overall, it is still a worthy investment. It is ideal for runners who are looking for a comfortable pair of shoes for daily training."
Salomon Sonic RA, Salomon,93.0,87.0,117.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.6oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Feb 2018, Normal | Normal, Salomon Sonic RA 2,"11 reasons to buy
A lot of buyers noted that the shoe was best for short and long-distance running activities.
Many users agreed that the Salomon Sonic RA was comfortable.
Many runners noted that the shoe provided excellent traction on wet pavements.
A good number of buyers loved its flexibility.
According to some runners, the shoe was very responsive.
Many reviewers said that the cushioning of this shoe was amazing.
Most of the testers commented that the Salomon Sonic RA has a wide toe box.
The majority of the users were contented because there were a variety of color options for them to choose from.
A handful of consumers said that the fit was perfect.
Based on some reviews, the shoe was breathable.
Several testers appreciated its well-constructed upper.
3 reasons not to buy
Some reviewers commented that the shoe wear-off easily after several uses only.
One of the testers felt a slight gap in the arch area.
The shoe was expensive, according to some buyers.
Bottom line
Generally, many runners were amazed at the Salomon Sonic RA's quality and fantastic construction. Aside from its attractive design, they were satisfied with its flexibility, excellent cushioning, and breathability. Although some runners were disappointed because of its price and durability issues, others still recommend this shoe because of its superb performance and versatility. The Salomon Sonic RA is a good option for those who are looking for a comfortable yet responsive running shoe."
New Balance FuelCell 5280, New Balance,84.0,89.0,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 5.3oz , Women: 4.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Sep 2019, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Several testers mentioned that the New Balance FuelCell 5280 is lightweight in structure.
According to those who have tried it, the running shoe is fast.
Based on the reviews, the shoe is durable.
Several users admire the FuelCell 5280's excellent grip.
The running footwear is true to size, as noted by some wearers.
The shoe is best used for short-distance running sessions, an avid fan commented.
2 reasons not to buy
One of the consumers said that the New Balance FuelCell 5280's back area digs into the Achilles. This made him uncomfortable at some point in the running session.
A buyer commented that the shoe is not advisable for marathon running.
Bottom line
With the positive feedback given to the New Balance FuelCell 5280, many users agreed that the shoe is a successful release. Those who have tested it are happy and contented with the lightweight structure and durability of the shoe. The overall quality of its construction is truly evident in the reviews and comments. The excellent grip and responsiveness of the shoe were highlighted as the essential factors in the performance of the users. In general, the majority of the purchasers agree that the New Balance FuelCell 520 is suitable for those who are looking for a well-performing running shoe."
, Mizuno,,85.0,,$299,$180 (save 40%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,
Altra Lone Peak 4.0 Mid Mesh, Altra,86.0,,148.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 12.3oz , Women: 10.3oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm, Aug 2018, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Based on some user reviews, the Altra Lone Peak 4.0 Mid Mesh feels comfortable even after long hours of standing and walking.
The shoe offers a good level of underfoot protection, said a few users.
Several wearers admired the mid-cut design of the shoe because it gives them ankle support.
A few noticed that it is as breathable as the previous version.
A couple of runners lauded the shoe's amazing grip on muddy and wet running surfaces.
Many purchasers admired the upper of the shoe because it keeps the shoe dry and warm.
3 reasons not to buy
The shoe is slightly expensive.
According to a few users, the shoe runs smaller than usual.
A few mentioned that it feels heavy.
Bottom line
The Lone Peak 4.0 Mid Mesh is a durable neutral running shoe from Altra. Designed for off-road running, the shoe features a good balance of comfort, underfoot protection, and impressive grip. The shoe has also been used by some buyers for hiking. Though some people have issues with price, sizing and weight, overall, the shoe has proven to be a successful release. "
Nike Flex Experience RN 6, Nike,89.0,84.0,3918.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 7mm , Women: 7mm, Mar 2017, Normal | Normal, Nike Flex Experience RN 7,"10 reasons to buy
A handful of runners gave a thumb’s up to the Flex Experience RN 6’s comfort.
It is quite light and lighter than the past model.
The price tag is very affordable.
More than a few mentioned that they can easily double as casual shoes.
Some runners have received compliments regarding the shoe’s looks.
The open mesh guarantees excellent breathability.
It is very flexible.
The traction is surprisingly very good, even on wet pavements.
There are wide options.
Nike offers multiple color options for the 6th version of the Flex Experience RN.
3 reasons not to buy
A few buyers were disappointed by the stiff cushioning.
It is a little too narrow, according to a handful of reviewers.
A couple of others were disappointed by the sound it makes when walking on wooded floor.
Bottom line
The Nike Flex Experience RN 6 is more of an “athleisure” shoe than a true-blue running outfit. It does have its merits as a moderate clip shoe for entry level runners. It is light, a little more responsive, and looks good on the road. The unbeatable price range makes it a worthy addition to a rotation or a casual shoe."
New Balance Test Run Project 3.0, New Balance,77.0,,9.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,, Nov 2019,,,"5 reasons to buy
The Test Run Project 3.0 is supportive, some users claimed. 
Many buyers mentioned that this shoe is comfortable to wear. 
This running gear offers just the right amount of cushioning, said a reviewer. 
A few runners appreciated its roomy toe box. 
People loved the unique design of this running shoe. 
2 reasons not to buy
A tester returned his shoe due to the uncomfortable insole. 
One commenter noted that it does not offer a snug fit. 
Bottom line
Featuring a unique design, the New Balance Test Run Project 3.0 is made out of recycled materials, ensuring that no two pairs are identical. This running shoe is designed for people who do not overpronate or with a neutral gait. It is manufactured with a supportive midsole and durable outsole, which aim to provide a comfortable running experience.  "
Adidas Alphabounce Parley, Adidas,93.0,,217.0,$110,$74 (save 33%), Road, Neutral, Men: 12.3oz , Women: 10.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Apr 2018, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Many people liked the mesh upper of the Adidas Alphabounce Parley, which was made using recycled plastic.
The aesthetics of this running shoe were lauded for being eye-catching.
‘Comfortable’ was a word that was frequently used to describe consumers’ experiences with this product.
Appreciation was given to the underfoot cushioning system for being dutifully responsive.
The price for a pair of Alphabounce Parley shoes was mostly deemed to be affordable.
The sizing scheme agreed with the expectations of many runners.
1 reasons not to buy
A couple of users mentioned that the shoe is too bulky for a running shoe.
Bottom line
The Adidas Alphabounce Parley received acclaim from runners and other shoe enthusiasts. This road shoe was welcomed because of its appealing design, comfortable construction, and environment-friendly materials. It’s perceived to be an agreeable choice for neutral pronators who want to take to the roads."
Mizuno Wave Prophecy 4,,90.0,75.0,483.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.3oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Mizuno Wave Prophecy 9,"8 reasons to buy
Most reviews focused on the extremely comfortable ride of the Prophecy 4.
It is a highly-cushioned shoe that still feels close to the ground and stable, according to some comments.
It has very good arch support for a neutral trainer as observed by quite a number of runners.
The new upper is very breathable.
A handful of runners valued the responsive ride despite the cushioning.
The interior is plush and very soft for a luxurious feel.
Dynamotion Fit greatly helps with the heel and midfoot security.
Almost no break-in time needed for a shoe with lots of rubber and cushioning, noted several runners.
3 reasons not to buy
The 4th edition of the Prophecy is very expensive.
It is quite heavy.
The traction suffers in wet conditions.
Bottom line
One of Mizuno’s flagship line continues to deliver a very fine performance where cushioning, arch support, and smoothness of the ride goes. If the runner can get past the wallet-thinning price, then he gets to enjoy a nicely-cushioned shoe that has noticeable responsiveness and ultra-comfortable ride."
Brooks Launch 2,,90.0,81.0,229.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Brooks Launch 7,"6 reasons to buy
The upper has a no-sew construction, which keeps the foot comfortable and free from irritation.
The overlay system has been fused directly to the fabric, keeping the cover system lightweight and flexible.
The different colorways present an eye-catching look.
Runners appreciated the mid-sole unit of the Brooks Launch 2, which delivered personalized underfoot support.
Additional cushioning is provided by a segmented crash pad, which also absorbs impact shock.
This running shoe doesn’t have an expensive price.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners didn’t like that it took them time to break in the shoe and get their feet to acclimate to how it performs.
A few noted that the mesh upper tore apart after a few months of use.
Bottom line
The streamlined design doesn’t make the Brooks Launch 2 less appealing. It’s actually a great option for neutral runners who want to have a shoe for their daily running sessions and other activities. Its cushioning is dependable and its features work well."
Asics Gel Kayano 25 SP, Asics,93.0,,2068.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.9oz , Women: 9.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 13mm,, Normal | Normal, Asics Gel Kayano 26 SP,"5 reasons to buy
Many people loved the color choices that are available for the Asics Gel Kayano 25 SP.
Some heavyset consumers stated that the underfoot platform was able to adequately support the weights of their bodies.
The upper unit didn’t bunch up and cause irritation to the skin of the foot, several testers reported.
The toe box was spacious enough to welcome a natural toe-spread, according to a few purchasers.
Runners who suffer from foot issues such as plantar fasciitis claimed that the midsole staved off any discomfort.
2 reasons not to buy
The Gel Kayano 25 SP has less cushioning compared to the original shoe, according to a tester.
Some users noted that the running shoe has a narrow toe box.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Kayano 25 SP received a lot of positive feedback from those who have tried it. The elements that garnered renown include the highly supportive underfoot cushioning system, the charming visuals, and the non-irritating upper unit. The negative point about this road shoe was apparently its sizing options which were said to be half-a-size smaller than the standard choices."
Asics Gel Kenun Lyte MX, Asics,87.0,,53.0,$80,$55 (save 31%), Road, Neutral, Men: 7.7oz , Women: 6.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
People liked the eye-catching yet minimalist aesthetics of the Asics Gel Kenun Lyte MX.
The color schemes were lauded for being pleasing to the eyes.
The underfoot cushioning system was deemed by some to be supportive and capable of alleviating foot strain.
Consumers generally appreciated the lightweight construction of this running shoe.
The breathability of the upper unit was considered to be efficient.
Some testers noted that this product was versatile enough for working and walking.
2 reasons not to buy
Some users dislike the unusual tongue design of the shoe and claim the shoe is difficult to wear because of it.
The upper material soaks up too much water, said a couple of reviewers.
Bottom line
People liked the Asics Gel Kenun Lyte MX. They welcomed this road shoe’s attractive looks, supportive underfoot experience, and lightweight build. The versatility of this product was also praised. On the other hand, there were those who stated that the sizing scheme was smaller than what they were used to."
Asics Gel Lyte33 3,,81.0,67.0,203.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.8oz , Women: 5.7oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Asics made the upper more minimal in the Lyte33 3 to reduce its weight.
The relatively low stack height is one of Asics’s ways of promoting a natural running gait in the Lyte33 3.
3M reflective materials make the shoe visible, even at night.
The Gel Lyte33 3 is the lightest in the series.
It is really flexible.
Several testers loved the fit as it is snug in the heel and midfoot, while the forefoot has enough wiggle room.
Most runners consider the price as very reasonable
1 reasons not to buy
Some runners emphasized how the soles of the shoe deteriorated way earlier than normal.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Lyte33 3 carves a very solid place in the lightweight trainer category. It has decent arch support, sufficient cushioning, and extraordinary comfort. This is also one of the most versatile shoes available as it can double as a race day shoe and as a training partner."
On Cloud Hi, On,77.0,,9.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.5oz , Women: 11oz, Men: 2mm , Women: 2mm,, Normal | Normal,,"8 reasons to buy
According to many runners, the On Cloud Hi is comfortable to wear. 
Several wearers appreciate the shoe’s excellent cushioning. 
It offers a stable ride, numerous buyers claim. 
The shoe is easy to wear, said some users. 
A lot of purchasers commented that it is suitable for everyday wear. 
Many reviewers noted that it can keep the foot dry and warm for an extended period. 
People loved the stylish design of the shoe.
A user mentioned that it is also suited for winter runs.
2 reasons not to buy
The On Cloud Hi is a bit narrow, according to a few wearers. 
It is not breathable, many people observe. 
Bottom line
Created for everyday active use, the On Cloud Hi is designed to support runners from regular runs to slightly off-road scenarios. It is a new breed of On running shoe that is crafted with advanced technologies to meet the high standards of runners and athletes. This neutral running shoe aims to provide long-lasting comfort and protection in urban environments. "
Brooks Ariel 14, Brooks,82.0,80.0,290.0,,, Road, Stability,,,,,, Normal | Normal, Brooks Ariel 20,"7 reasons to buy
The exterior and interior of the Brooks Ariel 14 use a moisture-wicking and breathable fabric in order to keep the foot cool and dry.
A secure fit is given by the Internal Support Saddle.
Runners appreciated the DNA mid-sole, which adapts to the natural stride of the wearer.
The underfoot platform is durable and responsive, yet it’s made from environmentally friendly biodegradable materials.
Excess pronation of the foot is also alleviated because of some dense mid-sole components.
The testers appreciated the traction given by the protective outsole unit.
Many runners noted that the premium price of this shoe was worth it because it has a lot of features and high quality technologies.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners thought that the toe box of this shoe was a bit narrow.
There were those who didn’t enjoy the color schemes, which were too bland for them.
Bottom line
The Brooks Ariel 14 is a women’s shoe that offers great support and reliable stability for those who need it. Its mid-sole unit it able to adapt to the natural stride of the wearer, but it still keeps the foot in a stable and balanced position when running. Surely, it’s a choice that serves well when running and when going on other activities."
Salomon Sonic RA Max, Salomon,94.0,88.0,72.0,$130,$54 (save 58%), Road, Stability, Men: 9.3oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Feb 2018, Normal | Normal, Salomon Sonic RA Max 2,"8 reasons to buy
Many users agreed that the Salomon Sonic RA Max offers excellent cushioning, perfect for road running.
Customers were pleased with the shoe’s lightweight construction.
Several users welcomed the design of the shoe; some said it looks cool.
According to some users, the Sonic RA Max is very comfortable, making it also great as casual
Some wearers admired the outstanding fit of the Salomon Sonic RA Max.
The shoe is very supportive, said some testers.
A few runners admired the shoe’s wide toe box.
A lot of buyers noted that the shoe is best for both long distance and short distance runs.
1 reasons not to buy
A few buyers were dissatisfied with the shoe’s durability; they said that the sole wore off after a few miles.
Bottom line
Designed for daily training, the Salomon Sonic RA Max provided each runner a good combination of cushioning, comfort, and stability. This road running shoe had gained positive reviews from several users while a few others are unhappy with its durability. Nevertheless, the Sonic RA Max is still a good option for runners who are looking for a reliable stability shoe."
Saucony Peregrine 7 ICE+, Saucony,76.0,77.0,44.0,$150,$114 (save 24%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.4oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,, Normal | Normal, Saucony Peregrine 8 Ice+,"9 reasons to buy
The upper material supplied sufficient warmth while running on wintry conditions, many runners observed.
One reviewer found that the outsole provided immediate traction.
The midsole brought adequate cushioning, wrote a commenter.
The grip of the outsole has significantly improved compared to other Saucony running shoes, a user remarked.
The shoe excelled on snow-covered trails and icy roads, according to an impressed runner.
A couple of reviewers thought the Peregrine 7 ICE+ was incredibly lightweight, considering it was a technology-packed trail shoe.
One user said that the chunky shoelaces made it easier to tie them even with gloves on.
The shoe kept the foot dry even while running on wet and icy surfaces, a customer mentioned.
Some wearers thought the shoe was comfortable even right out of the box.
1 reasons not to buy
A wearer observed that the Arctic Grip compound did not cover the entire outsole, and there was a bit of slipping during toe-off.
Bottom line
Based on the amount of positive feedback it received, the Saucony Peregrine 7 ICE+ was able to amaze most its users. Many comments were about the effectiveness of its various technologies, while some commended the comfort and protection it gave. In summary, the majority of consumers found that the shoe delivered on its promises."
Brooks Asteria, Brooks,94.0,88.0,618.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 8.3oz , Women: 6.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal, Brooks Racer ST 5,"7 reasons to buy
Some runners were impressed by decent cushioning and support of the Brooks Asteria.
It is a road racing shoe that is comfortable to wear, according to some users.
Many testers mentioned that the shoe feels light and fast.
The Omege Flex grooves deliver flexibility.
The mesh upper is breathable enough to keep the foot well-ventilated.
Many runners noticed the secure fit and gave positive feedback to the shoe’s well-padded tongue.
Toe box is roomy and the heel locks in the foot without slipping, based on user’ review.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runner noticed that the Asteria is too narrow for their liking.
Few users disliked the bright colors of the shoe and the unavailability of the other color options.
Bottom line
The Brooks Asteria is a road running shoe designed for racing and uptempo training. Many runners lauded the shoe's decent cushioning, flexible platform and breathable coverage. There are also a few who dislikes the shoe. but in summary, the shoe is best for mild pronators as it delivers reliable support and speed."
Vibram FiveFingers Bikila Evo WP,,79.0,80.0,24.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 5.3oz , Women: 3.9oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The Bikila Evo WP is completely waterproof.
It has nubby texture to prevent slippage.
It has an extra grip when use on ice.
It provides two fastening mechanisms which are the zipper and the lace.
Testers prefer the quality of Bikila Evo WP than the previous years.
It keeps your feet dry even if you wear thick toe socks.
5 reasons not to buy
The shoe has tighter toe pockets.
Bikila Evo WP is less flexible compared to the previous version.
Testers experience cold toes when wearing the shoe.
Some users complain that their middle toes were being slammed on the tips.
There are users who are disappointed with the zipper of the shoe.
Bottom line
The Bikila Evo WP is the right shoe for different seasons and conditions. It is flexible and waterproof from the toes up to the collar. You can have the maximum grip on ice and snow and runners are also amazed at the design of the shoe."
Hoka One One Mach, Hoka One One,94.0,88.0,6982.0,$140,$60 (save 57%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8.2oz , Women: 6.7oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm, Feb 2018, Normal | Normal, Hoka One One Mach 3,"7 reasons to buy
A couple of runners found the Hoka One One to be a lightweight shoe.
Some users were surprised that the underfoot platform saved the knees from tension or discomfort.
A satisfied wearer commended the effortless energy return of the Mach.
Several reviewers were happy that the shoe did not give them blisters. One user was mostly contented that the arch blisters that they used to get in the Clayton were no longer in the Mach.
As claimed by some, the fit was snug but yet able to accommodate a comfortable toe-splay.
A lot of wearers gave positive remarks to the forefoot cushioning and responsiveness.
Many runners reported a comfortable wear right out of the box.
6 reasons not to buy
A disappointed user disliked the poor shock absorption of the sole unit.
Some wearers felt the Mach had a stiffer cushioning than the Clayton, which was its predecessor.
A customer wrote that the mushy underfoot resulted in poor proprioception.
The tongue was too thin, according to many users.
The ride was neither soft nor bouncy and lacked the “race feeling,” a buyer lamented.
Several consumers reported that the fit was too narrow; there wasn’t enough room for the foot to relax.
Bottom line
Although the Hoka One One Mach received many satisfactory reviews, others could not help but compare it in favor of its predecessor, the Clayton. While most of the Mach’s users admired the design and structural elements, and many others found it pleasant to wear, some found faults in the shoe’s fit and feel. Overall, the Mach was a comfortable shoe, but some improvements are necessary for a completely praiseworthy performance."
Newton Distance S 8,,81.0,,20.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 8oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 2mm , Women: 2mm,,, Newton Distance S 9,"6 reasons to buy
Most users mentioned that the Newton Distance S 8 feels light and fast.
This road running shoe is very responsive, as mentioned in some user reviews.
Many runners lauded the durable design of the Distance S 8.
Several wearers were satisfied with how comfortable the shoe is, especially on long runs.
Majority of those who tried the shoe said that it felt amazing right out of the box.
Based on some reviews, the shoe fits well and it runs true to size.
1 reasons not to buy
The Distance S 8 is very expensive.
Bottom line
The Newton Distance S 8 is a lightweight running shoe designed for the road. The reintroduction of this model is very successful given that the majority of the users appreciate the shoe’s lightweight design, responsive cushioning, and comfortable foot wrap. Despite having an expensive price, most users considered the shoe a worthy investment. The re-release of this shoe is indeed a success for Newton Running."
New Balance Vazee Pace v2, New Balance,88.0,82.0,266.0,$110,$45 (save 59%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm, Jul 2016," Normal | Normal, Wide",,"9 reasons to buy
Many runners appreciated the general durability of the New Balance Vazee Pace v2, saying that it lasted through many running sessions and training.
A good number of consumers felt that it was suitably lightweight.
Based on the feedback of some testers, this version did not look awkwardly bulky.
The toe box gained some fans because, for them, it was roomy enough to accommodate natural toe splay.
The appearance of this version gained praise from those who stated that they received compliments and inquiries while wearing it.
The underfoot cushioning was reliable and responsive, according to reviewers.
A lot of commenters have used the word ‘comfortable’ as a means of describing this running shoe.
A reviewer reported that their lower back and knees loved the mid-sole because it staved off pain and discomfort.
According to a runner, the outsole tread worked well on concrete and asphalt; it didn’t allow them to slip or fall on the ground.
4 reasons not to buy
It felt narrow, according to the reports of some consumers.
The upper fabric didn’t satisfy a consumer because, for him, it looked thin and cheaply made.
The heel of a disgruntled runner kept slipping off the shoe, no matter how tight he laced it.
There were those who still noted that the fit was too tight, even when they have chosen the wider width variant (2E).
Bottom line
A lot of runners acclimated well to the New Balance Vazee Pace v2. They were receptive to its components and features. They wrote that it was great for running and training and that it stayed intact throughout such potentially abrasive activities. The only gripes were about its apparently inconsistent width and fit schemes. Still, this neutral road shoe was able to satisfy."
Nike Downshifter 5, Nike,90.0,,277.0,$60,$48 (save 99%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9.4oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,, Normal | Normal, Nike Downshifter 10,"6 reasons to buy
A large number of reviewers mentioned that the Downshifter 5 is super comfortable.
Good value for its price.
BRS 1000 carbon rubber enhances outsole durability.
It is very breathable, according to some runners.
The cushioning is plush as noted by a handful.
Several runners appreciated the smooth transition.
2 reasons not to buy
The carbon rubber outsole lacks traction, particularly on wet or smooth surfaces, based on comments from a few.
The arch support is a bit jarring as observed by a small number of reviewers.
Bottom line
The Nike Downshifter 5 is a dependable trainer that has tons of comfort and excellent arch support. Entry level runners will love the soft cushioning and the plush interior of this shoe. It should also be a good choice for anyone looking to get a wallet-friendly and hassle-free shoe that can withstand the poundings of everyday training."
Adidas Run Lux Clima, Adidas,88.0,,258.0,$100,$36 (save 64%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
According to those who have tried it, the Adidas Run Lux Clima was breathable.
The good color combination made the shoe visually-appealing, according to reviewers.
One of the purchasers said that Adidas Run Lux Clima fit perfectly on her feet.
According to one of the buyers, the shoe has a spacious toe box.
A runner mentioned that the footwear was comfortable.
Some testers admired the lightweight structure of the shoe.
Several testers mentioned that it was stylish.
2 reasons not to buy
Based on some reviews, the shoe seems to be a little loose in the heel area when compared to other models.
The Adidas Run Lux Clima was not well-cushioned, according to a reviewer. She felt a little pain when running on a treadmill.
Bottom line
Many of the consumers agreed that the Adidas Run Lux Clima is a comfortable footwear. They lauded its lightweight structure and breathability. Some of them have issues with price and cushioning, but others still recommend the running shoe because of its amazing fit. Overall, customers are satisfied and happy with its fantastic design and construction."
Newton Motion 8, Newton,84.0,,17.0,$175,$105 (save 40%), Road, Stability, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 3mm , Women: 3mm,, Normal | Normal, Newton Motion 9,"6 reasons to buy
People who have tried the Newton Motion 8 stated that it was suitably lightweight.
Some testers claimed that their running outputs were energized adequately because of the responsible construction of this running shoe.
The stability mechanisms in the midsole were praised; consumers felt that irregular pronation was averted corrected.
The tongue unit was appreciated by a few runners for being able to cushion the bridge of the foot.
Some consumers felt the upper adequately welcoming air into the foot-chamber, thus ensuring a breezy in-shoe experience.
Runners liked the color schemes of the Newton Motion 8, stating that the hues were eye-catching.
2 reasons not to buy
Several users say the Motion 8 could do better with more arch support.
The shoes are a little on the expensive side for a road running shoe, said some users.
Bottom line
The Newton Motion 8 was well-received. The runners were happy with this stability running shoe’s capacity to keep their feet comfortable and secure. The anti-pronation mechanisms were also praised because they were able to neutralize irregular running gaits. On the other hand, several people felt that the sizing scheme didn’t accommodate their choices and that they had to size down to achieve a pleasant fit.
The Newton Motion 8 is an addition to the global family of stability running shoes. It is meant for overpronators and those who desire a stable yet flexible ride."
Skechers GOrun Pure 2,,83.0,,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.3oz , Women: 7.1oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The breathable upper unit of the Skechers GOrun Pure 2 is welcomed by those who have tested it.
The flexibility of the platform of this road running shoe has been lauded by consumers.
Some users are stating that the overall ride of this product is comfortable.
According to runners, the lightweight build of the GOrun Pure 2permits all-day use.
The surface grip afforded by the outsole unit is deemed highly dependable.
2 reasons not to buy
A few comments have highlighted the upper unit’s tendency to develop holes due to toe abrasion.
The midfoot section is a bit restrictive, based on a few comments.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of people towards the Skechers GOrun Pure 2 has been positive. This neutral running shoe is lauded because it encourages natural motion through its flexible platform and lightweight build. On the other hand, the not-so-durable and restrictive upper are criticized.
Fans of Skechers’ offerings for performance and speed are likely to enjoy the GOrun Pure 2."
Merrell Mix Master Move 2,,87.0,86.0,483.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.4oz , Women: 6.9oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Most runners appreciate the lightweight construction of the Mix Master Move 2
This shoe is very comfortable based on some reviews.
It features reflective details for increase visibility.
The Merrell Mix Master Move 2 has a protective toe cap for added protection while running on rough terrains.
The heel has an air cushion for shock absorption and added stability.
It comes with a removable foot bed for orthotics.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners found this shoe too narrow for them.
The new designed made some runners disappointed based on some reviews.
Too stiff for some testers.
Bottom line
The Merrell Mix Master Move 2 is a lightweight shoe that gained positive feedback from several users. They admire the shoe's protective and comfortable design. The shoe also offers a combination of cushioning and impressive ground feel. The Mix Master Move 2 is trail running shoe for tempo runs, daily training, and racing."
Nike LunarEclipse 4, Nike,87.0,88.0,41.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 8.7oz, Men: 11mm , Women: 11mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The Engineered Mesh upper provides a breathable and well-supported coverage.
The Dynamic Flywire system was appreciated by many testers because it was able to keep the coverage feeling snug and secure.
Pronation support is afforded by the Dynamic Support system, which includes a wedge of firm foam in the rear area.
The Lunarlon mid-sole is able to cushion the foot well, while also giving a better and enabled lift to each toe-off.
Durable rubber covers critical areas of the external sole unit and shields them from wear and tear.
The platform of the Nike LunarEclipse 4 is flexible as it’s able to adapt to the movement and running style of the wearer.
1 reasons not to buy
Some runners felt a lump in the inner part of the shoe, which dug into their feet while they wore it.
Bottom line
The Nike LunarEclipse 4 is a running that’s great for many types of runners who want to get responsible cushioning, support and coverage. It’s a durable shoe that features high quality materials and components to keep the performance as comfortable and efficient as possible."
Salomon XA Pro 3D Ultra 2 GTX, Salomon,87.0,82.0,739.0,,, Trail, Stability, Men: 14.3oz , Women: 10.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Most runners, especially the beginners on trail running, love this model because of its perfect combination of comfort and support.
The Salomon XA Pro 3D Ultra 2 GTX includes the Gore-Tex membrane, which offers water-proof properties.
A highly breathable running shoe.
Its upper construction features anti-debris capacities that keep your foot safe from debris along the way.
Features anti-bacterial and anti-odor properties.
3 reasons not to buy
For runners who are not used to using well-padded stability running shoes, the 2nd version of the Salomon XA Pro 3D Ultra GTX may be too rigid.
A few runners say this trail shoe has a poor ankle support.
The shoe's Quicklace system has an asymmetrical design, which may not provide a snug fit.
Bottom line
The XA Pro 3D Ultra 2 GTX, a reliable Salomon trail running shoe, is perfect in providing support to overpronators. It includes trail-specific technologies that enable runners to run on challenging terrains, even in the snow. This shoe is also reliable in various outdoor activities."
Nike Flex RN 2016, Nike,88.0,82.0,2979.0,$80,$72 (save 10%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8.2oz , Women: 6.5oz, Men: 7mm , Women: 7mm,," Normal | Narrow, Normal", Nike Flex RN 2017,"12 reasons to buy
Many of the reviewers loved the comfortable ride of the Flex RN 2016.
The price tag is very affordable.
It is very flexible, according to some.
The 2016 Flex RN runs very light, as noticed by more than a few.
Most of the comments noted that it is quite durable.
Several runners living in hot-weather areas valued its excellent breathability.
Its lightness is appreciated by a handful.
A moderate number of runners liked the color of the new Flex RN.
Several runners loved the colorways and stylish appeal of the shoe.
A handful of users had a great time wearing the shoe right out of the box.
Despite being very light and minimal, more than a handful of runners use it for gym workouts.
Many were quite surprised by the grip of this shoe, even on wet pavement.
3 reasons not to buy
The fit can be too tight for those with more than average foot dimensions, remarked several.
The outsole sucks small stones, based on the comments of some runners.
A significant number of users who prefer to walk had irritation in their heels because the back part of the Nike 2016 Flex RN is a little too high.
Bottom line
The Nike Flex RN 2016 is a no-nonsense trainer that is quite light, but has decent cushioning to handle daily training. It has adequate arch support, superior breathability, excellent comfort, and nice looks. For a very affordable price, runners can get a really functional shoe that looks more than its price tag."
Adidas Pureboost ZG, Adidas,93.0,85.0,579.0,$140,$80 (save 43%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Oct 2016, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
The upper unit of the Pure Boost ZG features a fabric that naturally expands with the foot, giving a comfortable fit.
The inner sleeve is smooth, so it doesn’t cause irritation to the skin.
A good number of runners noted that the slightly expensive price was reasonable and worth it because of the great quality of this shoe.
The many different color options for this shoe heightens its visual appeal.
The boost™ mid-sole keeps the foot well-cushioned at all times.
The outsole unit uses a thick EVA layer for a smooth and easy ride.
The moderate weight doesn’t make the runner feel as if they’re weighed down by this shoe.
1 reasons not to buy
A few felt that the elastic strap that goes around the mid-foot section got in the way of the shoelaces.
Bottom line
The Adidas Pure Boost ZG brings comfort, flexibility and durable support to the runner. Each step becomes natural because of its soft coverage, the responsive mid-sole system, and the layered EVA outsole. Neutral runners are going to have a great time with this Adidas running shoe."
Nike Zoom Pegasus 35 Turbo,,76.0,79.0,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.5oz , Women: 6.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, May 2019,, Nike Zoom Pegasus Turbo 2,"6 reasons to buy
The cushioning system of the Nike Zoom Pegasus 35 Turbo is lauded for being soft and responsive.
The lightweight structure of this road running shoe is appreciated by many wearers.
People have noted that the breathability of the upper unit is dependable and accommodating.
Some purchasers have considered the flexibility of the platform to be remarkable.
The outsole unit’s traction capacity is welcomed by numerous runners.
Several runners believe that the Flywire cables are able to help with in-shoe steadiness.
4 reasons not to buy
The midsole of this running shoe has fallen apart after only a few uses, according to a lot of testers.
The textiles of the upper are apparently susceptible to tears; runners have experienced holes developing after only a few uses.
A handful of runners have observed the outsole wearing off after only a few hundred miles of use.
A few purchasers claim that the platform is too soft to deliver steady underfoot support.
Bottom line
The overall feedback for the Nike Zoom Pegasus 35 Turbo has been mixed. The positive points are consistent and valid, like the breathable upper and the flexible midsole. The lightweight construction of this running shoe makes it ideal for long miles.
Fans of Nike running shoes that are for neutral pronators are the ones who are likely to benefit from what the Zoom Pegasus 35 Turbo has to offer."
Hoka One One Vanquish 3, Hoka One One,82.0,80.0,155.0,$170,$150 (save 25%), Road, Neutral, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm, Jan 2017, Normal | Normal,,"10 reasons to buy
The majority of the customers were happy with the cushioning of the Hoka One One Vanquish 3.
The runners were impressed with the snug fit because it prevented their feet from wobbling.
Most users felt that the open construction of the upper unit kept their feet cool and dry.
Many runners were satisfied with the performance of the shoe on long-distance runs.
The Vanquish 3 surprised many of its wearers by its excellent grip on the asphalt.
The shoe satisfied many runners with its general durability.
A few of its users admired its good looks.
The shoe felt lightweight despite its bulky appearance, some consumers reported.
A customer suffering from Plantar Fasciitis felt relief in his steps while walking; he had the substantial midsole to thank for that.
A customer was happy with the wide toe-box of the shoe because it provided enough room for his toes to splay.
3 reasons not to buy
A few customers were unhappy with the construction of the Vanquish 3; they said that the platform was less substantial and its form heavier than its predecessor.
Some of the runners complained about the tightness of the shoe.
According to a tester, the heel cup wasn’t as efficient as the one that’s present in the previous iteration.
Bottom line
Hoka One One Vanquish 3 ensures the optimal level of cushioning and support for runners during their run. It surprised its wearers with its excellent performance in different activities on the roads. Overall, the users seemed very happy with the shoe as it satisfied their daily needs very well."
Nike Air Max Dynasty 2, Nike,89.0,,289.0,$85,$76 (save 11%), Road, Neutral, Men: 12oz , Women: 9oz,,, Jun 2017, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
A lot of runners considered the Nike Air Max Dynasty 2 to be a comfortable running shoe.
Some runners thought that the mid-sole of the shoe was able to support the foot through long periods of time.
This shoe is true-to-size, according to many of those who have tried it.
Testers appreciated the lightweight nature of this shoe.
It had an appealing look, many testers observed.
Runners generally welcomed the price of this shoe, which for them, as was affordable.
The traction-capability of the outsole gained positive remarks.
2 reasons not to buy
The Air cushioning unit in the heel area tended to burst, according to some consumers.
The sole unit made a squeaking sound with each step, several runners observed.
Bottom line
Generally, the feedback for the Nike Air Max Dynasty 2 was positive. Many consumers welcomed its appealing design, its comfortable midsole, and its efficacy as a shoe for active lifestyles. But there were runners who had complaints with some of its parts, particularly the Air cushioning unit. They reported that it was easy to burst."
La Sportiva VK, La Sportiva,79.0,,8.0,$135,$64 (save 54%), Trail,,,,,, Feb 2018, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Most users admired the superb grip of La Sportiva VK on varied terrains.
Some runners lauded this trail shoe because of its lightweight construction.
A few wearers said that the shoe is comfortable even if worn without socks.
According to some runners, the La Sportiva VK feels fast.
The running shoe offers great underfoot protection, based on some comments.
3 reasons not to buy
The shoe is too narrow for some users.
Several buyers mentioned that the shoe lacks durability; they said the lugs and lacing system break off easily.
One trail running disliked the shoe's lacing system; he said it's inconvenient to wrap the laces around the heel and tie them on the side. 
Bottom line
The La Sportiva VK is a trail running shoe designed for competition and long-distance runs. The shoe gained mixed reviews from users. Some trail runners are happy with the shoe's grip and performance, but others are disappointed with its sizing, durability and unique lacing system. Overall, the shoe has satisfied a number of runners but there is still significant room for improvement."
La Sportiva Unika, La Sportiva,63.0,76.0,10.0,$190,$90 (save 53%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.6oz , Women: 9.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Feb 2018," Normal | Narrow, Normal",,"4 reasons to buy
According to a few users, the Unika offered superb cushioning no matter the distance.
Some runners were impressed by the shoe’s durable traction on varied surfaces.
A user remarked that the shoe fits great out of the box.
Several runners lauded the shoe's excellent quality.
3 reasons not to buy
The La Sportiva Unika is a very expensive trail shoe.
A couple of runners mentioned that the tongue felt rough.
The upper felt warm; one user advised other runners to wear thin socks.
Bottom line
The La Sportive Unika is an expensive trail running shoe. Those who tried the shoe admired its cushioning, traction, and fit. While others consider this model a successful release, others were dismayed over a few flaws. Overall, this trail shoe is worth a try."
Salomon Wings Pro 2, Salomon,88.0,83.0,220.0,$140,$110 (save 21%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.8oz , Women: 10.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal, Salomon Wings Pro 3,"7 reasons to buy
Most runners took note of the durability of the Salomon Wings Pro 2.
This shoe features a full foot decent control for an impressive downhill running advantage.
The Wings Pro 2 is a combination of secure fit and protective structure, which gained positive feedback from some runners.
The ProFeel film provides added protection for the feet, without adding weight, from sharp objects while running on the trail.
The Wings Pro 2 utilizes the Sensifit technology the holds the foot securely, for confidence and comfort.
The shoe has amazing durability as noted in some reviews.
It comes with an easy-on, easy-off quick lacing system.
3 reasons not to buy
This shoe is slightly heavy.
Slightly expensive price.
Most runners said that the Salomon Wings Pro 2 runs large.
Bottom line
The Salomon Wings Pro 2 is a neutral training shoe that gives you confidence while running on tough terrain. It features durability, protection, and comfort. The cutting-edge technologies gained quite a number of positive feedback from runners. Though the shoe is a bit heavy and pricey, users still like and recommend the Wings Pro 2 to professional and casual runners."
New Balance FuelCell 5280, New Balance,84.0,89.0,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 5.3oz , Women: 4.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Sep 2019, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Several testers mentioned that the New Balance FuelCell 5280 is lightweight in structure.
According to those who have tried it, the running shoe is fast.
Based on the reviews, the shoe is durable.
Several users admire the FuelCell 5280's excellent grip.
The running footwear is true to size, as noted by some wearers.
The shoe is best used for short-distance running sessions, an avid fan commented.
2 reasons not to buy
One of the consumers said that the New Balance FuelCell 5280's back area digs into the Achilles. This made him uncomfortable at some point in the running session.
A buyer commented that the shoe is not advisable for marathon running.
Bottom line
With the positive feedback given to the New Balance FuelCell 5280, many users agreed that the shoe is a successful release. Those who have tested it are happy and contented with the lightweight structure and durability of the shoe. The overall quality of its construction is truly evident in the reviews and comments. The excellent grip and responsiveness of the shoe were highlighted as the essential factors in the performance of the users. In general, the majority of the purchasers agree that the New Balance FuelCell 520 is suitable for those who are looking for a well-performing running shoe."
, Mizuno,,85.0,,$299,$180 (save 40%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,
New Balance Fresh Foam Hierro BOA, New Balance,80.0,86.0,8.0,$160,$140 (save 13%), Trail, Neutral,,,,,," Normal | Normal, Wide",,"7 reasons to buy
The Fresh Foam Hierro Boa is comfortable, many runners claimed. 
Some consumers said that the traction is excellent. 
A couple of buyers testified that the shoe offers good support. 
Many purchasers appreciated the shoe’s good cushioning. 
A few users mentioned that it is also comfortable for winter runs. 
It can be worn without socks, according to a tester.
One consumer loved that this shoe is easy to clean. 
3 reasons not to buy
The ankle collar was tight making it hard to get on, some users reported. 
One runner said that the outsole lugs cause pain and discomfort while running. 
The Boa laces can’t get tight enough if you have a small foot, said a buyer. 
Bottom line
The New Balance Fresh Foam Hierro Boa is a neutral running shoe that works best for runners who do not overpronate. It is made out of high-quality materials that enhance durability and comfort even on uneven surfaces. This trail running shoe offers aggressive traction, responsive cushioning, and breathable upper, which are designed to provide an efficient and comfortable running experience. "
Nike Zoom Fly SP Fast, Nike,88.0,82.0,67.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.7oz , Women: 8.7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Aug 2018, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Several users noted that the Nike Zoom Fly SP Fast is lightweight.
The shoe is comfortable, according to those who have tried it.
Based on some reviews, the footwear has fantastic design and unique colorways.
The shoe offers a sleek in-shoe feel, noted in some reviews.
The shoe promotes smooth transitions, according to many runners.
The Zoom Fly SP Fast provides ample support to the foot, several wearers remarked.
2 reasons not to buy
The width is narrow, according to several purchasers.
One of the consumers said that the Nike Zoom Fly SP Fast is expensive.
Bottom line
The Nike Zoom Fly SP Fast is said to be a successful release, but not quite for some. Although a significant number of purchasers praised the shoe’s lightweight structure and comfort level, there were a few who were not contented and happy with the price, fit and sizing. In terms of style and design, the shoe received positive feedback. Overall, the Nike Zoom Fly SP Fast is still worth trying and recommended by"
Mizuno Wave Rider 18, Mizuno,90.0,80.0,1379.0,$120,$50 (save 67%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,," Normal | Normal, Wide", Mizuno Wave Rider 23,"7 reasons to buy
The general consensus from a good number of reviews show that the 18th version of the Rider is a comfortable shoe.
It is a value for the money investment.
Many comments focused on the spacious toe box for plenty of toe splay.
It has excellent arch support.
The Rider 18 is relatively lightweight for a neutral trainer.
A handful loved the pop coming from the midsole.
The heel to toe transition is quick, according to several runners.
3 reasons not to buy
Quite a few runners saw the soles of the Rider 18 getting separated from the upper.
Several disliked the firmness of the ride.
Some were disappointed because it required a break-in period.
Bottom line
One of Mizuno’s most popular lines goes back to what worked for them in this version of the Rider. With a more form-fitting upper, runners will get to experience again the superb arch support, firm and responsive cushioning, and efficient movement through the gait cycle. This is a very solid option for those looking for a high-mileage trainer that has noticeable stability and shock-absorbing features."
Altra Lone Peak 4.0 Mid Mesh, Altra,86.0,,148.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 12.3oz , Women: 10.3oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm, Aug 2018, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Based on some user reviews, the Altra Lone Peak 4.0 Mid Mesh feels comfortable even after long hours of standing and walking.
The shoe offers a good level of underfoot protection, said a few users.
Several wearers admired the mid-cut design of the shoe because it gives them ankle support.
A few noticed that it is as breathable as the previous version.
A couple of runners lauded the shoe's amazing grip on muddy and wet running surfaces.
Many purchasers admired the upper of the shoe because it keeps the shoe dry and warm.
3 reasons not to buy
The shoe is slightly expensive.
According to a few users, the shoe runs smaller than usual.
A few mentioned that it feels heavy.
Bottom line
The Lone Peak 4.0 Mid Mesh is a durable neutral running shoe from Altra. Designed for off-road running, the shoe features a good balance of comfort, underfoot protection, and impressive grip. The shoe has also been used by some buyers for hiking. Though some people have issues with price, sizing and weight, overall, the shoe has proven to be a successful release. "
Nike Air VaporMax Flyknit Utility, Nike,81.0,,42.0,$225,$160 (save 29%), Road, Neutral,,,,, Jan 2018, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
According to some user reviews, the Nike Air VaporMax Flyknit Utility is a very comfortable shoe; two users mentioned that it is the most comfortable shoe they’ve ever worn.
A few mentioned that the shoe has a very durable construction.
A couple of satisfied runners said that the shoe fits like a glove.
Some purchasers admired the stylish look of the shoe.
Runs true to size, said most users.
4 reasons not to buy
The Nike Air VaporMax Flyknit Utility is a very expensive running shoe.
One user was disappointed when some dirt gets inside the shoe, making it difficult to clean.
Based on a few reviews, the mid-cut collar wraps the ankle area tightly.
One runner noticed that the heel counter is too high; it rubbed the back of the ankle which caused severe irritation.
Bottom line
The Nike Air VaporMax Flyknit Utility gained a winning spot to many users because of its comfortable fit. While other praised its good-looking design and durable structure, there are also others who expressed disappointments with the shoe’s expensive price and tight mid-cut collar. Overall, with its functional design, this road running shoe is still worth a try. "
New Balance Test Run Project 3.0, New Balance,77.0,,9.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,, Nov 2019, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
The Test Run Project 3.0 is supportive, some users claimed. 
Many buyers mentioned that this shoe is comfortable to wear. 
This running gear offers just the right amount of cushioning, said a reviewer. 
A few runners appreciated its roomy toe box. 
People loved the unique design of this running shoe. 
2 reasons not to buy
A tester returned his shoe due to the uncomfortable insole. 
One commenter noted that it does not offer a snug fit. 
Bottom line
Featuring a unique design, the New Balance Test Run Project 3.0 is made out of recycled materials, ensuring that no two pairs are identical. This running shoe is designed for people who do not overpronate or with a neutral gait. It is manufactured with a supportive midsole and durable outsole, which aim to provide a comfortable running experience.  "
Skechers GOrun Speed Elite, Skechers,86.0,92.0,8.0,$190,$180 (save 81%), Road, Neutral, Men: 6oz , Women: 6oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm, Feb 2020, Normal | Normal,,"9 reasons to buy
A lot of users appreciated the Skechers GOrun Speed Elite’s overall performance. 
This running footwear is lightweight, noted by some reviewers. 
Some of the buyers said that this shoe has plenty of cushioning. 
The shoe’s comfort level was loved by a lot of happy customers. 
According to those who have tried it, the running shoe is breathable.
This running footwear is stylish, said some purchasers. It has an attractive design, they added.
A few purchasers appreciated this shoe’s responsiveness.
This running partner has a fantastic ground feel, based on the reviews.
The shoe is best used for the treadmill and half marathons, as noted by a few consumers.
3 reasons not to buy
A couple of runners commented that the Skechers GOrun Speed Elite has a narrow toe box.
One user noted that the running shoe needs to break-in.
A few buyers observed that the GOrun Speed Elite wears out quickly after several uses only.
Bottom line
The Skechers GOrun Speed Elite made a lot of users happy and contented because of the advanced technologies employed to the shoe. Overall, this running footwear has helped the majority of the users to be better runners. It is engineered with materials and features that let the users enjoy a more responsive, breathable, and comfortable riding experience. This neutral running shoe is said to be a perfect partner in achieving a successful running activity. Its excellent performance is suitable for runners who want to take their activities to the next level."
Brooks Defyance 9, Brooks,90.0,83.0,182.0,$120,$100 (save 17%), Road, Neutral, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,, Normal | Normal, Brooks Defyance 10,"5 reasons to buy
Some runners were impressed by the arch support of the Brooks Defyance 9.
It has Segmented Crash Pad that promotes a smooth heel-to-toe transition.
This shoe delivers great flexibility because of the Omega Flex Grooves based on several comments.
The breathable mesh upper keeps the foot cool and dry.
Most runners liked the Defyance 9 because it is durable and comfortable to wear.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners observed a poor cushioning in the Defyance 9.
This shoe is slightly expensive.
It is a bit stiff.
Bottom line
The Brooks Defyance 9 is a neutral shoe that is great for road running. It is a versatile running shoe that offers a combination of smooth ride and cushioning. However, some felt that it lacks the necessary cushioning for long-distance runs. But despite the negative comments, overall, users still consider the shoe a successful release."
Saucony Breakthru 4, Saucony,84.0,78.0,2869.0,$100,$64 (save 36%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8.6oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Jan 2018, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
The toe box of the Saucony Breakthru 4 was broad enough for toe-splay, several users commented.
The available colorways for this running shoe were visually endearing, some people noted.
Most consumers welcomed the price tag, stating that it’s affordable.
The lightweight nature of this product gained the favor of its testers.
The sizing scheme followed most people’s expectations.
2 reasons not to buy
A few testers complained that the midsole was stiffer and less responsive than the previous version.
According to a consumer, there was a lump in the sole unit that tended to grab the arch uncomfortably.
Bottom line
The Saucony Breakthru 4 came into the industry with grace, but not with a bang. While neutral runners were positive about its affordable price, it’s lightweight build, and its appealing color schemes, some of them felt that its midsole wasn’t as comfortable. One person even claimed that something was causing some discomfort to the arch of the foot."
Nike Air Zoom Vomero 12,,93.0,90.0,427.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.8oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Nike Air Zoom Vomero 14,"10 reasons to buy
A reviewer wrote that the upper fit of the Nike Air Zoom Vomero 12 was better than its previous iterations.
Many consumers appreciated the presence of the Flywire cables; they wrote that the upper was more secure because of them.
Runners were generally happy with the different color schemes because they allowed more choice when it came to the visual aesthetics of the shoe.
Several testers considered this shoe to be a great option for long distances.
The mid-sole received some praise for being well-cushioned and flexible.
The foam technologies present in this model were lauded for being very responsive.
Those with different foot-dimensions welcomed the fact that this shoe came in many width variants.
‘Comfortable’ was a word used frequently to describe the Nike Air Zoom Vomero 12.
A consumer noted that the outsole was strong and efficient enough to increase mileage durability.
The reflective coating in the upper pleased many runners who needed to be seen when running in low-light conditions.
1 reasons not to buy
A consumer reported that the toe box of the Nike Air Zoom Vomero 12 was short and tight.
Bottom line
The Nike Air Zoom Vomero 12 neutral road shoe was a resounding success, based on many runners’ reports. Most were able to appreciate its comfortable construction, as well as its durable components. They also believed that it was a step up from the previous iterations in terms of cushioning, durability and overall quality."
Asics Gel Exalt 2, Asics,89.0,,646.0,$90,$55 (save 39%), Road, Stability, Men: 11oz , Women: 8.7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal, Asics Gel Exalt 4,"6 reasons to buy
Breathable mesh makes the upper coverage comfortable to the wearer.
Synthetic overlays with reflectivity enhance the visual appeal of the Asics Gel Exalt 2, while also acting to give a snug fit.
The increased energy return is afforded by the SpEVA® mid-sole unit, which is also lightweight and responsive.
The stability mechanics that are present in this model were appreciated by many because they assisted in keeping their feet stable when running.
Shock absorption is also available via the Gel® Cushioning System in the heel.
Durable, abrasion resistant rubber makes sure to extend the life of the sole unit.
2 reasons not to buy
A few of the testers felt that this shoe ran a bit smaller than what they were used to.
Some noted that it was a bit narrow in width.
Bottom line
The 2nd version of the Gel Exalt from Asics is a comfortable stability running shoe that offers cushioning, breathable coverage, and surface traction. Stability is a huge part of its service because it is able to support the mid-foot section. It’s a solid option for those who are fans of daily running and exercise sessions."
Mizuno Wave Sayonara 3, Mizuno,90.0,89.0,352.0,$110,$50 (save 55%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8.4oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal, Mizuno Wave Sayonara 4,"6 reasons to buy
Some runners were impressed by the light construction of the Mizuno Wave Sayonara 3.
It has the X10 technology that promotes added durability.
It features the Mizuno SmoothRide Engineering technology for a smooth heel to toe transition.
The shoe feels light and fast, as noted in some reviews.
A few number of users mentioned that the shoe is responsive enough for their preferences.
The Sayonara 3 is available in several color options.
3 reasons not to buy
Several users were not impressed by the 3rd version of the Wave Sayonara because the midsole felt too soft.
Many felt that the Wave Sayonara 3 is too stiff.
Not as comfortable as the previous model, said some reviews.
Bottom line
Runners looking for a fast running shoe will never get disappointed with the Mizuno Wave Sayonara 3. It is designed to give runners a combination of fast, responsive and light ride. It is not just a go-to running shoe, but also a superior trainer with decent arch support and racing partner."
Mizuno Wave Prophecy 4, Mizuno,90.0,75.0,483.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.3oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,, Normal | Normal, Mizuno Wave Prophecy 9,"8 reasons to buy
Most reviews focused on the extremely comfortable ride of the Prophecy 4.
It is a highly-cushioned shoe that still feels close to the ground and stable, according to some comments.
It has very good arch support for a neutral trainer as observed by quite a number of runners.
The new upper is very breathable.
A handful of runners valued the responsive ride despite the cushioning.
The interior is plush and very soft for a luxurious feel.
Dynamotion Fit greatly helps with the heel and midfoot security.
Almost no break-in time needed for a shoe with lots of rubber and cushioning, noted several runners.
3 reasons not to buy
The 4th edition of the Prophecy is very expensive.
It is quite heavy.
The traction suffers in wet conditions.
Bottom line
One of Mizuno’s flagship line continues to deliver a very fine performance where cushioning, arch support, and smoothness of the ride goes. If the runner can get past the wallet-thinning price, then he gets to enjoy a nicely-cushioned shoe that has noticeable responsiveness and ultra-comfortable ride."
Brooks Launch 2, Brooks,90.0,81.0,229.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal, Brooks Launch 7,"6 reasons to buy
The upper has a no-sew construction, which keeps the foot comfortable and free from irritation.
The overlay system has been fused directly to the fabric, keeping the cover system lightweight and flexible.
The different colorways present an eye-catching look.
Runners appreciated the mid-sole unit of the Brooks Launch 2, which delivered personalized underfoot support.
Additional cushioning is provided by a segmented crash pad, which also absorbs impact shock.
This running shoe doesn’t have an expensive price.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners didn’t like that it took them time to break in the shoe and get their feet to acclimate to how it performs.
A few noted that the mesh upper tore apart after a few months of use.
Bottom line
The streamlined design doesn’t make the Brooks Launch 2 less appealing. It’s actually a great option for neutral runners who want to have a shoe for their daily running sessions and other activities. Its cushioning is dependable and its features work well."
Reebok Print Run 2.0, Reebok,89.0,81.0,251.0,$80,$32 (save 60%), Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm, Feb 2017," Normal | Normal, Wide", Reebok Print Run 3.0,"12 reasons to buy
The Reebok Print Run 2.0 is, according to the majority, the pair of comfortable running shoes.
Many customers praised the snug fit of the upper since it prevented any interior wobbling of the foot.
Most runners highlighted the light weight of the shoe, which helped in running extra miles.
A few wearers believed that the quality of the footwear was excellent since it held up well, even after many miles of running.
Some individuals mentioned that the shoe caused no uncomfortable rubbing or chafing against the skin, resulting in zero blisters.
A few customers appreciated the look of the shoe by calling it ‘stylish’.
A user said that the shoe’s sole was firm yet highly flexible; it allowed him to follow his natural style while running.
A purchaser commented that the Reebok Print Run 2.0 was priced very reasonably.
A user with plantar fasciitis said that the shoe provided great arch support.
A few wearers mentioned that the footwear felt really soft and smooth against the skin.
An individual was of the opinion that the shoe was made using fine-quality materials.
A purchaser lauded the breathability of the shoe’s upper.
4 reasons not to buy
A few wearers had experienced blistering from running in these shoes.
A user thought that the shoe was not comfortable to wear.
A runner mentioned that the shoe felt like a combat cleat; for him, its weight was heavy.
Some purchasers had problems with the sizing schemes of the Reebok Print Run 2.0.
Bottom line
The Reebok Print Run 2.0 has managed to establish a massive fan base owing to its high comfortability, enhanced grip and sturdy yet flexible construction. The shoe has a very stylish look which satisfies the fashion urge of the looks-conscious people, as well."
Skechers GOrun Horizon, Skechers,84.0,87.0,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.3oz , Women: 7.2oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
People like the Skechers GOrun Horizon’s color schemes and general aesthetics.
Several consumers like the lightweight structure of the whole silhouette, stating that it allows them to go on all-day running sessions.
This running shoe has a midsole that is considered reactive and comfortable for general use.
The flexibility of the platform is praised by consumers who like a product that accommodates the natural motion of the foot.
Some heavyset runners claim that the midsole is able to support them and remain responsive.
The traction capacity of the outsole is lauded because it is deemed precise and reliable.
2 reasons not to buy
A few testers lamented the need for a break-in period when taking the Skechers GOrun Horizon for a spin.
The outsole unit has a tendency to wear off quickly, according to several runners.
Bottom line
The overall feedback towards the GOrun Horizon has been positive. People are generally happy with the elements that put this Skechers running shoe together. The appealing design, the lightweight construction, the comfortable yet supportive midsole, and the traction-ready outsole have become the highlights. On the other hand, there are complaints about the need for this shoe to have a break-in period and the outsole being quick-to-wear-off.
Fans of road running shoes that are for neutral-pronated motion are the target audience of the Skechers GOrun Horizon."
Asics Gel Lyte33 3, Asics,81.0,67.0,203.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.8oz , Women: 5.7oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
Asics made the upper more minimal in the Lyte33 3 to reduce its weight.
The relatively low stack height is one of Asics’s ways of promoting a natural running gait in the Lyte33 3.
3M reflective materials make the shoe visible, even at night.
The Gel Lyte33 3 is the lightest in the series.
It is really flexible.
Several testers loved the fit as it is snug in the heel and midfoot, while the forefoot has enough wiggle room.
Most runners consider the price as very reasonable
1 reasons not to buy
Some runners emphasized how the soles of the shoe deteriorated way earlier than normal.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Lyte33 3 carves a very solid place in the lightweight trainer category. It has decent arch support, sufficient cushioning, and extraordinary comfort. This is also one of the most versatile shoes available as it can double as a race day shoe and as a training partner."
Asics Gel Foundation 12, Asics,89.0,,506.0,$120,$53 (save 96%), Road, Motion control, Men: 12.2oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,," Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Normal", Asics Gel Foundation 13,"6 reasons to buy
Lightweight and breathable coverage is provided by the Engineered mesh in the upper.
The 12th version of the Gel Foundation features the ComforDry Sockliner, which provides additional cushioning while reducing moisture and odor.
Synthetic Overlays offer an improved fit while the Seamless Upper Construction ensures a non-irritating sleeve for sockless wearing.
It has SpEVA in the mid-sole for efficient energy return and the Gel Cushioning System in the heel and forefoot areas for shock absorption.
Stability is afforded by effective mid-sole components, such as the DuoMax Support System and the Guidance Trusstic System.
Most runners took note that the Gel Foundation 12 is a well-cushioned shoe that is also flexible.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners felt this version needed more depth in the toe box because they felt their toes rub uncomfortably against the upper fabric of the shoe.
There were complaints stating that the underfoot stability mechanics were not efficient as it rendered the foot stiff and unable to move naturally.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Foundation 12 is a motion control shoe that gives responsive and comfortable cushioning for both short and long running sessions. The layered stability and full guidance system help runners experience a smoother ride. The shoe gathers mixed reviews from users but overall, the Foundation 12 is considered by some as a successful update."
Salomon XA Pro 3D M+,,89.0,,1870.0,,, Trail, Stability,,,,,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Many wearers liked the convenience provided by the Quicklace™ system of the XA Pro 3D M+.
The roomy toe box allowed a comfortable toe splay, a user stated.
One runner appreciated the protective rubber toe cap in the upper.
Several customers were impressed with the lightness and durability of the shoe.
The outsole supplied fantastic traction, various consumers stated.
The XA Pro 3D M+ was a reliable shoe for challenging trails, cited a reviewer.
A wearer commended the supportive and robust fit of the shoe even after long runs.
6 reasons not to buy
The shoe was very tight in the arch area, a couple of buyers commented.
The strips on the inside of the upper wrapped around the foot uncomfortably and caused blisters, a user experienced.
A lot of wearers were disappointed with the narrow fit of the shoe.
The midsole was not flexible enough and therefore put unnecessary stress on the foot, a runner observed.
A user mentioned that the Quicklace™ was difficult to loosen when dirty.
Another said their heel continually slipped despite the tightness of the lacing system.
Bottom line
A good number of users thought that the Salomon XA Pro 3D M+ was not true to its claims; it was marketed as a wide shoe but was still ill-fitting for many wearers. There were also numerous complaints about the shoe’s structure. Several features have been praised, but it was apparent that the criticisms were more notable and more significant in number."
Asics Gel Cumulus 21 GTX, Asics,94.0,95.0,57.0,$130,$91 (save 30%), Road, Neutral, Men: 12.3oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
The Gel Cumulus 21 GTX is comfortable, according to many users. 
Several runners mentioned that the shoe is supportive. 
A few people highlighted the quality of materials used in the shoe. 
Many purchasers appreciated the shoe’s waterproof features. 
Some buyers said that it can keep the foot dry and cool for an extended period. 
It is perfect for long-distance runs, based on some reviews. 
A couple of users admired the lightweight structure of the shoe. 
2 reasons not to buy
The shoe is a bit narrow, said some commenters. 
A wearer complained that the outsole is not durable enough. 
Bottom line
Asics Gel Cumulus 21 GTX is a neutral running shoe that works for mild pronators or people who supinate. This waterproof running shoe is equipped with advanced features that aim to enhance comfort and running speed. It is specially designed for running on hard surfaces and keeping the foot dry and comfortable no matter how soggy the terrain.  "
Saucony Kinvara 6, Saucony,90.0,85.0,701.0,$110,$71 (save 35%), Road, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 6.5oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,, Normal | Normal, Saucony Kinvara 11,"4 reasons to buy
The Saucony Kinvara 6 is a reasonably-priced running shoe.
Many testers liked the lightweight construction of the Saucony Kinvara 6.
The shoe is very comfortable for distance running.
Some runners highlighted that the Kinvara 6 is a fast shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
Many runners noticed that the shoe wears out quickly than expected.
The shoe is not flexible enough to provide a responsive ride.
The shoe is too narrow for some runners.
Bottom line
The Saucony Kinvara 6 is a lightweight running shoe that delivers a good combination of cushioning, fit, durability and comfort. The shoe gained mix reviews from users but overall, there are still a huge number of users who think the shoe as a worthy investment. The Kinvara 6 is a great training partner and reliable enough for distance running."
Brooks Asteria, Brooks,94.0,88.0,618.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 8.3oz , Women: 6.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal, Brooks Racer ST 5,"7 reasons to buy
Some runners were impressed by decent cushioning and support of the Brooks Asteria.
It is a road racing shoe that is comfortable to wear, according to some users.
Many testers mentioned that the shoe feels light and fast.
The Omege Flex grooves deliver flexibility.
The mesh upper is breathable enough to keep the foot well-ventilated.
Many runners noticed the secure fit and gave positive feedback to the shoe’s well-padded tongue.
Toe box is roomy and the heel locks in the foot without slipping, based on user’ review.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runner noticed that the Asteria is too narrow for their liking.
Few users disliked the bright colors of the shoe and the unavailability of the other color options.
Bottom line
The Brooks Asteria is a road running shoe designed for racing and uptempo training. Many runners lauded the shoe's decent cushioning, flexible platform and breathable coverage. There are also a few who dislikes the shoe. but in summary, the shoe is best for mild pronators as it delivers reliable support and speed."
Vibram FiveFingers Bikila Evo WP, Vibram FiveFingers,79.0,80.0,24.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 5.3oz , Women: 3.9oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
The Bikila Evo WP is completely waterproof.
It has nubby texture to prevent slippage.
It has an extra grip when use on ice.
It provides two fastening mechanisms which are the zipper and the lace.
Testers prefer the quality of Bikila Evo WP than the previous years.
It keeps your feet dry even if you wear thick toe socks.
5 reasons not to buy
The shoe has tighter toe pockets.
Bikila Evo WP is less flexible compared to the previous version.
Testers experience cold toes when wearing the shoe.
Some users complain that their middle toes were being slammed on the tips.
There are users who are disappointed with the zipper of the shoe.
Bottom line
The Bikila Evo WP is the right shoe for different seasons and conditions. It is flexible and waterproof from the toes up to the collar. You can have the maximum grip on ice and snow and runners are also amazed at the design of the shoe."
Salomon Sonic RA Pro, Salomon,97.0,94.0,82.0,$130,$79 (save 39%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8.3oz , Women: 7.1oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm, Feb 2018, Normal | Normal, Salomon Sonic RA Pro 2,"7 reasons to buy
Several consumers liked the lightweight nature of the Salomon Sonic RA Pro.
The inner sleeve of the upper gained praise for preventing hot spots and skin irritation.
Many testers lauded the breathability of the façade.
Some runners noted that the design and color schemes were appealing to the eyes.
The quality of the materials used for this running shoe was deemed to be high and reliable.
According to a handful of reviews, the width profiles for both the men and women’s versions were accurate to expectations.
The runners appreciated the overall durability and efficacy of the outsole.
1 reasons not to buy
A few testers felt that the Sonic RA Pro had an expensive price tag.
Bottom line
The Salomon Sonic RA Pro is a running shoe that was well-received. Roadsters were happy with the performance and its components, particularly praising the softness of its upper, the lightweight build, and the dependability of its various parts. Some weren’t happy with the price, but it’s a concern that didn’t overshadow the positive feedback."
Brooks PureGrit 7, Brooks,91.0,90.0,52.0,$120,$75 (save 93%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.6oz , Women: 8.7oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm, Jul 2018, Normal | Normal, Brooks PureGrit 8,"7 reasons to buy
The PureGrit 7 expertly handled gravel, dirt, and grass surfaces well, commented a user. Another mentioned that the shoe excelled on sloped dirt paths with small rocks.
The shoe’s flexible construction allowed for a near-perfect fit, said a reviewer.
One wearer stated that the shoe offered plenty of arch support.
Many users found the PureGrit 7 to be a lightweight shoe.
The PureGrit 7 also showed its usefulness in walking and hiking, a buyer claimed.
The structure of the shoe proved to be easy on bunions, according to a customer.
The updated lugs on the outsole looked more durable than the previous version, said a runner.
2 reasons not to buy
One buyer claimed the sizing of the PureGrit 7 was not accurate.
A wearer mentioned that their toes were cramped because of the small toe box.
Bottom line
Despite some issues experienced by a few regarding fit and sizing, the Brooks PureGrit 7 has emerged as a high-performing trail running shoe, as it successfully met expectations. Users have positively remarked the shoe as comfortable, supportive, and reliable, with some even expressing a boost in confidence while running in the PureGrit 7."
Newton Distance S 8, Newton,81.0,,20.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 8oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 2mm , Women: 2mm,, Normal | Normal, Newton Distance S 9,"6 reasons to buy
Most users mentioned that the Newton Distance S 8 feels light and fast.
This road running shoe is very responsive, as mentioned in some user reviews.
Many runners lauded the durable design of the Distance S 8.
Several wearers were satisfied with how comfortable the shoe is, especially on long runs.
Majority of those who tried the shoe said that it felt amazing right out of the box.
Based on some reviews, the shoe fits well and it runs true to size.
1 reasons not to buy
The Distance S 8 is very expensive.
Bottom line
The Newton Distance S 8 is a lightweight running shoe designed for the road. The reintroduction of this model is very successful given that the majority of the users appreciate the shoe’s lightweight design, responsive cushioning, and comfortable foot wrap. Despite having an expensive price, most users considered the shoe a worthy investment. The re-release of this shoe is indeed a success for Newton Running."
Altra King MT, Altra,91.0,83.0,65.0,$140,$118 (save 16%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm, Feb 2017, Normal | Normal, Altra King MT 2,"8 reasons to buy
The Altra King MT was able to provide a comfortable and relaxed feeling while traversing the trails, a runner commented.
The outsole gripped the terrain surely and easily, many testers observed.
Consumers were happy that stones and other trail-debris didn’t get lodged between the outsole lugs.
A majority of purchasers wrote that this running shoe was able to easily shed off the mud from the upper and the outsole.
The protective features that are present—such as the Stone Guard—gained positive feedback for being very useful against debris and other aggressive surfaces.
There were good remarks about the Foot Lock Midfoot Strap, because it apparently secured the mid-foot without causing any hot spots.
The King MT felt light, according to some testers.
Runners generally didn’t experience any blistering while using this running shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
The heel felt a bit sloppy, a consumer reported; according to her, it didn’t prevent any accidental shoe removals.
A few runners complained of mud accumulation between the outsole lugs.
One of the purchasers noted that the mid-foot strap was too long that it caused the shoe to look a bit strange.
Bottom line
Many neutral runners were able to enjoy the Altra King MT and its functionality on the trails. They welcomed its trail-optimized outsole and its protective components. They were also generally happy with its performance. And though there were a number of concerns with the way that it was constructed, it still satisfied most of those who have tried it."
Salomon XA Wild, Salomon,83.0,,8.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 12.5oz , Women: 10.6oz, Men: 11mm , Women: 11mm,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Several people have welcomed the steadiness of the Salomon XA Wild.
The Quicklace™ system is appreciated by those who like to adjust the fit with effortless gusto.
Some users have noted that the traction capacity of the outsole is highly dependable, even on wet ground.
The upper unit doesn’t have hot spots and irritating fabrics, according to most testers.
Based on a handful of reviews, this Salomon running shoe has a durable construction.
2 reasons not to buy
A wobbly in-shoe experience has been felt by some consumers; adjusting the laces apparently doesn’t do much to help.
The presence of the excess laces in the lace-pocket has caused some runners to feel some bulkiness and discomfort.
Bottom line
People generally like the Salomon XA Wild. This product is welcomed because it offers reliable traction and comfortable in-shoe experience. The accessible fit-adjustment system is also highlighted. Conversely, a not-so-secure wrap and a disconcerting lace-pocket implementation have garnered criticism.
Fans of the Salomon brand and their trail options can enjoy the Salomon XA Wild."
Mizuno Wave Rider 21, Mizuno,93.0,85.0,829.0,$120,$95 (save 21%), Road, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.7oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm, Oct 2017," Normal | Normal, Wide", Mizuno Wave Rider 23,"9 reasons to buy
Plenty of users stated that the Mizuno Wave Rider 21 was sufficiently cushioned.
Several runners expressed that their feet felt supported during their runs.
A majority of testers said that the shoe was comfortable.
A good number of runners observed that the materials used in the manufacturing were of high quality.
The Mizuno Wave Rider 21 felt lightweight, which resulted in a relaxed and steady cadence, based on several reviews.
Many testers were glad that the midsole was very responsive.
The upper’s ventilation was commended by one reviewer. He said that his feet were kept dry and comfortable during runs.
One user narrated that his back pain went away while running with the shoe. He usually did not get a similar experience with other running shoes.
The outsole had a good grip, one runner said.
3 reasons not to buy
One runner felt that the new colors were more muted compared to the ones from the previous version.
Other users were not appreciative of the limited colorways
Some testers said that the toe box initially felt narrow. They had to break the shoe in to get a more comfortable fit.
Bottom line
The Mizuno Wave Rider 21 is a neutral running road shoe that has focused on upgrading its comfort and in-shoe feel, while still providing most of the benefits delivered by its predecessor. According to many of those who have tried it, it proved to be a dependable shoe for gym workouts, daily running, or marathon training."
Skechers GOrun Pure 2, Skechers,83.0,,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.3oz , Women: 7.1oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
The breathable upper unit of the Skechers GOrun Pure 2 is welcomed by those who have tested it.
The flexibility of the platform of this road running shoe has been lauded by consumers.
Some users are stating that the overall ride of this product is comfortable.
According to runners, the lightweight build of the GOrun Pure 2permits all-day use.
The surface grip afforded by the outsole unit is deemed highly dependable.
2 reasons not to buy
A few comments have highlighted the upper unit’s tendency to develop holes due to toe abrasion.
The midfoot section is a bit restrictive, based on a few comments.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of people towards the Skechers GOrun Pure 2 has been positive. This neutral running shoe is lauded because it encourages natural motion through its flexible platform and lightweight build. On the other hand, the not-so-durable and restrictive upper are criticized.
Fans of Skechers’ offerings for performance and speed are likely to enjoy the GOrun Pure 2."
Merrell Mix Master Move 2, Merrell,87.0,86.0,483.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.4oz , Women: 6.9oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Most runners appreciate the lightweight construction of the Mix Master Move 2
This shoe is very comfortable based on some reviews.
It features reflective details for increase visibility.
The Merrell Mix Master Move 2 has a protective toe cap for added protection while running on rough terrains.
The heel has an air cushion for shock absorption and added stability.
It comes with a removable foot bed for orthotics.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners found this shoe too narrow for them.
The new designed made some runners disappointed based on some reviews.
Too stiff for some testers.
Bottom line
The Merrell Mix Master Move 2 is a lightweight shoe that gained positive feedback from several users. They admire the shoe's protective and comfortable design. The shoe also offers a combination of cushioning and impressive ground feel. The Mix Master Move 2 is trail running shoe for tempo runs, daily training, and racing."
Nike LunarEclipse 4, Nike,87.0,88.0,41.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 8.7oz, Men: 11mm , Women: 11mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
The Engineered Mesh upper provides a breathable and well-supported coverage.
The Dynamic Flywire system was appreciated by many testers because it was able to keep the coverage feeling snug and secure.
Pronation support is afforded by the Dynamic Support system, which includes a wedge of firm foam in the rear area.
The Lunarlon mid-sole is able to cushion the foot well, while also giving a better and enabled lift to each toe-off.
Durable rubber covers critical areas of the external sole unit and shields them from wear and tear.
The platform of the Nike LunarEclipse 4 is flexible as it’s able to adapt to the movement and running style of the wearer.
1 reasons not to buy
Some runners felt a lump in the inner part of the shoe, which dug into their feet while they wore it.
Bottom line
The Nike LunarEclipse 4 is a running that’s great for many types of runners who want to get responsible cushioning, support and coverage. It’s a durable shoe that features high quality materials and components to keep the performance as comfortable and efficient as possible."
Adidas Edge Flex, Adidas,89.0,,64.0,$80,$30 (save 63%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"9 reasons to buy
The lightweight construction of Adidas Edge Flex helps increase the running speed, a couple of reviewers observed. 
People were happy that the price of this Adidas running shoe is affordable. 
A few purchasers welcomed the wide width of this shoe. 
Many users agreed that the Adidas Edge Flex running shoe is very comfortable to wear. 
This running companion offers excellent arch support, according to a satisfied user. 
Several buyers noted that the shoe has a flexible and durable outsole. 
A lot of wearers said that the Adidas Edge Flex shoe was good-looking and stylish.
The shoe provides good support and can securely hold the foot in place while running, a number of testers commented. 
The shoe is very responsive, some runners claimed. 
2 reasons not to buy
A user complained that the forefoot section of Adidas Edge Flex was a bit wide and uncomfortable. 
One buyer reported that every time he takes off the shoe the insole comes out and it makes him uncomfortable. 
Bottom line
The Adidas Edge Flex offered a lot when it comes to responsiveness. People were greatly happy with the shoe's lightweight construction and durability. Also, its outstanding performance made it a worthwhile choice for most runners looking for affordable, comfortable and flexible running shoes. Only a few testers complained about the shoe’s wide forefoot and uncomfortable insoles. 
 "
Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 31, Nike,93.0,86.0,380.0,$110,$90 (save 18%), Road, Neutral, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal, Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 37,"9 reasons to buy
The foot-hugging wrap of the Pegasus 31 gives a very comforting run in whatever distances, based on a lot of reviews.
The price continues to be bang for the buck.
Durability is yet again a strong asset of this shoe, according to some comments.
Several reviews mentioned the exceptional blend of cushioning and responsiveness.
It is lighter than the earlier model.
The breathable upper makes it a nice option in humid weather.
A large number of runners loved its cool looks.
Quite a number of runners appreciated its new fast feel while it can still pile on the miles.
14 different color options.
2 reasons not to buy
Some loyal fans of the Pegasus were disappointed about the firmness of the cushioning.
A few mentioned that the firmness lessens its appeal for long runs.
Bottom line
One of Nike’s flagship series gets a massive makeover in the 31st ride of the Pegasus. While the arch support continues to be very good, there is now a firmer ride to induce speed and quicker transitions from landing to take-off. At a very reasonable price, the shoe rides like a dream where comfort and responsiveness are mentioned."
Puma Axelion Block, Puma,85.0,,7.0,,, Road,,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
The knitted textile that is used for the upper unit of the Puma Axelion Block is considered breathable.
Some users have noted that the overreaching structure of the lacing system helps to secure the foot properly.
The price of this Puma running shoe is welcomed by those who gravitate towards affordable performance footwear.
Several comments have highlighted the outsole unit’s capacity to deliver a responsible grip over the surfaces.
The heel support given by the midsole unit is appreciated by testers.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people have noted that the forefoot section of the Puma Axelion Block is a bit restrictive.
There were complaints about the lacing system breaking apart quickly.
Bottom line
The Puma Axelion Block offers the runner the capacity to stay supported while also enjoying an in-shoe experience that is freeing. The breathable upper works with the classic heel-focused support system to accentuate all-around balance and unfettered performance. But the comments on the restrictive forefoot design and not-so-durable lacing system can serve as cautionary tales."
Asics Gel Excite 3, Asics,90.0,,1331.0,$70,$40 (save 100%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,," Normal | Normal, Wide", Asics Gel Excite 6 Twist,"5 reasons to buy
The comfort continues in the 3rd iteration of the Asics Excite because of the plush padding and soft inner lining.
It is very affordable.
The overlays do a very good job of keeping the foot secure through every stride.
Several runners liked the vertical and horizontal flex grooves for superb flexibility despite the substantial cushioning.
The wide and open mesh of the Asics Gel Excite creates maximum breathability.
2 reasons not to buy
There were many who wanted better durability in this shoe.
A few runners developed hot spots because of the stitching.
Bottom line
The Gel Excite 3 remains to be a serviceable option for low-mileage runs as it has excellent cushioning, great flexibility, and moderate arch support. Runners who are looking for a budget-friendly trainer that works reliably well should give this neutral running shoe a good look."
Under Armour Highlight Delta 2, Under Armour,79.0,,49.0,$120,$39 (save 100%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm, Aug 2017, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Many users commended the minimal weight of the Under Armour Highlight Delta 2.
One reviewer thought the upper gave a customized
The collar was still very comfortable despite its high ankle cut, said a runner.
The shoe performed great on casual runs and brisk walks, a customer stated.
The Threadborne ankle support felt like a sock, according to a tester.
A purchaser was amazed at the outsole traction.
4 reasons not to buy
The heel cup was ineffective at keeping the foot from sliding, a user complained.
Many runners did not like that the Highlight Delta 2 ran big, with some saying it was carelessly made.
The midsole felt thinner and was not as bouncy compared to the previous version, several reviewers commented.
The upper looked flimsy and delicate, a buyer wrote.
Bottom line
Although the Under Armour Highlight Delta 2 claims to be a non-bulky shoe, many users thought otherwise as they expressed disappointment with the shoe’s larger-than-actual sizing and the unnecessary space resulting from it. Some have also pointed out how it was a pale comparison to its predecessor. The redeeming quality of the shoe was its impressive comfort, but maybe it was not enough for consumers to think the Highlight Delta 2 is an excellent running shoe."
Salomon Sense Mantra 3,,85.0,79.0,96.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Most runners liked the lightweight construction of the Sense Mantra 3.
Many were impressed by the shoe’s quick lacing system.
It has better cushioning as compared to the older version, based on some reviews.
This shoe has a roomy toe box, which some runners preferred.
Available in many color choices.
2 reasons not to buy
A moderately high priced shoe.
The outsole unit of this shoe was not optimized for wet surfaces, said some reviews.
Bottom line
The Sense Mantra 3 from Salomon is a comfortable trail running shoe that offers enough cushioning and seamless coverage. The shoe is expensive but most users admired its design and performance. It is best for short and long distance trail runs, though it may not be ideal for wet or muddy surfaces."
New Balance 770 v5, New Balance,85.0,,11.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The 770 v5 is the best training shoe for stability runners, declared some testers.
It is a lightweight shoe and it offers great breathability.
It is a shoe that functions well for gym work outs, according to reviewers.
The New Balance 770 v5 has an improved outsole with great traction on gravel and even terrains, as noted by a couple of testers.
A right balance between comfort and support is noticeable in this shoe, noted several users.
It is made of high quality materials for enhanced durability.
It is an affordable training shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
The support is lacking based on a small number of comments.
The fit runs small is a mutual complaint by some testers.
Bottom line
The New Balance 770 v5 is a training shoe designed for stability runners who need ample comfort, support, and protection. It can be used for running, work outs, and gym trainings, making it an ideal option for active individuals. It is a wise investment to spend on."
Altra Torin 2.0, Altra,85.0,80.0,689.0,$125,$95 (save 98%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9.1oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,, Normal | Normal, Altra Torin 4,"6 reasons to buy
The average weight of the Torin 2.0 makes it adequate for most runners who don’t want to be weighed down by heavy shoes.
The majority of the runners loved the improved and redesigned upper unit, which offers breathable and lightweight coverage.
This shoe features a 6mm Contour Footbed for additional underfoot cushioning.
The responsive nature of the FootPod Outsole was applauded by many runners.
The Torin 2.0 offers the Inner Flex groove system for added flexibility and increased performance.
The A-Bound and Dual Layer EVA maintain a durable and efficient underfoot platform.
4 reasons not to buy
Some complained that the flat laces of this running shoe easily become untied.
The color options were not impressive to reviewers.
Most of the testers found the toe box a bit too wide and uncomfortable.
Most reviews mentioned that the Torin 2.0 is not great for those with bunions.
Bottom line
The Altra Torin 2.0 is a neutral, zero-drop running shoe that offers enhanced durability, flexibility and comfort. Runners were impressed by the shoe because they experience supreme comfort while running and doing your regular fitness training. This shoe is a good option for those who are looking for a lightweight road running partner."
Salomon S-Lab XA Alpine, Salomon,85.0,84.0,23.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 12.3oz , Women: 12.3oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm, Aug 2016, Normal | Normal, Salomon S-Lab XA Alpine 2,"9 reasons to buy
Many runners applauded the water-repellent coating of the shoe that works efficiently.
The shoe remains breathable and flexible as noted in some reviews.
The Salomon S-Lab XA Alpine has a reliable cushioning on the uphill and downhill runs.
The Contagrip traction provides reliable grip on varied terrain, even on wet surfaces.
A significant number of runners were impressed by the shoe’s quick lacing system that allows easy-on and easy-off in one pull.
The shoe is durable as noted in some reviews.
Most of those who have tested this running shoe have considered it to be true-to-size.
The upper unit was able to keep the foot warm in colder conditions, a reviewer commented.
According to consumers, this shoe looked visually endearing.
4 reasons not to buy
Many runners were put off by the expensive price of the S-Lab XA Alpine.
Some runners found the S-Lab XA Alpine heavy.
It felt too narrow for some of those who have tested it.
Some consumers weren’t able to acclimate well to the underfoot platform, stating that it was too hard and unwieldy for them.
Bottom line
The Salomon S-Lab XA Alpine is a mountain running shoe. It has been optimized to provide exceptional protection and performance on high-altitude topography. Durable and efficient materials work together in order to make this model a force to be reckoned with."
Asics HyperGel Yu, Asics,90.0,95.0,20.0,$100,$50 (save 50%), Road, Neutral, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
People stated that the color schemes of the Asics HyperGel Yu were visually striking.
The underfoot experience that this road running shoe provided was comfortable and responsive, according to a tester.
The upper unit of this product offered a secure yet breathable coverage, some runners commented.
A consumer was happy that the silhouette of this model didn’t make the foot look humongous.
Based on a handful of reviews, the flexibility of the shoe reliably accommodated the natural movements of the foot.
1 reasons not to buy
A few reviewers lamented this shoe’s lack of lateral steadiness; he wasn’t able to enjoy it during gym exercise sessions involving sideward movements.
Bottom line
The majority of those who have tried the HyperGel Yu were happy with what it had to provide. This addition to the roster of Asics running shoes has been hailed as a comfortable and visually appealing product that welcomed the foot and its inherent capacity to push forward. The components were also praised, with the midsole and upper gaining particular recognition for being highly effective. On the other hand, lateral stability was an aspect that was missed.
The Asics HyperGel Yu was made to work well with neutral pronators and urban adventurers who love taking to the roads."
Nike Air VaporMax Flyknit Moc, Nike,91.0,,152.0,,, Road, Neutral,,, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal, Nike Air VaporMax Flyknit Moc 2,"7 reasons to buy
A lot of testers admired the cool-looking design of the shoe.
Some purchasers mentioned that the shoe was comfortable.
According to those who have bought it, the Nike Air VaporMax Flyknit Moc has excellent cushioning.
The majority of the wearers noted that the shoe was lightweight in structure.
The Nike Air VaporMax Flyknit Moc was stylish, according to many buyers.
Users did not feel worried about the laces coming untied while running, based on observations.
A good number of reviewers agreed that the shoe was supportive.
2 reasons not to buy
One of the testers said that the heel area of the Nike Air VaporMax Flyknit Moc was poorly designed.
A lot of purchasers said that the shoe was expensive.
Bottom line
The Nike Air VaporMax Flyknit Moc has made many users satisfied because of its great-looking design and cushioning. Aside from its design, the shoe also delivers a comfortable running experience. While other runners have issues with its heel area, others still recommend the shoe because of the support it offered. Overall, the Nike Air VaporMax Flyknit Moc is an excellent option for runners who are looking for a comfortable yet lightweight and supportive running shoe."
Asics Gel Flux 2,,91.0,,578.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Flux 5,"6 reasons to buy
The upper unit of the Asics Gel Flux 2 uses a mesh material that offers breathable support for comfort.
Stitched-on synthetic overlays make the cover system snug and secure.
The color schemes of this shoe are visually appealing.
The underfoot cushioning system was appreciated by many because it didn’t break down easily or lose efficacy after a few uses.
This shoe has an affordable price, which agreed with many testers.
The outsole offers shielding, traction, and even a bit more cushioning through the use of two rubber compounds.
1 reasons not to buy
Some runners complained that the rubber outsole started to peel off on them after a few months of use.
Bottom line
An exceptional running experience is what the Asics Gel Flux 2 is able to give to the wearer. Employing reliable cushioning, some supportive mechanics in the mid-foot, a breathable cover system, as well as a durable outsole, this neutral running shoe is going to do well for runners who have neutral and under-pronated foot motions."
Mizuno Wave Inspire 11, Mizuno,91.0,86.0,817.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 8.6oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,, Normal | Normal, Mizuno Wave Inspire 16,"6 reasons to buy
A large number of appreciative runners loved the super comfortable feel of the Inspire 11.
Durability is a very nice asset of this shoe, based on some reviews.
The blend of cushioning and support is unbelievable, according to most users.
A very plush and soft Ortholite sockliner adds to fit and comfort.
It runs light and relatively flexible despite the cushioning and support.
It is not clunky or boxy like the prior model, noted a handful.
3 reasons not to buy
Some needed a break-in time to get the right kind of performance from the shoe.
The price is a bit expensive for several runners.
The forefoot is a bit tight for a few users.
Bottom line
The Wave Inspire 11 maintains the tradition of providing stability for training and a nice shift from landing to take-off. Additionally, it remains to be very light for a cushioned and stable shoe, which makes it a versatile option for different distances at different speeds. A solid choice for entry level and dedicated runners."
Hoka One One Huaka, Hoka One One,90.0,84.0,96.0,$150,$130 (save 28%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9.3oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 2mm , Women: 2mm,, Normal | Normal, Hoka One One Huaka 2,"5 reasons to buy
The No Sew Construction effectively provides a comfortable wearing experience for runners, even when not using socks.
Many applauded the Hoka Race Lace System, which essentially makes adjusting the fit possible with only a single pull of the laces.
Impact protection is delivered by the Rmat mid-\sole material.
The Early Meta-Rocker Geometry encourages better running performance through a semi-rocker shape of the sole unit.
This shoe has a roomy toe box.
4 reasons not to buy
This running shoe has a moderately expensive price.
Some runners mentioned that the outsole gripping lugs wore out quicker than expected.
The forefoot area was a bit narrow for some runners.
Based on some comments, the RMAT material in the outsole was slippery when used in muddy surfaces.
Bottom line
The Huaka from Hoka One One gained mixed reviews from its users. But despite the negative comments, the shoe has proven to be a worthy investment. The Huaka is a lightweight road running, neutral shoe that provides the runner with enough cushioning while maintaining a supportive and responsive nature. This shoe can also function well on soft off-road tracks."
Asics Comutora, Asics,89.0,,122.0,$70,$38 (save 46%), Road, Neutral, Men: 7.3oz , Women: 6.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Feb 2018, Normal | Normal,,"9 reasons to buy
Most of the wearers praised the lightweight construction of the Asics Comutora.
The Comutora is very affordable, said some happy customers.
A few purchasers admired the soft, stretchy fabric in the shoe’s upper.
A significant number of users claimed that the shoe is very comfortable.
Several reviews mentioned that the shoe is durable.
Many wearers confirmed that the shoe is true-to-size.
Some medium-footed runners took note of the impressive fit of the Asics Comutora.
A few users with plantar fasciitis mentioned that the Asics Comutora provided them enough support, they said the shoe is very comfortable.
The shoe has a good design perfect for casual days, said a few comments.
1 reasons not to buy
A few wearers mentioned that the forefoot of the Comutora has a narrow fit.
Bottom line
The Asics Comutora has been a successful release. The shoe provided runners with a good balance of cushioning, comfort, breathability, durability, and impressive design. A little to no problem has been encountered about fit. Overall, the shoe is a good option for runners who are looking for an affordable yet reliable running partner."
Mizuno Wave Paradox 2, Mizuno,88.0,80.0,207.0,$135,$95 (save 30%), Road, Stability, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,, Normal | Normal, Mizuno Wave Paradox 5,"6 reasons to buy
The PU Printed Overlays offer a more responsible wrap in the heel and mid foot sections.
Most reviewers welcomed the Ortholite technology in the sock liner as it offers anti-microbial properties to keep the interior environment healthy.
The Mizuno Wave runs along the heel to the mid foot area of the sole unit, keeping a bouncy and well-supported ride.
The Extended Wave Plate found in the mid-foot area provides torsional rigidity for a more controlled step.
The U4ic is lightweight mid-sole unit that has shock absorption mechanics, as well as durability and resilience.
Runners generally appreciated the X10 outsole, which is a durable material that offers sure traction.
5 reasons not to buy
The 2nd version of the Wave Paradox has a slightly expensive price.
The men’s version has a moderately heavy weight.
  Some runners felt that this shoe became very warm, thus making it uncomfortable for longer races.
A few noted that it wasn’t as responsive because of the heightened stiffness and thicker mid-sole.
Bottom line
The Wave Paradox 2 from Mizuno is a great-looking running shoe that has a lot of features for runners who need added support and protection. The multiple color choices make it appealing, and the efficient components enable it to function well for daily runs."
Altra Lone Peak 3.0 NeoShell Mid, Altra,88.0,83.0,191.0,$160,$81 (save 91%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 13.3oz , Women: 10oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
A number of users applauded the Polartec NeoShell lining that effectively keeps the foot dry while running on wet condition.
Many testers mentioned that the Lone Peak 3.0 NeoShell Mid has an excellent grip.
Some took note of the comfortable fit and impressive cushioning of the shoe.
The outsole of the Lone Peak 3.0 NeoShell Mid is durable, as noted in some reviews.
The TrailClaw outsole delivers an exceptional traction on varied surfaces.
Several Altra fans liked the roomy toe box of the Lone Peak 3.0 NeoShell Mid.
4 reasons not to buy
Few users noticed that the upper was not breathable due to the abrasion-resistant waterproof mesh.
The men’s version is quite heavy.
One runner disliked the thick tongue and over-padded collar.
It is expensive.
Bottom line
The Altra Lone Peak 3.0 NeoShell Mid is a trail running shoe designed for extreme weather conditions. It provides a perfect blend of traction, comfort, support and stability. Though this mid-cut running shoe is considered by some as expensive and heavy, it will not disappoint while running both uphill and downhill."
Adidas Kanadia 7 GTX, Adidas,88.0,,605.0,$120,$106 (save 12%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 12.7oz , Women: 11.3oz, Men: 11mm , Women: 11mm,, Normal | Normal,,"8 reasons to buy
The Kanadia 7 GTX is significantly lighter than other trail shoes with GTX membrane.
A mud-shedding outsole make the Adidas Kanadia 7 GTX a solid choice when going for runs on muddy trails.
A few runners have experienced using this for obstacle racing to great effect.
Most of the reviewers liked the plush comfort of the Kanadia 7 GTX.
The cushioning, especially the heel, gets several good points from reviews.
Goretex works as intended.
It is fairly breathable despite the water proofing feature.
A heel loop is present for convenience.
4 reasons not to buy
Several runners craved for better flexibility in the Adidas Kanadia 7 GTX.
A small number of users were upset by the lack of durability.
It is a bit expensive.
Runs a little smaller than standard sizing.
Bottom line
The Adidas Kanadia 7 GTX has the feel and design of a traditional trail running shoe with waterproofing features except in its weight. It has a relatively high stack height and heel offset while arch support is good enough for longer runs on uneven surface. The shoe is tailor-made for heavy heel strikers who like to continue their running in wet and challenging trail conditions."
Brooks Aduro 3,,88.0,,39.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Brooks Aduro 4,"6 reasons to buy
Brooks incorporates their proprietary HPR Plus rubber compound for enhanced outsole durability.
Most runners were quite surprised by the Aduro 3’s adequate underfoot cushioning.
Durability is a valued asset in this shoe, according to a large number of runners.
Flexibility is another nice bonus to a really well-cushioned shoe as noticed by a few testers.
The open mesh upper offers breathability and comfort even, especially when running in warmer weather.
The 3 different color combinations make it appealing.
3 reasons not to buy
The 3rd version of the Aduro is a slightly expensive entry-level shoe.
Some runners were not happy that the Brooks Aduro 3 needs a break-in period.
Others noted that it lacked more robust stability mechanics, which are able to provide a more controlled and balanced gait for those who need it.
Bottom line
Patterned and designed after one of Brooks’ flagship line of shoes, the Aduro 3 steps up to the plate when performance and durability are mentioned. It has really good arch support for a neutral shoe while the cushioning is sufficiently plush and comfortable.  Similar to another neutral running shoe from Brooks, the Aduro 3 is known to be reliable and comfortable running shoes.  If not for the slightly expensive price tag, this running shoe could easily be one of the best options for runners of all levels."
Saucony Lancer 2, Saucony,88.0,,94.0,$80,$49 (save 51%), Road, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
A breathable mesh upper keeps the foot cool and dry.
Synthetic overlays keep the foot feeling snug and secure as these are connected directly to the lacing system.
The PROGRID system offers support for the medial side of the arch while also maintaining adequate levels of cushioning as observed by many runners.
The aesthetic choices for the Lancer 2 are great because this model comes in many different color schemes.
Many testers noted the reliable durability of this shoe.
The wide design of the shoe accommodates those with wider feet.
It doesn’t have a very expensive price.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners who tried it felt that it needed more cushioning to provide more support for their feet.
A few felt that it was a bit too stiff.
Bottom line
The Saucony Lancer 2 is a daily running shoe for those who need some underfoot cradling and arch support. The shoe has captured the attention of many a runner because of its appealing design, its comfortable upper and reliable performance. Though a few found some issues with flexibility and support, the Lancer 2 is still considered by many as a reliable road partner."
Adidas Run Lux Clima, Adidas,88.0,,258.0,$100,$36 (save 64%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
According to those who have tried it, the Adidas Run Lux Clima was breathable.
The good color combination made the shoe visually-appealing, according to reviewers.
One of the purchasers said that Adidas Run Lux Clima fit perfectly on her feet.
According to one of the buyers, the shoe has a spacious toe box.
A runner mentioned that the footwear was comfortable.
Some testers admired the lightweight structure of the shoe.
Several testers mentioned that it was stylish.
2 reasons not to buy
Based on some reviews, the shoe seems to be a little loose in the heel area when compared to other models.
The Adidas Run Lux Clima was not well-cushioned, according to a reviewer. She felt a little pain when running on a treadmill.
Bottom line
Many of the consumers agreed that the Adidas Run Lux Clima is a comfortable footwear. They lauded its lightweight structure and breathability. Some of them have issues with price and cushioning, but others still recommend the running shoe because of its amazing fit. Overall, customers are satisfied and happy with its fantastic design and construction."
Hoka One One Speed Instinct 2, Hoka One One,88.0,89.0,35.0,,," Trail, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 3mm , Women: 3mm, Jul 2017, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
The Hoka One One Speed Instinct 2 lasted a long time, based on the feedback of many consumers.
A number of testers commented that the cushioning system generally made them very comfortable.
Those with Achilles tendonitis wrote that the underfoot platform properly kept pain at bay.
The wide toe-box agreed well with most runners because it allowed their toes to play naturally during their runs.
Some purchasers noted that this running shoe had a suitably lightweight nature.
There were people who welcomed the gripping capability of the outsole.
2 reasons not to buy
According to a reviewer, the heel cup was a bit low, so there was a tendency for heel slippage.
A tester reported that the stretchy upper fabrics caused his foot to roll unsteadily. He would’ve liked a more robust and supportive upper construction to hold the foot well.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Speed Instinct 2 appealed to a lot of consumers. Most of them welcomed its comfortable cushioning system and the reliable durability. They also thought that most of its components were effective. But there were a number of users who didn’t like the way that it was constructed. They mentioned some flaws in the design that kept them from performing well on the trails."
Hoka One One Hupana EM, Hoka One One,77.0,,6.0,$115,$80 (save 43%), Road, Neutral, Men: 7.9oz , Women: 6.5oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
The lightweight structure of the Hoka One One Hupana EM is welcomed by most consumers.
Some testers believe that this running shoe is a viable choice for any activity, even casual strolls.
The overall design of this product is appreciated by those who welcome appealing shoe-aesthetics.
The breathability given by the upper unit is welcomed by most users.
Based on more than a handful of reviews, the underfoot cushioning unit is flexible and responsive.
The underfoot experience is deemed highly supportive as it apparently averted tendon strain and fatigue.
2 reasons not to buy
Several people are unhappy because the outer part of the sole does not have the durability of a traditional rubber layer.
A few consumers have noted that the forefoot section of this shoe is a bit restrictive.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Hupana EM aims to become the ideal partner for any activity or situation. The lightweight and uncluttered construction of this model can be used for any occasion. A breathable upper and a reactive underfoot cushioning unit ensure agreeable performances and confident steps on the urban landscape."
Altra Superior 3.5, Altra,89.0,84.0,323.0,$110,$75 (save 32%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.6oz , Women: 8.2oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm, Dec 2017, Normal | Normal, Altra Superior 4.0,"8 reasons to buy
The Altra Superior 3.5 gave a precise fit, various customers stated.
Many users were pleased with the durability of the outsole.
A lot of purchasers admired the traction on technical terrain.
Various revieweres have directed their positive comments on the versatility of the tread pattern.
Numerous runners commended the roomy toe box.
Several wearers responded positively to the shoe’s zero-drop silhouette.
The midsole supplied plenty of cushioning, a customer stated.
The shoe was comfortable even throughout all-day wear, as mentioned by a reviewer. Other people echoed on this opinion by saying the Superior 3.5 delivered comfort right out of the box.
1 reasons not to buy
The StoneGuard was quite bulky and cumbersome, according to some wearers. Others removed it during their runs, while some thought its thickness and weight was distracting.
Bottom line
In summary, the Altra Superior 3.5 has proven itself to be a solid trail running shoe. According to various users, it has ticked all the boxes on what an ideal trail runner should have, as they cited praises about the fit, durability, and other structural factors. For a series that is doing quite well, Altra Superior has nailed it once again with version 3.5."
Salomon XT Wings 3, Salomon,93.0,88.0,71.0,,, Trail, Stability, Men: 12.3oz , Women: 10.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"4 reasons to buy
Without a doubt, the Salomon XT Wings 3 provides great comfort that lets runners endure long-distance runs, according to a handful of testers.
The XT Wings 3 features the Ortholite sock liner that reduces the odor and bacteria inside the shoe.
This trail shoe includes the Contagrip rubber found on the outsole, which improves its traction useful especially on wet surfaces.
Most runners were impressed with the shoe's breathable mesh upper.
2 reasons not to buy
A bit pricey.
A couple of runners say that this Salomon shoe has a slightly firmer feel underfoot.
Bottom line
Great for trail and mountain running, the Salomon XT Wings 3 is a stability running shoe that cannot be used for speed work. Runners who love any kind of outdoor activities will enjoy running a lot more with enough protection and comfort."
Adidas Questar Boost,,93.0,88.0,341.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Many testers appreciated its versatility as a multi-purpose shoe.
The cushioned insole adds more to the already comfortable mid-sole unit.
The Torsion System is able to provide support to the mid-foot area.
Many runners appreciated its casual look, which made it very appealing.
This shoe is equipped with energy-returning boost foam, which is efficient for a wide range of routines.
The upper offers flexible and breathable coverage as noted by some users.
The Questar Boost is affordable.
3 reasons not to buy
Some testers complained that the forefoot area was a bit narrow.
Others noticed the upper getting separated from the sole unit after a few months’ use.
A few runners didn’t welcome the plastic look of the upper.
Bottom line
The Adidas Questar Boost is a road running shoe with boost technology for energy-return and for comfort. In technical details, this shoe is equipped with great shoe technologies for better performance. It is a solid shoe, especially to neutral pronators who are looking for a great running companion, with just the right amount of cushioning and support. At its price, it is a good investment."
Altra Olympus 3.0, Altra,87.0,86.0,203.0,$150,$99 (save 34%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm, May 2018, Normal | Normal, Altra Olympus 3.5,"6 reasons to buy
The Altra Olympus 3.0 provided a pleasant ride, even after extended periods of wear, as attested by several users.
The midsole offered plenty of plush cushioning, according to a reviewer. Meanwhile, many others were contented with the arch support delivered by the Olympus 3.0.
One commenter wrote that the outsole was surprisingly flexible. Another user mentioned it had excellent grip on wet surfaces.
A number of wearers agreed that the upper was lightweight and comfortable. Meanwhile, others praised it for its quick-drying and breathable qualities.
A satisfied user claimed the Olympus 3.0 took away their plantar fasciitis.
Some runners admired the roomy toe box of the shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
The toe flap started to separate from the shoe just after the first wear, a buyer observed.
A wearer experienced the rearfoot of their left shoe squeaking, which made them uncomfortable.
The lacing eyelets have started to fray within only 200 miles of usage, said a reviewer.
Bottom line
With the shoe’s comfortable fit and above-average trail performance, the Altra Olympus 3.0 has obtained a winning spot to many consumers. The shoe’s useful features made it a worthy investment for its price tag, but others were not too keen, after their issues with durability. Overall, the Altra Olympus 3.0 was successful in proving itself to be an outstanding trail-running shoe."
Reebok Sole Fury TS, Reebok,87.0,90.0,41.0,$80,$32 (save 60%), Road, Neutral, Men: 6.6oz , Women: 6.6oz,,, Jul 2019, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
Many people consider the Reebok Sole Fury TS to be a supportive and comfortable shoe to wear for their daily activities. 
This Reebok running shoe has a lightweight structure that makes it perfect for running and training sessions, according to several reviewers.  
The stretchable material at the front of Reebok Sole Fury TS makes it very easy to move around, said a user.
A lot of consumers admire the overall design of this running shoe.
The midsole of the Reebok Sole Fury TS was so soft yet stable, a runner stated. 
Some buyers have noted that, in terms of durability, this running companion is worth their money. 
Several purchasers commented that the shoe offers good amount of cushioning. 
2 reasons not to buy
A user reported that toe box of Reebok Sole Fury TS is a bit tilted and it made the shoe uncomfortable. 
A few buyers have complained that the color of the shoe that they received didn’t match the visual representation in the web pages. 
Bottom line
Many consumers agreed that the Reebok Sole Fury TS was supportive and comfortable to wear. Although a lot of runners were impressed with the shoe’s lightweight structure, durable outsole, and good cushioning system, there were some testers who were disappointed with the actual color and tilted toe box of the shoe. Reebok Sole Fury TS is an average running shoe, it is not perfect but worth the investment."
New Balance Vazee Summit,,85.0,86.0,15.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.3oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, New Balance Vazee Summit v2,"6 reasons to buy
The Vazee Summit is a very comfortable shoe to run in, according to most reviews.
It is definitely worth its affordable price tag.
The shoe has decent flexibility and optimal protection, based on some comments.
It is a lightweight trainer that can take on various distances.
The mesh upper offers plenty of breathability with enough stopping power to prevent debris from getting in.
An outsole with multi-directional lugs and sticky rubber compound afford superior traction on a multitude of outdoor surfaces.
4 reasons not to buy
A few runners were disappointed with the upper durability.
Some reservations were given towards the 10mm offset, which some runners consider as too much for a lightweight trainer.
The thin and flat insole moved around when used for really long runs.
The lugs shake off mud naturally, observed a significant number of runners.
Bottom line
New Balance introduces the new Vazee Summit as a do-it-all lightweight trainer that can handle all almost all types of distances and in different speeds. It has a nice mix of soft, but responsive cushioning through the RevLite midsole. Runners who love to do ultra-long runs will feel the sufficient arch support from this neutral trainer."
New Balance Fresh Foam Cruz Retro Hoodie, New Balance,87.0,,718.0,$70,$55 (save 39%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8.7oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,," Normal | Narrow, Normal",,"7 reasons to buy
Many people appreciated the relaxed hug of the New Balance Fresh Foam Cruz Retro Hoodie’s upper unit.
The color schemes of this road shoe were much welcomed.
Several testers felt that the affordable price made it a more approachable option.
The underfoot cushioning offered by the midsole was considered to be comfortable.
Some purchasers liked the lightweight nature of the materials.
The upper unit rubbed uncomfortably against the skin of several testers; they didn’t recommend wearing this shoe without socks.
Most of those who have tested this model claimed that it was better to get one that’s half-a-size bigger to accommodate a more relaxed in-shoe experience.
2 reasons not to buy
The shoe has worn out easily, according to some users.
Some buyers thought the toe box was too narrow.
Bottom line
The New Balance Fresh Foam Cruz Retro Hoodie was welcomed by most of those who have tested it. Neutral runners liked its lightweight build, the wallet-friendly price, the agreeable midsole, and the eye-catching design. On the other hand, there were complaints about the shoe's longevity and the toe box width. Overall, this road shoe was able to garner heaps of praise from those who liked its looks and its performance."
Skechers GOmeb Speed Elite,,78.0,80.0,8.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The seamless GOknit upper of the GOmeb Speed Elite hugs the foot in comfort.
It is very light at only 6.9 oz for a men’s size 9.
The cushioning is notably responsive, based on the observations of more than a few runners.
Most of the reviewers really loved the head-turning looks of the Skechers Speed Elite.
Reflective details make it a nice option for low-visibility running.
A handful of runners appreciated the pretty stable and supportive ride from a shoe with minimalist features.
Owning one is like owning a piece of history as this is the shoe Meb Keflezighi wore to win the Boston and New York marathons while grabbing a silver medal during the Rio de Janeiro Olympics.
3 reasons not to buy
It is a very expensive shoe.
The GOmeb Speed Elite is only in limited edition.
It is a bit narrow for some runners.
Bottom line
The Skechers GOmeb Speed Elite is a new twist in the lightweight racer that is specifically released to commemorate the 2016 Olympics. It works very well as a transition shoe for those who are looking towards more minimalist shoes. The shoe provides a superior foot-hugging wrap that covers the foot in support and comfort. Runners who are looking for a stylish and responsive shoe should make a beeline as this is only in limited edition."
On Cloud Hi, On,77.0,,9.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.5oz , Women: 11oz, Men: 2mm , Women: 2mm,, Normal | Normal,,"8 reasons to buy
According to many runners, the On Cloud Hi is comfortable to wear. 
Several wearers appreciate the shoe’s excellent cushioning. 
It offers a stable ride, numerous buyers claim. 
The shoe is easy to wear, said some users. 
A lot of purchasers commented that it is suitable for everyday wear. 
Many reviewers noted that it can keep the foot dry and warm for an extended period. 
People loved the stylish design of the shoe.
A user mentioned that it is also suited for winter runs.
2 reasons not to buy
The On Cloud Hi is a bit narrow, according to a few wearers. 
It is not breathable, many people observe. 
Bottom line
Created for everyday active use, the On Cloud Hi is designed to support runners from regular runs to slightly off-road scenarios. It is a new breed of On running shoe that is crafted with advanced technologies to meet the high standards of runners and athletes. This neutral running shoe aims to provide long-lasting comfort and protection in urban environments. "
Saucony Breakthru 3, Saucony,89.0,90.0,476.0,$100,$47 (save 53%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8.7oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Jan 2017, Normal | Normal, Saucony Breakthru 4,"6 reasons to buy
Some testers commented that the cushioning was great for a fast running shoe.
A lot of runners mentioned that the shoe was very breathable and versatile.
Some reviewers said that the shoe provided a good amount of underfoot support.
Few buyers mentioned that the Saucony Breakthru 3 offered a responsive ride.
A lot of reviewers agreed that the shoe was a great option for neutral pronators.
A good number of runners noted that the shoe was comfortable and lightweight.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners mentioned that the heel-to-toe transition of the shoe felt a little bit rough and uncomfortable.
One of the testers commented that the midsole lacked flexibility.
According to some reviewers, this shoe’s platform was not able to not provide enough cushioning.
Bottom line
A good number of testers agreed that the Saucony Breakthru 3 is a comfortable and lightweight running shoe. They commented that it proved agreeable for runners who do not excessively pronate. Although some testers mentioned that it apparently lacked a quality cushioning, others still recommended the Saucony Breakthru 3 because of its breathability and versatility on the roads."
Reebok Zig Pulse, Reebok,93.0,87.0,260.0,$90,$75 (save 17%), Road,,,,,,, Normal | Normal, Reebok Zig Pulse 3,"8 reasons to buy
The Reebok Zig Pulse was extremely comfortable, several users reported.
The upper enabled the foot to stay cool even during warm days, a tester observed.
The shoe had a snug fit and was effective in keeping the foot secure, wrote a buyer.
One commenter said the midsole worked well in absorbing impact.
A vast improvement from first generation Zig shoes, a wearer remarked.
Many users thought that the Zig Pulse was an affordable shoe.
The shock-absorbing property helped reduce fatigue, a reviewer stated.
The shoe was lightweight and aided running for longer miles, some users said.
4 reasons not to buy
Some users felt that the Reebok Zig Pulse was too narrow.
The ankle collar was too low and offered very little support, according to a wearer.
A buyer complained that the upper material was difficult to clean.
A handful of customers mentioned that the shoe broke quickly.
Bottom line
The Reebok Zig Pulse garnered a lot of positive reviews from consumers, which were mostly about the features and the performance. Criticisms, on the other hand, were few, but quite significant, as these were consistently towards the shoe’s quality. In conclusion, the Zig Pulse was an okay running shoe, but maybe average at best."
Adidas Alphabounce Parley, Adidas,93.0,,217.0,$110,$74 (save 33%), Road, Neutral, Men: 12.3oz , Women: 10.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Apr 2018, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Many people liked the mesh upper of the Adidas Alphabounce Parley, which was made using recycled plastic.
The aesthetics of this running shoe were lauded for being eye-catching.
‘Comfortable’ was a word that was frequently used to describe consumers’ experiences with this product.
Appreciation was given to the underfoot cushioning system for being dutifully responsive.
The price for a pair of Alphabounce Parley shoes was mostly deemed to be affordable.
The sizing scheme agreed with the expectations of many runners.
1 reasons not to buy
A couple of users mentioned that the shoe is too bulky for a running shoe.
Bottom line
The Adidas Alphabounce Parley received acclaim from runners and other shoe enthusiasts. This road shoe was welcomed because of its appealing design, comfortable construction, and environment-friendly materials. It’s perceived to be an agreeable choice for neutral pronators who want to take to the roads."
Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 35 Turbo, Nike,87.0,86.0,162.0,$180,$119 (save 34%)," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 8.5oz , Women: 6.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 10mm, Aug 2018, Normal | Normal, Nike Zoom Pegasus Turbo 2,"6 reasons to buy
The majority of the consumers said that the Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 35 Turbo is comfortable.
A lot of users mentioned that the shoe is lightweight.
A good number of testers commented that the running footwear has excellent cushioning.
Based on the reviews, the running shoe is fast.
It is a nice-looking shoe according to those who have bought it.
The shoe is best suited for easy and long runs as well as walking and marathon training.
2 reasons not to buy
The Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 35 Turbo lacks heel support, as noted by some users.
Several buyers commented that the running shoe is not durable. The sole started to wear off after several uses only.
Bottom line
  The majority of the consumers welcomed the Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 35 Turbo with so much joy and pride. They agreed that the shoe is suitable for both indoor and outdoor running and walking activities. They were contented with this running shoe's lightweight structure and excellent cushioning. Most of the testers were made happy, satisfied with the combination of all the materials and technologies employed to the outsole, midsole, and upper area of the shoe. It's fantastic construction and performance prove that this shoe is a successful release from Nike."
New Balance 2040 v3, New Balance,82.0,,62.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 14.9oz , Women: 14.9oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Many liked the luxurious look and design of the New Balance 2040 v3.
It is very durable as mentioned in some reviews.
The 2040 v3 features the Horween nubuck leather upper with plush cushioning.
Despite being too heavy, some mentioned that this shoe is still comfortable to wear.
The shoe offers right amount of foot protection, a few users mentioned.
2 reasons not to buy
This shoe is very expensive.
It is very heavy to most runners.
Bottom line
The New Balance 2040 v3 features the state of the art American-made Horween nubuck leather. It is very heavy and expensive, but it does not disappoint runners because of its luxurious look, comfortable fit, reliable arch support, and top-quality construction. This New Balance shoe is ideal for everyday running and daily training."
New Balance 680 v2, New Balance,82.0,,495.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,, Normal | Normal, New Balance 680 v4,"8 reasons to buy
The excellent cushioning and plush interior provide a very comfortable ride for the 680 v2.
It is pretty light for a cushioned trainer.
It is a very affordable shoe.
It is quite flexible.
Some runners loved its versatility for short or long distance runs.
The traction works better than expected from an affordable shoe, according to several reports.
The 2nd version of the 680 is very breathable due to the large holes in the mesh upper.
Based on some reviews, the transition is smooth.
2 reasons not to buy
It lacks durability, according to some.
A few mentioned that it is a bit boxy for a relatively lightweight trainer.
Bottom line
New Balance keeps it simple and functional in the 680 v2. It is moderately light and has very decent arch support for all kinds of distance running. Entry level runners will surely love the wallet-friendly price, the luxurious feel, and the above average traction of this shoe."
Mizuno Wave Mujin 3,,94.0,,57.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.5oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Mizuno Wave Mujin 6,"6 reasons to buy
Runners generally welcomed the eye-catching look of the Mizuno Wave Mujin 3.
A reviewer commented that this model was able to give a superb fit like its predecessors.
Several consumers noted that this shoe was durable.
Some runners reported that the water-resistant mesh kept the foot cool, dry and safe from mild water exposure.
The mid-sole unit was able to cushion the foot well, a number of testers stated.
The different rubber compounds in the outsole received positive recognition because they were apparently efficient.
3 reasons not to buy
There was a complaint about the lack of color choices, which stunted its visual appeal.
Some runners lamented the lack of an arch support mechanism, which would’ve assisted the foot and stabilized it during those long running sessions.
A few consumers thought that this shoe was a bit heavy.
Bottom line
A majority of those who have tested the Mizuno Wave Mujin 3 were happy with its performance. They wrote that it was comfortable, secure and efficient. They even lauded most of its technologies and features. There were some complaints about this trail companion, but the overall feedback for it was positive."
Nike Air Max Tailwind 7,,86.0,,168.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 13.2oz , Women: 11.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Nike Air Max Tailwind 8,"7 reasons to buy
The soft cushioning and luxurious interior of the Nike Tailwind 7 provide excellent out of the box ride based on most comments.
It has a reasonable price.
12 different color options.
Looks really great, is a common comment from a large number of reviews.
The heel cushioning is superb because of the thick Air sole unit.
It runs light as noted by some.
The open mesh offers superior breathability.
3 reasons not to buy
A few complained about the upper durability.
There is very little arch support, even for neutral runners as experienced by a handful.
Traction needs a lot of improvement, according to several reviewers.
Bottom line
The Air Max Tailwind 7 blends great looks with decent performance on the road. It really stands out because of its ultra-breathable and comfortable ride. The shoe has adequate arch support to work as a reliable trainer. For a very reasonable price, runners can have a running shoe that can double as an everyday casual option."
Brooks Levitate, Brooks,92.0,84.0,3315.0,$150,$140 (save 7%), Road, Neutral, Men: 11.2oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Sep 2017, Normal | Normal, Brooks Levitate 3,"7 reasons to buy
Many runners were satisfied with the bounce brought by the midsole.
The underfoot springiness worked incredibly in maintaining a fluid gait, one reviewer stated.
Some users agreed that the Levitate was great to use for long-distance running.
One wearer observed that there was enough cushioning to maintain a resilient form and a comfortable stride.
Running speed has increased because of the DNA AMP midsole, according to one user.
A tester stated that the bounciness of this product made up for its weighty nature.
A couple of wearers commented that the upper was efficient in giving a secure fit despite it using a soft fabric material.
4 reasons not to buy
Several users noted that the outsole did not grip well on wet and snow-topped roads.
One reviewer thought that the Brooks Levitate did not provide the level of responsiveness it claimed to have.
A couple of testers felt that the heavy weight of the shoe made it challenging to use for numerous running sessions.
A lot of users did not appreciate the narrow toe box, which felt uncomfortable.
Bottom line
The Brooks Levitate was considered an endearing shoe by many runners because it was able to fulfill the promise of comfort and responsiveness. But some users were not impressed with the shoe's outsole and hefty weight. Overall, the performance and ride offered by the shoe were well-received."
Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 35 FlyEase, Nike,78.0,,35.0,$120,$80 (save 33%), Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,," Normal, X-Wide | Normal, Wide",,"7 reasons to buy
According to some purchasers, the zipper construction at the back of the Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 35 FlyEase was excellent.
A lot of buyers commented that the footwear has pleasing colors.
Some of the runners who have tried it loved its fantastic lace cords.
The majority of the consumers agreed that the Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 35 FlyEase was stylish.
According to some reviews, it was true to size.
The fit was perfect, according to a handful of reviewers.
Most of the testers appreciated its spacious toe box.
2 reasons not to buy
One of the users said that the heel rubbed on foot. As a result, he felt a little pain while running.
According to some consumers, the underfoot of the Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 35 FlyEase has a curve that caused the shoe to tilt. They felt uncomfortable during their activity.
Bottom line
Overall, the majority of the users left a good impression on the Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 35 FlyEase because of its visually-appealing design and structure. Aside from its construction, they loved the shoe's perfect fit on them. Although several of them have to deal with pain and discomfort during their running session, others still lauded its style and lacing system. The Pegasus 35 FlyEase is a good option for those who are looking for a well-constructed and stylish running shoe."
Skechers GOrun 600 - Circulate, Skechers,81.0,,169.0,$46,$42 (save 97%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 6.5oz,,,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
Many users commented that the Skechers GOrun 600 - Circulate is comfortable.
Several testers said that the running shoe is breathable.
Some of the reviewers agreed that the footwear is durable.
A lot of buyers noted that the shoe is best used for work, gym, and casual wear.
According to those who have tried it, the shoe is true to size.
Many consumers loved the attractive look of the shoe. It was stylish. 
The majority of the purchasers loved its affordable price.
2 reasons not to buy
One of the users commented that the shoe has poor cushioning.
It looks bulky, a tester observed.
Bottom line
Many users loved the Skechers GOrun 600 - Circulate. It was evident in their positive comments that they were happy with the features and technologies that are used in making the shoe. Moreover, the size, comfort level, and design of this running shoe were appreciated by many users. Though some were disappointed with its poor cushioning and bulky look, this did not affect the decision of others to try the shoe on. In general, the Skechers GOrun 600 - Circulate was accepted by the majority of the consumers because of its affordable price, excellent quality, and stylish structure."
Asics Gel Kayano 26 Lite-Show, Asics,90.0,,34.0,$160,$130 (save 99%), Road, Neutral, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"8 reasons to buy
Numerous consumers stated that the Asics Gel Kayano 26 Lite-Show is comfortable. 
Many buyers agreed that the fit was perfect. 
The Gel Kayano 26 Lite-Show runs true to size, stated some runners. 
Purchasers appreciated the color scheme and stylish design of this shoe. 
Several testers liked the lightweight construction of this running partner. 
This road running shoe offers great arch support, as mentioned in some reviews. 
People love the reflective detailing of the Gel Kayano 26 Lite-Show. 
According to a couple of commenters, the shoe is also perfect for casual walks.
3 reasons not to buy
A few runners reported that the midsole unit started to wear off after only several miles of running. 
One wearer mentioned that this running gear is very stiff and caused him great pain. 
Some reviewers highlighted that the shoe requires a break-in period.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Kayano 26 Lite-Show is a worthy purchase for many runners. This neutral running shoe is aimed towards consumers who are not only after a smooth ride but also versatility, as it is suitable for low-light running conditions. Thanks to the cushioning technologies incorporated into the shoe, the majority of the users have appreciated the light and comfortable running feel."
Adidas Speedfactory AM4LA, Adidas,84.0,88.0,9.0,$200,$70 (save 65%), Road, Neutral,,,,, Jun 2018, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Many people considered the Adidas Speedfactory AM4LA to be a suitably lightweight running shoe.
The color schemes that are available for this road companion were welcomed by a lot of consumers.
Several testers liked that they were able to use this shoe for casual purposes.
The midsole offered a firm yet well-cushioned ride, based on many user comments.
Some purchasers stated that they wore this shoe for workouts in the gym, and reported that it was efficient.
4 reasons not to buy
Some runners disliked the price; for them, it was a bit expensive.
There were complaints about the shoe being a bit narrow; the claimants would’ve appreciated a wide-width option, but such a variant is not available.
The Speedfactory patch on the medial midfoot side caused some discomfort, according to a few testers.
Some consumers felt that the cushioning system was a bit thin compared to most shoes that feature the boost™ platform.
Bottom line
The feedback for the Adidas Speedfactory AM4LA was split. While a lot of people welcomed its versatile design and lightweight configuration, others weren’t happy with the apparently thin midsole unit. Also, while it looked visually appealing, complaints about a narrow fit and an irritating overlay system arose. Overall, this neutral road shoe was highly criticized, but consumers didn’t shy away from it."
Adidas Aerobounce PR, Adidas,89.0,81.0,314.0,$90,$50 (save 44%), Road, Neutral, Men: 7.5oz , Women: 7.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
People liked the lightweight nature of the Adidas Aerobounce PR.
Some consumers claimed that they were able to get improved performances while wearing this running shoe.
The design of the façade was appreciated; users liked the visual aspect of the product.
The forefoot was wide enough to accommodate natural toe-splay, according to most runners.
Some testers noted that the cushioning was enough to avert discomfort during the striking phase.
The flexibility of the construction allowed freedom of motion, according to a couple of runners.
1 reasons not to buy
A few individuals stated that the shoelaces were a bit short.
Bottom line
Overall, the Adidas Aerobounce PR was well-received by those who have tried it. The lightweight design and materials received the bulk of the attention, with users welcoming an improvement to their running output while donning this road shoe. The aesthetics were also given praise, as well as the flexible frame and the well-cushioned platform."
Skechers GOrun MaxTrail 5 Ultra, Skechers,90.0,92.0,24.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.3oz , Women: 6.7oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm, Jul 2018, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
‘Comfortable’ was a word that was used to describe the experience of running in the Skechers GOrun MaxTrail 5 Ultra.
This running shoe was deemed visually endearing.
The underfoot platform was able to provide sufficient support when on uneven terrains, according to a consumer.
Based on several user feedback, the upper was stretchy and form-fitting.
People liked that the Skechers GOrun MaxTrail 5 Ultra had a lightweight build.
2 reasons not to buy
The midsole tended to be too soft for speedy activities and exercises sessions, a purchaser complained.
Based on a couple of reviews, debris still got into the foot-chamber through the collar.
Bottom line
Consumers were mostly in agreement when they noted that the Skechers GOrun MaxTrail 5 Ultra offered comfort throughout their adventures on the trails. They noted that the underfoot experience was soft and comfortable and that the upper was flexible and pleasant to the skin. On the other hand, the too-soft midsole and an unsecured upper were points of contention."
Salomon Sonic RA, Salomon,93.0,87.0,117.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.6oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Feb 2018, Normal | Normal, Salomon Sonic RA 2,"11 reasons to buy
A lot of buyers noted that the shoe was best for short and long-distance running activities.
Many users agreed that the Salomon Sonic RA was comfortable.
Many runners noted that the shoe provided excellent traction on wet pavements.
A good number of buyers loved its flexibility.
According to some runners, the shoe was very responsive.
Many reviewers said that the cushioning of this shoe was amazing.
Most of the testers commented that the Salomon Sonic RA has a wide toe box.
The majority of the users were contented because there were a variety of color options for them to choose from.
A handful of consumers said that the fit was perfect.
Based on some reviews, the shoe was breathable.
Several testers appreciated its well-constructed upper.
3 reasons not to buy
Some reviewers commented that the shoe wear-off easily after several uses only.
One of the testers felt a slight gap in the arch area.
The shoe was expensive, according to some buyers.
Bottom line
Generally, many runners were amazed at the Salomon Sonic RA's quality and fantastic construction. Aside from its attractive design, they were satisfied with its flexibility, excellent cushioning, and breathability. Although some runners were disappointed because of its price and durability issues, others still recommend this shoe because of its superb performance and versatility. The Salomon Sonic RA is a good option for those who are looking for a comfortable yet responsive running shoe."
Brooks Trance 13,,88.0,,142.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 9.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Brooks Transcend 7,"6 reasons to buy
The Element Mesh Upper offers breathable coverage, while also having the capability to wick off moisture.
Most reviewers noted that the Tongue Tied Lacing System allowed lesser displacement of the tongue.
A Progressive Diagonal Rollbar offers the stability that is customized, which is greatly efficient when aiming for a better transition.
The 5mm BioMoGo Sock Liner keeps the fit customized while also maintaining an increased level of cushioning.
The mid-sole unit is fully biodegradable and it offers dependable cushioning.
Blown Rubber ensures better protection for the outsole unit of the Trance 13.
3 reasons not to buy
The 13th version of the Trance has a slightly expensive price tag.
The men’s version of this running shoe is moderately heavy in weight.
Some runners noted that it lacked support for the lateral side of the foot, making it a bit flimsy for those who need precise midfoot support.
Bottom line
The Brooks Trance 13 is a robust running shoe that caters to runners who want to get more stable and durable protection. It can function well on many activities, even tempo training. Though some runners considered the shoe as heavy and expensive, there are also others who found satisfaction in the Trance 13."
361 Degrees Nemesis,,88.0,84.0,9.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 8.7oz,,,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Most users like that the 361 Degrees Nemesis is available in both standard and wide width sizing.
The majority of runners appreciate the excellent stability that the shoe offers.
The shoe is very durable, said many users.
A number of wearers state that the shoes are very comfortable and lightweight.
A few users mention how great the selection of color choices are.
2 reasons not to buy
The shoe has a slightly firmer ride as a handful of users claim.
One wearer says that the shoe needs accurate adjustment because it comes in a longer length.
Bottom line
The Nemesis from 361 Degrees was designed due to popular demand from the brand’s fanbase. It is a classic everyday running shoe that offers stability like no other. The shoe’s tested and proven platform consisting of the extended medial post is just one of its best features for that extra stability support. Thanks to the Nemesis’ combination of comfort and durability, it will push anyone to break their personal bests while having a responsive and enjoyable ride."
Under Armour Fat Tire Low, Under Armour,88.0,87.0,25.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 13oz , Women: 10.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Jul 2015, Normal | Normal,,"9 reasons to buy
Several runners mentioned that the Fat Tire Low is the most comfortable shoe they have ever worn.
The Michelin outsole and layout are patterned after mountain bike tires for exceptional traction and durability.
Most reviewers loved the way the cushioning absorbs impact.
The thick outsole helps protect the foot from rugged surfaces and sharp objects on the trail.
The Low Top version of the Fat Tire is also a superb hiker.
A handful of users remarked that the upper dries quickly.
There’s a small number of runners and hikers who have had foot, knee, or back issues that were relieved of pain and discomfort in this shoe.
Some users who spend most of their working hours standing, prized the shoe’s comfort and cushioning.
A moderate number of runners use the shoe for weights/cardio workouts.
5 reasons not to buy
Ground feedback is almost nil in this shoe, according to some reviewers.
It is just too heavy for several.
The shoe is quite expensive.
More than a few runners took some time to get used to the ultra-thick cushioning and high stack height.
The shoe does not breathe very well, based on the observation of several runners and testers.
Bottom line
The Fat Tire Low is the Low Top version of the standard model. It has loads of traction on almost all types of outdoor surfaces, including wet surfaces. For a pretty steep price, runners get tons of comfort and unbelievable protection against the sharpest objects on the trail. While this may not be the best option for long runs or technical running, the shoe is unbelievable for short distance forays on the most challenging trails that do not require agile movements."
New Balance FuelCore Sonic, New Balance,91.0,86.0,31.0,$110,$103 (save 6%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8.5oz , Women: 7.3oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm, Jul 2017," Normal, Wide | Normal, Wide", New Balance FuelCore Sonic v2,"6 reasons to buy
Some testers mentioned that the mechanisms and the form of the shoe are awesome.
Based on some reviews, the shoe felt like the original Vazee Pace.
Few runners commented that the New Balance FuelCore Sonic looked vibrant and beautiful.
A lot of users said that the upper felt snug and durable.
According to some testers, this shoe offered high levels of comfort and flexibility.
A number of users agreed that the BOA system is a welcome upgrade to the shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
According to some users, the shoe easily fell apart after only several uses.
A small number of buyers were disappointed in the inefficient breathability of the upper unit.
Several runners commented that the shoe was not able to provide enough grip on wet roads.
Bottom line
A lot of testers agreed that the New Balance FuelCore Sonic felt more like the original Vazee Pace when compared to the Vazee Pace 2. They also stated that the BOA closure system was a standout as a feature; according to them, the easy-to-adjust mechanism made the whole product more appealing. Runners mentioned that the shoe was best used for daily training, but a few gave caution because it did not provide them with an effective grip on moist and wet roads."
Adidas Pureboost LTD, Adidas,91.0,,2851.0,$140,$80 (save 43%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Many people who have tried the Adidas Pure Boost LTD stated that it offered effective performance on the roads.
Most consumers stated that this running shoe’s sizing scheme followed their usual expectations.
The lightweight configuration was lauded by people who claimed that they were able to run without feeling weighed down by the shoe.
The glow-in-the-dark upper was appreciated by a lot of consumers who desired a visual twist to their running apparel.
A handful of runners liked the springy nature of the boost™ midsole, stating that it was able to dole out pleasant steps as they walked or ran.
The upper unit of this product provided proper ventilation that averted stuffy in-shoe experiences.
2 reasons not to buy
Several purchasers lamented the lack of a dedicated insole; they felt that the package was incomplete because of such an absence.
Some users believe the shoe is expensive.
Bottom line
The Adidas Pure Boost LTD was able to capture the hearts of a majority of people. The various parts of this product were hailed as highly efficient, notably the midsole and the upper. The aesthetics also garnered favor for being unique and intriguing. It is worth noting that several complaints were logged because the road companion apparently doesn’t have a dedicated insole.
Neutral pronators are the target audience of the Pure Boost LTD, as well as those who enjoy adventures on the roads. Moreover, the novel aesthetics have captivated many, making the package potentially appealing to sneakerheads."
Salomon S-Lab Sense 8 SG, Salomon,86.0,82.0,7.0,,," Mud, Trail, Snow", Neutral, Men: 7.2oz , Women: 7.2oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
The traction capacity of the outsole unit of the Salomon S-Lab Sense 8 SG is lauded by most consumers.
Confidence on wet and slippery surfaces is elevated, according to those who like the versatile nature of the gripping lugs.
Some people say that this product is suitably lightweight for extended running sessions.
The water-repellent upper is welcomed by off-road running enthusiasts.
Underfoot support is dependable and precise, based on more than a handful of reviews.
2 reasons not to buy
Breathability is a trait that has not been enjoyed by most users; the foot feels warm inside this product.
The heel part of the upper is a bit restrictive, according to a few reviewers.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of people towards the Salomon S-Lab Sense 8 SG has been positive. Runners are happy because this update to the popular series of soft-ground performance shoes has been welcoming. The traction, underfoot cushioning, and secure upper are highlighted. Inversely, the stifling in-shoe experience and the restrictive heel are disliked."
Asics Gel Kenun Lyte MX, Asics,87.0,,53.0,$80,$55 (save 31%), Road, Neutral, Men: 7.7oz , Women: 6.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
People liked the eye-catching yet minimalist aesthetics of the Asics Gel Kenun Lyte MX.
The color schemes were lauded for being pleasing to the eyes.
The underfoot cushioning system was deemed by some to be supportive and capable of alleviating foot strain.
Consumers generally appreciated the lightweight construction of this running shoe.
The breathability of the upper unit was considered to be efficient.
Some testers noted that this product was versatile enough for working and walking.
2 reasons not to buy
Some users dislike the unusual tongue design of the shoe and claim the shoe is difficult to wear because of it.
The upper material soaks up too much water, said a couple of reviewers.
Bottom line
People liked the Asics Gel Kenun Lyte MX. They welcomed this road shoe’s attractive looks, supportive underfoot experience, and lightweight build. The versatility of this product was also praised. On the other hand, there were those who stated that the sizing scheme was smaller than what they were used to."
Mizuno Wave Kazan,,87.0,80.0,403.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
It is a versatile shoe on trails and on all types of terrains, as commented by testers.
The strategic pattern in the outsole provides excellent traction and grip.
It is designed with ultra-aggressive outsole for trail running.
There is flexibility as well, as noticed and felt by a few testers.
It is great for fast trail running because of its light weight, according to runners.
It is a rugged shoe that offers protection, comfort, and support.
It is a shoe that has everything for trail running, as commented by some runners.
The materials are of high quality and durable.
2 reasons not to buy
It has a poor traction on wet condition, as complained by some runners.
The toe box and mid-foot area are wider, which caused the foot to slip when running uphill or downhill, as commented by some runners.
Bottom line
The Mizuno Wave Kazan is an all-around shoe for a wide range of trails. Its patterned outsole can dig into tough trails while keeping the shoe of great responsiveness. Comfort-wise and protection, it has the best design, but it missed the necessary grip and traction on wet and slippery trails."
New Balance Fresh Foam Boracay,,87.0,79.0,331.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, New Balance Fresh Foam Boracay v3,"5 reasons to buy
The majority of the upper unit is comprised of Open Mesh, which offers breathable and comfortable coverage as noted by some runners.
The synthetic overlays improve the fit, while the no-sew construction allows the inner to be like a sock-like fit based on several runners’ comments.
Runners generally appreciated the inclusion of a traditional sock liner for some added cushioning.
A natural underfoot feel is given by the Fresh Foam mid-sole compound, which is a single-piece foam.
Blown rubber on the outsole provides traction and durability for the external layer of the Fresh Foam Boracay.
2 reasons not to buy
There were runners who noticed the outsole wear off easily after a few months of use.
Others felt that the toe box was a bit narrow.
Bottom line
The Fresh Foam Boracay from New Balance is a running shoe that has a lot of followers because of the incredible comfort, responsive cushioning, and sufficient arch support. It offers an adequate underfoot platform that follows the natural geometry of the foot, which makes it a very good daily trainer."
La Sportiva Uragano GTX, La Sportiva,87.0,96.0,11.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 12.2oz , Women: 12.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Some runners described the La Sportiva Uragano GTX as a comfortable running shoe.
Several users mentioned that the shoe has a durable design.
According to some comments, the grip is superb as it holds up on rugged terrains.
Most buyers agreed the GTX element works efficiently; it keeps the foot dry on wet and snowy conditions.
A few users commented that the Uragano GTX fits perfectly.
2 reasons not to buy
The La Sportiva Uragano GTX is an expensive trail running shoe. 
A few users mentioned that it is best to wear the shoe on cold conditions because the GTX upper made the shoe very warm; 
Bottom line
The La Sportiva Uragano GTX is considered by most trail runners as a great shoe that offers a good blend of durability, comfort, grip, and protection. Some users have minor issues but it does not affect the shoe's overall rating. Despite being expensive, runners still consider the Uragano GTX as a reliable waterproof trail running shoe."
Brooks Cascadia 12, Brooks,93.0,91.0,621.0,$130,$125 (save 22%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 12.1oz , Women: 10.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Jan 2017, Normal | Normal, Brooks Cascadia 14,"9 reasons to buy
Many consumers noted that the roomy toe box was a welcome feature that allowed their feet to spread naturally during their runs.
A runner commented that the gripping lugs on the bottom of the shoe were able to handle many types of surfaces, even snow.
A tester reported that even though the outsole tread wasn’t too aggressive, it was still able to work well without letting them feel like they needed to dig for traction.
A lot of runners welcomed the Pivot Point System because they stated that it kept them balanced as they were traversing uneven or rocky ground.
Several consumers wrote that the shoe’s width was nice and agreeable for their feet.
The durability of this model was also given praise; there were those who were able to use this shoe for tougher trails, and they wrote that it remained intact.
Several runners wrote that the Brooks Cascadia 12 was more comfortable than the previous version.
Many felt that this iteration in the series was a solid one; they appreciated its cushioning systems, its trail-specific features, and its design.
There were purchasers who welcomed the design and color schemes of this model.
3 reasons not to buy
More than a handful of reviewers wished for better color options.
A few runners noted that the heel cup is a bit shallow.
A couple of expert reviewers mentioned that the 12th iteration of the Cascadia is not as springy as its competitors.
Bottom line
The Brooks Cascadia 12 was able to perform admirably, according to many trail runners. They wrote that its trail-optimized features were helpful and appropriate, especially when traversing uneven surfaces. Some were also impressed by its durability, its looks and its overall construction."
The North Face Rovereto, The North Face,86.0,70.0,15.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.2oz , Women: 9.3oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Some consumers felt that the underfoot cushioning given by The North Face Rovereto was akin to walking on clouds.
Most testers welcomed the various available color schemes; they stated that the subtle shades blended well with the brighter highlights.
A few people noted that the outsole unit wasn’t expressly aggressive; they were able to use this shoe on the roads.
Several runners liked that this North Face running shoe was able to provide lightweight performance that doesn’t quickly fatigue the foot.
The sizing scheme was welcomed for being accommodating of the general preferences of consumers.
The outsole unit’s grip capacity was appreciated because it was apparently precise and reliable.
1 reasons not to buy
A couple of people claimed that the upper unit permitted dust into the foot-chamber.
Bottom line
The Rovereto from The North Face was able to garner positive responses from those who have tried it. Consumers were mostly happy with this addition to the overall register of trail running shoes, stating that the underfoot experience was glorious. Words like ‘walking on clouds’ and ‘comfortable’ were thrown around with confidence. On the other hand, a few testers didn’t like the porous upper which apparently drew dust into the interior chamber.
Neutral pronators and enthusiasts of adventures over groomed trails are the ones who are most likely going to enjoy Rovereto."
Mizuno Wave Creation Waveknit 2, Mizuno,83.0,,8.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 14.1oz , Women: 12oz, Men: 15mm , Women: 15mm,, Normal | Normal, Mizuno Wave Creation Waveknit,"5 reasons to buy
Some users said that the Mizuno Wave Creation Waveknit 2 is comfortable.
This shoe is supportive, according to a few commenters. 
The excellent cushioning received praise from several wearers. 
It is perfect for jogging and workouts, a couple of consumers observed. 
Many purchasers appreciated the stylish design of the shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
A few testers experienced footsore while running in a pair of Wave Creation Waveknit 2. 
This shoe is heavy, some buyers complained.
Bottom line
The Mizuno Wave Creation Waveknit 2 is a neutral running shoe that is suitable for runners with neutral gaits or those who do not overpronate. It is built with advanced features, which include excellent cushioning and foot-hugging fit. It is a good choice for runners and athletes seeking a comfortable, durable, and supportive running companion."
Saucony Hurricane 17, Saucony,92.0,86.0,573.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.2oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal, Saucony Hurricane 22,"7 reasons to buy
The ISOFIT technology is a mesh material that is stretchable, thus very capable of adapting to the exact dimensions and movements of the wearer’s foot.
A support frame at the heel area secures the rear section of the foot, while the ISOFIT saddle covers the mid-foot in a stable way.
The RUNDRY Sock Liner follows the contours of the foot’s underside and wards off moisture, keeping the foot dry and fresh all throughout.
The POWERGRID system is a full-length cushioning foam that effectively handles impact and additional underfoot comfort.
The SRC Impact Zone helps the foot transition more responsibly from the heel to the toe.
The IBR+ is a durable material that protects the Hurricane 17 from wear and abrasion, while also affording some additional cushioning.
The women’s version of the Hurricane 17 has an average weight.
4 reasons not to buy
The men’s version of the Hurricane 17 is moderately heavy.
It has an expensive price.
Some runners felt that the toe box was a bit narrow as they experienced their toes clump together uncomfortably.
There were testers who felt the interior sleeve rub against the heel, making the skin irritated.
Bottom line
The Hurricane 17 from Saucony offers a lot for runners who need support and protection throughout their activities. It’s a high profile shoe that features high quality materials, so anyone can be confident when taking it for a spin."
Saucony Mirage 5, Saucony,92.0,88.0,114.0,$110,$40 (save 64%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8.7oz , Women: 7.7oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
The Open Mesh provides a breathable wrap for the foot.
The RUNDRY Collar Lining keeps the heel in place while also maintaining moisture-wicking nature.
An internal support strap locks the foot down, effectively preventing accidental removal of the shoe noted a handful of runners.
The EVA+ is a composite foam that’s found in the entire length of the mid-sole and it makes sure the cushioning is durable and responsive.
The POWERGRID technology makes use of a grid design, which is efficient in dissipating impact shock.
XT-900 and Blown Rubber offer a robust outsole that is durable and capable of high-level traction.
The moderate weight makes the 5th version of the Mirage ideal for anyone who wants a shoe that has a balanced weight.
3 reasons not to buy
There were runners who felt that the rubber on the outsole was softer and more susceptible to wearing off easily.
Some of the testers thought that the platform needed more cushioning to fully support the weight of the wearer.
A few noticed that the midfoot area was a bit narrow.
Bottom line
The Saucony Mirage 5 is a daily training shoe that’s great for those with mild over-pronation of the foot. It received a lot of positive praise from users because of its performance and comfort. It doesn’t have a heavy weight and it performs well, making it great for tempo training."
Nike Air Zoom Structure 22 Shield,,92.0,90.0,73.0,,, Road, Stability,,, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
According to most users, the Nike Air Zoom Structure 22 Shield is very comfortable.
A few admired the shoe’s good grip on road surfaces.
Some buyers lauded the good looking design of the Air Zoom Structure 22 Shield.
Several were satisfied with the shoe’s water-repellent upper; they said it works well when used on wet condition.
Many users were pleased by the shoe’s overall fit.
The shoe feels fast and light, according to some user reviews.
A reviewer shared that the shoe has great quality.
As mentioned in some comments, the shoe runs true to size.
2 reasons not to buy
One disappointed user mentioned that the laces do not stay tight while running; he needs to tighten it often.
The Nike Structure 22 Shield is slightly expensive.
Bottom line
The Nike Air Zoom Structure 22 Shield has won over many consumers, based on the significant number of positive feedback it received. The shoe’s comfort level, water-repellent coverage, and overall fit were all appreciated. Though the new lacing system is not effective and the price is too expensive for some runners, the Nike Structure 22 Shield has been regarded by the majority as a running shoe that is worth giving a try."
Nike Air Zoom Elite 7,,92.0,89.0,46.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.6oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Nike Air Zoom Elite 10,"8 reasons to buy
The comfortable feel delivered by the seamless and plush interior of the Zoom Elite 7 translates even when running sockless.
A very reasonably-priced shoe, based on performance and looks, according to several reviews.
It has a markedly responsive ride for midfoot and forefoot strikers noted some runners.
6 color options.
The Flywire cables enhance midfoot hold and fit.
A very good number of reviewers loved the cool design of the Elite 7.
It is lighter than the previous model.
A handful noted that it is a lightweight trainer that can handle long-distance or fast runs with ease.
2 reasons not to buy
Outsole durability suffers early because of the exposed EVA.
Several runners who usually go for middle distance runs felt fatigue in their calves as the lack of rubber on the medial side of the heel and midfoot puts pressure in their arches.
Bottom line
The Nike Air Zoom Elite 7 is a reliable, lightweight cushioned trainer that has moderate arch support and great comfort. It seeks to provide that sweet spot between a traditional trainer and a race day shoe. The trendy design and nice fit make it a very popular option for runners of all levels."
Nike Air Relentless 5, Nike,84.0,,170.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"8 reasons to buy
Many runners lauded the versatility of the Nike Air Relentless 5 because they were able to use it for running and training.
According to a lot of consumers, the design and the color schemes of this model made it look fashionable.
A tester wrote that this running shoe was able to resist damage and wear; it withstood many scenarios and conditions, like running on pavement and in shallow mud, as well as workouts in the gym.
It felt suitably lightweight for a number of consumers.
The testers generally appreciated the Reslon mid-sole, which offered them plush underfoot cushioning.
The underfoot experience was generally comfortable, according to runners.
Many users stated that was true to its size and width.
Runners spoke well of its price, which, for them, was affordable.
3 reasons not to buy
Most of the complaints were about the sizing, which was ½ smaller than what runners were used to.
Some runners felt that this shoe was difficult to wear, because they had to loosen the lacing system about a few inches in order to easily place their feet into the foot-chamber.
A few noticed that the outsole rubber extension located at the tip of the forefoot peeled off after only a few uses.
Bottom line
The 5th version of the Nike Air Relentless gained positive reviews from a lot of runners. Many of them stated that they were able to use it for many types of activities in the urban landscape. They felt that it was very versatile in terms of function and purpose. Though some testers took note of some caveats, this road shoe still became popular among those with neutral running gaits."
Asics Gel Blur33 2,,84.0,75.0,436.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 8.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"4 reasons to buy
The Gel Blur33 2 features the new mono-sock construction, a breathable airmesh upper that is also flexible.
The added supportive external cage promotes a more and secure fit for some runners.
The Asics Gel Blur33 2 features the ComforDry Sockliner technology that provides added cushioning and anti-odor properties.
The padded tongue of this shoe continued to impress most runners.
4 reasons not to buy
Slightly high-priced shoe.
Some runners felt that this shoe is too tight and stiff for them.
Based on some reviews, this shoe is not as durable as expected.
Some experienced heel slippage.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Blur33 2 is a neutral daily training that provides impressive flexibility. The shoe received positive comments, but some are not happy with the shoe’s fitting and durability. The Blur33 2 is a good option for those who are looking for an affordable shoe for long distance road running."
Under Armour SpeedForm Slingshot, Under Armour,90.0,82.0,119.0,$140,$72 (save 49%), Road, Neutral, Men: 7.5oz , Women: 6.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal, Under Armour SpeedForm Slingshot 2,"5 reasons to buy
Many applauded the new design and looks of the Under Armour SpeedForm Slingshot.
It is lightweight and very comfortable to wear according to some runners’ comments.
Some testers mentioned that the SpeedForm Slingshot is a fast and reliable shoe while running on the road.
It is available in different color choices.
True to size.
3 reasons not to buy
It is a slightly expensive shoe.
Some runners experience heel slippage.
Knitted material in the upper wears out quickly as mentioned in some reviews.
Bottom line
The Under Armour SpeedForm Slingshot is an innovative road running shoe designed to deliver an improved look and running performance. Despite being an expensive shoe, most users are still willing to purchase a pair because of its comfortable design and ride quality. This shoe is best for short and long distance road running and a great daily training partner."
New Balance 730 v3, New Balance,79.0,,27.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.9oz , Women: 6oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"12 reasons to buy
Comfortable, even right out of the box, is a major point among a good number of runners.
The 730 v3 is affordable.
It is very flexible, based on most reviews.
The shoe is really light, according to many.
The 3rd version of the 730 is quite fashionable for some runners.
There are 4 different color options.
A handful loved the shoe’s optimal ventilation.
Several owners of the 3rd instalment of the 730 use it for cross fit training or aerobics.
More than a handful ran sockless in this shoe without suffering from blisters or even just hot spots.
The roomy toe box was appreciated by some users.
It feels surprisingly stable, despite being quite light.
The removable insole can get way to orthotics.
5 reasons not to buy
Several runners were disappointed that the collar and tongue are no longer as cushioned as before.
A handful experienced rubbing on top of the foot due to the now-thin tongue.
Quite a small number noticed the very little arch support.
It is a bit tight for a few runners.
A handful of reviewers judged it to be a little smaller than before.
Bottom line
The New Balance 730 v3 is an unassuming lightweight trainer that offers solid versatility. For budget-conscious runners, this is an all-in-one kind of shoe that can take on any kind of distance under different types of speed. The minimalist upper includes a soft and plush interior while the breathability and flexibility are superb features. It has minimal arch support, good versatility, and comes with very nice color combos at a very wallet-friendly price."
Brooks Glycerin 15, Brooks,94.0,90.0,3777.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Jun 2017, Normal | Normal, Brooks Glycerin 18,"8 reasons to buy
Most users said that the Brooks Glycerin 15 is a comfortable shoe.
A number of users mentioned that the fit of the shoe felt just right.
One user was glad to say that the shoe offered a springy ride.
A few testers were happy to note that the shoe did not need to be broken in.
Some users said that the quality of the shoe and the features it came with was worth the price.
Many runners said that the leg pain they usually felt due to foot and leg problems diminished when they ran with the Brooks Glycerin 15.
Several users narrated that the cushioning of the Glycerin 15 was a welcome update.
The Glycerin 15 is a lightweight shoe which plenty of runners appreciated in their reviews.
5 reasons not to buy
The majority of consumers mentioned that the Glycerin 15 felt smaller than their usual preferences.
Most reviewers said that the shoe didn’t have enough arch support. They stated that the shoe is not recommended for those with high arches.
A user who had low ankles found the collar of the shoe to be inconvenient because it caused some rubbing.
Another user narrated that the footbed cushioning resulted in the shoe being noticeably less stable than the former model.
A few runners were able to test the shoe by running 70-75 miles. They said that they were unsatisfied about seeing signs of early wear on the outsole.
Bottom line
Lighter than ever, the Brooks Glycerin 15 is the most awaited updated of the Glycerin 14. It’s a neutral road running shoe equipped with premium comfort and fit. It can be a reliable companion when doing short runs or light workouts."
New Balance Minimus 10 v4, New Balance,74.0,82.0,20.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 7.2oz , Women: 5.7oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,, Normal | Wide, New Balance Minimus Trail 10,"6 reasons to buy
The inside material of the shoe’s upper was comfortable for runners because it didn’t cause any irritation, even when they didn’t wear socks.
The testers appreciated the appealing look of the New Balance Minimus 10 v4.
As commented by users, this one was suitably lightweight as a minimal trail running shoe.
The general consensus about the mid-sole was that it was comfortable.
One reviewer stated that this model was great on soft surfaces such as sand and mud, and perfect for obstacle courses.
Runners noted that the sole unit was strong enough to withstand impact and surface friction.
6 reasons not to buy
There were testers who felt that this shoe’s platform was built higher than its predecessors, which removed the minimalist vibe.
Some users stated that the toe box was too narrow that it rubbed against their toes uncomfortably.
There were those who didn’t like how part of the tongue was attached to the interior sleeve; they felt that it cut into the skin of their ankles.
The heel section of the upper unit wasn’t able to secure the foot in place, complained a reviewer.
Several runners reported that the mid-foot and rear sections of the upper unit were too loose; their feet kept sliding around in the foot-chamber.
A couple of consumers stated that the color schemes were bland and boring.
Bottom line
The flexible New Balance Minimus 10 v4 is an update that carries on the legacy of its well-received predecessor in the series. Its lightweight nature was able to allow runners to take on the trails with ease and comfort, but there were those who didn’t acclimate well to some of its components. A number of consumers felt that it wasn’t as efficient as the previous iteration. But many still believed that it’s still a solid option for trail adventurers who desire a lightweight ride across the outdoor topography."
Inov-8 Parkclaw 275, Inov-8,88.0,84.0,71.0,$130,$109 (save 22%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,," Normal, Wide | Normal, Wide",,"5 reasons to buy
The cushioning given by the foam midsole was considered by consumers to be comfortable.
Confidence when running on wet surfaces apparently went skyward because the outsole unit held onto the ground well.
Runners generally liked the color schemes of the Inov-8 Parkclaw 275, stating that they were visually appealing.
Water drained fast from the interior chamber when going through paths that contained puddles or streams.
The toe box offered the toes more space for natural splaying, some runners commented.
1 reasons not to buy
A few testers observed the sole unit separating after only several months of use.
Bottom line
Most purchasers were happy that they were given the Inov-8 Parkclaw 275. They considered it to be an appealing running shoe because of its comfortable midsole, traction-capable outsole, and its attractive looks. And although the durability was questioned by a few consumers, it wasn’t enough to quell the goodwill of the majority."
Salomon Spikecross 3 CS, Salomon,93.0,89.0,33.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.5oz , Women: 11.5oz, Men: 11mm , Women: 11mm, Oct 2016, Normal | Normal,,"11 reasons to buy
Many runners appreciated the traction-capability of the Salomon Spikecross 3 CS’s outsole unit.
The gripping lugs actually dug into the soil in order to heighten surface grip, according to a reviewer.
Several consumers welcomed how this shoe was optimized for cold weather conditions; they felt that their feet stayed warm throughout their running sessions on the snowy ground.
There were testers who appreciated the snug coverage of the upper via the Sensifit system; they noted that it wasn’t too tight, but it held their feet securely.
Generally, the Speedlace system received acclaim; runners wrote that it made adjusting the fit much easier.
This shoe is true-to-size, according to a lot of those who have tried it.
The general quality of construction received some praise from runners; for them, it looked and felt like a product of great quality.
Based on a number of reviews, this shoe’s durability was reliable.
The cushioning system was adequate and efficient, stated some reviewers.
With all the technologies, including the 9 carbide spikes, packed into the 3rd version of the Spikecross CS, it remains to be remarkably light.
The water resistant upper works as designed, as expressed in the reviews of more than a handful of runners.
3 reasons not to buy
Many runners reported that the shoe was expensive.
It runs a little narrow, according to a handful of reviewers.
The 9 carbide spikes are irreplaceable after they wear out.
Bottom line
The Salomon Spikecross 3 CS was generally well-received by runners who wanted a solid option for their trail running sessions. They welcomed its aggressive outsole design, its protective upper construction, and its easy lace-up system. Neutral pronators also noted the quality and sturdiness of this shoe’s components."
Puma Rogue, Puma,85.0,,75.0,$80,$60 (save 25%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Most of those who have tested the Puma Rogue feel that it offers a comfortable underfoot experience.
The aesthetics of this running shoe have been lauded by those who have worn it; they claim that the hues and overall design are eye-catching.
Some testers feel that the weight of this product is light enough to accommodate all-day wear.
According to several consumers, the breathability of the upper unit has permitted them to enjoy their activities without feeling stifled.
The quality of the materials used for this Puma running shoe is considered reliable and suitably durable.
The price of a pair of Rogue shoes is deemed affordable. Many people welcome the price-to-quality distinction that comes with this product.
2 reasons not to buy
According to a few testers, the protruding heel part of the platform causes an imbalance in the performance.
A handful of purchasers have reported incidences of the upper fabrics tearing apart after only a few uses.
Bottom line
The overall feedback that people gave for the Puma Rogue has been positive. Many of those who have worn this road running shoe are appreciative of what it has to offer. The aesthetics and the price tag are some of the highlighted elements; this model apparently looks appealing yet not too expensive compared to other offerings. On the other hand, the protruding heel platform and the flimsy upper are the targets of criticism.
Fans of neutral running shoes are the target market of the Puma Rogue."
Merrell Overedge, Merrell,76.0,,9.0,$70,$56 (save 20%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 14.1oz , Women: 12.3oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,, Normal | Normal,,"8 reasons to buy
Some of the buyers commented that the Merrell Overedge is comfortable.
According to those who have bought it, the shoe is lightweight.
It provides a great fit, as noted by a few testers.
The shoe has a roomy toe box, a purchaser observed.
Based on a review, the shoe is supportive.
One of the consumers said that the shoe is protective.
A reviewer commented that the running footwear is flexible.
A few buyers noted that the shoe is best used for walking and gym activities.
2 reasons not to buy
One of the testers thinks that the Merrell Overedge has poor quality because the material used in making the shoe is thin.
A user commented that the shoe does not provide enough protection when training.
Bottom line
The Merrell Overedge has made the majority of the users overwhelmed and contented. They were appreciative of the structure and performance of the shoe. Because of the comfort level, flexibility, and support the shoe provides, a lot of them lauded it. Although one of the users expressed his concern with its low quality, others still recommend the Merrell Overedge for those who are looking for a comfortable and well-performing running shoe."
Inov-8 X-Talon 200,,93.0,90.0,279.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 7.1oz , Women: 7.1oz, Men: 3mm , Women: 3mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The Inov-8 X-Talon 200 offers an impressive grip on all surfaces, according to a huge number of runners.
Most runners applauded the shoe for being lightweight and flexible.
Breathable forefoot mesh and DWR coating keeps the foot dry.
This shoe has a roomy toe box but not bulky based on several comments.
The Talon 200 has a narrow lacing system for a more secure and snug fit.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners complained that the Talon 200 is not as durable as expected.
Based on some comments, this shoe needs added underfoot protection.
Bottom line
The Inov-8 X-Talon 200 is a lightweight running shoe for racing and obstacle course running. It provides impressive grip and protection on all surfaces. This trail running shoe is ideal for those who are looking for a flexible and water-repellent shoe at a reasonable price."
Salomon XA Enduro, Salomon,91.0,85.0,112.0,$160,$72 (save 98%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 9.8oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm, Feb 2017, Normal | Normal,,"8 reasons to buy
A few wearers were satisfied with the stretchable gaiter that prevented trail-debris from getting into the shoe.
The majority of runners admired the impressive traction of the Salomon XA Enduro over technical terrains.
Some runners liked the firm yet comfortable cushioning of the shoe.
Most of the wearers noted the durable outsole of the XA Enduro.
The upper mesh is breathable enough, especially in warm weather conditions, based on some reviews.
A couple of users mentioned that the heel section of the upper unit held the foot securely while running downhill.
Several runners were happy with the shoe’s wide toe-box.
The automatic lacing system of the shoe gained positive impressions from a few consumers.
2 reasons not to buy
According to few reviewers, the shoe is slightly expensive.
After wearing the shoe several times, the protective gaiter started to stretch out and lose its structure, said a few testers.
Bottom line
Generally, the Salomon XA Enduro gained positive feedback from a lot of trail enthusiasts. They were satisfied with the shoe’s durable construction, reliable grip, and protective features that are all necessary for a better trail running experience. Despite being expensive, some runners still found the XA Enduro a worthy investment."
, Jordan,,95.0,,,, Road, Neutral,,,,, Jul 2019, Normal | Normal,,
Salomon S-Lab Sense 8 SG, Salomon,86.0,82.0,7.0,,," Mud, Trail, Snow", Neutral, Men: 7.2oz , Women: 7.2oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
The traction capacity of the outsole unit of the Salomon S-Lab Sense 8 SG is lauded by most consumers.
Confidence on wet and slippery surfaces is elevated, according to those who like the versatile nature of the gripping lugs.
Some people say that this product is suitably lightweight for extended running sessions.
The water-repellent upper is welcomed by off-road running enthusiasts.
Underfoot support is dependable and precise, based on more than a handful of reviews.
2 reasons not to buy
Breathability is a trait that has not been enjoyed by most users; the foot feels warm inside this product.
The heel part of the upper is a bit restrictive, according to a few reviewers.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of people towards the Salomon S-Lab Sense 8 SG has been positive. Runners are happy because this update to the popular series of soft-ground performance shoes has been welcoming. The traction, underfoot cushioning, and secure upper are highlighted. Inversely, the stifling in-shoe experience and the restrictive heel are disliked."
Saucony Omni 14, Saucony,90.0,82.0,445.0,$130,$80 (save 38%), Road, Stability, Men: 11.2oz , Women: 9.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Jun 2015," Normal | Narrow, Normal, Wide", Saucony Omni 16,"7 reasons to buy
The upper is breathable because of the open mesh, according to some reviews.
Most reviewers appreciated the securing mechanisms that were added here, including the Sauc-Fit system and the Heel Support Frame.
The PWRGRID is a unit in the mid-sole that has shock attenuating properties.
The SRC Impact Zone that runs from the heel to the midfoot offers shock absorption and a smoother step.
Stability is received from the Dual Density SSL EVA, which has pronation control capabilities.
A significant number of testers were satisfied with the shoe’s durable outsole.
It is flexible as noted in some reviews.
4 reasons not to buy
Some runners felt that the 14th version of the Saucony Omni had a tighter toe box than the previous version.
A few noted that the upper unit wasn’t very comfortable to the skin, so it became necessary to wear socks, which made the fit a bit too tight.
The price of this shoe is slightly expensive.
Some of the testers criticized its bulky look, which helped to diminish flexibility.
Bottom line
The Saucony Omni 14 is a daily running shoe that has reliable components, high quality design and efficient performance. The shoe received positive feedback from users but there are also a few who are less satisfied with its tight fit and bulky look. The Omni 14 is a running shoe that’s meant for runners who need additional support in the arches."
New Balance 1400 v3,,90.0,87.0,151.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.5oz , Women: 5.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, New Balance 1400 v6,"6 reasons to buy
Most runners applauded the lightweight and durable construction of the New Balance 1400 v3.
The 3rd version of the New Balance 1400 features no-sew overlays for added security.
It is very comfortable and flexible as mentioned in some reviews.
A significant number of runners mentioned that the shoe is very responsive because of its Revlite midsole.
The shoe feels light and fast for competition, as noted in some reviews.
A reasonably-priced shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners did not like the new color combination of the shoe.
It is too narrow and too tight for several runners.
Bottom line
The New Balance 1400 v3 gained positive remarks from its users, but there are also a few negative comments geared towards the shoe's narrow and tight fit. Overall, the 1400 v3 has proven to be a successful release. The shoe is a light and fast running shoe that works incredibly well on race day. It is ideal for those who are looking for comfort, flexibility, and secure fit. "
Salomon Sense Pro,,90.0,84.0,59.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,, Salomon Sense Pro 4,"6 reasons to buy
A hybrid type of shoe because it keeps your feet closer to the trail while still providing full-length protection.
This shoe was designed with a solid toe cap and a rugged design for the upper.
This is the shoe praised by many testers for its ability to handle different trails even with its minimalist style.
The lace system is very efficient for a trail running shoe, say many runners.
The feet are very comfortable and it brings confidence to runners, as observed by testers.
It works pretty well on city trails, and even on rougher and tougher wild trails.
3 reasons not to buy
There is a lack of volume for the cushioning, as complained by some testers.
It has a slightly expensive price.
This is not the shoe for runners who want a robust and extensive cushioning foam underneath the foot.
Bottom line
The Salomon Sense Pro is a great trail shoe with great and efficient design for a minimalist style of running. There is a full-length plate that protects the foot from trail challenges. The low drop design provides a very satisfying closer ground feel. It is a wise choice to invest on for minimalist trail running."
Topo Athletic Ultrafly, Topo Athletic,90.0,85.0,57.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm, May 2016," Normal | Normal, Wide", Topo Athletic Ultrafly 3,"6 reasons to buy
One buyer shared that the shoe performed very well during long runs.
Several users were satisfied with the fit of the shoe and how it wrapped nicely around the foot.
Based on the feedback of many consumers, the cushioning system was able to provide a comfortable ride, either on road or softer pavements.
A runner commended the arch support provided by the shoe and how great it felt during up-tempo runs.
Many users admired the roomy yet non-exaggeratedly spacious toe box.
The shoe’s weight and how it contributed to the overall experience was well-regarded.
1 reasons not to buy
The big toe pounded against the front of the shoe and made running uncomfortable, according to a couple of runners.
Bottom line
Presenting a bouncy ride and a commendable flexibility, the Topo Athletic Ultrafly provides enough guidance without forcing the movement of the foot. The shoe is touted to be durable and agreeable for moderate long tempo runs and tough road running. A few users hinted on improvement areas such as the weight and the structure, but it’s considered to be an overall satisfactory running shoe."
New Balance Vazee Prism v2, New Balance,92.0,93.0,100.0,$100,$60 (save 40%), Road, Stability, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Jan 2017, Normal | Normal,,"10 reasons to buy
Most of the reviewers valued the comfort of the Prism v2.
The stability is noticeable without being intrusive, according to several runners.
It is more breathable than the original model, based on the comments of a handful of testers.
The toe box gets a little more room with the removal of the forefoot/toe box overlays.
A few experts appreciated the softer heel, which does not compromise the secure fit of the rear section.
It comes in multiple color options.
New Balance continues to offer wide widths for the Vazee Prism v2.
The price is less compared to some of its competitors.
It rides a bit softer, which a handful considered as an improvement over the stiff ride of the earlier version.
Some runners have used it for gym workouts because of the lightweight support.
2 reasons not to buy
It is noticeably heavier than the original model, according to a handful of reviewers.
The midsole foam lacks the responsiveness of many of its competitors, according to a few runners.
Bottom line
The 2nd instalment of the Prism continues to provide the only stability option in New Balance’s Vazee collection of shoes. It is a shoe that still performs a little faster despite the added bulk. Additionally, it becomes a more viable option for those who require lightweight stability when running in half or full marathons. With a very reasonable price tag, the shoe is an excellent value for the money choice for many runners."
Merrell Antora GTX, Merrell,74.0,,8.0,$140,$126 (save 10%), Trail, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
The majority of the users said that the Merrell Antora GTX is comfortable.
According to those who have tried it, the shoe is lightweight.
Some purchasers love the shoe's flexibility.
A consumer said that the running footwear is supportive.
Some reviewers appreciated its perfect fit.
Several buyers admire its attractive and stylish look.
Based on the reviews, the shoe is best used for trail running activities.
2 reasons not to buy
A tester commented that the GTX material used in crafting the shoe is not working well.
One of the users observed that the Antora GTX is not durable. It wears off easily after several uses only.
Bottom line
Overall, the majority of the consumers agreed that the Merrell Antora GTX is a shoe that provides a high level of comfort. It is strategically designed to offer a more supportive and flexible ride. With the utilization of high-quality materials and technologies, the shoe helps in improving the user’s running performance. This great-looking shoe is considered by many as a perfect companion for different trail running activities."
Asics GT 2000 7 Twist, Asics,75.0,,7.0,$120,$60 (save 50%), Road, Stability, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
A lot of the athletes compliment the durability of the Asics GT 2000 7 Twist.  
Several laud the comfort supplemented by the shoe.
It is very flexible, observed many purchasers. 
Quite a few praise the breathability of the platform. 
A number of users claim that it has a secure fit. 
According to many, it heightens their pace because of its lightweight construction. 
2 reasons not to buy
One reviewer states that the shoe’s cushioning worsened his/her plantar fasciitis. 
It doesn’t fit snugly, noted one customer. 
Bottom line
A performance road running shoe from Asics, the GT 2000 7 Twist sports total support for stability. Designed with featherlight materials, this running shoe can surely maximize your speed for you to go the distance. With Asics’ top-of-the-line technologies, the platform enables both lasting durability and responsive rebound. With the Asics GT 2000 7 Twist being a dynamic running shoe, expect maximum traction boosting each of your stride. "
Asics Gel Foundation 12, Asics,89.0,,506.0,$120,$53 (save 96%), Road, Motion control, Men: 12.2oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,," Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Normal", Asics Gel Foundation 13,"6 reasons to buy
Lightweight and breathable coverage is provided by the Engineered mesh in the upper.
The 12th version of the Gel Foundation features the ComforDry Sockliner, which provides additional cushioning while reducing moisture and odor.
Synthetic Overlays offer an improved fit while the Seamless Upper Construction ensures a non-irritating sleeve for sockless wearing.
It has SpEVA in the mid-sole for efficient energy return and the Gel Cushioning System in the heel and forefoot areas for shock absorption.
Stability is afforded by effective mid-sole components, such as the DuoMax Support System and the Guidance Trusstic System.
Most runners took note that the Gel Foundation 12 is a well-cushioned shoe that is also flexible.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners felt this version needed more depth in the toe box because they felt their toes rub uncomfortably against the upper fabric of the shoe.
There were complaints stating that the underfoot stability mechanics were not efficient as it rendered the foot stiff and unable to move naturally.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Foundation 12 is a motion control shoe that gives responsive and comfortable cushioning for both short and long running sessions. The layered stability and full guidance system help runners experience a smoother ride. The shoe gathers mixed reviews from users but overall, the Foundation 12 is considered by some as a successful update."
Under Armour SpeedForm Slingshot 2, Under Armour,90.0,,247.0,$100,$62 (save 38%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,," Narrow, Normal | Normal",,"8 reasons to buy
A significant number of users mentioned that the Under Armour SpeedForm Slingshot 2 is very comfortable.
Some purchasers admired the lightweight design of the SlingShot 2.
The shoe fits well and requires no break-in time, said some wearers.
A few others happily expressed that they have been using the shoe not just for running, but also for walking and gym workout sessions.
Several users said that the mesh upper was sufficiently breathable.
According to some runners, the SpeedForm Slingshot 2 has a good-looking design.
One user is delighted with the shoe’s wide toe box.
Several testers thought that the laces of the shoe are odd, but it provides better fit and support.
2 reasons not to buy
The material used for the upper unit was considered by a few people to be rough and abrasive.
A consumer lamented the flimsy lateral support given by the knit upper and the asymmetrical lacing system.
Bottom line
The second version of the SpeedForm Slingshot is a lightweight running shoe packed with top-notch Under Armour technologies. It gained positive reviews from various users and had continued to wow runners with its functionality, design, and comfort. On the other hand, there were complaints about the upper unit, with some considering the fabrics to be irritating and one treating the fit system to be unreliable."
Inov-8 Roclite 300,,73.0,,15.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Many trail runners commend the comfort of the Inov-8 Roclite 300.
The running shoe has a good fit, expressed several buyers.
According to quite a few testers, the platform has a reliable ground adherence. 
It permits the natural splay of the toes, reported some reviewers. 
The trail running shoe is very flexible, hailed a number of customers.
2 reasons not to buy
One user has observed that the shoe's laces are too long. 
A couple of purchasers state that the neutral shoe is quite stiff.
Bottom line
Perfect for entry- and elite-level runners, the Inov-8 Roclite 300 is geared with comfort and protection, ideal for trail and off-trail activities. With the grippy rubber engineered into the platform, users are equipped with surefootedness and stability in all conditions. Because of the configuration of the running shoe, it is able to adapt to the natural motions of the foot for lasting and irritation-free performance."
Mizuno Wave Sayonara 3, Mizuno,90.0,89.0,352.0,$110,$50 (save 55%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8.4oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal, Mizuno Wave Sayonara 4,"6 reasons to buy
Some runners were impressed by the light construction of the Mizuno Wave Sayonara 3.
It has the X10 technology that promotes added durability.
It features the Mizuno SmoothRide Engineering technology for a smooth heel to toe transition.
The shoe feels light and fast, as noted in some reviews.
A few number of users mentioned that the shoe is responsive enough for their preferences.
The Sayonara 3 is available in several color options.
3 reasons not to buy
Several users were not impressed by the 3rd version of the Wave Sayonara because the midsole felt too soft.
Many felt that the Wave Sayonara 3 is too stiff.
Not as comfortable as the previous model, said some reviews.
Bottom line
Runners looking for a fast running shoe will never get disappointed with the Mizuno Wave Sayonara 3. It is designed to give runners a combination of fast, responsive and light ride. It is not just a go-to running shoe, but also a superior trainer with decent arch support and racing partner."
Vivobarefoot Stealth III, Vivobarefoot,85.0,,5.0,,, Road, Neutral,,, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,," Normal, Wide | Normal, Wide",,"5 reasons to buy
A few comments have highlighted the non-irritating interior environment of the upper unit.
The Vivobarefoot Stealth IIIis welcomed as a suitably lightweight running shoe for all-day wear.
Flexibility is a trait that is said to be easily appreciated from this product.
The general durability of this product is welcomed by those who like long-lasting shoes.
According to several comments, the outsole unit is able to provide a dependable surface grip.
2 reasons not to buy
A few testers have noted that the forefoot section is a bit restrictive.
A couple of users have complained that the shoelaces are quick to unravel by themselves.
Bottom line
The Stealth III is an everyday partner for any activity. People can wear this Vivobarefoot running shoe for their speed training sessions and regular strolls. The versatile and flexible design of this product allows it to become an extension of the foot, offering mild protection from impact and surface debris. Barefoot runners can enjoy this close-to-the-ground offering."
Merrell Road Glove 3,,91.0,86.0,199.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.2oz , Women: 6.1oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Most of the runners noted that the excellent traction of the Road Glove 3 gave them confidence during their running sessions.
The Merrell Road Glove 3 is lighter by a substantial margin than any of the past versions.
Some runners liked the way the upper moved with the foot.
Many of the testers easily welcomed its breathable upper unit.
While this is built for shorter distances, a few experts observed that it became a great option for minimalist runners who like middle-distance runs.
The outsole durability impressed a handful of runners.
It has an affordable price.
3 reasons not to buy
A few runners were disappointed with the wide heel as it caused some wobbly heel movement.
A small number of runners found the Merrell Glove 3 as somewhat stiffer compared to other shoes of the same type.
There were complaints saying that it was only meant for short distance runs because they felt foot soreness when wearing it for an extended length of time.
Bottom line
The Merrell Glove 3 is an excellent minimalist shoe. It wraps the mid-foot very well, yet it offers almost no arch support. Barefoot-inclined individuals are the ones who are going to fully enjoy what it has to offer. Though a few found some drawbacks, it is still considered by many as a successful update to the notable Glove model."
Reebok Print Run Prime Ultraknit, Reebok,91.0,,114.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"8 reasons to buy
Many runners said that the Reebok Print Run Prime Ultraknit was comfortable.
A tester was impressed with the sturdiness of the shoe.
Various users agreed the shoe was lightweight and was great to wear for extended periods.
The upper was breathable and kept the foot cool for an entire day, a runner experienced.
One consumer found the outsole to have an efficient grip.
A lot of buyers liked the design of the shoe, as well as the various color choices.
A wearer commended the excellent balance of comfort, support, and stability in the Print Run Prime Ultraknit.
Numerous purchasers approved the shoe’s affordability.
5 reasons not to buy
The product was stiff and looked cheap, wrote several customers.
Some users thought there was not enough support for it to be a decent running shoe.
The shoe was too narrow, stated a buyer.
A few runners mentioned there was a lack of cushioning and bounce.
The outsole was too rigid and felt like cardboard, according to a couple of buyers.
Bottom line
The Reebok Print Run Prime Ultraknit was well-received by most of its users. Many praises were towards its construction and the efficiency of its features. On the other hand, some wearers were not impressed by the quality and fit. In summary, this was considered as a reliable running shoe and therefore a good purchase."
Adidas Terrex Skychaser, Adidas,91.0,83.0,334.0,$160,$90 (save 44%), Trail, Stability, Men: 11.5oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,, Normal | Normal,,"8 reasons to buy
Many runners considered the Adidas Terrex Skychaser to be a visually attractive shoe.
A number of consumers wrote that they actually found reliable quality and great value from this model, even though it had an arguably high price point.
There were purchasers who appreciated the overall construction of this shoe; for them, it was durable and generally well-made.
The outsole unit’s grip capability received recognition for being precise and unfailing; many testers didn’t report any slipping during their trail running experience.
The boost™ mid-sole really worked well for a lot of runners; they felt the responsiveness of this material as they tackled the trails.
The underfoot platform felt stable and supportive, reported a happy consumer.
Runners generally welcomed the breathable nature of this shoe’s upper fabric, citing that their feet remained cool and dry while wearing it.
Many reviewers agreed that the Adidas Terrex Skychaser is true-to-size.
2 reasons not to buy
An unsatisfied tester wasn’t too keen about this model because its forefoot section felt too narrow.
Some reviewers felt a bit of pain when initially wearing this shoe, stating that it was the effect of the break-in period.
Bottom line
The Adidas Terrex Skychaser generally received positive feedback from trail enthusiasts and shoe reviewers because they were satisfied with what it had to offer. Many of them wrote that its components actually helped them during their running sessions, particularly the stable midsole unit. But there were a few who thought that its overall construction was a bit inconsistent with what they were used to."
Inov-8 Roadclaw 275 v2, Inov-8,78.0,,49.0,$120,$80 (save 33%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,," Normal | Normal, Wide",,"7 reasons to buy
A good number of users said that the shoe was breathable and lightweight.
Many runners loved its lacing system.
A lot of testers commented that the cushioning was comfortable.
According to those who have tried it, the shoe performed well on tracks, parks, and roads.
Some reviewers agreed on the versatility and durability of the Inov-8 Roadclaw 275 v2.
A lot of purchasers said that the product was best for short and long-distance running activities.
Many runners mentioned that the sole provided enough traction on the surfaces.
2 reasons not to buy
A consumer mentioned that the toe box was a bit narrow. As a result, he was not able to spread out his toes comfortably.
Some runners said that the shoe length was smaller than the standard fit.
Bottom line
Many runners commented that the shoe was comfortable and breathable. They were happy that the outsole provided excellent traction for different types of roads and conditions. Although some runners were disappointed because of the product's narrow toe box and smaller shoe length than the standard size, others still recommended Inov-8 Roadclaw 275 v2 because of its versatility, durability, and performance on any running sessions."
Topo Athletic Magnifly 2, Topo Athletic,93.0,89.0,55.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
The Topo Athletic Magnifly 2 was great for daily runs, wrote a reviewer.
The shoe excelled on long distances, said a wearer.
Some runners mentioned that the toe box was roomy.
One tester liked how the upper had an incredibly soft and natural feel.
The midsole of the Magnifly 2 was firm and delivered a snappy and responsive ride, according to a purchaser.
The shoe did not require a break-in period, a few users claimed.
A customer remarked that the midsole was exceptionally responsive to fast-paced running.
1 reasons not to buy
The outsole started showing signs of wear after only less than 50 miles, stated a runner.
Bottom line
The Topo Athletic Magnifly 2 was a success with most of its users, as evident in the positive remarks geared towards the shoe’s performance, construction, and fit. The durability seemed to be an issue, but there was no other criticism aside from it. In summary, the Magnifly 2 was a fruitful update, and consumers have said it was an enjoyable shoe to wear."
Saucony Xodus ISO, Saucony,81.0,83.0,223.0,$130,$68 (save 57%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,, Normal | Normal, Saucony Xodus ISO 3,"6 reasons to buy
The upper unit uses the ISOFIT, a stretchable material that wraps around the foot like a sock.
The collar lining has RUNDRY, a soft fabric that’s able to stave off moisture.
Runners appreciated the inclusion of anti-debris components, such as the Gusseted Tongue and the Molded Toe Shell.
Contoured support is given to the underfoot by the ComofrtLite Sock Liner.
Quality cushioning and shock attenuation are handled by the responsive mid-sole foam.
The outsole rubber is able to adapt to many types of terrain, giving traction and protection to the runner at all times.
2 reasons not to buy
This running shoe has a slightly expensive price.
Some runners thought that the laces of this shoe were a bit short, which made tying their shoes tedious.
Bottom line
The Saucony Xodus ISO is a good-looking running shoe that’s great when taken to off-road adventures. Featuring protective elements and reliable cushioning systems, this neutral shoe is going to do wonders for trail runners and trekkers who want to go off the beaten path."
Reebok PT Prime Run 2.0, Reebok,86.0,,75.0,$60,$26 (save 57%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
A good number of buyers says that the Reebok PT Prime Run 2.0 is affordable.
According to many testers, the shoe is comfortable.
It is stylish, based on some reviews.
Several purchasers agree that the running shoe is breathable.
A significant number of consumers love how the shoe performs in walking, running, and workout activities.
Many reviewers admire its lightweight structure.
Some purchasers love its cushioning.
3 reasons not to buy
According to several testers, the shoe is not true to size. It runs bigger than usual.
A user says that the shoe does not have enough support for exercising and walking.
The quality is poor, based on a review.
Bottom line
The Reebok PT Prime Run 2.0 is a neutral running shoe that is strategically designed for road running. The shoe gains a lot of praise because of its comfort level and fantastic design. Though some users have issues with its quality, sizing, and support, these problems did not hinder others from recommending the shoe for walking and running activities. Overall, this shoe receives positive comments and feedback because of its style and performance on the roads."
Inov-8 Trailroc 270, Inov-8,81.0,88.0,13.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm, Jul 2017, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Most runners mentioned that the Inov-8 Trailroc 270 offers less cushioning but provides plenty of protection for off-road running. 
Several users lauded the performance of the rock plate; it protects the bottom of the feet efficiently.
The trail running shoe offers great traction on varied trail surfaces, based on some user reviews.
A few buyers mentioned that the shoe is comfortable.
Some were happy with the shoe's lightweight design.
The shoe is good looking, according to a few comments.
1 reasons not to buy
A significant number of purchasers said that the shoe runs small; a few even described the sizing as `weird`.
Bottom line
The Inov-8 Trailroc 270 is a lightweight trail running shoe. Most trail runners admired the shoe's traction, design, and performance. Though there have been issues when it comes to the sizing, the Trailroc 270 has still proven to be a reliable shoe. If you are a runner who is looking for a shoe that offers less cushioning but impressive foot protection, then you should include this shoe in your list."
Asics GT 2000 4 GTX,,87.0,,109.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.9oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics GT 2000 8 GTX,"6 reasons to buy
The GORE-TEX waterproof upper unit serves as the fabric of the GT 2000 4 GTX.
The heel clutching system keeps the foot in place, thus reducing the risk of accidental removals.
Runners generally appreciate the Gel Cushioning System, a silicon-based unit that offers shock absorption.
The Impact Guidance System and Guidance Trusstic System offer a better stride by assisting the foot in a balanced manner.
The AHAR or the Asics High Abrasion Resistant rubber makes up a durable outsole unit that protects the shoe from wear and damage.
The DuraSponge layer adds a cushioning mechanic to the outsole that’s also flexible.
3 reasons not to buy
The GT 2000 4 GTX has a slightly expensive price.
The men’s version has a moderately heavy weight.
There were runners who felt that the mid-sole unit was a bit too stiff, limiting the natural movement of the foot.
Bottom line
The GT 2000 4 GTX from Asics is a great-looking daily running shoe that offers support for those who need it and waterproof protection all throughout. Its durability is dependable, making it great for high mileage training. Overall, the shoe is a reliable road running partner."
New Balance 1080 v5,,87.0,80.0,224.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 9.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, New Balance Fresh Foam 1080 v10,"7 reasons to buy
Most runners observed the comfortable feel of the 1080 v5 upon landing.
The 5th instalment of the 1080 is relatively lightweight for what New Balance calls as its top neutral cushioned shoe.
A very nice fit without being constrictive is commonly mentioned in some reviews.
Traction is superlative, even in wet conditions, according to quite a number of runners.
The FantomFit technology provides a seamless construction that lessens the risk of irritation or blisters.
Forefoot responsiveness is evident as noted by a handful.
The T-Beam shank offers torsional integrity and stable ride.
4 reasons not to buy
The 1080 v5 is expensive.
Some runners felt that the transition could have been much better.
There is no reflective material.
Several were disappointed in the lack of durability for an expensive shoe.
Bottom line
While the New Balance 1080 v5 may not be the highly-cushioned shoe as advertised, the cushioning is still plush, particularly in the heel. The neutral running shoe like its latest counterpart the Fresh Foam 1080 v9, the 1080 v5 has very nice arch support and great cushioning. Runners will love the luxurious comfort and relatively lightweight performance of this shoe."
Reebok Speed Breeze 2, Reebok,85.0,,6.0,$60,$35 (save 42%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
More than a handful of consumers have lauded the cushioning system of the Reebok Speed Breeze 2 for being responsive.
People are generally happy with the affordable price of this road running shoe.
The lightweight nature of this product is welcomed by those who appreciate all-day wearing sessions.
According to some testers, the shoe is versatile enough to be used for many activities.
The upper unit of this shoe is deemed breathable and gives a cool-feeling wrap.
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of testers have noted that the insole is firm and irritating to the pad of the foot.
The forefoot section of the Speed Breeze 2 is a bit restrictive, based on a handful of reviews.
Bottom line
People who are just getting into running as a part of their routines can enjoy the Reebok Speed Breeze 2. This neutral running shoe has an affordable price that won’t alienate those who are potentially interested in the activity. It also has industry-standard technologies to help with performance. A foam midsole, a breathable upper, and a lightweight build assist the wearer when taking each step."
Inov-8 RoadTalon 240, Inov-8,87.0,86.0,97.0,$110,$90 (save 31%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8.5oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,," Normal | Normal, Wide",,"4 reasons to buy
Most consumers welcomed the lightweight nature of the Inov-8 Roadtalon 240.
Several users admired the durable construction of the RoadTalon 240.
The shoe offers a great level of comfort, as noted in some user comments.
The design and color schemes of this running shoe were lauded; many felt that the product was visually endearing.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners complained that the midsole unit didn’t suitably cushion the foot.
A consumer reported that the upper fabric’s lightness prevented it from giving a snug and secure fit.
Bottom line
Many people appreciated the lightweight construction of the Inov-8 Roadtalon 240, as well as its eye-catching looks. But others felt that this neutral shoe’s negative aspects far outweighed its potential to be a dependable companion for the roads. The width profiles received some flak for being inconsistent; the upper unit and underfoot platform also got criticized for being inefficient. These seemingly simple concerns were mainly the reason why most purchasers didn’t consider it as their go-to footwear for their running sessions."
Asics Piranha 5,,85.0,77.0,33.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 3.9oz , Women: 3.9oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Cushioning and shock-absorbing features are achieved by the Solyte midsole.
This shoe is very lightweight.
The upper adapts very well with the foot’s movement, according to most runners.
Some runners were impressed by the improved transition in this model.
A large majority of runners loved the way the Piranha 5 encourages speed and efficacy.
3 reasons not to buy
The price of the Asics Piranha 5 is slightly higher compared to other shoes of the same type of performance and quality.
It is mainly limited to racing in shorter courses unless the runner is a full-blown minimalist runner.
Some runners complained that the Piranha 5’s durability leaves so much to be desired.
Bottom line
The Asics Piranha 5 is flat out a racing shoe. It is about a few millimeters from becoming a true barefoot shoe and has next-to-nothing arch support. On the plus side, barefoot runners can use the shoe as a long-distance option due to the “sufficient” cushioning."
Altra Superior 3.0, Altra,85.0,76.0,360.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm, Dec 2016, Normal | Normal, Altra Superior 4.0,"11 reasons to buy
The Altra Superior 3.0 provides a reliable traction, as noted in some reviews.
Many liked the durable and breathable upper of the shoe.
Some runners love the light weight construction of the shoe, making it ideal for racing and uptempo trainings.
The shoe provides a comfortable fit, according to some who tried it.
A number of runners applauded the durable outsole unit of the Superior 3.0.
The shoe does not disappoint even on wet and slippery surfaces, as noted in some reviews.
Many runners were satisfied that the outsole sheds off mud easily.
A handful of reviewers welcomed the improved stability in this shoe.
Ground feedback was evident without losing protection, as reported by a few expert testers.
Most expert reviewers consider the Superior 3.0 as an improvement over all the other earlier versions of this shoe.
Altra offers a more durable mesh to answer past issues of premature ripping in the upper.
6 reasons not to buy
A number of runners noticed that the shoe is too narrow for their foot measurements.
Many were complaining about the small sizing of the shoe.
The top of the toe box creases when the foot flexes prior to take-off, based on the observations of a handful of runners.
It is heavier than the past model.
The shoe does not drain water out fast or dry quickly, according to some testers.
No additional widths, which are craved by some runners.
Bottom line
Designed for trail running, the Altra Superior 3.0 gathered mixed reviews from users. Positive comments geared towards the shoe's performance and design while negative ones were about the shoe's fit and sizing. Overall, the shoe provides a lightweight yet reliable cushioning. It also provides durability and impressive traction on varied trail conditions. "
Under Armour Threadborne Slingflex, Under Armour,90.0,90.0,284.0,$100,$75 (save 32%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Feb 2017, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
A lot of users stressed that the shoe offered remarkable comfortability.
Most of the customers appreciated the snug fit of the footwear.
Many fashionistas admired the overall look and design of the shoe.
A lot of buyers appreciated the different colors the Under Armour Threadborne Slingflex was available in.
Several users highlighted the lightweight nature of the shoe, which enabled them to run without worrying about getting tired being weighed down.
A few runners mentioned that the Under Armour Threadborne Slingflex was sufficiently flexible to allow for a smooth and natural ride.
Some purchasers commented that it had an affordable price.
3 reasons not to buy
The shoe fell apart after only a couple of months, according to a purchaser.
The insole of the shoe was too flimsy for some users.
A user said that the Threadborne Slingflex was not able to provide sufficient arch support.
Bottom line
The Under Armour Threadborne Slingflex is for the individuals who are looking for a highly comfortable yet optimally responsive neutral road shoe. It has a knit upper that looks unique and feels very soft against the skin. The well-cushioned environment, the lightweight disposition, and the stylish looks make this footwear definite everyday wear for most casual and enthusiast runners."
Under Armour Threadborne Fortis 3, Under Armour,88.0,81.0,109.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 7.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"9 reasons to buy
Many runners loved the well-constructed upper.
Some reviewers mentioned that this running shoe featured incredible cushioning.
Some of the runners commented that the Under Armour Threadborne Fortis 3 had a durable outsole.
A handful of consumers agreed that the shoe was lightweight, responsive and comfortable.
A good number of purchasers noted that the product has excellent quality.
A lot of users observed that its color variations were impressive.
Several buyers lauded its exceptional performance.
Based on some reviews, its design and appearance were best suited not only for running sessions but also for casual occasions.
According to those who have tried it, the fit was perfect for them.
2 reasons not to buy
According to a tester, the shoe did not perform well on running and walking activities.
A reviewer mention that he felt a little pain in his big toe while wearing the product.
Bottom line
The majority of the purchasers commented that the Under Armour Threadborne Fortis 3 was a responsive, lightweight and comfortable shoe. They were content with its perfect fit and durable outsole. They loved wearing the product not only for short and long-distance running and walking activities but also for casual occasions. Although several of them said that it did not perform or fit properly, others still recommended the Under Armour Threadborne Fortis 3 because of its visually-appealing appearance, attractive design, excellent cushioning, and fantastic performance."
Nike Lunar Skyelux, Nike,96.0,97.0,1179.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.4oz , Women: 7.7oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm, Nov 2016, Normal | Normal,,"11 reasons to buy
A good number of reviewers noticed that the Lunar Skyelux is one of the most comfortable shoes they have ever worn.
The price is quite reasonable.
Several runners noticed that it runs very light despite the thick cushioning.
Most of the reviewers focused on the aesthetic appeal of the Nike Skyelux.
It is a very breathable shoe, according to a handful of comments.
The plush collar, tongue, and smooth fabric combine for luxurious next to skin feel.
Some runners greatly appreciated the superb traction coming from this shoe.
It comes in 7 different color combinations.
According to a few reviews, the soles were very sturdy.
Several reviewers appreciated the attached tongue as they stay in place throughout their runs or when they are working out.
A handful of runners have used the shoe for workouts in the gym.
2 reasons not to buy
It runs a bit large, according to a handful.
When landing, the shoe often produces a sound that irritated a few runners.
Bottom line
The Nike Lunar Skyelux enters the near maximum cushioning category with the stack height and heel offset of most traditional trainers. Nike designed the shoe for daily training at moderate speed. At a very fair price, runners get a ton of shoe from such a lightweight package. Plus, it delivers decent arch support, great comfort, and the style that can readily turn heads on the road."
New Balance 1500 v4, New Balance,94.0,93.0,795.0,$110,$59 (save 89%), Road, Stability, Men: 8.6oz , Women: 7.1oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm, Jan 2018," Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Normal, Wide", New Balance 1500 v6,"5 reasons to buy
Several consumers noted that the toe box of the New Balance 1500 v4 was noticeably roomier than the previous version, making the experience better.
Many people felt that the sizing scheme followed their expectations.
The upper maintained a cool and dry experience on the roads, a tester commented.
Several runners noted that the weight of this running shoe was fittingly light.
The stability mechanism in the midsole wasn’t too obvious that it became a noticeable bump, a reviewer noted.
2 reasons not to buy
There is less support than what was expected from the shoe, according to some wearers.
The reflectivity wasn’t as prominent as the previous version, a tester noted.
Bottom line
People were chiefly appreciative of the New Balance 1500 v4. They welcomed this stability road shoe’s roomy toe box, the breathable façade, its lightweight nature, and the unobtrusive stability mechanism. But the sizing scheme was apparently inconsistent, and that reflectivity wasn’t as efficient."
Salomon S-Lab XA Amphib 2, Salomon,85.0,,7.0,,, Trail, Neutral,,, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
The Salomon S-Lab XA Amphib 2 performed greatly on muddy surfaces, according to some runners.
Several wearers agree that the running shoe is lightweight.
The outsole provides excellent traction even on slippery surfaces, said a reviewer.
The shoe is comfortable even when worn without socks, a commenter noted.
Some users have appreciated how the shoe is quick to stave off the water.
2 reasons not to buy
A few users claimed that the shoe is not as durable as expected.
Some buyers think the shoe is expensive.
Bottom line
The Salomon S/Lab XA Amphib 2 running shoes have successfully proven their high-quality performance in both wet or dry conditions. With its precise fit and terrain-specific configurations, this shoe provides runners with the necessary traction, water drainage system, and cushioning that allows them to log many miles on the outdoors."
Adidas Alphabounce EM, Adidas,85.0,80.0,7.0,$110,$64 (save 42%), Road, Neutral, Men: 11oz , Women: 9.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Nov 2016, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
The versatile and modern design of the Adidas Alphabounce EM allows it to be used for any activity, based on most reviews.
Some users believe that the general durability of this road running shoe is spot-on with their expectations.
The cushioning unit of this product is welcomed because it is responsive and comfortable.
According to most purchasers, the grip given by the outsole unit is dependable.
The upper unit of this product is deemed seamless and non-irritating to the skin.
Almost all of the users have claimed that the quality of this shoe is worth its relatively mid-tier price.
2 reasons not to buy
Some people believe that the in-shoe experience near the forefoot is a bit too restrictive.
A few consumers have noted that the insole has a tendency to dig into the sole of the foot.
Bottom line
The Adidas Alphabounce EM aims to be one of the most reliable go-to running shoes for any occasion. The sleek and contemporary design of this model accommodates any activity. Still, it has a traction-ready outsole, a secure upper unit construction, and a midsole that aims for long-term comfort. Performance and stylishness come together in this made-for-anyone offering from the brand that popularized the three-stripe logo."
Nike Air Zoom Wildhorse 3,,88.0,82.0,12.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Nike Air Zoom Wildhorse 6,"5 reasons to buy
Many were impressed by the updated version of the Nike Air Zoom Wildhorse which offers great levels of comfort, cushioning and support.
The Nike Air Zoom Wildhorse 3 has a rock plate that keeps the foot protected while running on rough surfaces.
The rubber forefoot gives impressive grip on wet surfaces.
The 3rd version of the Air Zoom Wildhorse has a wider forefoot for enhanced foot splay and comfort.
The Wildhorse 3 is durable, said some user reviews.
2 reasons not to buy
The shoe is too narrow for some runners.
Some complained that the laces loosen constantly which is quite annoying.
Bottom line
The Nike Air Zoom Wildhorse 3 offers more than its previous version. It gives runners maximum support and impressive protective comfort. This shoe was designed for trail running and it has the traction needed for wet and rough surfaces. Overall, the Wildhorse gained positive reviews from its users."
Newton Distance V,,88.0,74.0,162.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.1oz , Women: 6.1oz, Men: 2mm , Women: 2mm,,, Newton Distance 9,"4 reasons to buy
Many runners applauded the lightweight construction of the Distance V.
According to some reviews, the shoe is very comfortable and supportive especially on long runs.
It comes with an improved seamless upper construction for enhanced ventilation and conformity.
This shoe is super fast, as highlighted in most reviews.
2 reasons not to buy
The Newton Distance V is expensive.
Some do not like the colors of the 5th update of the Newton Distance.
Bottom line
The Newton Distance V is a lightweight neutral running shoe that offers a combination of comfort, breathability, support, and flexibility. The new ice lugs and full flex zone accommodates the splay of the foot. This shoe is ideal for race days and daily training."
Adidas Duramo 7 ATR, Adidas,88.0,,29.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
The Adidas Duramo 7 ATR is an all-weather and all-terrain beast built for the toughest outdoor conditions.
A large number of reviews really valued the amazing traction of the Duramo 7 ATR.
A few runners also noted how comfortable the shoe is out of the box.
A couple of wearers have used for hiking and mountain climbing with good results.
A handful of users approved of the shoe’s durability.
Relatively lightweight despite the numerous protection and all-weather membrane.
3 reasons not to buy
Some users hated the plastic-like look of the iconic three stripes.
According to a few runners, the sole is a bit inflexible.
It looks bulky based on the observations of a small group of runners.
Bottom line
The Adidas Duramo 7 ATR is designed for the most difficult and toughest outdoor environment. It performs like a tank on the trail without being clumsy. Runners can get sufficient arch support and protection no matter the distance or speed in this shoe."
Under Armour Charged Bandit,,88.0,82.0,270.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 8.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Under Armour Charged Bandit 4,"5 reasons to buy
It features breathable mesh upper and seamless overlays for a comfortable feel.
Reviewers emphasized the durability, support, and comfort that Under Armour Charged Bandit offers.
Most runners are impressed with the padding on the heel and tongue of the Charged Bandit.
It provides energy return and stability.
Charged Bandit is made up of a fast-drying fabric.
2 reasons not to buy
Most runners find the ankle wrap too tight on their Achilles.
Few runners don’t like the Charged Bandit because of its narrow fit.
Bottom line
The Under Armour Charged Bandit provides runners with comfort and stability. You can run as fast as you can without worrying about the cushioning on your feet. Testers found this shoe suitable for short and long runs. The Bandit is ideal for those who are looking for affordable and lightweight stability shoe."
Saucony Triumph 11, Saucony,91.0,82.0,693.0,$140,$112 (save 20%), Road, Neutral, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,," Normal, Wide | Normal", Saucony Triumph ISO 5,"5 reasons to buy
The shoe has a great cushioning based on some reviews.
The plush and comfortable fit gained positive feedback from the users.
Many runners were impressed by how durable the shoe is.
The shoe is comfortable to wear and breathable enough.
Available in different color options.
3 reasons not to buy
It is slightly expensive.
Not flexible enough according to some runners.
Some mentioned that the Saucony Triumph 11 is too narrow for them
Bottom line
The Saucony Triumph 11 is a neutral shoe for road running. The shoe delivers a great combination of comfort, cushioning and protection. With the technologies attached to this shoe, the Triumph 11 will not disappoint when used for daily training and long runs. Based on reviews, the shoe is indeed a successful release. "
Dynafit Feline SL, Dynafit,86.0,86.0,33.0,$150,$131 (save 13%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
Most reviews mentioned that the Dynafit Feline SL delivered a good amount of protection to the foot.
Some users said that the forefoot was roomy but their feet still felt secured.
The shoe’s light weight was a popular pro among testers.
A few users observed that the toe box had enough wiggle room.
Plenty of users were impressed by the level of grip the shoe offered during the trail running sessions.
The lace pocket was a welcome shoe feature, based on several reviews.
Despite the level of protection, most runners were happy to report that the shoe kept their feet cool.
2 reasons not to buy
Most testers felt that the entire shoe was a tad narrow for their feet.
A majority of users experienced some flimsiness in the upper, especially on the midfoot zone. One user accounted that was because of the lack of overlays on this area.
Bottom line
Dynafit’s Feline SL is a neutral, trail running shoe that can provide the utmost protection on the trails while also presenting runners with the benefits of using a lightweight shoe. Specifically designed to tackle soft ground, mud, and snow, this shoe is a solid mid-priced option for those looking to speed through the trail without worrying about slipping and bumping into objects on the trail, which can cause injury."
Asics Gel Torrance Trail, Asics,85.0,,10.0,$70,$40 (save 43%), Trail, Neutral,,,,,," Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Normal, Wide, X-Wide",,"5 reasons to buy
People have mentioned that the lightweight nature of the Asics Gel Torrance Trailis a boon for fans of all-day adventures.
The underfoot cushioning system is praised for cushioning the foot responsibly.
Some users have noted that this trail running shoe has a versatile construction that permits quick transitions to flat surfaces.
The silhouette of this product is welcomed because it is sporty yet not obnoxiously large.
Several purchasers have noted that the price is affordable.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people have complained that the platform is a bit thin for long-term support.
A couple of users have noted that the midfoot part of the upper restricts the foot and chafes the skin.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of people towards the Gel Torrance Trail has been mostly positive. This Asics trail running shoe is lauded for providing individuals with a versatile underfoot experience, whether on the trails or the roads. The appealing design and affordable price are also highlighted.
Fans of running footwear that accommodate both casual use and active lifestyles can enjoy the Asics Gel Torrance Trail."
Mizuno Wave Ekiden 10,,86.0,86.0,38.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 5.1oz , Women: 5.1oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The upper unit has breathable coverage through the AIRmesh material.
The Slip Last is a construction mechanic in the upper which utilizes wrapping and stitching to the mid-sole unit, offering flexibility and lesser weight.
The U4ic is a mid-sole material that’s lightweight and resilient when it comes to flexible support and shock absorption.
A hardened Wave unit made of resin is placed in the heel area that offers shock dispersion.
The G3 Sole is a rubber material that’s lightweight and responsive, providing flexible support and traction.
The 10th version of the Ekiden is a very lightweight running shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners thought that it needed a bit more cushioning to adequately carry the foot.
Others felt that due to its minimalist design, this shoe wasn’t meant for those who want to tackle long-distance races.
Bottom line
The Wave Ekiden 10 from Mizuno is a popular running shoe that offers minimal underfoot support, which is a great detail for minimalist runners. Its near-barefoot construction makes it an ideal option for close-to-the-ground running. Based on the majority of the reviews, this lightweight running shoe offers average performance on the road."
Asics FuzeX Lyte 2, Asics,90.0,,385.0,$85,$55 (save 35%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Apr 2017, Normal | Normal,,"9 reasons to buy
Many wearers claimed that the Asics FuzeX Lyte 2 was lightweight.
One buyer remarked that the shoe was so comfortable, it could “almost be worn to bed.” Meanwhile, others likened the shoe to “walking on a mattress.”
Several users stated the shoe fit them snugly.
The FuzeX Lyte 2 reduced shin issues, a runner expressed.
Various reviewers admired the design of the shoe. Others mentioned it looked simple yet elegant, while some thought it had a fresh and clean look.
The shoe also worked well at the gym, and on grassy paths, aside from road surfaces, a customer wrote.
The heel cushioning was incredible, noticed a buyer.
A lot of consumers agreed the shoe was inexpensive.
The FuzeX Lyte 2 did a great job of correcting underpronation, according to numerous wearers.
3 reasons not to buy
The tongue rubbed against and irritated the skin of the foot, said a wearer. Another said they were bothered by having to adjust the position of the tongue repetitively.
Some users found the shoe sizing to be small.
The collar hit the ankle bone at times, which was uncomfortable, a reviewer noted.
Bottom line
The FuzeX Lyte 2 is a road running shoe design for neutral runners. The shoe received both negative and positive feedback. The overwhelming number of positive comments has proven that the Asics FuzeX Lyte 2 was satisfactory to a lot of runners. The shoe’s features, performance, and fit have all gathered praises, while very few issues were found on some of the upper elements. With that said, most customers have enjoyed using the shoe and therefore were happy with their purchase."
Adidas Terrex Swift R GTX, Adidas,91.0,86.0,762.0,$135,$90 (save 33%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 15.2oz , Women: 10.9oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,," Normal | Normal, Wide",,"6 reasons to buy
Several experts and testers gave really high marks to the shoe’s rugged and reliable performance.
Excellent durability is an overwhelming point coming from practically all users of the Terrex Swift R GTX.
The waterproofing membrane functions well, according to some reviews.
The Adidas Terrex Swift R GTX remains breathable despite the waterproofing features.
Unbelievable comfort enhances the shoe’s appeal, according to several runners.
After durability, the superior grip on a multitude of mountain or off-road terrain under all kinds of conditions is the most common comment from most users.
2 reasons not to buy
The Adidas Terrex Swift R GTX is heavy.
The shoe is slightly expensive.
Bottom line
While the word tank is thrown around often when it comes to heavy-duty shoes, this is certainly apt for the Adidas Terrex Swift R GTX. The superior cushioning, comfort, and durability come at the expense of weight. However, as hikers will triumphantly note, this is a much lighter shoe compared to the traditional hiking cleats without giving away too much of the needed performance under such challenging conditions."
Asics Gel Equation 8, Asics,87.0,,684.0,$80,$45 (save 98%), Road, Neutral, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Many noticed the satisfying arch support of the Gel Equation 8.
Some gave thumbs up to the new and updated look of the Asics Gel Equation 8.
This shoe has a plush collar and tongue, according to several runners.
The Asics Gel Equation 8 offers plenty of cushioning, as mentioned in some reviews.
Available in an affordable price.
3 reasons not to buy
Based on some reviews, this shoe is too narrow and not ideal for wide-footed runners.
According to some testers, they felt uncomfortable in this shoe when used in high mileage running.
Some noticed that 8th version of the Gel Equation is not as durable as the other versions.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Equation 8 is a neutral running shoe that is designed for road running. Some runners thought that this shoe is not ideal and durable enough for long runs. This pair of running shoe is great for everyday running and daily training."
Brooks Ricochet LE,,85.0,,172.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Brooks Ricochet 2 LE,"7 reasons to buy
Several users lauded the good-looking design of the Brooks Ricochet LE; they said they get compliments from wearing the shoe.
Most runners described the shoe as ‘very comfortable’, even after wearing for long hours.
This road running shoe runs true to size, according to most user reviews.
A few buyers mentioned that the shoe is durable.
A couple of wearers admired the shoe’s breathable coverage.
The Ricochet LE delivers responsive cushioning, said few reviews.
Based on users’account, the shoe is not only best for running but also for walking.
2 reasons not to buy
A few users mentioned that the shoe feels heavy on foot.
A couple of runners were disappointed by the upper’s loose fit.
Bottom line
Designed for road running, the Brooks Ricochet LE has satisfied a lot of users. The good-looking design, comfortable cushioning, and breathability gained positive reviews, but the fit and weight made a few runners disappointed. Overall, despite the flaws, the Ricochet LE has proven to be a reliable running shoe."
Nike Air Zoom Winflo 5 Run Shield,,85.0,,44.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10oz , Women: 10oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"4 reasons to buy
One of the users said that the Nike Air Zoom Winflo 5 Run Shield was lightweight in structure.
Several reviewers commented that the shoe was comfortable.
The unique lacing system of the footwear was admired by some purchasers.
A buyer lauded the shoe's performance in fall and winter running sessions.
1 reasons not to buy
Some users criticized the poor quality build of the shoe.
Bottom line
The Nike Air Zoom Winflo 5 Run Shield made some of the consumers happy and contented because of its lightweight structure. They loved the footwear's lacing system. Although one of them has an issue with its size, others still recommend the shoe because of the comfort it provides throughout the running activities. Overall, the Nike Air Zoom Winflo 5 Run Shield gained the trust of the users because of its excellent performance on a wide variety of surfaces, especially during winter and fall running activities."
Asics DynaFlyte 3 SP,,91.0,,27.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.1oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
A few runners praise the Asics DynaFlyte 3 SP’s contribution to their speed when running. 
The lightweight construction of the shoe has been lauded by a lot of buyers.
Several testers claim that this neutral running shoe is very comfortable to run in. 
Some reviewers state that the shoe required no break-in period.
The sufficient cushioning of the shoe provides excellent support, some wearers have commented.
The shoe is a great long-distance running companion according to numerous runners.
2 reasons not to buy
After using the Asics DynaFlyte 3 SP for various running activities, several runners note that heel wrap of the shoe started to wear.
The upper material of the shoe easily wore out after several uses, one customer commented.
Bottom line
The Asics DynaFlyte 3 SP has garnered a lot of positive reviews from different runners and testers. The overall comfort and support that the shoe offers are lauded by many. The shoe is also employing a lightweight construction that helps runners conserve energy. True to its promise of enabling a faster run, the Asics DynaFlyte 3 SP has been highly acclaimed for its contribution to the runner’s speed. "
Asics Jolt,,89.0,88.0,7.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Several purchasers laud the comfort of the Asics Jolt. 
The running shoe has good arch support, expressed numerous testers. 
According to various commenters, the platform permits natural toe splay.
There are a number of users claiming that the neutral shoe has a sturdy build. 
A few customers appreciate the ventilation within the platform.
The Asics running shoe offers ample security, reported some reviewers.
3 reasons not to buy
Multiple critics find the road running shoe too bulky.
It lacks responsiveness, shared some experts. 
The running shoe causes drag when running, observed a few racers.
Bottom line
A neutral running shoe from Asics, the Jolt delivers a featherlight, durable construction. Sporting top-tier technologies from the brand, the running platform is suited for runners looking for a flawless, uninterrupted ride. Offered at an affordable price, the Asics Jolt does not disappoint when it comes to maximizing stability and resilience."
New Balance 1400 v3,,90.0,87.0,151.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.5oz , Women: 5.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, New Balance 1400 v6,"6 reasons to buy
Most runners applauded the lightweight and durable construction of the New Balance 1400 v3.
The 3rd version of the New Balance 1400 features no-sew overlays for added security.
It is very comfortable and flexible as mentioned in some reviews.
A significant number of runners mentioned that the shoe is very responsive because of its Revlite midsole.
The shoe feels light and fast for competition, as noted in some reviews.
A reasonably-priced shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners did not like the new color combination of the shoe.
It is too narrow and too tight for several runners.
Bottom line
The New Balance 1400 v3 gained positive remarks from its users, but there are also a few negative comments geared towards the shoe's narrow and tight fit. Overall, the 1400 v3 has proven to be a successful release. The shoe is a light and fast running shoe that works incredibly well on race day. It is ideal for those who are looking for comfort, flexibility, and secure fit. "
Salomon Sense Pro,,90.0,84.0,59.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,, Salomon Sense Pro 4,"6 reasons to buy
A hybrid type of shoe because it keeps your feet closer to the trail while still providing full-length protection.
This shoe was designed with a solid toe cap and a rugged design for the upper.
This is the shoe praised by many testers for its ability to handle different trails even with its minimalist style.
The lace system is very efficient for a trail running shoe, say many runners.
The feet are very comfortable and it brings confidence to runners, as observed by testers.
It works pretty well on city trails, and even on rougher and tougher wild trails.
3 reasons not to buy
There is a lack of volume for the cushioning, as complained by some testers.
It has a slightly expensive price.
This is not the shoe for runners who want a robust and extensive cushioning foam underneath the foot.
Bottom line
The Salomon Sense Pro is a great trail shoe with great and efficient design for a minimalist style of running. There is a full-length plate that protects the foot from trail challenges. The low drop design provides a very satisfying closer ground feel. It is a wise choice to invest on for minimalist trail running."
Hoka One One TenNine,,86.0,78.0,9.0,,, Trail, Stability, Men: 12.7oz , Women: 12.7oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Some runners claim that the underfoot platform is stable enough to avert overpronation.
The Hoka One One TenNine is welcomed because it offers responsible cushioning, especially when tackling the unpredictable trails.
Several people are happy because the outsole unit of this trail running shoe is grippy and reliable.
The durability of the materials used in this shoe is highlighted as an advantageous trait.
Descending traversals are controllable and functionally accommodating, based on a couple of reviews.
2 reasons not to buy
The specialized purpose of this product is lamented by those who feel awkward because of the protruding heel part of the platform.
A tester has complained of an irritating collar lining.
Bottom line
The overall feedback of people towards the TenNine has been positive. This Hoka One One running shoe is deemed efficient at maintaining balance and support when traversing the outdoor terrains. Traction and stability are also highlighted. The specialized design of the platform (heel part jutting out for stability and extra support) may prove to be a source of wobbliness when going on activities other than running."
Merrell Vapor Glove 2,,88.0,83.0,2804.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 5.8oz , Women: 4.8oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,, Merrell Vapor Glove 4,"6 reasons to buy
The upper unit is made from mesh and TPU materials, which offer secure and breathable coverage.
Many runners appreciate the 100% vegan-friendly construction.
The mesh lining and footbed have been coated with the M Select FRESH odor-wicking tech.
The outsole unit is made with a very durable and dependable Vibram layer.
The footbed has been integrated as one unit with the outsole, making a very minimalist and barefoot-like running experience.
The 2nd version of the Vapor Glove has a very lightweight nature.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners experienced getting the upper unit torn after a few months of use.
A few thought that a midsole cushioning system was needed to fully provide a responsive platform for their feet.
Bottom line
The Vapor Glove 2 from Merrell is a solid barefoot running shoe that can function well. Its security is snug and precise, and its flexibility is next to the natural movement of the foot. It’s a great option for daily training."
On Cloudrunner,,90.0,86.0,70.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.7oz , Women: 10.3oz, Men: 7mm , Women: 7mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
First thing runners noticed was the extra room around the toes, which is good for wider feet.
The Cloudrunner is built for multiple uses: for endurance, for triathlon, and for races.
Attractive aesthetics as observed by many testers.
The On Cloudrunner has great and quality feel according to many runners.
The CloudTec really gives that enjoyable cloud-like feeling when running, according to many runners who already tested it.
Springiness is felt during runs.
The overall construction is of high quality.
4 reasons not to buy
Protection in the heel area is lacking as complained by testers.
Laces that are too long are not ideal in a running shoe.
Stability is also lacking in the Cloudrunner.
A bit pricey.
Bottom line
The ON Cloudrunner is a multi-purpose running shoe built on the CloudTec technology. It offers comfort and style while holding up short or long runs on road trails. The combination of impressive aesthetics with the technologies used resulted in a very appealing shoe. A possible deal-breaker is the price, which is a bit high for many runners."
Nike Flex RN 2020,,81.0,,8.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Lightweight: The majority of users say the Nike Flex RN 2020 is not as clunky as other running shoes.
Stable: Most wearers say it offers great stability for a neutral shoe.
Comfort: Many testers review the shoe as very comfortable.
Supportive: The shoe gives excellent lower back and leg support, note some users.
Easy-clean: A lot of users like that the shoe is no fuss when it comes to cleaning.
Versatile: According to some reviewers, the Flex RN 2020 is practical for all-day wear.
Value: Several buyers like the affordability of the shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
Upper: Few buyers express that the upper was not as durable as expected in rough wearing.
Slippery: The sole can get slippery when worn for indoor training, says one user.
Bottom line
The Nike Flex RN 2020 is a great lightweight solution to your running needs. Designed to follow the success of its predecessors, the Flex RN 2020 continues to offer both flexibility and comfort. The updates that lead to the shoe’s excellent performance are the enhanced dual-density foam and the redesigned flex grooves that encourage a more natural running motion."
Under Armour Charged Rogue Twist,,89.0,,46.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
This neutral running shoe has good traction on varied surfaces, according to some runners.
A number of reviewers say that the cushioning of the Charged Rogue Twist is very comfortable especially for long-distance running.
One purchaser remarks that the shoe allows maximum flexibility. 
The Charged Cushioning® midsole of the Under Armour Charged Rogue Twist is lauded by a lot of people as it brings high responsiveness from the shoe. 
Some runners like the breathable engineered mesh upper of the shoe. 
A lot of the users also like the durability of the shoe because of its solid rubber outsole. 
The colorway of the shoe is appreciated by many. 
2 reasons not to buy
The heel of this Under Armour running shoe is a little stiff, states one user. 
Some wearers mention that the padding of the tongue is too thin. 
Bottom line
Generally, the response for the Under Armour Charged Rogue Twist is mostly positive. A lot of the users commend the good grip that the rubber outsole of the shoe provided. A lot of them also really liked the integration Charged Cushioning® into the midsole, which increases the shoe’s responsiveness. The shoe, as said by many, provides sufficient comfort, especially during long-distance running. Some of the concerns of the buyers were the stiff heel and the thin padding of the shoe’s tongue. "
New Balance Fresh Foam Rise,,75.0,,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.4oz , Women: 7.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A lot of the purchasers report that the New Balance Fresh Foam Rise is very comfortable. 
The shoe provides a lightweight feel, say some users. 
Several of the wearers say that the shoe is fit for different occasions; the shoe is very versatile. 
The shoe provides a snug fit, according to a few runners. 
A lot of runners mention that the shoe provides a high level of support.
The shoe is very responsive to varied surfaces, say some runners. 
A lot of the purchasers say that the shoe is very flexible. 
2 reasons not to buy
For some runners, the shoe feels too tight. 
One disappointed purchaser states that the shoe had twisted his ankle. 
Bottom line
The overall reception for the New Balance Fresh Foam Rise is a mix of both good and bad reviews. A lot of the runners like the comfort and the lightweight feel offered by the shoe. They also like the versatility of the shoe as it is fit for both long-distance runs and for casual occasions. However, some of the reviewers think that the shoe can feel a bit tight, which somehow constricts their movement. "
, Puma,,,,$60,$35 (save 42%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,
Nike LunarTempo 2,,86.0,82.0,210.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.5oz , Women: 6.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
A lot of runners welcomed the vibrant look of the Nike LunarTempo 2, and they said that it made the façade very appealing.
Many reviewers appreciated the look of this shoe, which resembled a knitted material that wrapped around the foot like a cloth.
The Flywire cables gained some fans who wanted the upper cover system to feel more snug and secure.
Several testers pointed out how comfortable their experience had been with this version.
Runners noticed the plush underfoot support given by the Lunarlon foam.
This running shoe felt adequately lightweight for many of those who have tried it.
There were consumers who were able to wear this shoe for many types of activities, and they reported no problems with it.
Some reviewers stated that this shoe was able to last long, that it resisted wear and tear even after many uses.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners felt that the mid-sole unit of the LunarTempo 2 was a bit stiff.
A tester reported that the threading on the back of the shoe came apart after only one use.
Bottom line
The Nike LunarTempo 2 was able to satisfy many neutral runners, especially those who needed reliable underfoot cushioning for their running sessions. They welcomed its colorful design, its modern look and its responsive components. Though it wasn’t able to please a few testers, many still touted it to be a solid choice for adventures on the pavement."
Under Armour Dash RN 2, Under Armour,95.0,95.0,672.0,$60,$50 (save 17%), Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 9oz,,,," Normal, X-Wide | Normal",,"8 reasons to buy
Most runners mentioned that the shoe was ‘super comfortable’ owing to its midsole foam.
The consumers seemed very happy with the good flexibility provided by the pair of shoes.
The purchasers highlighted that the shoe offered great attributes at a very reasonable price.
A few runners noticed that this shoe had a strong and durable build.
Some customers lauded the good traction capability of the outsole; they felt that it worked well on wet and dry surfaces.
A purchaser said that it was very easy to keep the shoe clean.
A runner admired the snug fit of the shoe since it prevented the foot from slipping or wobbling inside the foot-chamber during his running sessions.
Some users thought that the Under Armour Dash RN 2 was very stylish and pleasing to look at.
2 reasons not to buy
A number of wearers commented on the shoe's poor build quality.
A couple of users noticed that the tongue at the top of the shoe does not cover the entire top part of their feet.
Bottom line
With its incredible comfortability, high durability and optimal traction, the Under Armour Dash RN 2 has earned a large number of fans. For many neutral runners, it is a wise choice when it comes to finding a long-term, comfortable shoe at an affordable price."
Jordan 89 Racer, Jordan,67.0,,21.0,$100,$54 (save 55%), Road, Neutral,,,,, Nov 2019, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Some consumers claimed that the midfoot part of the Jordan 89 Racer’s midsole unit was able to support the arch, preventing it from getting fatigued.
The lightweight build of this road running shoe was praised by those who appreciated a product that didn’t drag the foot down.
The aesthetics of this product gained positive feedback from casual shoe enthusiasts and those who wanted fashionable foot apparel for the gym.
According to a couple of runners, the upper unit wrapped around the foot like a glove, giving a smooth a non-irritating coverage.
The midsole was a responsive and flexible piece that didn’t limit shock attenuation and support, based on a handful of reviews.
It is reasonably priced.
1 reasons not to buy
A few people observed some foot fatigue when trying to use the Jordan 89 Racer for races and extended running sessions.
Bottom line
Runners and appreciators of performance footwear were happy with what the Jordan 89 Racer had to offer. They felt that this neutral running shoe was able to provide comfort and security throughout their activities. The overall design was also lauded, as was the non-irritating fabric of the upper unit. The few complaints that cropped up were about the midsole not maintaining its supportiveness when undertaking races and speed training.
Roadsters and those with no pronation concerns may find the Jordan 89 Racer to be a suitable partner for their active lifestyles."
New Balance Cypher Run Knit,,77.0,,29.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.2oz , Women: 6.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Many users described the New Balance Cypher Run Knit as a very comfortable running shoe.
The shoe is versatile enough for walking and gym training.
Several purchasers agreed that the shoe is true to size.
The Cypher Run Knit is an affordable running shoe.
Some runners admired the shoe’s lightweight design.
The color options are eye-catching, said a few wearers.
2 reasons not to buy
One user mentioned that the shoe is difficult to put on.
The eyelets rub the skin that causes irritation on the top of the foot, according to one disappointed buyer.
Bottom line
The New Balance Cypher Run Knit is a road running shoe designed for neutral runners. It gathered positive and negative feedback from its users. Users admired the shoe’s versatility, comfort, and design. Though there are few who have expressed dissatisfaction, this running shoe is still worth trying."
Reebok Interrupted Sole, Reebok,79.0,,33.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
The toe box of the Reebok Interrupted Sole is welcomed because it is apparently spacious enough to welcome toe-splay.
The design and color scheme of this Reebok running shoe is welcomed by runners who appreciate cool-looking footwear.
Most testers agree that the price of this product is affordable and friendly to the wallet.
Cushioning quality is on par with the expectations of everyday runners and casual shoe enthusiasts.
All-day activities are of no consequence when the foot is in the Interrupted Sole.
The weight of this running shoe is apparently suitably light for any activities, even ones that are not running.
2 reasons not to buy
Some consumers have claimed that there is a space in the arch that would cause the foot to desire more support.
The in-shoe experience near the midfoot section is a bit wobbly, based on a handful of reviews.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of people towards the Reebok Interrupted Sole has been relatively positive. This neutral running shoe is supposedly a highly agreeable part of the daily attire. The niceness of the cushioning, the appealing look of the facade, and the lightweight structure are all welcomed. Conversely, the unsteady in-shoe feel is criticized.
Fans of road running shoes are the target market of the Reebok Interrupted Sole."
Merrell Road Glove 3,,91.0,86.0,199.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.2oz , Women: 6.1oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Most of the runners noted that the excellent traction of the Road Glove 3 gave them confidence during their running sessions.
The Merrell Road Glove 3 is lighter by a substantial margin than any of the past versions.
Some runners liked the way the upper moved with the foot.
Many of the testers easily welcomed its breathable upper unit.
While this is built for shorter distances, a few experts observed that it became a great option for minimalist runners who like middle-distance runs.
The outsole durability impressed a handful of runners.
It has an affordable price.
3 reasons not to buy
A few runners were disappointed with the wide heel as it caused some wobbly heel movement.
A small number of runners found the Merrell Glove 3 as somewhat stiffer compared to other shoes of the same type.
There were complaints saying that it was only meant for short distance runs because they felt foot soreness when wearing it for an extended length of time.
Bottom line
The Merrell Glove 3 is an excellent minimalist shoe. It wraps the mid-foot very well, yet it offers almost no arch support. Barefoot-inclined individuals are the ones who are going to fully enjoy what it has to offer. Though a few found some drawbacks, it is still considered by many as a successful update to the notable Glove model."
Reebok Print Run Prime Ultraknit, Reebok,91.0,,114.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"8 reasons to buy
Many runners said that the Reebok Print Run Prime Ultraknit was comfortable.
A tester was impressed with the sturdiness of the shoe.
Various users agreed the shoe was lightweight and was great to wear for extended periods.
The upper was breathable and kept the foot cool for an entire day, a runner experienced.
One consumer found the outsole to have an efficient grip.
A lot of buyers liked the design of the shoe, as well as the various color choices.
A wearer commended the excellent balance of comfort, support, and stability in the Print Run Prime Ultraknit.
Numerous purchasers approved the shoe’s affordability.
5 reasons not to buy
The product was stiff and looked cheap, wrote several customers.
Some users thought there was not enough support for it to be a decent running shoe.
The shoe was too narrow, stated a buyer.
A few runners mentioned there was a lack of cushioning and bounce.
The outsole was too rigid and felt like cardboard, according to a couple of buyers.
Bottom line
The Reebok Print Run Prime Ultraknit was well-received by most of its users. Many praises were towards its construction and the efficiency of its features. On the other hand, some wearers were not impressed by the quality and fit. In summary, this was considered as a reliable running shoe and therefore a good purchase."
Puma Carson Runner, Puma,91.0,81.0,517.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.2oz , Women: 7.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A few number of runners mentioned that the Carson Runner has a comfortable and reliable cushioning.
The outsole unit is made durable by the EverTrack compound.
Some runners were happy by the overall fit of the shoe.
The Air Mesh upper provides a breathable coverage, keeping the shoe well-ventilated all throughout the run.
Many applauded the design of the Puma Carson Runner.
The shoe is affordable.
Available in different colorways.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners felt that the shoe is too narrow for them.
Size runs small.
Bottom line
Style and performance is what the Puma Carson Runner offers. With the perfect blend of cushioning, traction and durability, this shoe will not disappoint those who are looking for a new training partner. This shoe is best for narrow-footed runners."
Brooks Cascadia 13 GTX,,87.0,92.0,66.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 12.3oz , Women: 11oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Brooks Cascadia 14 GTX,"7 reasons to buy
Several users admired the waterproof feature of the Brooks Cascadia 13 GTX; they said it worked well on wet and muddy routes.
According to some runners, the shoe offers great grip on varied surfaces.
A few mentioned that the shoe is very effective in keeping the foot dry and warm.
A couple of users said that the Cascadia 13 GTX is stable enough even on uphill and downhill runs.
The cushioning of the shoe feels comfortable and soft, according to users.
According to one user, the shoe is durable.
It runs true to size, according to some user comments.
1 reasons not to buy
The Brooks Cascadia 13 GTX is expensive.
Bottom line
The positive reviews for the Brooks Cascadia 13 GTX have greatly outnumbered the negative feedback. Those who have tried the shoe expressed their happiness because of its waterproof coverage, traction, fit, and durability. Though it is expensive, the Cascadia 13 GTX is a waterproof running shoe that has proven to be a successful update."
Adidas Rockadia Trail 3, Adidas,83.0,,10.0,,, Trail, Neutral,,,,,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Some consumers have considered the cushioning system as comfortable enough for all-day running sessions.
The aesthetics of this running shoe are welcomed by those who appreciate visually endearing athletic attires.
The durability of the materials is appreciated by runners who like long-lasting trail running shoes.
Several purchasers are happy with the affordable price of the Adidas Rockadia Trail 3.
Breathability is an aspect that is clearly perceived by those who have tested this product.
2 reasons not to buy
A few individuals have stated that this shoe has a tendency to make the foot look awkwardly big.
Some have decided that the in-shoe experience is a bit wobbly; the inner walls and shoelaces aren’t enough to secure the foot.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of people towards the Rockadia Trail 3 has been positive. The best aspects of this Adidas trail running shoe include the affordable price, the supportive cushioning system, and the breathable upper unit. Conversely, the bulky silhouette and the wobbly in-shoe feel are criticized.
Fans of Adidas footwear that are for the off-road paths are the target market of the Rockadia Trail 3."
Asics GT 2000 4 GTX,,87.0,,109.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.9oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics GT 2000 8 GTX,"6 reasons to buy
The GORE-TEX waterproof upper unit serves as the fabric of the GT 2000 4 GTX.
The heel clutching system keeps the foot in place, thus reducing the risk of accidental removals.
Runners generally appreciate the Gel Cushioning System, a silicon-based unit that offers shock absorption.
The Impact Guidance System and Guidance Trusstic System offer a better stride by assisting the foot in a balanced manner.
The AHAR or the Asics High Abrasion Resistant rubber makes up a durable outsole unit that protects the shoe from wear and damage.
The DuraSponge layer adds a cushioning mechanic to the outsole that’s also flexible.
3 reasons not to buy
The GT 2000 4 GTX has a slightly expensive price.
The men’s version has a moderately heavy weight.
There were runners who felt that the mid-sole unit was a bit too stiff, limiting the natural movement of the foot.
Bottom line
The GT 2000 4 GTX from Asics is a great-looking daily running shoe that offers support for those who need it and waterproof protection all throughout. Its durability is dependable, making it great for high mileage training. Overall, the shoe is a reliable road running partner."
Adidas Ultraboost Leather,,87.0,95.0,7.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Many people admired the quality of the materials used in the shoes. 
It offers a good grip, according to a couple of runners. 
Adidas Ultraboost Leather is durable, based on some reviews. 
A few customers appreciated the soft leather upper of the shoe.
The shoe can be worn during the winter without freezing, said some users. 
Several wearers noted that it is also good for casual and leisure activities.
Some buyers praised the soft cushioning of the shoe. 
3 reasons not to buy
A lot of consumers reported that the shoe is not breathable. 
One buyer said that the shoe is not flexible. 
A couple of users noted that the leather upper is not as comfortable as Primeknit upper. 
Bottom line
The Adidas Ultraboost Leather is a road running shoe that is designed for people with a neutral gait. This shoe is created to provide excellent comfort and reliable protection while enhancing the runner’s performance. Its stylish design is perfect not only for running, but also for work, school, and other non-strenuous activities. "
New Balance 1080 v5,,87.0,80.0,224.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 9.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, New Balance Fresh Foam 1080 v10,"7 reasons to buy
Most runners observed the comfortable feel of the 1080 v5 upon landing.
The 5th instalment of the 1080 is relatively lightweight for what New Balance calls as its top neutral cushioned shoe.
A very nice fit without being constrictive is commonly mentioned in some reviews.
Traction is superlative, even in wet conditions, according to quite a number of runners.
The FantomFit technology provides a seamless construction that lessens the risk of irritation or blisters.
Forefoot responsiveness is evident as noted by a handful.
The T-Beam shank offers torsional integrity and stable ride.
4 reasons not to buy
The 1080 v5 is expensive.
Some runners felt that the transition could have been much better.
There is no reflective material.
Several were disappointed in the lack of durability for an expensive shoe.
Bottom line
While the New Balance 1080 v5 may not be the highly-cushioned shoe as advertised, the cushioning is still plush, particularly in the heel. The neutral running shoe like its latest counterpart the Fresh Foam 1080 v9, the 1080 v5 has very nice arch support and great cushioning. Runners will love the luxurious comfort and relatively lightweight performance of this shoe."
Altra Torin 2.5,,86.0,85.0,522.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.1oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,, Altra Torin 4,"10 reasons to buy
The Torin 2.5 secures the shoe in the right places and includes a roomy toe box for fantastic wiggle room to provide runners with a very comfortable run, as observed by most reviewers.
Several runners mentioned the bang for the buck value of this shoe.
The max cushioning does not compromise the stability or responsiveness, according to a handful of reviews.
The glossier upper greatly enhances the aesthetic appeal of the Torin 2.5, as noted by a good number of runners.
Some runners noticed how smooth the transition was from landing to take-off.
Quite a number appreciate the lightness of the run despite the max cushioning.
Many of the comments valued the shoe’s versatility as a high-mileage trainer or as an up-tempo option.
Moderate to long runs on varied surfaces is where this beast shines, according to several testers.
More than a handful of heavy-framed runners welcomed the midsole’s ability to take a pounding without losing the cushioning or responsiveness.
Gender specific variations of the Altra Torin 2.5 for better fit, performance, and style.
5 reasons not to buy
A large part of the midsole is exposed underneath, which lessens the Torin 2.5’s durability.
Some needed a break-in period to get their most comfortable runs.
It is ½ smaller than standard.
The breathability is not as good as before, as noticed by some of those who have tried the earlier version of the Torin.
Some runners still find the shape as funny and they often get strange looks from other runners.
Bottom line
Only a few shoes can approach the claim to have maximum cushioning, but light enough to be squarely in the sights of those looking for a lightweight trainer. The Altra Torin 2.5 is one such shoe and more. It has very nice arch support, smooth and effortless transitions, and delivers enough ground feedback despite the significant amount of rubber and cushioning."
Nike Free RN Motion Flyknit,,90.0,85.0,1281.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.9oz , Women: 6.3oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Nike Free RN Motion Flyknit 2018,"8 reasons to buy
The sock-like fit of the upper and the plush interior make the ride very comfortable in the Free RN Motion.
The durability is exceptionally good, based on several comments.
It is very light.
The flexibility is incredibly designed for more natural running, noted some testers.
It has plusher cushioning than other Free versions.
The breathable coverage ensures a cool and dry run.
A few testers liked the quick transitions.
The traction is versatile where terrain goes, even in wet conditions, based on a good number of observations.
2 reasons not to buy
A handful of runners felt the Free RN Motion is a little expensive.
Some said that the upper could have used a little more structure.
Bottom line
The Free RN Motion takes the natural running principle in the Free to another level in the form of a new midsole/outsole design. It is light, very flexible, and offers tons of comfort. The shoe is built to last for speed training or ultra-long runs."
Adidas Energy Cloud 2,,87.0,,865.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 9.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Many buyers have found the Adidas Energy Cloud 2 to be reasonably priced.
Some wearers approved the shoe’s straightforward design and overall appearance. Meanwhile, others expressed their liking of the simple colorways.
The shoe provided comfort, especially during extended periods of wear, according to a few users.
The Energy Cloud 2 had a precise fit, a number of customers stated.
One runner claimed the shoe did not require a break-in period, and that it was comfortable from the first wear.
3 reasons not to buy
The tongue was a bit rough, a commenter wrote.
The shoe has quickly deformed after just one run, as experienced by a buyer. Another user complained the upper easily ripped.
A customer complained about the plastic unit at the midfoot that pressed on the foot uncomfortably.
Bottom line
According to the majority of users, the Adidas Energy Cloud 2 was a must-buy running shoe, citing that it looked good, felt comfortable, and thus gave value for their money.  Many complimented how the Energy Cloud 2 brought a luxurious in-shoe feel and delivered an efficient running performance, as well as its accurate fit. However, the upper was heavily criticized by a few wearers who have had an unsatisfactory encounter with it."
Asics Piranha 5,,85.0,77.0,33.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 3.9oz , Women: 3.9oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Cushioning and shock-absorbing features are achieved by the Solyte midsole.
This shoe is very lightweight.
The upper adapts very well with the foot’s movement, according to most runners.
Some runners were impressed by the improved transition in this model.
A large majority of runners loved the way the Piranha 5 encourages speed and efficacy.
3 reasons not to buy
The price of the Asics Piranha 5 is slightly higher compared to other shoes of the same type of performance and quality.
It is mainly limited to racing in shorter courses unless the runner is a full-blown minimalist runner.
Some runners complained that the Piranha 5’s durability leaves so much to be desired.
Bottom line
The Asics Piranha 5 is flat out a racing shoe. It is about a few millimeters from becoming a true barefoot shoe and has next-to-nothing arch support. On the plus side, barefoot runners can use the shoe as a long-distance option due to the “sufficient” cushioning."
Altra Superior 3.0,,85.0,76.0,360.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,, Altra Superior 4.0,"11 reasons to buy
The Altra Superior 3.0 provides a reliable traction, as noted in some reviews.
Many liked the durable and breathable upper of the shoe.
Some runners love the light weight construction of the shoe, making it ideal for racing and uptempo trainings.
The shoe provides a comfortable fit, according to some who tried it.
A number of runners applauded the durable outsole unit of the Superior 3.0.
The shoe does not disappoint even on wet and slippery surfaces, as noted in some reviews.
Many runners were satisfied that the outsole sheds off mud easily.
A handful of reviewers welcomed the improved stability in this shoe.
Ground feedback was evident without losing protection, as reported by a few expert testers.
Most expert reviewers consider the Superior 3.0 as an improvement over all the other earlier versions of this shoe.
Altra offers a more durable mesh to answer past issues of premature ripping in the upper.
6 reasons not to buy
A number of runners noticed that the shoe is too narrow for their foot measurements.
Many were complaining about the small sizing of the shoe.
The top of the toe box creases when the foot flexes prior to take-off, based on the observations of a handful of runners.
It is heavier than the past model.
The shoe does not drain water out fast or dry quickly, according to some testers.
No additional widths, which are craved by some runners.
Bottom line
Designed for trail running, the Altra Superior 3.0 gathered mixed reviews from users. Positive comments geared towards the shoe's performance and design while negative ones were about the shoe's fit and sizing. Overall, the shoe provides a lightweight yet reliable cushioning. It also provides durability and impressive traction on varied trail conditions. "
Under Armour Threadborne Fortis 3,,88.0,81.0,109.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 7.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
Many runners loved the well-constructed upper.
Some reviewers mentioned that this running shoe featured incredible cushioning.
Some of the runners commented that the Under Armour Threadborne Fortis 3 had a durable outsole.
A handful of consumers agreed that the shoe was lightweight, responsive and comfortable.
A good number of purchasers noted that the product has excellent quality.
A lot of users observed that its color variations were impressive.
Several buyers lauded its exceptional performance.
Based on some reviews, its design and appearance were best suited not only for running sessions but also for casual occasions.
According to those who have tried it, the fit was perfect for them.
2 reasons not to buy
According to a tester, the shoe did not perform well on running and walking activities.
A reviewer mention that he felt a little pain in his big toe while wearing the product.
Bottom line
The majority of the purchasers commented that the Under Armour Threadborne Fortis 3 was a responsive, lightweight and comfortable shoe. They were content with its perfect fit and durable outsole. They loved wearing the product not only for short and long-distance running and walking activities but also for casual occasions. Although several of them said that it did not perform or fit properly, others still recommended the Under Armour Threadborne Fortis 3 because of its visually-appealing appearance, attractive design, excellent cushioning, and fantastic performance."
New Balance 750 v3,,84.0,,508.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.7oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Majority of the runners found New Balance 750 v3 comfortable.
The traction on the road is also a feature that some of the runners are impressed with.
It has been used by many runners for different distances and under varying speeds.
It provides adequate cushioning.
The price is affordable.
2 reasons not to buy
The lack of durability is a concern that many people were disappointed about in the 750 v3.
Some runners found the lack of support from the New Balance 750 v3 a bit frustrating.
Bottom line
The New Balance 750 v3 straddles the line between a competition shoe and a daily trainer. It is versatile enough to work both ways. Minus durability concerns and barely enough arch support, this is as good as any for those who are looking for a lightweight shoe with unbelievable comfort and traction."
Hoka One One Valor,,84.0,85.0,223.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.6oz , Women: 8.2oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The Lyrca ComfortFrame upper is a durable material that’s stretchable and breathable.
The TPU Heel Counter secures the heel, thus preventing any accidental shoe removals.
This shoe offers impressive shock absorption features, as mentioned in some reviews.
The Soft EVA Midsole provides a soft and comfortable platform on which the foot can rest.
The Flat Waisted Geometry of the Valor delivers natural stability and control.
The Rubber Outsole maintains durability, protection and traction on man-made tracks and surfaces.
4 reasons not to buy
Some runners didn’t like the bulky look of the Valor.
The forefoot and mid-foot areas were too tight for some testers.
The overall design is bland and unimpressive.
It is an expensive road running shoe.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Valor is a lightweight road running shoe that offers maximum cushioning, comfort and support. You can expect this shoe to give you the smooth ride you wanted, especially when traversing through flat roads and dirt tracks."
Adidas Alphabounce 5.8 Zip,,80.0,,235.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The Adidas Alphabounce 5.8 Zip is lightweight, as mentioned by a number of runners.
The upper has an incredible, glove-like fit, commented a buyer.
A runner likes how the shoe provided warmth during chilly days.
A few users agree that the Alphabounce 5.8 Zip is a comfortable shoe.
Some consumers approved the shoe’s use of recycled materials.
The shoe is great for street running, wrote a couple of testers.
3 reasons not to buy
Some buyers were disappointed with the narrow fit of the Alphabounce 5.8 Zip.
A user complained that the shoe is not durable.
A user found the midsole does not flex well during the stride.
Bottom line
Although it was a shoe with a well-thought concept, the Alphabounce 5.8 Zip did not seem to deliver the expectations of users, based on the feedback it received. There was a surprising number of criticisms regarding various elements in the shoe’s constructions, as well as issues on fit and sizing. There were, however, a few positive comments about comfort. In summary, Adidas has created many excellent running shoes, but maybe the Alphabounce 5.8 Zip was not one of them, as voiced out by consumers."
Salomon Speedcross 4 Nocturne GTX,,94.0,90.0,431.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.5oz , Women: 9.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Most reviewers mentioned that the grip of the Salomon Speedcross 4 Nocturne GTX was reliable during their winter runs. They said that they went over poorly treated sidewalks, roads, and puddles without slipping.
The cleats also worked well on dirt, some reviewers mentioned.
Users experienced lasting comfort.
A majority of testers praised this running shoe for its sleek appearance and minimalist color combination.
Plenty of runners said that the shoe felt stable.
Many agreed that the durability of the materials was reliable.
2 reasons not to buy
One user mentioned that the shoe was too pricey.
Some reviewers said that it might not be ideal for a wide foot as the shape of the forefoot appeared narrow.
Bottom line
Salomon’s Speedcross 4 Nocturne GTX is a premium neutral trail shoe fit for running in low-light conditions. Almost all users procured it for its reliable grip on snowy and icy sidewalks. Its durable construction and minimalist design were features that were also much appreciated. Some found the fit to be a tad narrow. Other than that, it seemed that the shoe emerged as a must-buy for those seeking a reflective and reliable shoe for the trail."
,,,86.0,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 11mm , Women: 11mm,,,,
Asics Gel Phoenix 7,,89.0,,121.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Most runners were impressed by the durability feature of the Gel Phoenix 7.
This shoe features a reflective material for increased visibility on low visibility.
It features a removable sockliner to accommodate a medical orthotic.
Some runners noticed the enhanced AHAR outsole material on this shoe that gives added cushioning and durability.
The 7th version of the Gel Phoenix has improved that bounce-back characteristic of the shoe, according to a small number of reviews.
Available at a reasonable price.
2 reasons not to buy
Size runs large.
Some runners hoped to see more color options.
Bottom line
The Phonix 7 impressively made a lot of users happy because of its performance and affordable price. A great stability shoe for overpronators, the Asics Gel Phoenix 7 offers enough amount of cushioning, support, protection, and durability. This shoe is ideal for those who are looking for a reliable road running gear for long or short-distance runs."
Puma Ignite Mesh, Puma,89.0,,266.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The shoe delivers a comfortable ride, according to some reviews.
The cushioning of the Puma Ignite Mesh provides soft underfoot protection and high energy return.
A few number of users noticed the reliable traction and sturdy build of the shoe’s outsole unit.
The forefoot grooves offers maximum flexibility for a smoother transition from heel to toe.
The ultra-thin tongue gained positive reviews from runners because it gives added comfort all throughout the run.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners mentioned that the shoe was poorly made because the stitching and fabrics wear off quickly.
A few runners complained that the shoe feels too tight for them.
According to view reviews, the shoe feels heavy.
Bottom line
The Puma Ignite Mesh is a road running shoe designed for neutral pronators. The shoe features maximum cushioning, flexibility and comfort. It received praises from users but a few are also disappointed. The Ignite mesh needs improvement but others still found the shoe to be a good option for daily training and short runs."
Salomon Speedtrak,,90.0,81.0,171.0,,," Trail, Mud", Neutral, Men: 8.6oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
Most of the runners who found the right fit found the Speedtrak to be very comfortable.
It is a worthy investment, according to a handful.
The shoe is extremely durable, based on the observations of more than a few.
Very aggressive and multi-directional lugs provide grip on rugged surfaces.
Several obstacle course racers loved the combination of traction, and durability in the Salomon Speedtrak.
Some users mentioned that the upper dries fairly quick and easy to clean.
A few noted that the interior of their shoes was very clean after a tough run on dirty off-road trail.
The QuickLace system offers effortless cinching that does not untie or loosen.
Several runners appreciated the QuickLace system for its ease of use and utility.
5 reasons not to buy
Most of the negative reviews were about how narrow the toe box is.
A handful of obstacle course enthusiasts remarked that it is a bit heavy.
Some runners felt that the ride was a bit jarring on hard ground due to the aggressive and very substantial lugs.
A small number of obstacle course participants wanted drainage holes in the shoe as it is one of Salomon’s biggest market for this shoe.
It runs small, according to several expert reviewers.
Bottom line
Salomon offers the Speedtrak as an update to the Fellraiser. It does, however, bring many of the features that have made the Fellraiser quite a popular choice among runners and obstacle course racers. The Speedtrak has unbelievable traction, excellent durability, and a no-brainer of a choice for muddy or wet running on rugged and difficult outdoor surfaces."
Nike Downshifter 6,,90.0,84.0,939.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.4oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Nike Downshifter 10,"9 reasons to buy
A runner wrote that the mesh material used in the Nike Downshifter 6 had a bit of stretch to it, basically allowing their feet to feel unrestricted even when the material is hugging it.
Testers noted that the padding in the upper unit granted the dimensions of their feet with some cushioning during the running sessions.
The testers appreciated the inclusion of a molded insole, which gave contoured support to the foot-pad and the arch.
The underfoot cushioning was commended by many because of its soft and responsive nature.
This shoe didn’t feel heavy and it didn’t feel too lightweight, according to some runners; for them, it had an adequate weight that’s agreeable for many activities.
The Downshifter 6 looked visually appealing to a lot of those who tried it.
‘Comfortable’ was a word many runners used to describe this shoe, as well as their time wearing it.
Based on a number of comments, this shoe was lauded for its affordable price.
The flat laces of this model gained recognition because they didn’t unravel easily.
3 reasons not to buy
Some of the testers felt that the Downshifter 6 was a bit large for their feet.
The toe box was a bit narrow for a few runners; they wrote that it tended to clump their toes together uncomfortably.
The tongue was a bit lumpy and irritating to the skin, a tester complained.
Bottom line
The 6th version of the Nike Downshifter gained the favor of a lot of neutral runners and shoe enthusiasts. They stated that they felt contented and secured when trying it on the pavement. For many of them, the underfoot cushioning felt reliable and consistent, as did the upper cover system. There were some who didn’t enjoy this version, but that didn’t stop the Downshifter 6 from getting such prominence."
New Balance Fresh Foam Hierro v4,,84.0,68.0,129.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.4oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, New Balance Fresh Foam Hierro v5,"7 reasons to buy
Most of the users said that the New Balance Fresh Foam Hierro v4 is a very comfortable shoe.
This shoe delivers impressive ground contact, a few noticed.
Many runners lauded the lightweight design of the Hierro v4.
A few mentioned that the shoe has a very soft cushioning. One said it feels like pillows for the feet.
Several wearers said that aside from running activities, the shoe is also comfortable for walking and everyday wear.
The grip brought by the Vibram outsole is impressive, based on some user reviews.
Some purchasers admired the shoe’s eye-catching design and appealing color options.
5 reasons not to buy
Several buyers were disappointed because the shoe runs smaller than the usual.
The Fresh Foam Hierro 4 is slightly expensive.
Some runners were unhappy because the fabric in the upper area is not as durable as expected.
It fits too narrow than expected, said some users.
According to a few wearers, the cleatie construction made the shoe difficult to put on.
Bottom line
A neutral shoe designed for the trail, the New Balance Fresh Foam Hierro v4 received mixed comments from the users. Positive reviews were about the shoe’s comfortable cushioning, great ground contact and pleasing design while the negative ones are about its fit, sizing, and durability. Overall, users thought that it is a good shoe that also needs improvement."
Nike Lunar Apparent, Nike,88.0,,81.0,$85,$75 (save 17%), Road, Neutral,,, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
The majority lauded the high comfortability of the Nike Lunar Apparent.
The buyers liked the overall look of the shoe.
A runner was happy about the snug fit of the pair since it prevented sliding inside the shoe while running.
A purchaser appreciated the high quality of the shoe’s upper which held up great even after many miles of long runs.
Another individual admired how soft these shoes felt against the skin.
A customer with flat feet found these shoes great for his daily walks.
The purchasers found its price very reasonable.
1 reasons not to buy
A customer said that the Nike Lunar Apparent did not have the best arch support.
Bottom line
The Nike Lunar Apparent impressively gained positive feedback from its user. It is a decent choice for neutral runners looking for an all-around shoe in an affordable price range. The shoe, with its sleek and stylish looks, offers optimal cushioning, good responsiveness and excellent durability."
Inov-8 Roclite 305 GTX,,77.0,,27.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 10.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Many customers said that the shoe was really comfortable.
A few users highly appreciated the quality of the materials used for the Inov-8 Roclite 305 GTX.
A runner lauded the GORE-TEX technology since it made running through streams and other wet conditions an easy task.
A customer found the midsole to be really responsive.
A user mentioned that the shoe offered excellent underfoot protection and traction.
An individual admired the lightweight disposition of the footwear.
1 reasons not to buy
A user found the toe-box a bit narrow.
Bottom line
The Inov-8 Roclite 305 GTX had mainly a positive response from the running community. The trail enthusiasts found it suitable for rough trail conditions and wet surfaces. The majority admitted that it held up well for a long period of time, even after several miles of running."
Mizuno Wave Horizon 2,,88.0,84.0,116.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 12.1oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Mizuno Wave Horizon 4,"5 reasons to buy
The stability mechanics of the Mizuno Wave Horizon 2 were lauded by some consumers.
This running shoe was true-to-size, according to several testers.
A reviewer commented that the fit was perfect.
A few runners who had tendon and muscle problems reported that the underfoot platform was able to alleviate their discomfort.
The premium sock liner received positive feedback from a purchaser who thought that it offered some extra bounce in every step.
1 reasons not to buy
A few people noted that the façade of this running shoe looked awkwardly bulky.
Bottom line
Most of those who have tested the Wave Horizon 2 believed that it was a worthy update to the recent series from Mizuno. They welcomed its apparently efficient stability features, its correct sizing scheme and width profiles, and the comfortable underfoot experience. Some testers lamented its seemingly large silhouette, but they’re isolated complaints."
Asics Gel DS Trainer 21,,90.0,90.0,154.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.1oz , Women: 7.7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel DS Trainer 25,"6 reasons to buy
The Gel DS Trainer 21 comes with an updated upper which is more durable and breathable.
The Seamless Construction allows runners to wear this shoe comfortably without using socks.
Many runners appreciated the Heel Clutching System, which makes use of an exoskeleton that secures the rear part of the foot in place.
The shoe’s traction and grip were enhanced and runners found it to be very effective.
The 21st version of the Asics Gel DS Trainer delivers a good blend of support and cushioning through high quality components in the mid-sole.
It features the ComforDry Sock Liner technology, which keeps the foot dry and odor-free.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners noted that the outsole was a bit too hard that it didn’t quite hold onto the roads pretty well.
Others experienced the upper unit near the heel area rip apart after a few months.
A few felt their toes get clumped together by the narrow forefoot area.
Bottom line
The Gel DS Trainer 21 from Asics is a shoe that is ideal for road running. It has the necessary support and cushioning systems that are essential for performance training and high mileage running. Generally, the runners found this version more satisfying than the older versions."
Adidas Pureboost ZG Prime,,90.0,89.0,12.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.7oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A significant number of reviews focused on the exceptional comfort of the Adidas ZG Prime.
Many runners consider the Pure Boost ZG Prime as worth the investment because of its versatile usability on the road, in the gym, and for casual wear with jeans.
The sock-like and supportive fit of the Primeknit upper moves very well with the foot and wraps it in security.
It is quite flexible.
It is very light.
The full-contact outsole improves the durability of the EVA material in the outsole.
The Boost midsole’s responsiveness keeps the run more dynamic.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners wanted more leeway in the compression-like fit of the upper.
Other reviewers would have preferred more ground feedback coming from the substantial outsole.
Bottom line
Adidas mixes the best benefits of the Boost midsole with the snug fit of the upper for an energizing and form-fitting ride. The road running shoe has decent arch support for speed training or during race days. With the Zero Gravity concept, runners will experience a cloudlike feel when piling on the miles."
Saucony Excursion TR 11 GTX,,82.0,,23.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.7oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Many buyers commented that the shoe was breathable.
A lot of purchasers admired its perfect fit.
Some testers mentioned that the shoe has a roomy toe box.
According to those who have tried it, the Saucony Excursion TR 11 GTX was best suited for winter running activities.
A handful of reviewers loved its attractive design.
The majority of the consumers noted that the shoe was lightweight.
The Saucony Excursion TR 11 GTX has excellent quality, according to many buyers.
The shoe was durable, based on observations.
4 reasons not to buy
One of the users said that the shoe was uncomfortable to wear.
Several testers agreed that the materials used in making the Saucony Excursion TR 11 GTX was too firm.
According to a buyer, he felt a in the arch area while wearing the shoe.
Many purchasers noted that the amount of traction it provided was not enough.
Bottom line
The majority of the buyers commented that the Saucony Excursion TR 11 GTX was a lightweight and durable running shoe. They were contented with its visually-appealing design. They were satisfied with wearing the shoe in winter running activities. Although several of them said that it was uncomfortable to use, others still lauded the shoe because of its perfect fitting. Overall, a handful of buyers said that the Saucony Excursion TR 11 GTX is a great deal for those who want to find a running shoe that provides a roomy toe box, excellent quality, and fantastic performance."
,,,,,,, Road, Motion control, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,
Adidas Supernova Riot,,86.0,81.0,63.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.4oz , Women: 11.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A lot of runners appreciated the appealing design and color schemes of the Adidas Supernova Riot.
The upper hook-and-loop closure system was welcomed by many because it prevented debris from entering the shoe.
The high-cut collar felt secure when it wrapped around the foot, runners commented.
A reviewer commented that the mid-sole cushioning system was able to bring back a lot of energy while running.
The platform was comfortably springy, commented some testers.
The grip of the outsole was praised by many because it was able to hold into many types of surfaces.
The high quality Continental™ Rubber technology staved off some runners’ worries about the durability of the sole unit.
2 reasons not to buy
There were a few runners who felt that the upper felt narrow and tight.
A tester wasn’t able to appreciate the stability mechanics of this shoe because they said their heel succumbed to over-pronation.
Bottom line
The Adidas Supernova Riot gives off-road runners are given more comfort, protection and support when it comes to tackling the unpredictable topography of the great outdoors. Many praised its durable components, efficient trail-ready features, and its appealing design. The upper might feel too narrow for some, but the majority of wearers dismissed it as merely feeling a snug fit."
Asics Gel DS Trainer 22,,89.0,87.0,235.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 8oz , Women: 6.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel DS Trainer 25,"8 reasons to buy
The 22nd edition of the DS Trainer is currently the lightest shoe featuring Asics’ most innovative midsole cushioning, the FlyteFoam.
More than a handful of expert reviewers consider the cushioning to weight ratio as truly exceptional.
The lightweight stability was appreciated by some runners.
A good number of users mentioned how comfortable they were right out of the box in this shoe.
Bigger and more prominent lugs in the forefoot enhance traction, particularly when changing directions or rounding a curve.
More than a few runners consider the price as quite reasonable.
The Gel DS Trainer 22 can handle race day requirements or when piling on the miles.
Reflective details in the heel make this an ideal shoe for night time running.
2 reasons not to buy
More than a handful of reviewers found the fit to be narrower than the earlier model or when it is compared to many of Asics’ other shoes.
Very limited color options.
Bottom line
Asics brings the FlyteFoam technology to this very versatile shoe. With the latest midsole update, the Asics DS Trainer 22 easily becomes a light, supportive, and resilient shoe that can do both races and trainings. This is an excellent option for experienced or elite athletes who want a do-it-all shoe that takes on speed and distance with ease. If Asics comes up with more color options, the Trainer 22 could become one of the most sought after lightweight trainer/racer options in the market today."
Vivobarefoot Stealth III,,85.0,,5.0,,, Road, Neutral,,, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
A few comments have highlighted the non-irritating interior environment of the upper unit.
The Vivobarefoot Stealth IIIis welcomed as a suitably lightweight running shoe for all-day wear.
Flexibility is a trait that is said to be easily appreciated from this product.
The general durability of this product is welcomed by those who like long-lasting shoes.
According to several comments, the outsole unit is able to provide a dependable surface grip.
2 reasons not to buy
A few testers have noted that the forefoot section is a bit restrictive.
A couple of users have complained that the shoelaces are quick to unravel by themselves.
Bottom line
The Stealth III is an everyday partner for any activity. People can wear this Vivobarefoot running shoe for their speed training sessions and regular strolls. The versatile and flexible design of this product allows it to become an extension of the foot, offering mild protection from impact and surface debris. Barefoot runners can enjoy this close-to-the-ground offering."
Asics Gel Scout,,84.0,84.0,210.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.8oz , Women: 9.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
This shoe features a closed mesh upper to keep debris out.
It features an anti-gravel tongue, which keeps debris and rocks from entering the shoe.
The Gel Scout has a rock plate in the outsole to prevent stone bruising.
Most runners applauded the Wet Grip technology of the Gel Scout, which offers amazing grip on wet surfaces.
A Lace Pocket allows the runner to hide the laces in a secure area, preventing any accidental unraveling or uncomfortable wobbling of the shoelaces.
Many reviewers welcomed the Gel Cushioning System in the heel and forefoot area as it handles impact shock and responsive toe-offs.
3 reasons not to buy
The closed mesh in the upper wasn’t breathable as noted by many reviewers.
Some runners noticed that the mid-sole broke down on them after a few months.
This shoe has a moderately heavy weight.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Scout offers a smooth ride and adequate cushioning. This neutral trail running shoe can be used in many types of surfaces, including wet ones. You can expect lots of impact and debris protection from this model."
Mizuno Wave Legend 4,,84.0,,24.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
A runner commented that the rear section of the upper unit was able to support the heel with ease.
For many consumers, the price was affordable.
It felt suitably lightweight for longer wear, stated a tester.
It generally felt comfortable for active workouts and running sessions, according to those who have tried it.
It fit like a glove, a runner observed; he wrote that the upper wrapped around the foot in a snug yet unrestrictive manner.
The different color schemes were welcomed; many considered the look to be visually appealing.
2 reasons not to buy
It was slightly narrow in the toe box area, commented a purchaser.
The durability of the shoe is not too great for some users.
Bottom line
The Mizuno Wave Legend 4 was able to gain the favor of a lot of those who have tried it. Its affordable price, comfortable upper cover system, and its overall performance were lauded and given the deserved attention. Though a few consumers had some complaints about it, this road running companion still became quite a successful update."
Adidas Pureboost RBL LTD,,85.0,,46.0,,, Trail, Neutral,,,,,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The underfoot experience given by the Adidas Pureboost RBL LTD was deemed comfortable.
A couple of consumers liked that the knitted upper covered the foot securely.
The outsole was considered to be effectively grippy on both flat and rough surfaces.
The water-repellent upper was appreciated for being able to protect against splashes and light rain.
People felt that the Adidas Pureboost RBL LTD was true to size.
1 reasons not to buy
The fit was a bit narrow for a few testers.
Bottom line
People offered positive feedback on the Adidas Pureboost RBL LTD. They felt that this neutral shoe was able to provide a compelling performance on both the roads. Its comfortable midsole, traction-ready outsole, and weather-resistant silhouette were elements that were highlighted as performance boosters. There were a few who didn’t like the fit, but such feedback was scarce."
Nike LunarConverge,,90.0,,256.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
The majority felt very comfortable in the Nike LunarConverge.
Customers admired the flexible nature of the insole.
Many users were happy with its light weight; they felt like they were wearing nothing on their feet.
Most customers thought this running shoe was more reasonable in terms of price.
The wearers also liked the upper unit since it ensured better breathability and a healthier feel during their runs.
A few runners expressed satisfaction with the fit and size of the shoe.
A few buyers praised the quality and the nice color schemes.
A small number of users also liked the aesthetic style and considered it a perfect option for everyday attire.
3 reasons not to buy
Some users seemed irritated with the suction-cup-construction at the shoe’s bottom; they mentioned that they felt shallowness under their heel.
A user was disappointed with the squeaky sound produced by the shoe’s bottom as he walked.
Another customer felt tightness in the mid-foot section.
Bottom line
The Nike LunarConverge offers high performance, a comfortable fit, stylish looks and an adaptive construction. In addition to running, it’s also a solid option for training and casual wear. Overall, this shoe delivers an excellent performance and comfort. "
Salomon Alphacross GTX,,88.0,80.0,187.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.6oz , Women: 9.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
The stylish and robust design of Salomon Alphacross GTX is praised by several consumers. 
This Salomon trail running shoe fits well and is very comfortable to wear, according to many reviewers. 
Salomon Alphacross GTX’s gripping ability is good in both wet and dry surfaces, some runners mentioned. 
A few commenters appreciated this running gear’s shock absorption ability. 
This running shoe is also good for workouts and casual walks, many users claimed. 
Salomon Alphacross GTX’s lightweight structure gained positive feedback from several runners who have tried it. 
People lauded the breathability of this shoe’s upper unit. 
Numerous wearers commented that the midsole is supportive and responsive to the foot’s movement. 
A couple of reviewers explained that the shoe offers just the right amount of cushioning, not too soft nor too firm. 
3 reasons not to buy
The insole of the Salomon Alphacross GTX is not soft enough, according to a tester. 
A purchaser reported that the shoe doesn’t perform well in mud.
The shoe is expensive, some buyers state. 
Bottom line
The general feedback for the Salomon Alphacross GTX has been positive. Consumers are mostly happy with this trail running shoe’s responsiveness, breathability, and lightweight construction. People also appreciated the shoe’s cushioning system, durability, and gripping ability. The shoe is also good for workouts and casual walks. Only a few consumers dislike that shoe is a bit expensive and the insole is too firm. "
Saucony Excursion TR 9,,89.0,,899.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Saucony Excursion TR 14,"6 reasons to buy
The mesh and synthetic upper maintain breathable coverage that’s comfortable at the same time.
The soft fabric lining and padded interior secure the foot and make it easier for the foot to stay in place, according to some testers.
The Molded IMEVA makes up the bulk of the mid-sole cushioning system, which is responsible for the lightweight underfoot support and shock absorption.
A significant number of runners noticed the reliable impact protection in the heel area.
The outsole unit of the Excursion TR 9 was able to provide durable protection and traction over the trails based on some comments.
The Saucony Excursion TR 9 is affordable.
4 reasons not to buy
The men’s version of the Excursion TR 9 is moderately heavy.
Some runners noted that it was stiffer than the previous version.
Others criticized the low-quality stitching, which easily got loose.
A few felt that it was a bit narrow in the forefoot area.
Bottom line
The Excursion TR 9 from Saucony offers durability, comfort and breathable coverage to trail runners. The trail-specific outsole delivers reliable traction on technical terrains and impressive underfoot protection while the upper of the shoe wraps the foot comfortable while giving support throughout the run. This trail running shoe is designed for neutral runners."
Mizuno Wave Catalyst 2,,89.0,80.0,218.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Several runners noted that the Mizuno Wave Catalyst 2 was suitably lightweight for their activities.
The toe box accommodated natural toe-splay, some consumers wrote.
The collar and heel of the upper secured the food well and prevented slipping, a reviewer observed.
A tester lauded this shoe for being efficient for mid-distance running sessions.
A satisfied purchaser stated that wearing the Catalyst 2 prevented her feet from feeling tired or sore throughout the day.
According to a tester, there’s more support in this shoe than a track flat, which made for great extended exercises.
3 reasons not to buy
The forefoot section of the upper felt a bit narrow, according to some testers.
Some users say that the shoe's upper design is a bit outdated for its price tag.
The shoe's outsole is not thick enough, as noted by some wearers.
Bottom line
The Mizuno Wave Catalyst 2 gained generally positive remarks from runners. They felt that it was a nice update, marked with helpful components and features. They even enjoyed its performance, noting the comfort that they felt during their activities while wearing it. Inversely, there were those who had some gripes with its width and sizing scheme."
Inov-8 Mudclaw 300,,92.0,86.0,156.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 10.6oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The upper unit of the Mudclaw 300 is flexible and durable, allowing for a reliable coverage to the foot, remarked some runners.
Most reviewers appreciated the mesh lining and the water repellent coating that keeps the foot clean and dry.
A large number of runners welcomed the protective components, such as the Gusseted Tongue, which keeps dirt from entering the shoe.
EVA makes up the mid-sole layer and it’s coupled with the Meta-Shank groove design on the forefoot for more natural foot movement.
The Dual-C outsole is made up of sticky rubber for more durability and grip on the surfaces.
2 reasons not to buy
Others thought that it was greatly missing the arch support needed for many runners who need such a feature.
The testers noticed that the outsole wasn’t able to offer much traction on wet surfaces.
Bottom line
The Mudclaw 300 from Inov-8 is a trail shoe that’s made for hard terrain and hardened trail enthusiasts who want to experience a solid option when adventuring. It’s sturdy, durable and comfortable to wear for neutral runners."
Saucony Cohesion 8,,93.0,,1014.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Saucony Cohesion 13,"5 reasons to buy
The Cohesion 8 is very comfortable as noted in some reviews.
Many were satisfied with the cushioning of the shoe.
The shoe is true to size.
The shoe has a good fit based on some user reviews.
It has a very comfortable and breathable upper.
2 reasons not to buy
Not as durable as expected because shoe parts started to fall apart in few months only.
Some were not impressed by the new looks of the Cohesion 8.
Bottom line
Saucony Cohesion 8 is a very comfortable running shoe that delivers the right amount of cushioning and support. Several positive comments were towards the shoe's performance and fit. There were few comments on the shoe's new looks and durability but these are not enough to overshadow the positive comments. The Cohesion 8 is great for those who are looking for an affordable shoe for daily training and short distance runs."
Asics Gel Nimbus 21 Lite-Show,,91.0,,84.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 9.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 13mm,,,,"4 reasons to buy
A few runners lauded the wide toe-box of the Asics Gel Nimbus 21 Lite-Show. They said it gives there toes enough wiggle room.
According to some buyers, this running shoe has a good fit, from the heel to the forefoot section.
It is a great supportive shoe, said a few reviewers.
A couple of users mentioned that they are using the shoe not only for running but also for gym training.
4 reasons not to buy
The shoe is expensive.
One user said that the shoe is not as durable as expected.
The Nimbus 21 Lite-Show feels heavy, said a few disappointed users.
Several users observed that the shoe lacks the necessary underfoot cushioning, especially in the heel area.
Bottom line
The Lite-Show version of the Asics Gel Nimbus 21 received mixed reviews from users. Some were highly satisfied because it fits well and versatile enough to be used on gym workouts. However, others are disappointed because it is expensive, not durable and offers less cushioning than the previous version. In summary, this road running shoe needs more improvement to fully capture the approval of the majority."
Newton Distance S IV,,88.0,83.0,131.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 7.2oz , Women: 6.1oz, Men: 2mm , Women: 2mm,,, Newton Distance S 9,"6 reasons to buy
Breathable mesh makes up a lightweight upper unit.
Many testers appreciated the inclusion of the anatomical metatarsal stretch panels, which offer more flexibility and natural movement.
The Distance S from Newton has an enhanced medial midsole platform, which offers stability and control.
A springy EVA compound makes up the main mid-sole unit.
Several reviewers noted that the Action/Reaction Technology in the forefoot area helped propel them forward.
A durable and responsive outsole encourages traction and control over the surfaces.
2 reasons not to buy
The outsole wasn’t able to give as much traction and surface contact for some runners.
It has an expensive price.
Bottom line
The Distance S from Newton is a running shoe that gives stability, control and better performance. The shoe received a lot of praise because of its performance. Though there are a few drawbacks, these are not enough to stop the majority from admiring the shoe. The Distance S can be used daily for a bevy of activities, ranging from the athletic to the casual."
La Sportiva Crossover 2.0 GTX,,88.0,85.0,29.0,,, Trail, Stability, Men: 13.1oz , Women: 10.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"4 reasons to buy
Most runners were impressed by the overall sturdy construction of the Crossover 2.0 GTX.
The La Sportiva Crossover 2.0 GTX offers and precise and internal lacing system with a gaiter zipper for outstanding protection based on several comments.
Majority of the runners took note of the enhanced grip of this shoe, allowing great experience while running on icy terrain.
This shoe features an ""Easy-In"" speed fitting technology to easily slide the shoe on and off.
3 reasons not to buy
The Crossover 2.0 GTX is an expensive shoe.
Few runners experienced discomfort because of the shoe’s narrow toe box.
As noted in some reviews, the heel cup rough fabric needs enhancement.
Bottom line
The La Sportiva Crossover 2.0 GTX is a great off-road running shoe that features a very durable and reliable construction. This shoe offers an impressive grip while running on a snowy or icy surface. The shoe gained different reviews but overall, the shoe is still considered by some as a worthy investment."
New Balance 720 v4,,88.0,82.0,60.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Jun 2017,,,"6 reasons to buy
Several users commented on the high level of comfort given by the shoe.
Testers said that the price was just right for the quality that they had received.
A majority of users used the New Balance 720 v4 for everyday activities and they wrote that it remained efficient.
A good number of users appreciated the modish design of the shoe, though it’s minimal-looking.
One user observed that the underfoot platform was soft enough that it felt like walking on clouds.
The shoe is a great option for those who have wider feet, said some reviewers.
3 reasons not to buy
One major disadvantage that several users noted was the tongue, which was constantly shifting; for them, it posed as a discomfort.
Many noticed that this shoe ran a little narrow. One tester accounted that the 4E width measurement felt more like the 2E one.
Some testers noted that the shoe didn’t have the best durability; for them, some sections started to wear off early.
Bottom line
The New Balance 720 v4 is a neutral road running that’s fit for daily use. It targets all-day comfort while delivering a smooth ride. Because of its wider width availability, it’s also a shoe for those with wider feet. It is preferred as a shoe for work and for casual wear, but it can also function well when used for light forms of exercise and short runs."
Mizuno Wave Mujin 6,,89.0,92.0,7.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 13.4oz , Women: 11.6oz,,,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Several admire the durable configuration of the Mizuno Wave Mujin 6. 
According to many, it has grippy traction.
Some appreciate the shoe’s comfort.
It delivers a stable ride, stated a few. 
A number of purchasers claim that it has a secure fit.
2 reasons not to buy
It is quite heavy, remarked several users. 
A buyer is disappointed with the shoe’s tongue; it has to be readjusted every once in a while. 
Bottom line
Grippy, soft, stable- these are among the many characteristics that make the Mizuno Wave Mujin 6 the perfect pair to conquer rugged terrains. A natural breaker of conventions, the Wave Mujin 6 is packed with top-notch Mizuno technologies and innovations. Its general design is one that’s built to last on the and deliver peak performance in the roughest of terrains. "
Under Armour Charged Escape 2,,92.0,75.0,535.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Under Armour Charged Escape 3,"5 reasons to buy
The Under Armour Charged Escape 2 performed well on the roads, many consumers reported.
The width profiles followed expectations, according to those who have tried it.
This running shoe was great for casual walks in the city, according to purchasers.
People were happy with the design of this product, emphasizing that contemporary aesthetics were great for any occasion.
Most runners claimed that the underfoot experience was pleasant.
2 reasons not to buy
Numerous runners find the durability of the Charged Escape 2 to be questionable.
The shoelaces untie easily, according to some reviewers.
Bottom line
The Under Armour Charged Escape 2 was considered by asphalt adventurers to be a successful iteration of the original Charged Escape neutral shoe. The components of this product were lauded for being able to function well. The modern design was also given praise. On the other hand, there were complaints regarding durability, as well as inconsistent build quality."
Adidas Springblade Drive 2.0,,76.0,,76.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 13.7oz , Women: 12oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
This shoe offers the ultra-aggressive propulsion that has never been seen in a running shoe.
Many of the testers appreciated the unique and very appealing design, especially when it comes to the outsole blades.
The polymer blades offer additional cushioning and bounciness to every step, efficiently pushing the runner forward.
Runners noticed the positive effects of wearing this running shoe, such as shock dissipation, energy return and responsive performance.
It offers a snug fit feeling without restricting the movement.
According to most reviews, it’s a flexible running shoe that allows the feet have more freedom of movement.
Durable and reliable outsole that is more resistant against high abrasion.
3 reasons not to buy
The weight of the 2nd version of the Springblade Drive is heavy.
It has an expensive price.
This shoe is not for uneven terrain because of the blades.
Bottom line
The Adidas Springblade Drive 2.0 is a neutral running shoe that propels runners to move forward in an efficient and responsive way with the slanted spring blades in the outsole. The energy-returning effect of the blades makes running a lot easier and enjoyable. It is a heavy and expensive running shoe, but its quality service is well worth the price of admission."
Under Armour Threadborne Slingflex,,90.0,90.0,284.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A lot of users stressed that the shoe offered remarkable comfortability.
Most of the customers appreciated the snug fit of the footwear.
Many fashionistas admired the overall look and design of the shoe.
A lot of buyers appreciated the different colors the Under Armour Threadborne Slingflex was available in.
Several users highlighted the lightweight nature of the shoe, which enabled them to run without worrying about getting tired being weighed down.
A few runners mentioned that the Under Armour Threadborne Slingflex was sufficiently flexible to allow for a smooth and natural ride.
Some purchasers commented that it had an affordable price.
3 reasons not to buy
The shoe fell apart after only a couple of months, according to a purchaser.
The insole of the shoe was too flimsy for some users.
A user said that the Threadborne Slingflex was not able to provide sufficient arch support.
Bottom line
The Under Armour Threadborne Slingflex is for the individuals who are looking for a highly comfortable yet optimally responsive neutral road shoe. It has a knit upper that looks unique and feels very soft against the skin. The well-cushioned environment, the lightweight disposition, and the stylish looks make this footwear definite everyday wear for most casual and enthusiast runners."
, Dynafit,,78.0,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,
Saucony Cohesion TR 11,,85.0,,184.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.3oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Saucony Cohesion TR 13,"7 reasons to buy
Many buyers stated that the Saucony Cohesion TR 11 was an affordable shoe.
A number of users liked the design and overall appearance of the shoe. Others also appreciated the color options available.
The Cohesion TR 11 felt comfortable in both walking and running activities, according to a wearer.
A satisfied user said the shoe helped relieve their back pain.
Several customers described the shoe as lightweight.
One runner claimed the midsole offered a precise fit and an adequate arch support.
A user remarked that the shoe did not need a break-in period.
3 reasons not to buy
The inside of the shoe got hot while running on warmer days, a user mentioned.
One buyer observed that the shoelaces were thin and flimsy.
The Cohesion TR 11 seemed to have a narrow fit, even with the wide option, a wearer observed.
Bottom line
The Saucony Cohesion TR 11 has maintained the positive momentum gathered by the previous iterations in the series. With the optimistic comments regarding its price, design, and comfort, the shoe has evidently provided users with a satisfactory running experience. Despite the minor criticisms about some structural components, the shoe has proven itself to be a worthy and valuable investment towards an efficient running gear."
Asics FuzeX,,88.0,80.0,1133.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The mesh material used for the Asics FuzeX is water resistant, so the runner is able to stay confident when running in any condition.
The many color schemes available for this model are appreciated by many runners.
A seamless construction prevents skin irritation, thus allowing the wearer to use this shoe without putting on socks.
An antimicrobial coating is added to the sock liner, making the interior environment clean and healthy.
A new foam unit that’s crafted from the fusion of the Gel® cushioning technology and foam makes the platform bouncier and more capable of absorbing shock.
This running shoe has a fairly average price, in light of its new components and high quality construction.
The full ground-contact outsole with abrasion-resistant rubber protects the rest of the sole unit from wear and tear.
2 reasons not to buy
A few runners felt that the upper unit was a bit stiff for their feet.
Some testers wished that a wider version was available to accommodate those with wider feet.
Bottom line
Taking on the market is the Asics FuzeX, a neutral running shoe that uses a new mid-sole technology that’s going to make each step more enabled and empowered. The responsive platform makes running easier and more comfortable. It’s a solid choice for exercises, daily runs and even competitions."
Asics Gel Flux 4,,88.0,76.0,444.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.4oz , Women: 9.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Flux 5,"7 reasons to buy
Several users claimed that they were able to stay up on their feet for long hours while wearing the 4th instalment of the Gel Flux.
More than a handful of runners use this shoe for gym workouts and while doing household works.
The price is considered by many as well worth the shoe’s performance.
The large, open mesh provides a very breathable coverage.
Asics uses a plush interior for a cozy feel with every run.
A few noticed barely discernible signs of wear and tear after considerable mileage.
The Asics Gel Flux 4 looks much better than its predecessor, according to some runners.
2 reasons not to buy
A handful of Flux fans were hoping for more weight reduction.
A few runners mentioned that the fit is a bit loose.
Bottom line
Budget conscious and entry level runners will continue to get a reliable and efficient performance in the Asics Flux 4. The shoe may not have the latest in Asics’ technology, but it does not scrimp on comfort or durability. It is a sturdy daily trainer that has sufficient arch support, security, and midsole resilience that will allow the runner to tack on the miles."
Newton MV2,,79.0,72.0,31.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 5.9oz , Women: 5.2oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,, Newton MV3,"7 reasons to buy
Many runners noted that the Newton MV2 was very lightweight, that is enabled them to perform more naturally.
The mid-sole cushioning systems were lauded because they were able to deliver true responsive cushioning.
The testers felt a pop of energy with each step, and they credited it to the trampoline-like cushioning of the Action/Reaction™ Technology.
The optional 3mm lift in the rear mid-sole was able to ease stress in the heels and calves, as noted by some who tried it.
Users generally appreciated the breathable upper because it allowed them to stay comfortable, even during extended running sessions.
Some liked the way the upper fabric was able to repel dirt.
The color schemes used in this running shoe were visually appealing, as noted by testers.
1 reasons not to buy
The forefoot area was uncomfortably narrow for those who have wider foot-dimensions.
Bottom line
Responsive and comfortable, the Newton MV2 is able to take runners through their activities with ease and comfort. Many welcomed its breathable design, high-quality cushioning and appealing look. Though it felt narrow for some users, it was still able to deliver quality service that’s reliable and long-lasting."
Adidas Springblade Pro,,75.0,,31.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.7oz , Women: 11.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Offers a new single-piece sockliner for enhanced comfort and lockdown feel.
Excellent outsole durability delivered by the springblades.
The Adidas Springblade Pro never fails to turn heads because of the never-before-seen design.
Many runners welcomed the nice fit that the Springblade Pro provides.
Runners who prefer customized orthotics can use them to replace the removable insole.
Several of the wearers noted that the blades do not feel strange when used as an everyday shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
The shoe is quite heavy.
It has a distinctive noise when walking on covered floors.
The traction of the Adidas Springblade Pro suffers a bit during wet conditions according to some runners.
Bottom line
The Adidas Springblade Pro is a neutral running shoe that offers an eye-catching design in a very comfortable package. With good enough arch support for neutral runners and a very nice fit, it makes daily training effortless as long as the conditions stay dry. Though a few found the shoe heavy, the majority are still satisfied."
Reebok Speed Breeze 2, Reebok,85.0,,6.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
More than a handful of consumers have lauded the cushioning system of the Reebok Speed Breeze 2 for being responsive.
People are generally happy with the affordable price of this road running shoe.
The lightweight nature of this product is welcomed by those who appreciate all-day wearing sessions.
According to some testers, the shoe is versatile enough to be used for many activities.
The upper unit of this shoe is deemed breathable and gives a cool-feeling wrap.
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of testers have noted that the insole is firm and irritating to the pad of the foot.
The forefoot section of the Speed Breeze 2 is a bit restrictive, based on a handful of reviews.
Bottom line
People who are just getting into running as a part of their routines can enjoy the Reebok Speed Breeze 2. This neutral running shoe has an affordable price that won’t alienate those who are potentially interested in the activity. It also has industry-standard technologies to help with performance. A foam midsole, a breathable upper, and a lightweight build assist the wearer when taking each step."
Altra Paradigm 3.0,,85.0,84.0,367.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 8.2oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,, Altra Paradigm 4.5,"6 reasons to buy
Most customers were of the opinion that the shoe was highly comfortable.
The wide-footed runners found its toe-box sufficiently roomy.
The testers admitted that the outsole showed minimal signs of wear, even after many miles of running.
The customers admired the impressively soft and breathable upper.
A few runners mentioned that the shoe needed no ‘breaking in’; they were able to do many miles in these shoes straight out of the box.
One user commented that it was easy to transition through the gait cycle running in the Altra Paradigm 3.0, owing to the pair’s enhanced flexibility.
4 reasons not to buy
Some customers thought that the overall look of the shoe was rather ‘boring’.
A number of users found durability issues with the Paradigm 3’s outsole after several miles of running.
The toe-box was rather narrow, a few runners observed.
A tester thought that the shoe’s design made it very difficult to clean after some dirt was stuck in it.
Bottom line
Altra Paradigm 3.0 generated a mixed response from its users. While the neutral running shoe provided excellent comfort and higher flexibility, some people believed that it could certainly use an improvement in its overall look and design for better durability and a firmer hold."
New Balance Fresh Foam Veniz, New Balance,85.0,,95.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.4oz , Women: 6.4oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,," Normal, Wide | Normal, Wide",,"7 reasons to buy
Some runners found the New Balance Fresh Foam Veniz to be an affordable shoe.
It was a lightweight shoe that did not scrimp on the cushioning, a reviewer wrote.
The shoe was very easy to get on and off, observed a wearer.
The outsole had a good grip on smooth indoor surfaces, according to a buyer.
A customer remarked that the midsole was firm yet comfortable and that the shoe was excellent for exercise.
One user relayed their pleasant experience on how the shoe helped reduce lower back pain.
The Fresh Foam Veniz was a flexible shoe that performed well, even in obstacle courses, commended a reviewer.
4 reasons not to buy
The shoelaces were too short, a wearer commented.
A couple of runners were dismayed that the shoe was too narrow even with the width options available.
One user thought the midsole did not provide adequate arch support.
The toe area tore apart quickly, a buyer complained.
Bottom line
The New Balance Fresh Foam Veniz was able to get the approval of the majority of its users. Many runners praised the shoe’s performance and structure, notably the midsole. The price and weight were also positively regarded. The adverse reactions were few, and most customers have claimed to look forward to the next release of this shoe."
Jordan Grind, Jordan,92.0,96.0,28.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,, Jordan Grind 2,"5 reasons to buy
Various users described the shoe as comfortable, with most of them saying their foot was still relaxed after an extended period of wear.
Most commenters have particularly cited that the midsole felt like marshmallows. Meanwhile, others have remarked about the terrific bounce and cushioning it
The Jordan Grind was a lightweight shoe, as asserted by many purchasers.
The outsole was very efficient in supplying sufficient grip, especially during toe-off, according to a reviewer.
One buyer was impressed with the overall durability of the shoe as it did not show any sign of deterioration after many months of regular wear.
3 reasons not to buy
Users mentioned that the shoe had a tight midfoot area and the narrow fit, while another said their big toe rubbed against the shoe.
There were some disapprovals expressed regarding the design of the shoe.
One reviewer claimed that the foam outsole was not as tough as they would have liked.
Bottom line
For a new entry running shoe, the Jordan Grind was well-received by runners and casual wearers alike. Users appreciated the shoe’s structural components and commended the effectiveness of its features. While some experienced fit issues and criticized the appearance of the shoe, many customers still relayed their satisfaction with the purchase of the Jordan Grind, and most of them said the shoe was worth recommending."
Asics GT 1000 3,,92.0,84.0,2022.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics GT 1000 9,"6 reasons to buy
Durable mesh makes the upper unit of the Asics GT 1000 3 formidable and long-lasting.
Synthetic overlays are stitched onto the fabric, and they’re meant to keep the foot well-secured.
Many runners appreciated the mid-foot stability mechanism in the shoe, which helped them balance their running stance.
Lightweight but durable, the SpEVA® Midsole makes sure to deliver more cushioning than the industry standard foam units.
Protection from impact is afforded by the Gel® Cushioning System in the heel and forefoot sections.
This running shoe doesn’t have an expensive price.
2 reasons not to buy
The Asics GT 1000 3 ran a bit small for some runners.
A few felt that the platform was a bit stiff.
Bottom line
The Asics GT 1000 3 is a road shoe designed for neutral runners. Bouncy underfoot cushioning, stability and secure coverage make the Asics GT 1000 3 agreeable to runners who want to get a comfortable running experience on the roads. It is an affordable running companion that is great for all types of activities."
,,,92.0,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 12.5oz , Women: 10.5oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,
Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 34 LE,,89.0,,701.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Many runners loved the excellent ankle support the shoe provided.
Some of the testers said that the product was comfortable.
According to those who have tried it, the Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 34 LE fitted impeccably on them.
A lot of reviewers loved its cute and appealing design.
The majority of the testers agreed that the shoe was durable and lightweight.
For a lot of runners, the Air Zoom Pegasus 34 LE's cushioning was excellent.
2 reasons not to buy
A consumer claimed that the material in the midsole was too stiff for a running shoe. As a result, she just used the product for doing her errands.
One of the users said that the sizing was too small. She was not comfortable wearing it because her toes reached the end of the shoe.
Bottom line
A lot of runners agreed that the Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 34 LE was comfortable, well-cushioned and lightweight. They said that the fit was perfect. Although some of them commented that the product was stiff for a running shoe, others still recommended the Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 34 LE because of its excellent ankle support, appealing design, and fantastic performance. They loved wearing the shoe on long and short-distance marathon and regular running sessions."
New Balance 5000 v2,,81.0,84.0,14.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 3.6oz , Women: 2.8oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"4 reasons to buy
Many runners really liked the extremely lightweight construction of the New Balance 5000 v2.
Some runners noticed that the 2nd version of the New Balance 5000 is more flexible and has better traction than the previous version.
This shoe features the New Balance FantomFit technology that provides impressive fit and ultralight support.
The REVlite technology gives lightweight ride without reducing stability and underfoot cushioning.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners noticed that the sole of the shoe deteriorates quickly.
Available in limited color choices.
A moderately priced shoe for some runners.
Bottom line
The New Balance 5000 v2 is an ultra-light running shoe that is very flexible and comfortable to wear. The updated version continues to impress runners as it offers mild arch support, improved cushioning, traction and flexibility. This shoe performs best on road races and track workouts."
Nike Flex Fury 2,,92.0,81.0,430.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The minimal mesh upper provides as much flexibility and ventilation for the runner as possible.
Many testers appreciated the inclusion of the Flywire cables on the lateral and medial sides for an enhanced fit.
This running shoe has a budget-friendly price.
The many color options for this version made it more appealing to many runners.
The Flex Fury 2 is lighter in weight than the previous version.
The Nike Flex outsole encourages natural flexibility for the foot, which was enjoyed by reviewers.
The cushioning system remained great in quality for many runners.
2 reasons not to buy
The midfoot section pinched and hurt the foot of some testers.
Some reviewers didn’t like the lack of padding on the tongue as it scraped on their skin if they didn’t wear any socks.
Bottom line
The Flex Fury 2 from Nike is the next version of an up-and-coming series that has garnered much praise. Now, it features some of the technologies that have made most Nike shoes more efficient and formidable on the market. It’s a great running partner for daily training and casual walks."
Under Armour Charged Bandit Trail GTX,,83.0,,8.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.1oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A significant number of testers said that the Under Armour Charged Bandit Trail GTX is lightweight.
A lot of users commented that the shoe is comfortable.
According to those who have tested the running footwear, it has excellent arch support.
Based on some reviews, the running shoe has a perfect fit.
The shoe is best used for hiking and running activities, as observed by several buyers.
Its roomy toe box is admired by many consumers.
The majority of the purchasers said that the shoe is durable.
3 reasons not to buy
A number of wearers claimed the waterproofing feature is not effective.
The running shoe is expensive, noted by some users.
A few testers wished for more masculine color combinations.
Bottom line
This Under Armour running shoe has made a lot of users happy and satisfied. The features and materials used in the making of the shoe promotes a comfortable ride. The Under Armour Charged Bandit Trail GTX is sure to offer runners with a durable, lightweight, and durable shoe that aims to take their running experience to the next level. With ease and confidence, runners will start and finish the activities in a timely manner."
Skechers GOrun Mojo, Skechers,86.0,,123.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 5.5oz,,,, Normal | Normal, Skechers GOrun Mojo - Radar,"5 reasons to buy
Most reviewers agreed that the shoe was very comfortable even when worn throughout the day.
The majority of testers appreciated the sleek style of the Skechers GOrun Mojo in their reviews.
Almost all users were happy to have used a pair as a casual sneaker for work, walking, and other general activities.
Several testers appreciated the light weight of the GOrun
Almost all users agreed that the shoe was of good value.
3 reasons not to buy
Plenty of female testers mentioned that the width was too narrow.
Most users narrated that this running shoe lacked underfoot support when used for running.
One user was not pleased that it didn’t have a traditional tongue construction. He mentioned that this set up was not suitable for his wide feet.
Bottom line
The Skechers GOrun Mojo is a road shoe that’s fit for daily use. Because of its sleek and minimalist design, it can be easily mistaken for a lifestyle sneaker. However, it was intended to be a lightweight runner that’s versatile and functional. Easy, general workouts can be conquered. Afterwards, runners can just step out of the gym and be street-wear ready with the same shoe on."
Merrell Trail Glove 5 3D,,71.0,59.0,82.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 6oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
People liked the design of the Merrell Trail Glove 5 3D, stating that the aesthetics captured the eyes of others on the trails.
Those who liked to feel the ground more when running off the roads felt that the underfoot experience given by this trail shoe was adequate and compliant.
According to a couple of testers, the forefoot section was spacious enough to welcome natural toe-splay.
The lightweight structure of this product was appreciated by most of those who bought it.
The underfoot platform is supportive and protective, according to many users.
The quick-lacing system of the shoe is commended by several wearers.
Numerous runners are pleased with the flexibility of the shoe.
The Trail Glove 5 3D is versatile enough to be used outside of the trails, as claimed by various purchasers.
4 reasons not to buy
Several of the purchasers reported that the overlays that served as the eyelets of the upper unit broke apart as early as the first use.
According to many testers, the knitted upper tore apart after a few weeks of use.
Based on a few reviews, the inner sleeve wasn’t able to hold the foot securely; accidental shoe removals quickly became a problem.
A couple of users observed the outsole wearing off after only a few weeks.
Bottom line
The Trail Glove 5 3D received mixed reviews. This trail running shoe was considered by many to be highly dutifully reactive to movements and highly accepting of the natural shape of the foot. But it was panned for having a sizing scheme that was bigger than the usual. The durability of the components was also frowned upon, with most runners lamenting the easy-to-tear upper and outsole units.
This Merrell trail running shoe is designed for those who like minimalist running footwear or products that don’t restrict the movements of the foot."
Newton MV3,,84.0,87.0,22.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 5.8oz , Women: 5.1oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The MV3 is super lightweight and very responsive as noted in some reviews.
The updated version of the MV featured an ultra-light mesh upper that is highly breathable and quickly-drying.
It has a wider toe box with TPU toe cap for comfortable protection.
It features a water drainage system to drain water quickly.
Most runners noticed the shoe’s filled toe area and widened midfoot for added stability.
2 reasons not to buy
The outsole is not as durable as expected, wears out quickly according to some testers.
Some testers felt that there is a little support in the heel.
Bottom line
The Newton MV3 is a lightweight performance shoe with a zero-drop profile. It is great for runners who are looking for speed during races and short distance runs. This shoe is engineered to give quick turnovers and an impressive performance."
Asics Gel Exalt 4,,80.0,,508.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The underfoot experience given by the Asics Gel Exalt 4 was said to be highly comfortable.
Many consumers claimed that the stability mechanisms of this running shoe effectively corrected instances of overpronation.
Some testers who had plantar fasciitis felt that the midsole was able to support the tendons and muscles of the underfoot, effectively easing the strain of taking each step.
Several runners mentioned that the design and color schemes were eye-catching.
The outsole unit’s traction capacity was well-liked by road running enthusiasts.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people noted that the toe box was tight, bunching up their toes awkwardly.
Several testers didn’t feel the pronation correction features of this shoe, stating that they still pronated excessively.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Exalt 4 review accumulation resulted in overall positive feedback. People were mostly happy with what this road running shoe had to offer, particularly when it comes to the underfoot support. But there were some who didn’t feel the stability mechanisms of the midsole. Several individuals also had complaints about the inconsistent sizing and fit. Still, the majority had great things to say about the Exalt 4’s looks, traction, and midsole plushness."
Adidas Pulseboost HD LTD,,89.0,,201.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12oz , Women: 12oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
Many buyers noted that the Adidas Pulseboost HD LTD is slightly cheaper than the other road running shoes.
“Comfortable” is a word that many runners have used to describe their experience with this shoe. 
Several users were happy that the Adidas Pulseboost HD LTD is perfect not only for running but also for everyday use.
Many purchasers lauded the value of this shoe considering the quality of the components. 
This Adidas running shoe has superior cushioning on all surfaces, which makes the running session less stressful, according to many purchasers. 
This shoe is ideal for long runs, a reviewer claimed.
The lightweight structure of the shoe helps increase running speed, a couple of commenters observed. 
Some people reported that this running companion has amazing traction capacity. 
A few wearers stated that the midsole of this shoe is responsive to the movements of the foot. 
3 reasons not to buy
Some consumers disliked that the Adidas Pulseboost HD LTD required a break-in period.
The upper material is a bit scratchy in the forefoot area, commented by a few testers. 
Several purchasers mentioned that the upper is too tight and rubs at the back of the ankle. 
Bottom line
The Adidas Pulseboost HD LTD gained mostly positive reviews from consumers. People who have tried it felt that the shoe is comfortable and responsive to their movements. This running shoe’s excellent grip, affordability, cushioning system, and lightweight structure were also appreciated by many users.  Meanwhile, the break-in period and tight upper construction were factors that did not satisfy a few consumers. "
Under Armour HOVR Phantom Project Rock,,76.0,,9.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The security given to the ankles is appreciated by many consumers.
Several consumers have noted that the contemporary aesthetic of the HOVR Phantom Project Rock allows it to be worn for a variety of activities.
This Under Armour running shoe is praised for having a responsive midsole.
Some purchasers believe that the weight of this running shoe is suitably light for daily use.
The traction of the outsole unit is praised by runners.
‘Comfortable’ is a word that many testers have used to describe the underfoot experience.
2 reasons not to buy
A few consumers believe that it is a chore to wear this shoe because of the restrictive one-piece opening.
The in-shoe feel is a bit restrictive, based on a handful of reviews.
Bottom line
All-in-all, people are mostly happy with what the Under Armour HOVR Phantom Project Rock has to offer. This road running shoe is praised for its comfortable cushioning system, the versatile looks, and the traction-ready outsole. Such factors encourage runners to take on more challenging activities, while the metrics of the digital features help improve performance.
Fans of shoes that can work for both casual strolls and athletic exploits can enjoy the HOVR Phantom Project Rock.
 "
Brooks Ravenna 7,,91.0,84.0,829.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.2oz , Women: 9.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Many liked the lightweight construction of the Ravenna 7.
The Segmented Crash Pad offers an effective heel-to-toe transition, according to a few testers.
Some runners liked the flexibility features of the shoe because of the Omega flex grooves.
The 7th version of the Ravenna features an adjustable saddle pulls that promotes a secure fit.
Many noticed that this version offers an efficient energy return.
Available in several color options.
3 reasons not to buy
Mesh upper is not effective in keeping foot dry and cool, as mentioned in some reviews.
Some felt that this shoe is too narrow for them.
A moderately high priced shoe.
Bottom line
The Brooks Ravenna 7 offers a number of impressive updates. It provides better cushioning, support and flexibility. Though there are a few who are not happy with the Ravenna 7, the majority still praised its performance. This road running shoe is best for long and short runs, but wide-footed runners may find this shoe a bit narrow."
Inov-8 Roclite 282 GTX,,92.0,87.0,45.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 8.7oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The synthetic materials and the GORE-TEX upper ensures a breathable and waterproof coverage.
Most reviewers noted that the flexibility of this shoe is just right for them to move a bit more naturally.
Some stability mechanisms are found in the Roclite 282 GTX and they efficiently allow the runner to perform in a more natural and balanced manner.
Sticky rubber on the outsole ensures a durable external layer while also maintaining traction over the various surfaces of the trails, based on some runner’s reviews.
Minimalist runners are the ones who are going to enjoy this running shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
Others noticed the heel area starting to fall apart after a few months of use.
It has a very expensive price.
Bottom line
The Roclite 282 GTX from Inov-8 is a great waterproof running shoe that many runners who want support and comfort can enjoy. It has waterproofing mechanics, a responsive midsole and a durable outsole unit for daily adventures. Though some users have negative experiences with the shoe, it still considered by the majority as a reliable running companion."
Merrell Bare Access Trail,,92.0,87.0,397.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.3oz , Women: 7.2oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The Bare Access Trail features breathable upper and reflective details for increased visibility when running in low light.
This shoe provides unmatched flexibility as mentioned in several reviews.
The Merrel Bare Access Trail has a roomy toe box, according to some runners.
The synthetic overlays keep the midfoot secure and well-connected to the heel area as most runners’ observed.
The shoe’s flat platform promotes stability while running on technical terrains, based on a handful of comments.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners felt the Bare Access Trail a bit narrow in the midfoot area.
Based on some reviews, the shoe failed to provide a minimalist feel.
Bottom line
The Merrell Bare Access Trail is ideal for runners who are looking for minimal comfort and protection for long trail runs. It offers locked-in fit from the heel to forefoot. It is a great option that will deliver a great running experience while running on technical terrains."
Asics Gel Sendai 2,,92.0,,275.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.5oz , Women: 10.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
A multidirectional stretch mesh provides a glove-like fit that’s comfortable and breathable.
Stitched-on and fused reinforcements make the upper more good-looking, but they also help the fabrics in giving a snug and secure fit.
Runners welcomed the Gel® Cushioning System, which absorbs impact shock.
High quality cushioning is given by the full-length Solyte® material, which is also lightweight and durable.
Added cushioning and breathability is given by the ComforDry™ Sock Liner.
The outsole is very capable of keeping the rest of the Asics Gel Sendai 2’s sole unit safe from wear and tear.
1 reasons not to buy
The heel area was a bit too narrow for a few runners; they complained of skin irritation and tightness.
Bottom line
Comfort and security are part of what the 2nd version of the Asics Gel Sendai is capable of providing to runners. Its appealing design makes it eye-catching. But its efficacy on the roads makes this running shoe a great companion for neutral runners."
Adidas Adizero Takumi-Sen 6,,85.0,,5.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 7oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The responsiveness of the midsole unit can easily be appreciated, according to some users.
Breathability is an aspect that people have come to welcome from this running shoe.
The durability of this product is said to be reliable and agreeable.
The added support given by the Torsion System is lauded by purchasers.
Based on a couple of reviews, the traction given by the outsole is precise.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people have expressed some disappointment because this product feels a bit heavier than the previous iteration.
Some users have mentioned that the laces have the tendency to unravel unexpectedly.
Bottom line
People are generally happy with the Adizero Takumi-Sen 6. This update to the well-known series of long-distance running shoes is welcomed for its performance-boosting midsole construction, the breathable cover system, and the traction-ready outsole. On the other hand, the increase in weight and the quick-to-unravel shoelaces are criticized.
Those who appreciate running shoes from Adidas and speed-oriented footwear, in general, can enjoy the Adidas Adizero Takumi-Sen 6."
Nike Quest SE, Nike,87.0,92.0,9.0,,, Road,, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 8oz,,,,, Nike Quest 2 SE,"5 reasons to buy
The price of the Nike Quest SE has been hailed as affordable and able to reach many potential shoe enthusiasts.
The Flywire system that is on the facade is praised for locking the foot in place and averting in-shoe wobbling.
Some users believe that the weight of this neutral running shoe is light enough for all-day use.
Shock absorption is a trait that people have come to appreciate from the midsole unit of the Nike Quest SE.
The surface traction given by the outsole rubber is said to be precise and efficient.
2 reasons not to buy
Some consumers are unhappy because the forefoot section is a bit restrictive.
A few people have complained that the midfoot portion of the inner sleeve has a tendency to irritate the skin.
Bottom line
People are mostly happy with the Nike Quest SE. This running shoe is welcomed because of its lightweight construction, the traction-ready external pad, and the impact-attenuating midsole. On the other hand, the negative aspect revolved around the restrictive and somewhat irritating in-shoe experience.
Fans of cheap running shoes that are still efficient can enjoy the Quest SE."
Nike Dart 10,,87.0,76.0,477.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A good number of runners loved the comfort coming from the cushioning and plush interior of the Dart 10.
A very affordable shoe.
The midfoot saddle and substantial overlays superbly secure the foot.
It is lighter than the earlier model.
Some appreciated the arch support of this shoe.
A breathable run is ensured by the moderately large holes of the mesh.
Durability is decent for a shoe of this price.
2 reasons not to buy
A few noted that the traction suffers when used in wet conditions.
Quite a number of reviewers observed that it is too small.
Bottom line
Nike continues to improve on the 10th iteration of the Dart as a solid choice for entry level runners who are looking for trusty and lightweight trainer with decent arch support. The shoe is a fancy-free trainer that can slog through miles of training in comfort."
Adidas Terrex Agravic GTX,,89.0,80.0,1158.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 12oz , Women: 10.4oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
The Adidas Terrex Agravic GTX felt suitably lightweight, according to several consumers.
The general durability of this model received recognition from its purchasers.
The waterproof capability of the Gore-Tex® gained some favor from those who wanted to have a versatile trail running companion.
A number of runners appreciated the apparently cool & modern design of this shoe.
It felt reliably comfortable for a lot of testers.
According to many reviewers, the cushioning system was responsive and accommodating.
The traction capability of the outsole unit was trusted by those who have tested it.
Several testers were able to take this running shoe on adventures that feature tough surfaces; they reported that the outsole stayed intact and unfettered by the experience.
2 reasons not to buy
The upper fabric left some blisters on the rear section of a tester’s foot.
A consumer stated that the upper unit wasn’t very breathable.
Bottom line
The Adidas Terrex Agravic GTX gained some favor from those who truly appreciated its technologies and features. They reported that its waterproof capability was effective and that its trail-optimized tread was on-par with their expectations. Moreover, neutral runners welcomed its responsive and bouncy mid-sole. Conversely, there were testers who weren’t too appreciative of some of its components, citing some discomfort during the running experience."
The North Face Ultra Swift,,72.0,,8.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The upper unit of The North Face Ultra Swift is welcomed because it is breathable.
People are happy with the responsive nature of the cushioning system.
The ability of the outsole unit to grip the surfaces is appreciated by runners.
According to some testers, the not-too-aggressive external pad permits adventures on flat ground.
‘Lightweight’ is a term that some purchasers have used to describe the weight of this product.
2 reasons not to buy
People have expressed some ire against the too-long shoelaces that have a tendency to come in contact with the outsole.
A few individuals are claiming that a break-in period of a few uses is needed before this shoe can acclimate to the foot.
Bottom line
The Ultra Swift aims to become a go-to option for those who have an affinity to go out and enjoy the off-road paths. The overall design has a road-running vibe that speaks of its capacity to transition to the asphalt due to its not-too-aggressive outsole. Neutral pronators are the target market for this product."
Asics GT 3000 3,,75.0,,14.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11oz , Women: 8.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics GT 3000 5,"6 reasons to buy
A cool and dry environment is provided by the breathable upper unit of the 3000 3.
The Comfordry Sock Liner is a removable insole that has moisture-wicking capabilities.
Runners appreciated the FluidRide mid-sole, which has a bouncy property that offers better underfoot cushioning.
The Dynamic DuoMax support system helped several runners achieve a better running stance by reducing the rate of over-pronation.
The Impact Guidance System and Guidance Trusstic System give the gait an enhanced level of efficiency when running as noted by a few testers.
Since its release, the GT 3000 3 has seen vast reductions in its price, which is now affordable.
4 reasons not to buy
The 3000 3 has a moderately heavy price.
Many runners felt that it was too stiff and bulky that it limited their natural movement.
The stitching of the overlay system began to loosen out for some testers.
The similar look to many of Asics shoes turned off a few reviewers.
Bottom line
The Asics GT 3000 3 is a supportive shoe that can be used daily for many activities. It has been enjoyed by many runners because of its comfortable cushioning, responsive stability mechanics, durable outsole and reliable overall quality. Though it also received negative comments from users, overall, the shoe is still considered by some as a successful update."
Saucony Zealot ISO 2,,83.0,81.0,265.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Saucony Zealot ISO 3,"9 reasons to buy
The Saucony Zealot ISO 2 felt agreeably lightweight, according to many testers.
An expert reviewer reported that the upper fabrics were able to envelop the foot and keep it secure.
Several runners noted that the ISOFIT and the thin overlay system were able to support the foot and prevent it from moving against the shoe.
The underfoot cushioning system received praise from a lot of consumers; they felt that it was efficient.
Many runners used the word ‘comfortable’ to describe their time while wearing this running shoe.
The rubber outsole gained some fans because it was durable and reliable.
A number of purchasers stated that the supportive fabrics didn’t allow their feet to accidentally be removed from the shoe; they stayed in place during the running session.
A tester commented that they experienced less fatigue since they made the change to the Zealot ISO 2.
Several runners stated that the design of this shoe was visually pleasing.
5 reasons not to buy
The toe box felt a bit narrow, according to some of those who have worn it.
Several runners reported that it was a bit heavier than the original version.
A few consumers didn’t acclimate well to the color schemes of the Zealot ISO 2, stating that they were over-the-top.
The heel section of the platform felt too firm at lower speeds, a tester observed.
Energy return wasn’t very high, according to a reviewer; it’s as though she was wearing a heavy-duty shoe without the extra bulkiness and weight.
Bottom line
The Saucony Zealot ISO 2 generally performed well, according to shoe enthusiasts. They felt that it was able to provide reliable service to those with neutral gaits. For many of them, the upper was supportive, the midsole was responsive, and the outsole was efficient. But there were those who stated that the first iteration was better. They didn’t think that the 2nd version was a bad model, but they also didn’t think that it was able to surpass the original Zealot ISO."
Under Armour Micro G Pursuit SE, Under Armour,88.0,,391.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.7oz , Women: 7.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
One of the users said that the Under Armour Micro G Pursuit SE is one of the most comfortable shoes he has worn.
According to those who have tried it, the shoe looks great.
It is supportive, based on some reviews.
The majority of the users said that the running shoe is lightweight.
Several consumers commented that the footwear is stylish.
The shoe is affordable.
1 reasons not to buy
A user noted that after having the shoe for almost eight months, it still squeaks in every step.
Bottom line
The Under Armour Micro G Pursuit SE has earned positive comments from most consumers. Generally, they are contented with how lightweight and comfortable the shoe was. It featured a stylish design that the majority of the buyers loved. Though one mentioned it was being squeaky with every step, others still recommend the shoe because of its overall performance. They all agreed that this shoe is an excellent option for those neutral runners who seek comfort and support without sacrificing quality."
Mizuno Wave Ultima 9,,97.0,92.0,228.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Mizuno Wave Ultima 11,"5 reasons to buy
The Mizuno Wave Ultima 9 provided an excellent fit, according to a wearer.
Several users commended the midsole for its padding and support.
The AIRmesh upper was cool, comfortable, and skin-friendly, as reported by a number of
The Wave Ultima 9 was efficient on both short- and long-distance runs, a runner stated.
The functionality of the shoe’s features was consistent with the previous versions, a satisfied user wrote.
2 reasons not to buy
The outsole has cracked and worn with just less than 20 kilometers logged, a disappointed user mentioned.
One wearer reported feeling pain in their leg and lower back while using the Mizuno Wave Ultima 9. Meanwhile, another commented about a persistent pain in their arch during running with the shoe.
Bottom line
The Mizuno Wave Ultima 9 was an upgrade that users gladly welcomed because of its fantastic performance, as well as its comfortable and supportive structure. However, it is worth noting that some wearers were not compatible with the shoe because of fit and durability issues. Overall, a majority of consumers have said that the Wave Ultima 9 is worth a try."
Merrell Nova GTX,,80.0,,29.0,,, Trail, Neutral,,,,,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The Merrell Nova GTX has a firm yet comfortable cushioning, according to numerous wearers.
The majority of users find the waterproof feature of the shoe to be highly reliable.
Several runners claim the Nova GTX to have excellent arch support.
The shoe is described as lightweight, as well as easy to wear for extended periods, by many reviewers.
A lot of comments mention the Nova GTX outsole’s excellent traction, especially on uneven and slippery terrain.
The roomy forefoot area of the shoe is a positive aspect for various users.
3 reasons not to buy
A couple of purchasers have experienced getting a sore foot, particularly with pain at the sides, because of the upper material.
According to some reviewers, the outsole is not very durable as it has started to develop holes within only a few months.
Aside from the outsole, the upper’s resilience is also doubtful to a few users, as they claim the stitching has fallen apart quite easily.
Bottom line
The majority of runners who have worn the Merrell Nova GTX have shown their satisfaction with their purchase. Positive comments surround the shoe in terms of comfort, support, and functionality. The fit of the shoe was also highly regarded by some. On the other hand, the Nova GTX received poor remarks on durability and craftsmanship, especially in the upper.
Despite the few criticisms, many users still find the Nova GTX to be an average-performing shoe that is worth repurchasing in the future."
Reebok PT Prime Run 2.0, Reebok,86.0,,75.0,$60,$26 (save 57%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
A good number of buyers says that the Reebok PT Prime Run 2.0 is affordable.
According to many testers, the shoe is comfortable.
It is stylish, based on some reviews.
Several purchasers agree that the running shoe is breathable.
A significant number of consumers love how the shoe performs in walking, running, and workout activities.
Many reviewers admire its lightweight structure.
Some purchasers love its cushioning.
3 reasons not to buy
According to several testers, the shoe is not true to size. It runs bigger than usual.
A user says that the shoe does not have enough support for exercising and walking.
The quality is poor, based on a review.
Bottom line
The Reebok PT Prime Run 2.0 is a neutral running shoe that is strategically designed for road running. The shoe gains a lot of praise because of its comfort level and fantastic design. Though some users have issues with its quality, sizing, and support, these problems did not hinder others from recommending the shoe for walking and running activities. Overall, this shoe receives positive comments and feedback because of its style and performance on the roads."
Nike Tri Fusion,,88.0,,125.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Most runners gave positive impressions on how comfortable the Nike Tri Fusion was for them.
The shoe features the tri-density mid-sole for better cushioning and smoother transition.
The lateral midfoot strap and overlays provide additional support and structure.
Most runners applauded the diamond design in the solid rubber outsole because it adds durability and promotes multidirectional traction.
This model a roomy toe box for better toe splaying.
This shoe has an affordable price.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners mentioned that the outsole layer of the shoe started peeling off earlier than expected.
Cushioning of the shoe needs improvement, as stated in some reviews.
Upper mesh is not totally breathable.
Bottom line
The Nike Tri Fusion is an affordable, lightweight running shoe. It features ample support, smooth transition, and impressive traction. It is a neutral running shoe that performs well on the road. This daily running shoe gained positive feedback from users because it delivers above-average performance compared to other cheap running shoes."
Adidas Alphabounce AMS,,88.0,80.0,582.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
Several testers were impressed at how comfortable the Adidas AlphaBounce AMS is.
The modern look of the shoes was admired by those who love wearing running shoes that can also be worn casually.
A number of users observed that the materials used for the shoe are of high quality.
The pull tab and the slight extension of the heel cup were helpful features for a lot of users because it helped them put their feet into the shoe.
Testers were impressed with the general durability of the shoe.
The Bounce technology was lauded by testers who wanted more of a firmer feel and a springier rebound when running.
The inner cushioning is not too plush. According to testers, it provided the right amount of foot stabilization and support.
Despite the limited color choices, users still applauded the available colorways.
The shape of the AlphaBounce AMS looks narrow and pointy, but many users observed that there is actually more room in the forefoot than meets the eye.
3 reasons not to buy
The tongue of the Adidas AlphaBounce AMS being sewn on both sides made users feel a little tight at the top of the foot.
A couple of users remarked that the AlphaBounce AMS was not efficient for long-distance running.
Testers observed that it took some effort to insert their feet into the shoe because the opening was too narrow.
Bottom line
The Adidas AlphaBounce AMS is a running shoe that’s versatile enough to be an everyday companion, whether one is going to the gym, going for a short run, hiking or going to work. This averagely priced shoe can also be a unique fashion statement with its futuristic design, monochromatic upper pattern and muted, yet stylish colorways."
Under Armour Charged Rebel, Under Armour,88.0,,181.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
A lot of users stated that the shoe was comfortable even for daily use.
The midsole yielded sufficient cushioning and support, according to a wearer.
The upper was breathable, and the shoe felt terrific in long-distance runs.
Many customers liked the design of the Charged Rebel.
Various runners mentioned they were satisfied with their performance while wearing the shoe.
5 reasons not to buy
One user was disappointed that the shoe’s materials looked cheap and flimsy.
Parts of the shoe wore out after only two weeks of use, a buyer observed.
Some testers lamented that even in the 2E width, this running shoe was still too small.
The back of the shoe rubbed against the Achilles and was uncomfortable, commented a wearer.
A runner said the outsole was inflexible and was slippery on many surfaces.
Bottom line
Several users had a positive experience with the Under Armour Charged Rebel. According to them, although it’s not an excellent shoe, it was able to deliver the expected performance. On the other hand, some wearers were unhappy with the durability and the apparently insubstantial design."
Mizuno Wave Creation 17,,92.0,88.0,758.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.1oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Mizuno Wave Creation 21,"6 reasons to buy
A majority of runners applauded the durable and comfortable construction of the Wave Creation 17.
Based on the some reviews, the 17th version of the Wave Creation offers plenty of cushioning.
It features the Mizuno’s U4ic technology for durability and superior ride, according to a few testers.
It uses the X10 carbon rubber for added durability in high wear areas.
The Mizuno Intercool midsole offers full-length ventilation for breathability and comfort.
Available in several color options.
2 reasons not to buy
A moderately high-priced shoe.
Some runners felt that this shoe is a bit heavy.
Bottom line
The Mizuno Wave Creation 17 offers an impressive update as far as cushioning, durability and support are concerned. This road running shoe is reliable for high mileage runs and great for everyday running. A few negative comments geared towards the price and weight, but overall, the shoe is really a wise buy."
Reebok ZigTech Squared 2.0, Reebok,70.0,,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 10.7oz,,,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Many runners applauded the sole design of the Reebok ZigTech Squared 2.0 because it provides reliable support and responsiveness.
A few runners noticed that the shoe is comfortable to wear.
The Zig platform of the shoe provides enhanced energy return for a more responsive ride.
Some runners found the fit satisfactory for their liking.
Has enough room in the toe box for toe splay.
The shoe is affordable.
3 reasons not to buy
Some users feel that the shoe is slightly heavier than other shoes in the ZigTech series.
A few users do not recommend the shoe for runs longer than 5k or 10k.
Some runners were disappointed by the poor durability of the shoe.
Bottom line
The Reebok ZigTech Squared 2.0 is a road running shoe for neutral pronators. It delivers great underfoot protection and a smooth transition. The comfort and responsiveness allow runners to move forward without hesitation. The shoe gained several positive reviews and a few negative ones but overall, the ZigTech Squared 2.0 is an average shoe that needs improvement."
The North Face Ultra Endurance,,84.0,82.0,16.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, The North Face Ultra Endurance II,"7 reasons to buy
Many runners appreciated the excellent traction provided by the outsole.
One user stated that the shoe had the perfect balance of performance, lateral stability, and protection.
Some buyers were satisfied with the thick insole because it held the foot well inside the shoe and prevented any in-shoe slipping, thus enabling a relaxed run.
A lot of users agreed with the comfort and the form-fitting coverage that the shoe gave.
It is the most comfortable-fitting shoe of The North Face brand, as stated by one reviewer.
One tester said that toe box felt roomier in comparison to other shoes from The North Face.
Another mentioned that the midsole provided agreeable cushioning and protection for the foot.
5 reasons not to buy
Several runners noted that the lugs worked well on slightly muddy trails, but not completely effective on a totally muddy environment as they carried the mud and weighed the shoe down.
Some users mentioned that the Ultra Endurance had a poor drainage system as it took almost a mile to completely shed water.
A number of users were disappointed with the shoe’s traction as it performed poorly on downhill trails.
One buyer did not like the weight of the shoe and felt that it dragged the foot down.
The upper was a bit too snug and narrow for some testers.
Bottom line
The Ultra Endurance is a great trail-and-mountain shoe that transitions well between a multitude of surfaces. With the cushioning it provides, this shoe is not highly recommended for runners looking for a low-drop or a minimalist shoe. It may not be the lightest shoe on the market, but the cushioning, protection, and longevity on offer are enough to make it an overall attractive shoe."
Inov-8 Parkclaw 275 GTX,,84.0,88.0,42.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The shoe was very comfortable that it felt like a slipper, according to a reviewer.
The Parkclaw 275 GTX was easy to wear and take off, attested numerous users.
Many wearers enjoyed the spacious toe box of the Parkclaw 275 GTX.
Several buyers claimed the sizing of the shoe was accurate.
The outsole performed exceptionally on soft terrain, said a runner. Another said they were impressed with the outsole’s sticky grip.
1 reasons not to buy
One user experienced discomfort as the shoe did not fit them properly.
Bottom line
The Inov-8 Parkclaw 275 GTX was, favorably, a surprising performer. Runners appreciated the versatility of the shoe, which allowed them to navigate between pavement and trail with almost-to-no problem. Many users found themselves recommending the shoe, especially to those who are marathon-inclined. Ultimately, the Parkclaw 275 GTX did a fantastic job in being a reliable shoe on both road and trail."
Newton Gravity All Weather,,82.0,80.0,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 3mm , Women: 3mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
One user was very appreciative of the technologies the Newton Gravity All Weather came with.
Another runner who has had endoscopic decompression surgery mentioned that it took pressure off the ball of his foot which was a great relief.
There were plenty of reviewers that said the upper performed well in snow.
Some testers mentioned that their foot remained dry while running in rain.
The majority of users agreed that the shoe delivers a good amount of comfort.
A few runners admired its lightness.
Most were impressed by the overall design. These testers appreciated the glow in the dark feature.
A few testers noticed that the lugs were softer than the regular Gravity versions. The softness allowed them to get more bounce into their stride.
On runner was happy because her foot remained warm while walking and running in icy weather.
3 reasons not to buy
One runner though that the glow in the dark feature was cool, but she wished that the glow lasted longer.
Another tester noticed that the laces were not as secure as the laces in the Newton Motion.
Plenty of users were disappointed to discover that this is a limited edition shoe. They hoped that it would be part of the permanent collection.
Bottom line
Plenty of runners were impressed with the performance of the Newton Gravity All Weather. Its upper's water resistance proved to be effective when testers ran through rain and snow. Many also commented that it was light and comfortable, with a cool glow in the dark feature. The only con that most runners mentioned is that they hoped the shoe would be part of the permanent collection instead of being limited edition."
New Balance Vazee Coast v2, New Balance,81.0,,139.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 6.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Many runners found the lightweight construction of the Vazee Coast v2 admirable.
Some runners liked the roomy toe box of the New Balance Vazee Coast v2.
The New Balance Vazee Coast v2 is a comfortable shoe, according to some reviews.
Available in different color options.
Many runners appreciated the no-sew upper construction of the shoe for irritation-free running experience.
Budget-friendly running shoe.
True to size.
3 reasons not to buy
A few number of runners disliked the thin tongue and collar of the Vazee Coast v2.
For few runners, the shoe was too soft for their liking.
Few wide-footed runners mentioned that they ordered the shoe in wide width but it was still too tight for them.
Bottom line
With a budget-friendly price, the New Balance Vazee Coast v2 comes with a great combination of comfort, breathability and reliable cushioning. This road running shoe comes in sporty-chic design that will not disappoint when use for uptempo training and competition."
New Balance Minimus Zero v2 Road,,91.0,85.0,194.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 5.9oz , Women: 4.7oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
New Balance uses the FantomFit technology in the upper of this model for a sock-like fit and amazing comfort.
Antimicrobial properties are also introduced to fight bad odor and germs.
It is ultra-flexible.
Already very light, some runners had to check their feet to make sure they still have their shoes on.
A few testers lauded the Minimus Zero v2 Road’s ability to promote a natural running motion.
The 5 different color options make it visually endearing.
It has an affordable price.
2 reasons not to buy
The high ankle collar of the New Balance Minimus Zero v2 Road may bother some runners.
Some users have encountered shoe models that do not have the best build quality to represent the New Balance brand.
Bottom line
The Minimus Zero v2 Road is a minimalist shoe that offers just a hint of arch support and enough underfoot protection. The cushioning is average, but the responsive features of this shoe are truly exceptional. Given the praised and negative feedback, New Balance still needs to do some improvement in the Minimus Zero v2 Road."
Salomon Speedcross Vario,,91.0,83.0,345.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.2oz , Women: 11.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Salomon Speedcross Vario 2,"5 reasons to buy
The Speedcross Vario features the anti-debris breathable mesh upper that gives comfort while running.
Most runners applauded the tongue cover of the shoe that keeps debris and rocks from entering the shoe.
The Salomon Speedcross Vario uses the Contragrip technology that provides additional gripping power when running in various terrains.
Some runners took note of the shoe’s precise fit as a result of the Sensifit technology.
The overall construction of the shoe is lightweight and durable as mentioned in several reviews.
3 reasons not to buy
The firm cushioning of the shoe is not great for long distance running.
The price is slightly expensive.
Most runners expected this shoe to have a quick lacing system.
Bottom line
The Salomon Speedcross Vario is a neutral trail running shoe that offers enough cushioning, enough protection and impressive comfort. It has a great grip on different surfaces and one can even use this shoe every day for any outdoor activity. Though it also gained negative feedback from users, overall, the shoe is still considered by some as a worthy investment."
,,,83.0,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.4oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,
Salomon Speedcross Vario 2,,91.0,88.0,840.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Many runners have observed that the outsole did a fantastic job, especially on muddy trails.
A reviewer stated that the shoe provided excellent grip on all trail surfaces.
The upper was very effective in guarding debris out as well as retaining foot dryness, according to a tester.
Most users experienced a comfortable wear that did not require a break-in period.
Several wearers said the Speedcross Vario 2 was a durable trail-running shoe.
The shoe presented a snug fit resulting in a pleasant and smooth ride, one runner expressed.
2 reasons not to buy
A few consumers noticed the insole was not secure and kept moving out of place.
The lugs on the outsole were not on the same level of efficiency as other Salomon trail running shoes, as mentioned by a reviewer.
Bottom line
The Speedcross Vario 2 has delivered an impressive performance, according to many runners, with its technologies working together to yield multiple benefits to the user. However, despite the remarkable features, there were some who thought improvements are needed. Overall, the Speedcross Vario 2 has proven to be a reliable trail shoe."
Adidas Adizero Boston Boost 5, Adidas,91.0,86.0,140.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.3oz , Women: 7.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Adidas Adizero Boston 9,"6 reasons to buy
The mesh material used for the upper unit of the Adidas Adizero Boston Boost 5 is soft and breathable, keeping the skin comfortable at all times.
The upper adapts to the type and shape of the foot, bringing a secure coverage without making it feel too tight.
Suede overlays ensure more security to the foot, adding more snugness.
Many runners appreciated the mid-sole unit of this running shoe, which features molded EVA and cleat™ technology for comfort and springiness.
The different color schemes that are available for this model make it appealing to many runners.
Continental Rubber and ADIWEAR make the outsole unit more formidable against wear and tear.
2 reasons not to buy
A few runners felt that the upper was a bit irritating to the skin when worn barefoot for longer periods of time.
Some didn’t appreciate the lack of reflective coating to make evening runs easier and safer.
Bottom line
Featuring a slightly wider fit than the previous version, the 5th iteration of the Adidas Adizero Boston Boost makes daily running more enjoyable and easier to do. Its durable and reliable nature allows it to function well as a racing shoe, taking on fun runs and even marathons."
New Balance 1260 v4, New Balance,91.0,92.0,111.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
The fit is supremely comfortable in the 1260 v4, based on most reviews.
A good number of runners really enjoyed its stylish and trendy looks.
The 4th version has a very stable ride for overpronators.
The midsole foams utilized deliver the right mix of cushioning and stability.
Several reviews mentioned the smooth transition from landing to take off.
It has narrow (B) to extra wide widths (4E).
The seamless and plush interior makes it a great choice for sockless running.
A large number of runners with flat feet gave their thumbs up to the fit and stability of the New Balance 1260 v4.
Grip, including wet areas, is fantastic according to a handful of comments.
2 reasons not to buy
A few noticed that it lacks flexibility for toe offs.
Quite a number were frustrated as the sole separated from the shoe after only a few months.
Bottom line
New Balance’s premium stability running shoe roars again in the 4th iteration of the 1260. With superb stability, great cushioning, and grip, it promises to be a workhorse of a trainer, particularly for heavy overpronators. Additionally, the plush comfort makes it an all-day casual shoe."
Adidas Adizero Adios Boost 2.0, Adidas,91.0,83.0,55.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.3oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Adidas Adizero Adios Boost 3.0,"6 reasons to buy
The rubber material used for the external sole layer delivers sure protection and traction on the roads.
A mesh material that’s breathable is what makes up the main upper unit of the Adidas Adizero Adios Boost 2.0.
Tirrenina suede overlays have been stitched onto the upper to provide a more customizable fit.
The simple color schemes were appealing to many runners.
The boost™ technology provides responsiveness and additional lift with every step.
Runners felt that the outsole unit wasn’t stiff and that it was able to retain its durable nature despite its low-profile design.
2 reasons not to buy
It has an expensive price tag, partly due to the inclusion of the boost™ technology.
A few testers thought that it was a bit narrow for their feet.
Bottom line
A responsive ride makes the Adidas Adizero Adios Boost 2.0 a great option for runners who want to get the most out of their running sessions. It doesn’t have a heavy weight and it doesn’t feel stiff. Though its sole unit is a bit thin, it still gives reliable underfoot cushioning."
Brooks Dyad 9,,79.0,80.0,373.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.5oz , Women: 11oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Brooks Dyad 11,"11 reasons to buy
The Brooks Dyad 9 is very comfortable, according to most reviewers.
It is lighter than the previous model.
More than a few mentioned that the price is fair or average.
Some runners noted that it is quite responsive.
Traction is reliable, based on several comments.
The cushioning is really good for those who work long hours or run daily, as remarked by more than a few.
A handful loved its reliable arch support.
Several runners have used it for endurance training and gym workouts.
Some runners appreciated the adequate space in the interior to accommodate orthotics.
A moderate number of runners gave a thumbs up to the shoe’s durability.
More than a handful of runners appreciated the wide soles or footprint as it adds stability to their runs.
5 reasons not to buy
The 9th iteration of the Dyad is a bit stiffer than before.
Despite being lighter than the earlier model, a handful still thought that it is a bit heavy.
The toe box is narrower than the previous version, which greatly disappointed several loyal fans of this line.
Ugly is often associated when it comes to the appearance of the 9th edition of the Dyad, based on the comments of some runners.
The heel is shallower and does not provide security like the past model of this shoe, according to a few followers of the Dyad line.
Bottom line
The Dyad 9 is a neutral running shoe like the Brooks Launch 6 that offers excellent arch support. Brooks recommends it for those who wear orthotics or those with wider feet. Versatility is a great asset of this shoe as it can work as a daily training partner and as an everyday wear for people who are up on their feet for long hours. It should be a solid option for those with flat or medium arches that also need good cushioning in their shoes."
Asics Gel Phoenix 8, Asics,86.0,70.0,351.0,,, Road, Stability,,, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"9 reasons to buy
Most of the reviews of the Phoenix 8 mentioned that it is super comfortable.
It is very breathable, according to several.
The shoe effectively holds off overpronation, as observed by some.
A handful noted that the outsole is made to really last for a long time.
A good number of reviewers noticed a smoother transition in the gait cycle.
The traction is very good, opined more than a few users.
It works as a reliable and sturdy training partner in the gym, according to some users.
Most female runners loved the way the shoe looks.
Available in a handful of colors.
3 reasons not to buy
Several comments included that the 8th version of the Phoenix is heavy.
It is a bit too stiff, according to some.
According to many comments, runners might as well opt for the Kayano line, which is only a few dollars more..
Bottom line
The Gel Phoenix 8 lives up to the benchmarks of Asics stability shoes. It effectively curbs the inward rolling of the feet while still providing more than adequate cushioning. While runners may not be breaking their best times in this shoe, it can really shine as a sturdy workhorse that can handle high-mileage runs, particularly for heavy-framed runners."
Saucony Koa TR,,81.0,85.0,56.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A couple of consumers were surprised that the shoe is more supportive than expected.
Some runners felt the KOA TR provided a comfortable ride that is just right for trail running.
The midsole is thick and feels great to run in, a buyer commented.
A lot of users are impressed by the light weight of the shoe.
Several runners were satisfied by the traction provided by the lugs of the shoe.
One reviewer commented on the excellent water drainage system of the KOA TR.
The weave of the upper is tight but is surprisingly breathable, according to one user.
4 reasons not to buy
Some users felt the shoe was heavy and that it had a tendency to drag the foot.
One runner commented the lugs had less grip than they would have preferred.
The shoe is harsh on the first use and required breaking in, according to a reviewer.
There was a noticeable tightness around the midfoot, which was hard to ignore, as stated by a user.
Bottom line
With a much-appreciated versatility and impressive technology, the KOA TR delivers comfort and performance that is outstanding no matter the trail condition. It is not the lightest trail shoe on the market, but its responsive performance was admired by many neutral runners. They liked that the shoe was able to provide feedback and lateral stability without compromising protection."
Nike Air Zoom Wildhorse 3 GTX,,78.0,80.0,28.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The mesh upper is combined with the GORE-TEX membrane to provide breathable, waterproof covering for the foot.
Many reviewers welcomed the inclusion of the Dynamic Flywire cables that adjusts the fit well.
Runners also liked the Compression Molded Phylon Mid-sole material that offers responsive underfoot cushioning.
The Rubber Waffle features multi-surface traction because of the gripping lugs and the durable material.
Many testers liked how the Air Zoom Wildhorse 3 GTX can easily be cleaned without worrying about breaking the material.
3 reasons not to buy
There were runners who thought that the 3rd version of this running shoe was too small for their feet.
There were also complaints that the upper was a bit too tight.
This shoe has a high price.
Bottom line
The Air Zoom Wildhorse 3 GTX from Nike is a great neutral trail running companion for runners who want to go on off-road adventures. Its comfortable mid-sole, reliable outsole, and sure waterproofing mechanics boost the runner’s confidence on the trails."
Under Armour SpeedForm Slingride,,86.0,70.0,203.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.4oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
One tester commented that the Under Armour SpeedForm Slingride was the most comfortable one they ever owned.
Many runners welcomed its appealing and eye-catching design.
The lightweight nature of this model was adequate for those who tried it.
Reviewers noted that the cool-looking aesthetics made it agreeable for casual use.
A user wrote that the upper unit was able to hug their foot securely, but not too tightly.
The upper garnered appreciation because it felt like a sock and that it didn’t irritate the feet of the testers.
The underfoot foam unit was able to deliver the right amounts of cushioning without feeling too overbearing, according to one tester.
2 reasons not to buy
The foot of a reviewer slid around the interior when they used it for running, and it felt uncomfortable for them.
The upper unit felt thin for a runner, and they didn’t feel like it would last many running sessions.
Bottom line
The Under Armour SpeedForm Slingride gained praise for its high-quality construction and its efficient features. Many runners were also impressed by its eye-catching looks. They said that this neutral shoe was great for running and for casual use. Overall, the shoe was a fruitful release."
Nike Odyssey React Shield,,89.0,80.0,188.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Nike Odyssey React Shield 2,"5 reasons to buy
The Nike Odyssey React Shield is a comfortable running shoe, said a few users.
Some wearers considered the Odyssey React Shield as a versatile running shoe; they are wearing it for casual walking activities and workout sessions.
Several users admired the shoe’s water-repellent upper; they said it makes the shoe best for winter running.
A few runners admired the shoe’s level of cushioning.
A user mentioned that the Odyssey React Shield is a good-looking shoe.
4 reasons not to buy
A couple of wearers were disappointed with the shoe’s narrow toe box and its small sizing.
A few testers were unhappy with the toggle lacing system because it doesn’t feel secure and the laces are way too long.
A reviewer noted that the shoe is not breathable.
This shoe is not as flexible as the Epic React, a tester commented.
Bottom line
As a road running shoe designed to tackle the cold, wet weather, the Odyssey React Shield gathered mixed reviews from the users. Negative and positive comments surround the shoe’s design, sizing, and performance. Though some admired its water-repellent feature, the negative reviews are proof that there is still a room for improvement for this shoe."
Newton Distance Elite,,89.0,84.0,23.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.6oz , Women: 6.2oz, Men: 2mm , Women: 2mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The Newton Distance Elite is a very lightweight shoe.
The seamless upper construction gives a comfortable fit, according to most runners.
Most runners applauded the Action/Reaction technology in the outsole of the shoes that promotes a very firm but comfortable ride.
Some runners pointed out the fast-drying, breathable mesh of the Distance Elite.
The overall construction of the shoe is durable as noted in most reviews.
2 reasons not to buy
Moderately high-priced shoe.
Some runners observed that this shoe has an excessively wide toe box.
Bottom line
The Newton Distance Elite is a perfect training partner that offers good arch support, a responsive, lightweight, and efficient ride. The overall construction of the shoe gained positive responses in most reviews. This shoe is ideal for road performance as well."
Asics Gel Sonoma 2 GTX,,87.0,,105.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Asics Gel Sonoma 3 GTX,"6 reasons to buy
The Sonoma 2 GTX offers an extremely comfortable ride, noted several runners.
Most runners ranked the shoe’s durability as very good.
It is an excellent investment for trail runners.
The numerous flex grooves provide indispensable flexibility in a well-cushioned shoe.
The 2nd version of the Sonoma GTX is versatile enough to take the runner from road to trail, according to some reviews.
Running from 10Ks to ultra-long distances is doable in this shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
The elevated stack height may disappoint more than several runners.
Some runners were not able to enjoy their technical runs in this shoe.
Bottom line
The Gel Sonoma 2 GTX is a muscled trainer that can still take on ultra-long miles. With this in mind, Asics provides more than adequate arch support that still allows neutral runners to pile on the miles. The shoe is made for recreational or novice runners but remains to be a good option for seasoned ones who are looking for a reliable and no-fuss training partner."
Adidas Kanadia 7,,87.0,83.0,559.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 11mm , Women: 11mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The general feedback for the Adidas Kanadia 7 was positive and many said that it was very comfortable and agreeable to their performance on the trails.
An athlete wrote that they had no issue with this model when they used it for off-road racing competitions.
The trail-ready outsole was lauded by testers because it was able to hold onto the trail surfaces with ease.
Rocks, grass, dirt and mud weren’t much of a problem for this model, as observed by a majority of users.
A purchaser stated that they would recommend the Adidas Kanadia 7 to a friend because it was long-lasting, and that it had perfect quality.
The upper unit felt snug but not too tight, noted some runners.
A lot of testers wrote that they had a good price for such a quality trail running shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
A user complained that the toe-box was too big and that it caused their foot to slide around a little bit.
One tester noted that the outsole grip wasn’t as strong on wet surfaces because they slipped and fell under such conditions.
Bottom line
Comfortable coverage, responsive cushioning and a trail-ready outsole enable the Adidas Kanadia 7 to provide dependable performance in the great outdoors. A lot of runners and athletes praised its design, its cushioning and its grip on multiple types of topography. A polarizing user review criticized the outsole’s performance on wet surfaces but didn’t seem to be the case for a great majority of those who tried this neutral trail shoe."
Asics Gel Pursue 4,,90.0,,53.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Pursue 5,"5 reasons to buy
According to some users, the Asics Gel Pursue 4 is a very comfortable running shoe.
A few wearers admired the shoe's durable design.
Some runners mentioned that the Gel Pursue 4 feel light when worn.
Based on some user reviews, the shoe offers amazing cushioning in every step.
The overall performance of the Gel Pursue 4 is impressive; a few runners are planning to purchase another pair.
2 reasons not to buy
A few disappointed users mentioned that the Asics Gel Pursue 4 runs smaller than usual.
Some wide-footed runners noticed that this version is not as wide as the old Gel Pursue.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Pursue 4 is a reliable road running shoe. It continues to deliver an impressive ride quality expected by most fans. The shoe gathered mixed feedback from its users. Some were happy because of the shoe's durability, comfort, and performance while others are disappointed when it comes to fit and sizing. Overall, the shoe proved to be a successful release. It is a good option for runners who are looking for a shoe that offers responsiveness. "
Adidas Energy Cloud,,91.0,83.0,1409.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Adidas Energy Cloud 2,"11 reasons to buy
A good number of runners have used the Adidas Energy Cloud for gym workouts.
It is super affordable.
It is quite light.
Several users appreciated the comfortable fit of this shoe.
The numerous holes offer great breathability.
A midfoot cage that extends to form an external heel counter lock down the foot.
The Adiwear outsole provides excellent durability.
Several runners valued the shoe’s noticeable responsiveness.
There are numerous color options available.
It is great for all-day standing or for work, according to a good number of reviewers.
The shoe can really take a beating before it begins to show wear and tear, as reported by more than a few users.
4 reasons not to buy
A handful of runners noted that small pebbles often get stuck in the outsole of the Energy Cloud.
It doesn’t have good traction on wet surfaces, according to a few comments.
The heel feels a bit stiff for some users.
It runs a little smaller and narrower than a standard fit, based on the comments of a moderate number of runners.
Bottom line
Adidas offers a versatile and extremely affordable shoe in the Energy Cloud. Like its recent version, the Energy Cloud 2, the Energy Cloud delivers great support, superb comfort, and more than adequate responsiveness for high-mileage runs or daily training. For runners who are looking for a road running shoe that shines in functionality without any hassle, the Energy Cloud should be a really great choice."
Adidas Terrex Skychaser,,91.0,83.0,334.0,,, Trail, Stability, Men: 11.5oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Many runners considered the Adidas Terrex Skychaser to be a visually attractive shoe.
A number of consumers wrote that they actually found reliable quality and great value from this model, even though it had an arguably high price point.
There were purchasers who appreciated the overall construction of this shoe; for them, it was durable and generally well-made.
The outsole unit’s grip capability received recognition for being precise and unfailing; many testers didn’t report any slipping during their trail running experience.
The boost™ mid-sole really worked well for a lot of runners; they felt the responsiveness of this material as they tackled the trails.
The underfoot platform felt stable and supportive, reported a happy consumer.
Runners generally welcomed the breathable nature of this shoe’s upper fabric, citing that their feet remained cool and dry while wearing it.
Many reviewers agreed that the Adidas Terrex Skychaser is true-to-size.
2 reasons not to buy
An unsatisfied tester wasn’t too keen about this model because its forefoot section felt too narrow.
Some reviewers felt a bit of pain when initially wearing this shoe, stating that it was the effect of the break-in period.
Bottom line
The Adidas Terrex Skychaser generally received positive feedback from trail enthusiasts and shoe reviewers because they were satisfied with what it had to offer. Many of them wrote that its components actually helped them during their running sessions, particularly the stable midsole unit. But there were a few who thought that its overall construction was a bit inconsistent with what they were used to."
Merrell Bare Access Flex Knit,,87.0,,320.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 7.5oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The shoe delivered a precise fit, a couple of users stated.
The Merrell Bare Access Flex Knit gave just enough support for everyday running, wrote a reviewer.
Many users appreciated the convenient lacing system.
The midsole gave adequate cushioning despite being a barefoot shoe, said a buyer.
The toe box was pleasantly spacious, a wearer mentioned.
One reviewer was amazed at the sock-like sensation of the upper.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners claimed the Bare Access Flex Knit did not feel like a minimalist shoe because of its bulky
A bit stiff in the heel, a user observed.
One tester experienced discomfort after wearing the shoe for an extended period.
Bottom line
The Merrell Bare Access Flex was able to impress both new and loyal users of the brand, as the shoe received several commendations regarding the fit and efficiency of its features. However, it seemed to have missed on providing a good feel, according to some wearers. Therefore, Merrell still has some areas to improve on the Bare Access series."
Newton Sir Isaac,,89.0,82.0,22.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The closed mesh upper offers breathable coverage that also keeps debris at bay.
The sporty design has been welcomed by many reviewers.
The Single-density, high-rebound EVA cushions the foot while providing moderate stability.
The testers have also noticed the inclusion of a mid-foot chassis/shank, which heightens the stability given by the Sir Isaac.
The Action/Reaction Technology found in the forefoot area absorbs impact energy, then boosts the propelling motion of every step.
Beveled lugs in the outsole usher the runner through a more responsive running experience.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners noticed the outsole breaking its integrity after a few months of use.
Others thought that it was a bit too wide in the forefoot area.
A few noted that it looked a bit bulky.
Bottom line
The Sir Isaac from Newton is a daily running shoe that functions well in many kinds of activities. It is a solid offering to runners who want underfoot support, a breathable upper, and a responsive outsole. Overall, the Sir Isaac running shoe proved to be a desirable choice for a simple, no-frills runner."
Reebok Speedlux 2.0, Reebok,89.0,77.0,138.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal, Reebok Speedlux 3.0,"5 reasons to buy
Many customers agreed that the Reebok Speedlux 2.0 was affordable.
Numerous wearers found the shoe to have an excellent fit.
Several users said the shoe was lightweight.
One tester commented in gripped well on various surfaces.
The Speedlux 2.0 was a well-constructed shoe, said a runner.
3 reasons not to buy
While the cushioning was comfortable, it did not seem durable enough for long runs, a user commented.
One wearer asserted the shoe had low-quality materials because it felt cheap.
The outsole was a bit too stiff, said a buyer.
Bottom line
The Reebok Speedlux 2.0 scored a mix of positive and negative feedback from users on its fit, price, and structural elements. There were also criticisms regarding performance and quality. Some customers stated that while it was affordable, it may not be worth the purchase. On the other hand, more forgiving commenters have suggested the shoe for beginner runners who are not looking for something that is heaving with too many features."
Reebok One Guide 3.0,,83.0,,18.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Three mesh materials offer support in different zones, which is most noticeable during the phases of running.
Most reviewers appreciated the low-cut design, which improved the freedom of the foot’s movement.
The FoamFusion mid-sole uses 3 types of foam: The C43 for cushioning, the T48 for stability, and the R52 for forward propulsion.
The outsole features components that give off traction, durability, and propulsion, making each stride more controlled and efficient.
Many testers noted the reliable durability of the 3rd version of the One Guide.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners who have narrow feet thought that the One Guide 3.0 was a bit too wide.
Some of the testers felt that the mid-sole needed more springiness to its cushioning system.
A few didn’t like the bulky look of this running shoe.
Bottom line
The One Guide 3.0 from Reebok is a robust shoe for many runners because of its multiple layers of technologies. Comfort, mild stability, durability, and control are afforded to anyone who wears it for their athletic activities. Though there are a few negative comments about the shoe's cushioning and fit, overall, the shoe won't disappoint runners."
New Balance 880 v8 GTX,,83.0,,75.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 9.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, New Balance 880 v9 GTX,"5 reasons to buy
The underfoot cushioning system seemed to help in achieving a smooth and natural stride, based on several reviews.
More than a handful of people liked the sturdy build of the New Balance 880 v8 GTX, stating that the materials lasted long.
The fact that wide variations of this shoe’s width are available was appreciated by many testers.
A break-in period wasn’t necessary for this running shoe, some individuals claimed; this shoe was apparently comfortable right out of the box.
According to several runners, the 880 v8 GTX had a weight that was lighter than they expected.
2 reasons not to buy
A few consumers lamented the lack of a narrow-width variant; they felt that the standard width option of this model was a bit wide.
A couple of runners felt that the limited breathability of the upper caused the foot to feel a bit warm and sweaty.
Bottom line
The feedback for the New Balance 880 v8 GTX was very positive. Most were glad of its capacity to lead the foot smoothly through the gait cycle. People were also happy with its durable build, multiple width options, and lightweight disposition. On the other hand, this road companion received criticism for having a stuff interior and for skimping on a narrow-width option."
New Balance Fresh Foam Roav Fusion,,68.0,,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
People agreed that the Fresh Foam Roav Fusion is comfortable. 
Many have appreciated the lightweight structure of the shoe. 
This running companion is supportive, based on some reviews. 
The shoe is also perfect for casual wear, according to many users. 
A lot of buyers appreciated the shoe’s cushioning system. 
Most purchasers are happy with its stylish design.
3 reasons not to buy
The Fresh Foam Roav Fusion does not offer good grip, said a purchaser. 
Some consumers commented that this shoe requires a break-in period. 
It is difficult to get on because of the tight shoe opening, some users reported.
Bottom line
Featuring a modern look in fresh colors, the New Balance Fresh Foam Roav Fusion is suitable for both running and casual walks. It is an everyday running shoe that works best for runners and athletes with neutral gaits. The Fresh Foam Roav Fusion is crafted using advanced technologies to provide a responsive and comfortable platform, enabling the runner to achieve optimal performance."
Nike Flex Contact 3,,85.0,,9.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 7.5oz , Women: 6oz,,,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Wearers have testified that the Nike Flex Contact 3 is fast and lightweight. 
This running shoe is comfortable to wear, based on reviews. 
Many runners love the flexibility of the shoe. 
The upper is breathable, according to some commenters. 
It offers just the right amount of cushioning, a few users claim. 
Several purchasers mention that the shoe offers a snug fit. 
People are happy that the Nike Flex Contact 3 is affordable. 
A couple of buyers noticed that this running companion is easy to put on.
4 reasons not to buy
A few testers noted that the Nike Flex Contact 3 does not offer enough ankle support.
This shoe is a bit narrow, said some consumers. 
One runner reported that it is not durable enough for long runs. 
Some wearers dislike that there are no laces to tighten the shoe.
Bottom line
Featuring a lightweight structure, the Nike Flex Contact 3 is designed to provide a comfortable and efficient ride. It is a good option for runners and athletes who are looking for a flexible and breathable running companion that is easy to slip on and off. It is ideal for neutral runners or those who do not overpronate.
 "
La Sportiva Wildcat 3.0,,83.0,77.0,151.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 13.1oz , Women: 10.7oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Some runners noticed the enhanced comfort given by the 3rd version of the Wildcat.
The Air Mesh provides breathable coverage that’s comfortable and lightweight.
The toe cap protects the foot from debris.
Many reviewers like the Asymmetrical lacing harness of the Wildcat 3.0, which efficiently adjusts the fit in a responsive manner.
This shoe features the Impact Brake System for shock absorption and maximum grip.
This version comes with a wider toe box which was ideal for those with wide feet.
3 reasons not to buy
There were runners who noticed that the shoe lining does not totally keep the foot cool and dry.
The weight of the Wildcat 3.0 is heavy.
It has a slightly expensive price.
Bottom line
The La Sportiva Wildcat 3.0 is a reliable trail shoe for neutral runners. Runners can expect a comfortable fit and plush cushioning from the La Sportiva Wildcat 3.0. Many were impressed by the updated look and construction of the Wildcat. This shoe is best for off-road racing, long distance running and daily training sessions."
On Cloudracer,,80.0,79.0,37.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.7oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
The Cloudracer is designed for speed work on races or on trainings, according to quite a number of users.
There is a noticeably decent amount of cushioning noted by a few testers.
Being stylish is one of the compliments that many testers say.
Many runners who tried the On Cloudracer applauded its super lightweight and quality performance.
It is light and low to the ground.
Its cushioning is efficient enough for a minimalist-type racing shoe.
It gives a springier bounce during the race based on several comments.
The Cloudracer delivers a stable ride because of the Speedboard.
There is much protection found in this shoe than the other ON running shoes.
3 reasons not to buy
It is a bit narrow.
Many runners complained of the needed transition before they get used to its design.
Its expensive price tag holds back some runners from buying it.
Bottom line
The ON Cloudracer is a racing flat shoe that can be used for speed works. Its main features provide a sleeker design for speed and support, together with an adequate amount of the cushioning and protection. With added stability, all you feel is a springy and responsive ride."
Salomon Speedcross Vario 2 GTX,,80.0,,705.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.6oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
According to several reviewers, the upper offered reliable waterproof coverage.
Most consumers welcomed the shoe’s good-looking design.
Several runners welcomed the proficient performance of the Wet Traction Contagrip outsole.
Most users lauded the durability of the Salomon Speedcross Vario 2 GTX.
The shoe offers a reliable level of cushioning, according to a few reviews.
3 reasons not to buy
A couple of unhappy users mentioned that the heel had a tight fit; one said he had a blister.
The Speedcross Vario 2 GTX is a bit heavy, said one
According to a few, the shoe has a narrow fit in the forefoot.
Bottom line
The Salomon Speedcross Vario 2 GTX is a trail running shoe with a waterproof coverage. The shoe gained both positive and negative feedback from the users. Some admired the shoe’s impressive grip and durable design; others were really disappointed with the fit and weight. Overall, the shoe performs well for others, but it also needs some improvement."
Asics Gel Surveyor 5,,93.0,,227.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.6oz , Women: 9.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 13mm, Oct 2016,,,"9 reasons to buy
A good number of users loved the Gel Surveyor 5’s comfort.
Several runners with flat feet really enjoyed their runs in this shoe.
The arch support is reliable without being too aggressive, according to some runners.
More than a couple of users who are on their feet for prolonged periods of time greatly valued the luxurious and supportive cushioning.
A handful made remarks about how breathable the 5th version of the Surveyor is.
A few have used it for gym workouts to great effect because of the support and good cushioning.
4 color combinations to choose from.
For a meaty shoe with excellent cushioning and stability, it requires no break-in period, as reported by some runners.
According to more than a few runners, the durability of the 5th version of the Gel Surveyor is really excellent.
3 reasons not to buy
It is very expensive.
A few noticed that the cushioning is too soft.
It is a bit heavy for some users.
Bottom line
Asics provides a solid mix of cushioning and stability in the Surveyor 5. The tons of cushioning and support are at a slight compromise in weight, however. It is a great option for runners who are looking for a stable, yet well-cushioned ride with enough flexibility that it shines in runs ranging from slow to moderate speed."
Asics 33-DFA 2,,90.0,90.0,51.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
A seamless construction does away with stitching and seams, keeping irritation and discomfort at bay.
Most reviewers mentioned that the moisture-wicking lasting of this shoe was capable enough.
The Solyte midsole material is a lightweight platform and it’s added with a softer foam called the AmpliFoam.
The FluidAxis flex grooves are anatomically shaped naturally to the runner’s foot, making each step more natural.
The Asics High Abrasion Rubber or AHAR+ is featured in the outsole unit of the 33-DFA 2 and it’s durable and capable of providing traction.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners didn’t like the most squishy mid-sole material because it didn’t offer a lot of structural support to fully provide a natural stride.
Others noticed that the toe box was a bit too small that it clumped their toes together.
Bottom line
The 33-DFA 2 from Asics is a cool-looking running shoe that has a lot of features for comfort, stability, and support. It can be used daily for many types of activities, from training to casual walks. This shoe is a good option for those who are looking for an affordable and lightweight road running companion. "
Adidas Pureboost 2.0,,90.0,83.0,24.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Adidas Pureboost,"6 reasons to buy
The comfort excels in the Pure Boost 2.0, based on most reviews.
It is an all-day, everyday shoe that can be worn for social occasions, according to a good number of runners.
The Boost midsole foam provides unfailing responsive cushioning.
Some runners appreciated its lightweight nature.
The flexibility of the 2nd version of the Pure Boost is more than enough for natural running, noted a handful of runners.
It has excellent breathability because of the Air Mesh and the holes in the side panels.
2 reasons not to buy
There were some who found the price as too much.
A few others had issues with the upper durability.
Bottom line
Adidas’ aim to use a casual running shoe as a performance option in the 2nd edition of the Pure Boost continues to get mixed reactions. It sits somewhere between the middle with good arch support, excellent comfort, and nice aesthetic appeal."
Nike Air Zoom Winflo 4 Shield,,90.0,,42.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Nike Air Zoom Winflo 6 Shield,"5 reasons to buy
The water-repelling upper of the Nike Air Zoom Winflo 4 Shield worked well in staving off splashes, according to several consumers.
Most reviewers stated that the traction-capacity of the outsole was reliable.
The design and color schemes were deemed pleasing to the eyes, some people noted.
A lot of runners claimed that the underfoot cushioning system was comfortable and responsive.
It’s true to size and right when it comes to width, based on general user feedback.
1 reasons not to buy
A tester complained that the water-resistance of this shoe didn’t match his expectations.
Bottom line
The Nike Air Zoom Winflo 4 Shield received mostly positive reviews from runners. They welcomed this neutral shoe’s cool design, the efficient outsole, and the agreeable platform. There was a complaint about the water-repellent upper, but it’s an isolated case; most people felt that it worked well for them."
Skechers GOtrail Ultra 3,,90.0,80.0,58.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Skechers GOtrail Ultra 4,"6 reasons to buy
Many applauded the new stylish design of the GOtrail Ultra 3.
Many runners mentioned that the shoe is very comfortable to wear.
Some testers noticed the aggressive outsole that delivers necessary traction while running on the trail.
The GOtrail Ultra 3 is very flexible.
True to size.
Available in several color options.
2 reasons not to buy
The sole wears out quickly as mentioned in some reviews.
Not supportive enough for technical trail.
Bottom line
The GOtrail Ultra 3 is trail running shoe designed for neutral runners. It is designed with an improved upper and outsole unit. It is great for trail run but not sufficient enough for rough terrains. The shoe is also a great partner for fitness training and hiking."
Puma Carson 2 Knit, Puma,93.0,,195.0,$60,$35 (save 42%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
The shoe had a relaxed and secure fit, according to various users.
One reviewer admired how well the shoe held up under different running conditions.
Many runners were happy to use the Carson 2 Knit as an everyday shoe because of its lightweight nature.
A lot of buyers found the knit upper to be snug yet comfortable.
Several users commented it was a high-quality shoe despite its low price
The unique outsole exhibited durability and excellent grip, a tester remarked.
2 reasons not to buy
It was tight around the forefoot, some users stated.
One runner complained of signs of wear within just a month of using the shoe.
Bottom line
With only one significant difference from its base shoe – the Carson 2 – the Carson 2 Knit has mostly garnered a similar impression from its users. Numerous consumers liked the knit upper Puma has introduced. Most of the users regarded the shoe as reliable for everyday wear, while a few others wanted to refrain from wearing it because of fit and sizing issues."
La Sportiva Akyra GTX,,76.0,,15.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 13.7oz , Women: 10.9oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Some users welcomed the durable construction of the La Sportiva Akyra GTX.
Many runners considered the shoe to be comfortable right out of the box.
Several testers noticed that the Gore-Tex® membrane of this trail shoe performed well; it was able to protect the foot through wet or rainy surfaces and conditions.
Several buyers commented that this running shoe has reliable traction, even on wet and slippery surfaces.
The design and color schemes received positive feedback from various users.
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of runners felt that the shoe is a bit narrow for their medium-size feet.
The shoe is a bit expensive.
Bottom line
The La Sportiva Akyra GTX is a waterproof trail running shoe with a slightly expensive price. While some people expressed their satisfaction with the shoe’s upper material, traction, and durability, there are a few who are unhappy with the fit and sizing. In summary, the shoe was a satisfactory trail partner, but runners should pay attention to the size and fit."
Adidas Pulseboost HD Winter,,80.0,81.0,13.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12oz , Women: 12oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Pulseboost HD Winter is very comfortable, based on many reviews. 
People appreciated the general quality of the materials used in the shoe.
Many runners recognized its water-resistant features. 
A tester said that it offers better performance than other running shoes. 
The shoe is responsive, according to a runner. 
A few purchasers praised the stylish shoe’s design. 
2 reasons not to buy
A buyer complained because the upper material rubbed against the skin. 
The lace loops are not durable, reported a consumer. 
Bottom line
With the Adidas Pulseboost HD Winter, runners are able to run rain or shine all year round. This neutral running shoe is crafted using Adidas advanced technologies to help enhance the runner’s efficiency under various conditions. It is designed to deliver a blend of comfort, durability, and performance. "
Saucony Ride 10, Saucony,91.0,89.0,719.0,$120,$34 (save 72%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, May 2017," Normal | Narrow, Normal, Wide", Saucony Ride 13,"6 reasons to buy
The in-shoe experience of the Saucony Ride 10 was considered by a lot of runners to be smooth and form-fitting.
People have commented that the underfoot experience given by this running shoe was responsive.
A lot of purchasers stated that they were able to wear the Ride 10 for extended periods as it was comfortable to wear.
This product didn’t need a break-in period, several users reported.
Some heavyset runners were happy with the full-bodied midsole because its foam compound was able to support their weights and their gait transitions.
The weight of the product was generally welcomed because it apparently didn’t hold the foot down or mar the natural speed of the run.
3 reasons not to buy
Some consumers complained that the fabric on the sides of the Saucony Ride 10 tore apart after only a few uses.
A handful of testers commented that the fit was a bit narrower than what they expected.
A couple of users felt that the outsole’s traction capacity was not very reliable on wet surfaces, stating that they experienced some slippage.
Bottom line
The Ride 10 from Saucony had received mostly positive feedback from the runners who have tried it. This companion for the roads was lauded for having a cover system that accommodated the natural form of the foot, hugging it smoothly and non-irritatingly. The cushioning system was also highlighted for being comfortable from the beginning as well as highly efficient at supporting various weight profiles. But on the flip-side, there were complaints about the durability of the upper, the narrowness of the in-shoe experience, the smaller-than-usual sizing options, and the flimsiness of the outsole traction."
Reebok Floatride Run Fast London Pro, Reebok,85.0,86.0,9.0,$120,$119 (save 1%)," Road, Treadmill", Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
Quite a few buyers laud the comfort of the Reebok Floatride Run Fast London Pro. 
According to some purchasers, the shoe is extremely light. 
Several customers appreciate the ample support of the running platform. 
The road running shoe is made of durable materials, commended a number of athletes. 
Many experts claim that the shoe enhanced their speed. 
It is very flexible, reported some commenters. 
The shoe offers a bouncy ride, observed several purchasers.
3 reasons not to buy
There are some runners stating that the shoe lacks security. 
Several experts have remarked that the shoe rubs against the foot, causing abrasion. 
The shoe is too tight, noted a few wearers.
Bottom line
Taking inspiration from the London Racer, the Reebok Floatride Run Fast London Pro is engineered to be highly durable. It can accommodate activities ranging from fast training to races. Built with high-quality components, the running shoe offers premium cushioning for optimal response."
Under Armour Micro G Fuel,,85.0,,112.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Jun 2017,,,"7 reasons to buy
Several runners were highly appreciative of the shoe’s lightweight construction.
Most of the testers were satisfied with the shoe’s comfortable feel.
A significant number of wearers said that the Micro G Fuel is a good-looking shoe; some received compliments on how the shoe looked.
The available color schemes received positive remarks from consumers.
A couple of runners who have painful foot issues mentioned that they had painless running experiences with the Under Armour Micro G Fuel.
The shoe is affordable, said a few purchasers.
The Micro G Fuel is a versatile shoe; not only did a few people use it for road running, but also in the gym, while biking and as a casual shoe.
1 reasons not to buy
Some customers felt that the shoe was too tight for their tastes.
Bottom line
The Under Armour Micro G Fuel is a very versatile running shoe. Aside from road running, some wearers also found the shoe to be dependable for gym training and casual walks. Along with its lightweight construction, the shoe also provides the running enthusiasts the necessary cushioning, traction, and protection for a better running experience."
Nike FS Lite Run 3, Nike,91.0,,971.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.3oz , Women: 7.1oz, Men: 3mm , Women: 3mm,, Normal | Normal, Nike FS Lite Run 4,"8 reasons to buy
The Nike FS Lite Run 3 certainly felt lightweight for a lot of those who tried it.
Most reviewers appreciated the comfortable inner sleeve construction, which allowed them to wear the shoe without putting on socks first.
Many testers were able to use this shoe daily and they wrote that it kept them free from discomfort.
Many testers were impressed by the general durability of this running shoe.
The word ‘comfortable’ was used frequently to describe the FS Lite Run 3.
A runner reported that the mid-sole was flexible and that it accommodated natural freedom of movement.
The outsole grip was reliable, noted several reviewers.
A lot of consumers stated that this running shoe was affordable.
2 reasons not to buy
Washing this shoe tended to make the upper fabrics tighter, a runner commented.
The sole unit wore off on a tester; they wrote that after continued use, holes have started to appear on the foam.
Bottom line
The Nike FS Lite Run 3 became popular for a lot of runners. They stated that it accommodated their feet with sureness and ease. Many of them had a lot of positive things to say about the features and components of this neutral shoe. On the flip side, there were a few reviewers who didn’t enjoy it because, for them, some of its parts were inconsistent. Nevertheless, lots of consumers commended the performance of this road shoe."
Skechers GOrun Ride 6, Skechers,88.0,75.0,198.0,$95,$84 (save 100%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8.3oz , Women: 7.2oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm, Feb 2017, Normal | Normal, Skechers GOrun Ride 7,"8 reasons to buy
The majority of runners had an untiring run due to the excellent underfoot experience given by the Skechers GOrun Ride 6.
Many consumers found the cushioning of the shoe amazingly soft.
The shoe is worth its price due to its overall great performance, said most users.
A number of runners were satisfied with the breathable upper of the shoe since it kept their feet cool and dry.
Many users appreciated its light weight by mentioning that it was like walking on the air.
Most runners liked the firm grip it provided on various surfaces.
Many testers expressed that the shoe offered a snug fit.
A handful of buyers praised the color schemes and appearance of this shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
A few buyers were disappointed with the narrow fit of the GOrun Ride 6.
Some customers complained about the apparently expensive price of this running shoe.
Bottom line
The Skechers GOrun Ride 6 offers responsive cushioning that results in an untiring run. It is a lightweight shoe with a breathable upper, a feature that maintains a cool and dry environment for the foot. The firm grip of the outsole enables runners to perform well on the roads. Although a little expensive, its overall features and a nice color scheme make it worth its price."
Asics GT 2000 8 Knit, Asics,77.0,,9.0,$120,$108 (save 10%), Road, Stability, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
The Asics GT 2000 8 Knit offers excellent arch support, based on reviews. 
Several overpronators claim that the shoe is comfortable to wear. 
This running partner is well cushioned, according to a few users. 
It feels light on foot, said a wearer. 
Numerous consumers mention that this shoe offers a sock-like fit. 
People love the stylish design of this running companion.
2 reasons not to buy
The durability of the Asics GT 2000 8 Knit is questionable, said some testers. 
One commenter noted that this shoe is a bit narrow.
Bottom line
The Asics GT 2000 8 Knit is a stability running shoe that is intended for running on paved surfaces. It is crafted with supportive features that are designed to provide comfort for runners with severe overpronation or flat foot. This running shoe offers excellent shock absorption and protection for optimal performance."
Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 36 Trail GTX,,89.0,94.0,16.0,,, Trail, Neutral,,,,,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The majority of the runners claim that the Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 36 Trail GTX is comfortable. 
Numerous users noted that the shoe provides great traction on various surfaces. 
A couple of consumers expressed that the shoe has kept their feet dry. 
One reviewer mentioned that shoe offers a responsive and bouncy ride. 
Many have appreciated the shoe’s waterproof upper. 
This running shoe is lightweight, according to some purchasers.
3 reasons not to buy
Some buyers are worried about the shoe’s durability. 
A few commenters are not satisfied with the available color options. 
The toe box is a bit narrow, based on some reviews. 
Bottom line
The Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 36 Trail GTX received a mixed response from the consumers. Many runners have appreciated the Gore-Tex® mesh upper of this trail running shoe as it enables them to continue even in wet conditions. This running shoe proves to be a great companion in damp and cold conditions because it effectively keeps the foot warm and dry."
Nike Air Zoom Odyssey 2,,89.0,76.0,68.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 9.1oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"11 reasons to buy
A good number of the reviewers really loved the upper comfort of the Odyssey 2.
Most of the users appreciated the stable and supportive ride of this shoe.
The price tag is right around the average of its competitors, according to several.
A few of the comments mentioned that there is still noticeable flexibility, particularly in the forefoot despite being a stability shoe.
Excellent heel security was noticed by a handful of runners.
Several runners prized the cool looks of the 2nd version of the Odyssey.
Ground feedback was noticeable, according to a small group of users.
It is lighter than some of its competitors.
A handful of runners marvelled that the Nike Odyssey 2 was very breathable.
The interior feel and fit were praised by more than a few.
There is better heel security from this version compared to its predecessor.
4 reasons not to buy
It is a bit narrow in the toe box, as most Nike shoes are, observed a handful.
A small number of users wished for more responsiveness.
The cushioning is significantly stiffer compared to the original model, which defined the soft and responsive marketing promise of Nike, according to some.
A few runners narrated that it runs small.
Bottom line
The Air Zoom Odyssey 2 is Nike’s response to runners looking for a light, supportive and stable ride that should allow moderate to severe overpronators to enjoy their training. It has superb comfort and smooth transitions that can handle mid-distance training sessions. The shoe also offers the Nike benchmark of cool-looking shoes that makes it a very nice casual or everyday option."
Saucony Omni 14, Saucony,90.0,82.0,445.0,$130,$80 (save 38%), Road, Stability, Men: 11.2oz , Women: 9.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Jun 2015," Normal | Narrow, Normal, Wide", Saucony Omni 16,"7 reasons to buy
The upper is breathable because of the open mesh, according to some reviews.
Most reviewers appreciated the securing mechanisms that were added here, including the Sauc-Fit system and the Heel Support Frame.
The PWRGRID is a unit in the mid-sole that has shock attenuating properties.
The SRC Impact Zone that runs from the heel to the midfoot offers shock absorption and a smoother step.
Stability is received from the Dual Density SSL EVA, which has pronation control capabilities.
A significant number of testers were satisfied with the shoe’s durable outsole.
It is flexible as noted in some reviews.
4 reasons not to buy
Some runners felt that the 14th version of the Saucony Omni had a tighter toe box than the previous version.
A few noted that the upper unit wasn’t very comfortable to the skin, so it became necessary to wear socks, which made the fit a bit too tight.
The price of this shoe is slightly expensive.
Some of the testers criticized its bulky look, which helped to diminish flexibility.
Bottom line
The Saucony Omni 14 is a daily running shoe that has reliable components, high quality design and efficient performance. The shoe received positive feedback from users but there are also a few who are less satisfied with its tight fit and bulky look. The Omni 14 is a running shoe that’s meant for runners who need additional support in the arches."
Adidas Ultraboost Mid, Adidas,95.0,90.0,658.0,$200,$190 (save 5%), Road, Neutral,,,,, Oct 2018," Narrow, Normal | Normal",,"7 reasons to buy
Majority of the buyers of the Ultraboost Mid reported that it is a comfortable shoe.
The stylish appearance and pleasant colorways of the shoe were complimented by many. Others were happy that the shoe had a versatile appearance that made it suitable for both casual and active use.
One commenter wrote the shoe was great for high-intensity interval training as well.
Some users mentioned that the shoe’s material kept the foot warm enough during winter weather.
The Adidas Ultraboost Mid had just the right amount of support for the arches, according to a runner.
The Boost™ midsole felt like a “cloud-like cushion,” a reviewer said.
The Primeknit upper was praised by a couple of buyers for its breathability.
2 reasons not to buy
A few runners did not like that the shoe needed a break-in period.
The ankle part is too tight, claimed a couple of wearers.
Bottom line
As a running shoe with Boost, the Ultraboost Mid gave consumers high expectations, which were successfully met, if basing on the positive comments it received. The shoe’s construction, primarily, was the winning factor for several users; issues with fit were present, however. Overall, the majority of runners stated that the shoe was worth the price and that they would recommend the Adidas Ultraboost Mid to other prospective buyers."
Nike Air VaporMax Run Utility, Nike,86.0,80.0,93.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,, Sep 2018, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
A lot of users said the Nike Air VaporMax Run Utility is one of the most comfortable running shoes they have ever worn.
A few testers commented that the shoe is durable.
The VaporMax Run Utility provides an excellent fit, according to a wearer.
The shoe feels light, a reviewer mentioned.
A significant number of wearers admired the shoe’s good-looking and stylish design.
A couple of runners mentioned that the Nike Air VaporMax Run Utility keeps their foot warm on cold running condition.
3 reasons not to buy
A few buyers disliked the shoe’s squeaky sound; they said it is too loud and distracting.
The shoe runs big, said some users.
The VaporMax Run Utility is expensive.
Bottom line
Many runners were pleased with the Nike Air VaporMax Run Utility. Some expressed satisfaction with the shoe’s design, fit, durability, and performance. There are also a few who gave negative feedback about the sizing and shoe’s squeaky sound. With the majority of praises it received, it is easy to conclude that the VaporMax Run Utility is indeed a successful release."
Salomon Sense Escape 2, Salomon,83.0,,200.0,$110,$80 (save 97%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Most of those who have tested the Salomon Sense Escape 2 claim that this shoe has a suitably lightweight construction.
The grip capacity of the outsole unit has garnered positive feedback from those who welcome precise traction and movement control.
People like the overall design and colorways of this running shoe, stating that the silhouette is eye-catching.
Purchasers like the affordable price of the Salomon Sense Escape 2.
The breathability of the upper has been emphasized as a source of comfort and enjoyment.
The midsole offers adequate cushioning for the whole foot, according to most users.
3 reasons not to buy
Several consumers have complained of a too-short in-shoe feel. While some state that the deviation is half-a-size from the usual, others claim that the discrepancy is actually one full size.
A handful of people have decided that the width profile of the Salomon Sense Escape 2 is a bit narrow compared to their expectations.
Some testers have expressed their displeasure about the apparently firm underfoot cushioning; they noted that such a feature is not for all-day use.
Bottom line
While the Salomon Sense Escape 2 enjoys lavish acceptance from those who have tried it, some of its elements have become quite controversial. This update to the relatively new, but ultimately well-received Sense Escape features accommodating components, but the complaints still abound. The highlights of the criticism include a narrow width profile and a stiff midsole. On the other hand, the positive feedback emphasizes the lightweight construction, the grippy outsole, and the affordable price.
Trail running shoe enthusiasts and neutral pronators are the intended users of the Salomon Sense Escape 2."
Reebok Sole Fury '00, Reebok,75.0,,7.0,$80,$34 (save 57%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"9 reasons to buy
The majority of the users of Reebok Sole Fury 00 commented that it is comfortable.
A significant number of buyers noted that the shoe is lightweight.
According to customers, the running footwear provides excellent arch support.
The shoe fits perfectly, several testers agreed.
A lot of purchasers said that the shoe has beautiful color options. The colorways coordinate well with simple outfits.
Based on some reviews, the shoe is best for walking, running, and work out sessions.
One of the consumers noted that the shoe feels like she's wearing a flip-flop.
Several wearers loved its stylish design.
A reviewer commented that the shoe has an affordable price.
1 reasons not to buy
One of the testers observed that the shoe needs about one week to break in.
Bottom line
The Reebok Sole Fury 00 is concluded by many as a great purchase. The design and structure of this running shoe make it an epitome of a lifestyle-athletic hybrid shoe. Many laud the running shoe for its versatility. The Reebok Sole Fury 00 is a perfect option for those who are looking for a comfortable and supportive gear that is perfect for light runs."
Saucony Nomad TR, Saucony,83.0,82.0,206.0,$110,$70 (save 89%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Most runners took note of how lightweight the Nomad TR is as compared to other trail running shoes.
A significant number of runners applauded the cushioning and flexibility of this shoe.
The inner material of the Saucony Nomad TR is very smooth and comfortable as mentioned in some reviews.
This shoe features a PWRTRAC outsole for excellent traction and durability.
It comes with an oblique toe shape for exceptional fit.
3 reasons not to buy
As some reviews mentioned, the shoe is not breathable enough especially when used in warm condition.
The width of the Nomad TR runs wide, which is not impressive to narrow-footed runners.
Some runners felt that toe protection needs improvement for rocky surfaces.
Bottom line
The Saucony Nomad TR is a neutral running shoe that performs well on short trail running. It has a firm cushioning and impressive grip. It is praised by some runners for being comfortable, lightweight and durable. Though it also gained negative comments, overall, the shoe is still impressive. "
Hoka One One Clayton 2, Hoka One One,88.0,88.0,118.0,$150,$139 (save 7%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm, Apr 2017, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
Most customers appreciated the intelligent cushioning system of Hoka One One Clayton 2.
Many runners also noticed the light weight of the shoe; they were happy since it did not tire their feet during long runs.
The customers commented that this running shoe got better with time; its upper adjusted to the shape of their feet and felt more comfortable.
A few runners admired the responsive ride of Clayton 2.
A user commented on the rubberized laces, which cinched down the shoe’s upper and prevented any sliding of the foot.
A few customers mentioned that Clayton 2 had solved the blistering issue of Clayton 1; one such customer mentioned that Hoka One One had readjusted the design of the shoe’s upper and also placed a substantial sock-liner to solve the issue.
A runner lauded the improvements in the upper; he liked how the shoe’s upper felt softer and more pliable during his runs.
2 reasons not to buy
A few runners had apparently experienced blisters while running in the Clayton 2.
A user was disappointed with the shoe’s perceptive lack of responsiveness; the midsole sucked the energy out of him with each stride.
Bottom line
Hoka One One Clayton 2 is a light, well-cushioned, durable pair of long-race running shoes that offer a very comfortable, springy ride for its users. While this newer model solves the blistering issue of Clayton 1, some consumers felt that it took a while before completely adjusting to the feet. Generally, this neutral road running shoe was well-received by fans and newcomers."
Adidas Rockadia Trail 3, Adidas,83.0,,10.0,$65,$58 (save 99%), Trail, Neutral,,,,,," Normal, Wide | Normal, Wide",,"5 reasons to buy
Some consumers have considered the cushioning system as comfortable enough for all-day running sessions.
The aesthetics of this running shoe are welcomed by those who appreciate visually endearing athletic attires.
The durability of the materials is appreciated by runners who like long-lasting trail running shoes.
Several purchasers are happy with the affordable price of the Adidas Rockadia Trail 3.
Breathability is an aspect that is clearly perceived by those who have tested this product.
2 reasons not to buy
A few individuals have stated that this shoe has a tendency to make the foot look awkwardly big.
Some have decided that the in-shoe experience is a bit wobbly; the inner walls and shoelaces aren’t enough to secure the foot.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of people towards the Rockadia Trail 3 has been positive. The best aspects of this Adidas trail running shoe include the affordable price, the supportive cushioning system, and the breathable upper unit. Conversely, the bulky silhouette and the wobbly in-shoe feel are criticized.
Fans of Adidas footwear that are for the off-road paths are the target market of the Rockadia Trail 3."
New Balance 810 v3, New Balance,78.0,,115.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 7.2oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
It has a very appealing style as noticed by testers.
It is a light shoe for trail purposes.
This is a great outdoor shoe for different activities based on the reviews of several users.
The New Balance 810 v3 has great grip on off-road terrain as noted by a handful of runners.
The fit is great for wide foot is one common comment from users on reviews.
It is a good trail running shoe with low drop profile for a closer ground feel without sacrificing protection.
3 reasons not to buy
The cushioning is lacking according to some testers.
The upper part wears out easily as tried by some testers.
Those with narrow feet will not like its roomy toe box and mid-foot structure.
Bottom line
The New Balance 810v3 is a comfortable and stable running shoe for moderately rugged trails. But, it has the responsive, lightweight outsole construction that runners can depend on when used on outdoor soft grounds. It is a great shoe for its value."
Under Armour SpeedForm Slingride, Under Armour,86.0,70.0,203.0,$120,$77 (save 36%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8.4oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
One tester commented that the Under Armour SpeedForm Slingride was the most comfortable one they ever owned.
Many runners welcomed its appealing and eye-catching design.
The lightweight nature of this model was adequate for those who tried it.
Reviewers noted that the cool-looking aesthetics made it agreeable for casual use.
A user wrote that the upper unit was able to hug their foot securely, but not too tightly.
The upper garnered appreciation because it felt like a sock and that it didn’t irritate the feet of the testers.
The underfoot foam unit was able to deliver the right amounts of cushioning without feeling too overbearing, according to one tester.
2 reasons not to buy
The foot of a reviewer slid around the interior when they used it for running, and it felt uncomfortable for them.
The upper unit felt thin for a runner, and they didn’t feel like it would last many running sessions.
Bottom line
The Under Armour SpeedForm Slingride gained praise for its high-quality construction and its efficient features. Many runners were also impressed by its eye-catching looks. They said that this neutral shoe was great for running and for casual use. Overall, the shoe was a fruitful release."
Altra Torin 2.0, Altra,85.0,80.0,689.0,$125,$95 (save 98%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9.1oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,, Normal | Normal, Altra Torin 4,"6 reasons to buy
The average weight of the Torin 2.0 makes it adequate for most runners who don’t want to be weighed down by heavy shoes.
The majority of the runners loved the improved and redesigned upper unit, which offers breathable and lightweight coverage.
This shoe features a 6mm Contour Footbed for additional underfoot cushioning.
The responsive nature of the FootPod Outsole was applauded by many runners.
The Torin 2.0 offers the Inner Flex groove system for added flexibility and increased performance.
The A-Bound and Dual Layer EVA maintain a durable and efficient underfoot platform.
4 reasons not to buy
Some complained that the flat laces of this running shoe easily become untied.
The color options were not impressive to reviewers.
Most of the testers found the toe box a bit too wide and uncomfortable.
Most reviews mentioned that the Torin 2.0 is not great for those with bunions.
Bottom line
The Altra Torin 2.0 is a neutral, zero-drop running shoe that offers enhanced durability, flexibility and comfort. Runners were impressed by the shoe because they experience supreme comfort while running and doing your regular fitness training. This shoe is a good option for those who are looking for a lightweight road running partner."
Inov-8 Trailroc G 280, Inov-8,82.0,87.0,7.0,$150,$126 (save 30%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 9.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Aug 2018," Normal | Normal, Wide",,"5 reasons to buy
The traction capacity of the Inov-8 Trailroc G 280’s outsole is welcomed by trail running shoe enthusiasts.
According to a few consumers, the outsole design allows transitioning to roads with ease.
The general durability of the materials is appreciated by various users.
A couple of reviews have observed the midsole unit to be supportive and energizing.
The breathability of the upper unit is praised by consumers.
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of testers believe that the toe box is a bit too restrictive to permit natural toe-splay.
The inner sleeve has a tendency to rub uncomfortably against the skin of the foot, based on a few reviews.
Bottom line
The overall feedback towards the Trailroc G 280 is positive. People welcome this Inov-8 running shoe because of its durable construction, the traction capacity of the outsole, the comfortable midsole, and the ventilated in-shoe feel. Hard, rocky trails are made easier with the cushioning and protection offered by this running shoe."
Saucony Caliber TR, Saucony,86.0,,118.0,$80,$25 (save 75%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
According to the majority, the Saucony Caliber TR is a reasonably comfortable shoe.
Most of the runners were happy with the lightweight disposition of the shoe since it apparently increased the efficiency of their runs.
Several customers noticed that the upper was highly breathable; their feet remained cool and dry while they were out on the trails.
A few purchasers appreciated the overall look of the shoe by calling it ‘stylish’.
A wearer said that he loved the ‘glove-like’ fit of the upper.
2 reasons not to buy
Some customers had problems with the sizing scheme of the shoe; it was apparently inconsistent.
A user was of the opinion that the shoe was not sufficiently durable as its condition quickly deteriorated after only several miles of running.
Bottom line
The sleek and stylish design, sturdy yet flexible insole and the aggressive outsole of the Saucony Caliber TR have earned many followers in the market. Its long-term durability and the reasonable price make it a decent choice for most neutral runners who are looking for a rugged trail running shoe to sustain various challenging surfaces."
Brooks PureGrit 4,,87.0,81.0,396.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Brooks PureGrit 8,"7 reasons to buy
Overall comfort is an asset that has impressed more than a few runners.
Most of the runners raved about how the shoe delivers some great service while doing some off-road running.
The responsive mid-sole unit has the flexibility and springiness that’s quite appreciable.
Many of the testers were amazed by the PureGrit 4’s durability.
It is comparably lighter than some trail shoes that have more than sufficient cushioning.
The underfoot cushioning in this model is plush without being too soft or unwieldy.
The outsole unit has high quality components, which offer protection from debris, abrasion and wear.
3 reasons not to buy
A good portion of the reviews remarked how the shoe runs narrower than the standard fit.
A few runners also noted that the PureGrit 4 was a bit stiff.
Several trail enthusiasts wished for a few more anti-debris features in the upper unit.
Bottom line
The PureGrit 4 does its best to accommodate many types of runners for a more universal trail running shoe experience. While it has a fairly high-profile feature, the shoe compensates for it by utilizing a near-flat offset. It creates a cushioned run with just enough stability on uneven surfaces. Running in marathons or ultra-long races are some of the best activities for this shoe."
Skechers GOrun Ultra Road 2,,87.0,82.0,41.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 6.4oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
This running shoe ran well at slow speeds and it picked up high speeds nicely, according to a reviewer.
A great balance between firmness and cushioning was present, stated one user.
Some runners praised the upper for providing flexibility and an accommodating fit during long runs.
Many users found the shoe to be comfortable and supportive.
The GOrun Ultra Road 2 is great for running on hard surfaces, mentioned one user.
A buyer commented that the insole offered a good fit and it promoted their stride.
3 reasons not to buy
A couple of runners felt the outsole was not durable enough and that it had a tendency to be damaged easily.
One tester thought the high stack height affected the shoe’s ground feel and flexibility.
Some criticized the upper: one thought it had a bad design because it felt weird and loose on the foot; another stated it lacked stability around the ankles.
Bottom line
The Skechers GOrun Ultra Road 2 is a maximally-cushioned shoe that also delivers support and flexibility during runs. Despite the extra cushioning, users will not be disappointed as it features enough durability to handle the challenges of road running and an above-average responsiveness for a faster and longer run."
Under Armour SpeedForm Slingride Fade,,87.0,83.0,84.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.5oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"10 reasons to buy
Some runners highly-valued the comfortable ride of the Slingride Fade.
The price is reasonable.
Several runners noted that the cushioning absorbed the impact of their runs really well.
The shoe runs light, according to a handful of comments.
The Under Armour Slingride Fade is very pleasing to the eye, based on the observations of several runners.
The ventilation is just amazing, as experienced by more than a few runners.
It can be an amazing casual shoe because of its stylish looks.
A small number of runners have used it for gym work.
4 different color options.
The Slingride Fade is excellent for sockless running or workouts, as reported by several users.
3 reasons not to buy
The outsole durability leaves something to be desired, according to a few users.
A handful mentioned that the upper lacks solid support.
A few runners said that it runs a bit small.
Bottom line
The Slingride Fade is another shoe that epitomizes Under Armour’s ability to produce some of the knit uppers in the business. It is a shoe that is designed for daily training or for full or half marathons. The shoe brings tons of comfort, great cushioning, and the looks to turn heads on the road. Moreover, the price makes it a very solid option for those looking for a shoe that matches style and performance with ease."
Nike Free RN 5.0 Shield, Nike,85.0,,5.0,,, Road, Neutral,,, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
A few runners said that the Nike Free RN 5.0 Shield is lightweight.
This shoe offers excellent support, based on some reviews.
It is comfortable, according to a lot of commenters.
People appreciated its water-resistant feature.
A purchaser mentioned that it is comfortable even without socks.
The shoe fits well, most users claimed.
Users also love using this shoe for work and gym sessions.
2 reasons not to buy
A few wearers noted that the shoe is a bit narrow.
The outsole is not durable enough for long runs, said a tester.
Bottom line
The Nike Free RN 5.0 Shield is a comfortable running shoe designed for users with neutral foot motion. The shoe’s weatherized design allows its wearer to continue running or doing their usual exercise routines rain or shine. This stylish running shoe is also suitable for gym sessions and casual walks."
Adidas Response Limited, Adidas,88.0,,195.0,$110,$56 (save 65%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Most users mentioned that the platform felt comfortable underfoot, especially when walking and light running.
The majority agreed that the weight of the Adidas Response Limited felt light.
Plenty of users felt that the price was good for the quality.
Runners observed that the cushioning was enough even for standing for long periods of time.
Some testers commented that the support on the arch felt sufficient.
2 reasons not to buy
One user said that the rubber on the outsole seemed thin.
Several wearers agree that the shoe's appearance and style could be better.
Bottom line
The Adidas Response Limited was well received by most female reviewers. Many agreed that the neutral road trainer had good quality for its price. Testers used it for both walking and light running without any complaints. Others, however, were displeased with the running shoe not being true to size. They needed to go a half or full size down to get the right fit. Nevertheless, positive reviews outweighed the negative ones, making this affordable trainer something to consider."
Nike Air Max Sequent 3 Summer, Nike,85.0,,10.0,$100,$80 (save 27%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
People observed that the underfoot experience given by the Nike Air Max Sequent 3 Summer was comfortable.
This running shoe was suitably lightweight for long-term use, a consumer reported.
The design and colorways were lauded for being visually appealing.
The price is reasonable.
A few wearers noted that the upper of the shoe is breathable.
3 reasons not to buy
According to several consumers, the Air unit in the heel section quickly deflated; they observed the phenomenon after merely a few weeks of use.
The arch was considered by a few runners to be a bit high; it distracted them from performing well on the roads.
The width was a bit narrow than expected, based on a couple of reviews.
Bottom line
The Nike Air Max Sequent 3 Summer was not what people were expecting it to be. Though this neutral road shoe had an appealing look, it was deemed incapable of lasting long as the durability was sub-par. Moreover, the shoelaces garnered some ire because they were too short to be adequately secured."
Mizuno Wave Enigma 6, Mizuno,87.0,75.0,211.0,$150,$90 (save 40%), Road, Neutral, Men: 11.9oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm, Jun 2016, Normal | Normal,,"8 reasons to buy
Several testers noted that the upper unit of the Mizuno Wave Enigma 6 felt like a glove that’s responsive and flexible.
Based on several reviews, this shoe’s façade was visually endearing.
A runner detailed that the upper was roomy enough to let the foot relax.
Many consumers have used the word ‘comfortable’ to describe their running sessions while wearing this shoe.
It was satisfactorily lightweight, stated a number of runners.
The underfoot platform felt nicely cushioned, according to an expert reviewer.
A commenter described the mid-sole unit of this model as outstanding.
A person was able to test this shoe on the trails, and they wrote that even though it wasn’t technically a shoe for the trails, it was able to support their feet throughout the experience.
7 reasons not to buy
The color schemes of the Wave Enigma 6 weren’t too eye-catching, a runner commented.
Several testers felt that the price of this model was expensive.
The cushioning system’s heel section wasn’t very efficient for a consumer; for them, it felt lacking.
An expert reviewer reported that the Wave plate in the sole unit felt stiff.
The platform’s heel elevation seemed to bother a tester because he felt that it caused some discomfort to his knees.
The toe box seemed to be narrower than the previous model, a purchaser reported.
Those with wider foot-dimensions lamented the lack of different width options.
Bottom line
The Mizuno Wave Enigma 6 aptly provided comfort and support to a majority of those who have tried it. They said that it was a solid option for neutral runners who want to have a durable and efficient running companion on the roads. For them, it didn’t feel heavy or uncomfortable. On the other hand, it didn’t turn out to be the go-to shoe for several consumers because they felt that it was too expensive and that some of its mid-sole components weren’t up to the task."
Nike Dart 11, Nike,86.0,77.0,526.0,$60,$45 (save 44%), Road, Stability, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.6oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm, Jan 2016, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
Mesh that’s breathable, as well as synthetic overlays, make up the upper unit of the 11th version of the Dart.
A mid foot saddle that’s molded offers a lightweight and supportive fit.
Most runners felt the Reslon Tech, a cushioning system that’s dynamic and responsive.
An outsole that’s made from a combination of durable materials and components offer durable protection, traction and additional cushioning.
Many of the testers felt that it was very comfortable to wear.
The forefoot wraps the foot and holds it comfortably, as noted in some reviews.
Nike Dart 11 is affordable running shoe,
2 reasons not to buy
A few noticed that the rear section of the Nike Dart 11 squeezed their ankles uncomfortably at times.
Others felt that the arch support mechanics weren’t as prominent or efficient.
Bottom line
The Dart 11 from Nike is an adequate running shoe for those who want to get responsive cushioning, a serviceable outsole and a breathable upper. It’s a daily running shoe for neutral runners and for those who need mild arch support."
Reebok Floatride Run ULTK, Reebok,77.0,74.0,8.0,$150,$85 (save 43%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
Many testers of the Reebok Floatride Run ULTK are happy with the comfort that it gives them.
The transitions of the step when tackling the roads are hailed as precise and accommodating.
Several consumers have noticed the modern aesthetics of this running shoe, stating that the design and color schemes are visually appealing.
The lightweight configuration of this product has garnered positive remarks from those who like footwear that doesn’t drag them down.
A lot of runners welcome the breathable aspect of the upper unit.
The toe box is deemed roomy enough to accommodate the natural splaying of the toes.
The versatility of the construction is praised by people who welcome a shoe that is able to handle athletics and casual strolls.
2 reasons not to buy
Several consumers claim that the underfoot experience isn’t as supportive as they would’ve liked.
The collar of this shoe rubbed against the skin below the ankles irritatingly, according to a few testers.
Bottom line
All-in-all, the feedback for the Reebok Floatride Run ULTK has been positive. The people who have purchased this model are generally happy with what it has to offer. The flexible midsole, the arresting visuals, the lightness of the build, and the breathable upper are examples of what makes this shoe appealing to most runners. The lack of arch support and the irritating collar make up the areas that need improvement.
Fans of Reebok running shoes that are for neutral foot pronation are the ones who are likely to enjoy the Floatride Run ULTK."
New Balance Fresh Foam Lazr Hyposkin, New Balance,89.0,88.0,62.0,$100,$35 (save 65%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 8.2oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm, Feb 2018," Normal | Normal, Wide",,"5 reasons to buy
Many people were happy with the fashionable design of the New Balance Fresh Foam Lazr Hyposkin.
The interior of this shoe was appreciated for providing a smooth and sock-like fit.
Some consumers welcomed the midsole foam because it gave a comfortable underfoot experience.
Most of those who have tested it felt that it was true to size.
The breathability of the upper unit gained positive remarks.
1 reasons not to buy
Some people were taken aback that the colorway of the actual product was different from what’s advertised in websites’ photos.
Bottom line
The New Balance Fresh Foam Lazr Hyposkin was welcomed as one of the contemporary shoes that’s good for running and casual walks. They felt that it was a comfortable option for their daily activities. It’s also worthy to note that the breathable upper and the regular sizing scheme worked well. The caveat is that the color options didn’t match the ones in the online photographs."
Reebok Sublite Escape 3.0,,92.0,85.0,55.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.1oz , Women: 6.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The upper uses printed mesh and synthetic materials to provide lightweight coverage.
There were runners who thought that the low cut design of this 3rd version improved the freedom of their movements.
The MemoryTech sock liner adds a custom feel to the underfoot platform because it conforms to the shape of the wearer’s foot over time.
The Sublite is a cushioning system that takes the entirety of the sole unit; it’s lightweight and flexible.
Located in the heel area of the Escape 3.0 is a high abrasion rubber layer that protects the shoe from wear and damage, noted by some testers.
The Sublite Escape 3.0 shoe is lightweight.
It is very affordable.
3 reasons not to buy
Many runners thought that the outsole unit deserved more rubber for improved traction and durability.
Some felt their toes hitting the upper fabric too much, making it uncomfortable and at risk for quicker wear and tear.
A few noted that the design was too simplistic and unremarkable.
Bottom line
The Sublite Escape 3.0 is a minimalist running shoe that anyone can enjoy. It has protective and comfortable elements that keeps the foot secure. It’s a great running shoe that delivers nice comfort and decent arch support for daily exercises and trainings."
New Balance Fresh Foam Boracay v3, New Balance,92.0,82.0,93.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.6oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm, Feb 2017," Normal | Normal, Wide",,"9 reasons to buy
Several runners commented that their feet felt great wearing the New Balance Fresh Foam Boracay v3.
Many consumers welcomed the appealing design and color schemes of this shoe.
The testers generally appreciated this product’s lightweight nature.
The upper unit was able to fit snugly and securely, according to a number of runners.
The seamless construction of the upper gained positive feedback because it prevented skin irritation.
A lot of testers were delighted to find out that the cushioning system of this shoe was responsive and comfortable.
One reviewer commented that the Boracay v3 was constructed to be perfect for any running activity, even the marathon.
The forefoot area was roomy enough to welcome natural toe-splay, noted several consumers.
The general durability of this model was lauded by those who have tried it; they stated that its components lasted long.
2 reasons not to buy
The top section of the collar tended to rub uncomfortably against the ankle of a runner, causing some irritation.
According to a consumer, the platform was a bit stiffer than the original Boracay, which affected natural movement.
Bottom line
Many runners were in agreement when they welcomed the arrival of the New Balance Fresh Foam Boracay v3. This neutral road shoe gained a following of positive consumers who thought that it’s a reliable upgrade to the popular series. For them, the components and features felt efficient and dependable. Conversely, there were some testers who noticed some missteps in terms of construction and design."
Altra Superior 2.0, Altra,86.0,86.0,365.0,$110,$38 (save 65%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.7oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,, Normal | Normal, Altra Superior 4.0,"6 reasons to buy
The average weight of the Superior 2.0 makes it agreeable to the weight preferences of most runners.
Many reviewers noted that it was very comfortable to wear.
Some noticed the enhanced surface grip of the outsole unit, which is important when it comes to trail running.
It features a removable rock plate for protection against sharp objects.
The InnerFlex midsole technology promotes a more responsive ride, especially on unpredictable surfaces.
Many liked the added GaiterTrap technology for the Superior 2.0, an installable sleeve which keeps debris out while keeping the foot dry.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners observed that this shoe was not as durable as expected.
The majority of the testers was not impressed by the toe box of the Superior 2.0, which was too slim.
Based on some comments, this shoe is too narrow when it comes to the heel area.
Bottom line
The enhanced Superior 2.0 from Altra Running won’t disappoint you while running on the trails. It is a lightweight, comfortable and versatile shoe that offers added protection. Despite the issues on the fit and durability, some users still considered the shoe as a successful release. The Superior 2.0 is a great option for trail racing."
,,,,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.3oz , Women: 7.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, New Balance Fresh Foam Cruz v2 Sport,
New Balance 790 v6, New Balance,89.0,,168.0,$70,$65 (save 7%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 6.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Jun 2017, X-Wide | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
Most users commented that the New Balance 790 v6 felt very comfortable. One user highlighted that she has high arches and hammer toes, but the shoe still came through in terms of comfort.
A majority of testers praised the unfussy style and the apparently appealing colorways.
The New Balance 790 v6 is extremely light, said a few reviewers. They preferred this weight because it enabled them to run faster.
Several users observed that the shoe was well ventilated.
Because of its minimalist style, users generally used the shoe for casual and exercising purposes.
One user was able to run 30 miles with the shoe without experiencing any pains or soreness on his legs and feet.
Some of the testers felt that the shoe offered great value for its quality.
4 reasons not to buy
Several users complained that the shoe was too small or narrow.
Some testers commented on the cushioning of the New Balance 790 v6. They said that it wasn’t very comfortable.
One reviewer was displeased with the inserts that came with the shoe. He said that they felt cheaply made.
The shoe laces were a common concern for a lot of users. Many said that they were not of good quality and were too short.
Bottom line
The New Balance 790 v6 is a neutral road running that comes off as a more refined version of its predecessor. Because of the revamps made, the shoe performs better, but is more lightweight. The improvements make this an affordable choice to consider when looking for a faithful companion for daily wear, light exercises, and running."
Salomon Sense ProPulse, Salomon,88.0,82.0,64.0,$150,$114 (save 24%), Road, Neutral, Men: 11.8oz , Women: 10.4oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
A breathable, quick-drying mesh makes up the upper of the Salomon Sense ProPulse.
This shoe features a quick lacing system for easy on and off maneuvers and a more secure fit based on the experience of several users.
Some heel strikers applauded the oversized EVA midsole of the Sense ProPulse as it provides plenty of cushioning.
The anti-bacterial OrthoLite Sockliner reduces moisture and odor while adding underfoot cushioning.
As noted in some reviews, the friction-free eyelets of the Salomon Sense ProPulse wrap the foot precisely and comfortably.
The non-marking Contragrip technology provides better traction while running on varied surfaces.
2 reasons not to buy
The Salomon Sense ProPulse is slightly expensive.
Some runners found this shoe is a bit heavy.
Bottom line
The Salomon Sense ProPulse is a traditional neutral running shoe that has plenty of cushioning and propulsion features ideal for heel strikers. It is very comfortable to use and is ideal for daily training. The shoe gained negative comments from users, but in general, the shoe is above-average and considered by some as a worthy investment."
Altra Torin 2.5, Altra,86.0,85.0,522.0,$125,$79 (save 37%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9.1oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,, Normal | Normal, Altra Torin 4,"10 reasons to buy
The Torin 2.5 secures the shoe in the right places and includes a roomy toe box for fantastic wiggle room to provide runners with a very comfortable run, as observed by most reviewers.
Several runners mentioned the bang for the buck value of this shoe.
The max cushioning does not compromise the stability or responsiveness, according to a handful of reviews.
The glossier upper greatly enhances the aesthetic appeal of the Torin 2.5, as noted by a good number of runners.
Some runners noticed how smooth the transition was from landing to take-off.
Quite a number appreciate the lightness of the run despite the max cushioning.
Many of the comments valued the shoe’s versatility as a high-mileage trainer or as an up-tempo option.
Moderate to long runs on varied surfaces is where this beast shines, according to several testers.
More than a handful of heavy-framed runners welcomed the midsole’s ability to take a pounding without losing the cushioning or responsiveness.
Gender specific variations of the Altra Torin 2.5 for better fit, performance, and style.
5 reasons not to buy
A large part of the midsole is exposed underneath, which lessens the Torin 2.5’s durability.
Some needed a break-in period to get their most comfortable runs.
It is ½ smaller than standard.
The breathability is not as good as before, as noticed by some of those who have tried the earlier version of the Torin.
Some runners still find the shape as funny and they often get strange looks from other runners.
Bottom line
Only a few shoes can approach the claim to have maximum cushioning, but light enough to be squarely in the sights of those looking for a lightweight trainer. The Altra Torin 2.5 is one such shoe and more. It has very nice arch support, smooth and effortless transitions, and delivers enough ground feedback despite the significant amount of rubber and cushioning."
Saucony Hurricane ISO 3, Saucony,85.0,86.0,201.0,$160,$46 (save 95%), Road, Stability, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Jan 2017," Normal | Normal, Wide", Saucony Hurricane ISO 5,"6 reasons to buy
Many runners felt that the 3rd version of the Hurricane ISO from Saucony had an overall better performance than its predecessors.
The color schemes for this running shoe gained some fans; they welcomed its vibrant hues and shades.
The upper fabrics were comfortable to the skin, commented several consumers.
Those who needed additional support appreciated the stability mechanics present in this shoe.
A reviewer observed that there was a bit more cushioning in the forefoot area compared to version 2 of the Hurricane ISO, and he welcomed it.
The outsole unit’s grip capability was lauded by those who have tested it.
3 reasons not to buy
A number of consumers felt that this shoe’s price was expensive.
A tester wrote that though the underfoot foam looked bulky, it wasn’t able to give a springy and responsive ride.
The bottom part of the sole unit came apart after a few uses, a runner reported.
Bottom line
Most of those who have tried the Saucony Hurricane ISO 3 were positive about its features and what it had to offer in general. Some even thought that its performance was relatively better than the previous ones in the series. But there were others who complained about several of its components, stating that they were not as efficient as expected. Still, the majority of the testers believed that it’s a solid option for those with overpronated foot motion."
Saucony Excursion TR 10, Saucony,86.0,,866.0,$70,$47 (save 33%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 8.2oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,," Normal, Wide | Normal, Wide", Saucony Excursion TR 14,"10 reasons to buy
Comfort is a prime asset of the 10th instalment of the Excursion TR, based on most reviews.
It is very affordable.
The shoe is quite light despite the numbers on the weighing scale, according to several runners.
A handful of users noted its excellent breathability.
A good number of the reviews mentioned the shoe’s exceptional durability.
The cushioning absorbs shock very well, according to some runners.
The upper does a very good job of keeping dirt out, as noted in a couple of reviews.
As observed by more than a few runners, the traction is very good.
A small number of people who are up on their feet most of the day, valued the cushioning of the Saucony Excursion TR 10.
This is an all-exercise shoe, as claimed by a handful of users.
6 reasons not to buy
The Excursion TR 10 is quite stiff.
The break-in period is considerable, as stated by several.
It looks too cumbersome or heavy for a few.
A moderate number of runners felt that the fit is tighter and smaller than the past versions of this shoe.
There is absolutely no ground feedback from this shoe, according to several reviewers.
The heavily-padded ankle collar, tongue, and midsole prevent the shoe from drying quickly.
Bottom line
The Excursion TR 10 is a burly, durable, and comfortable trail fiend that can handle moderately difficult terrains. It has exceptional comfort, good traction, and surprisingly runs lighter than how it looks or what the numbers indicate on the scale. The very affordable price, superb protection, and no-fuss functionality should make this shoe a worthy candidate for any trail enthusiast."
Vivobarefoot Primus Lite II, Vivobarefoot,83.0,84.0,7.0,$160,$112 (save 30%), Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 7oz,,, May 2019," Normal, Wide | Normal, Wide",,"5 reasons to buy
The fact that the Vivobarefoot Primus Lite II is partly made of plant-based materials is a plus to many consumers.
Several testers have noted that the natural motion of the foot is encouraged by this minimalist running shoe.
The lightweight nature of this product is praised by a lot of purchasers.
Most users have found the aesthetics to be pleasing to the eyes.
The upper unit is lauded because it is breathable and flexible enough to accommodate toe-splay and natural foot-swelling during the run.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people have claimed that the foot has a tendency to wobble while inside the Vivobarefoot Primus Lite II.
Some testers believe that this running shoe has a price that is a tad expensive.
Bottom line
The overall feedback of people towards the Vivobarefoot Primus Lite II has been largely positive. This product is welcomed because it has an in-shoe feel that permits the natural motion of the foot. The vegan-friendly design is also highlighted as a standout aspect. Conversely, the hefty price tag and the inconsistent in-shoe wrap are criticized.
Fans of neutral running shoes made of environment-friendly materials can enjoy the Primus Lite II."
Brooks PureGrit 6, Brooks,91.0,88.0,70.0,$120,$100 (save 17%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.6oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm, Jun 2017, Normal | Normal, Brooks PureGrit 8,"6 reasons to buy
A majority of runners were happy that the outsole of the Brooks PureGrit 6 protected their foot from rocks and other objects on the trail.
Most testers said that they were glad to feel that the shoe is slightly lighter compared to its predecessor.
The shoe had adequate cushioning, based on a few reviews.
A lot of users observed that the transition the shoe provides was extremely smooth.
A number of users wrote that the shoe is sufficiently comfortable.
The close-to-the-ground feel of this new version was a welcomed update, according to several reviews.
2 reasons not to buy
One tester reminded everyone that the midsole on the PureGrit 6 is not soft at all.
Another runner said that the design of the sole created an underfoot pressure point, which caused slight discomfort.
Bottom line
With its light nature and neutral arch support, the Brooks PureGrit 6 is a trail running shoe that aims to give runners a nimbler experience during off-road runs, without having to worry about the technicality of the terrain. This moderately-priced option is ideal those seeking a shoe with reliable protection and traction while blazing the trail."
Merrell MTL Astrum,,79.0,,9.0,,," Mud, Snow, Trail", Neutral, Men: 11.6oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The Merrell MTL Astrum has an outsole unit that is able to grip the ground well, based on most reviews.
Those who appreciate running in the winter season are happy with the warmth given by the upper unit.
Some consumers believe that this beast of a trail running shoe does not reflect a heavy form.
The upper unit is said to be supportive and protective, particularly when it comes to debris on the trails.
According to some wearers, the midsole and facade are helpful enough to maintain a steady in-shoe experience throughout the run.
2 reasons not to buy
A few consumers have reported that the in-shoe experience is a bit wobbly.
Some testers believe that the upper unit of the MTL Astrum is not as ventilated as expected.
Bottom line
The reaction towards the MTL Astrum has been positive. People appreciate this winter-optimized Merrell trail running shoe because its elements are designed to fully support the runner throughout those trudges through the snowy landscapes. The traction-ready outsole and the secure in-shoe experience are highlighted. Additionally, the MTL Astrum also possesses attributes of no-bulk warmth and industrial-strength traction.
Fans of black running shoes that are for the off-road paths can enjoy the MTL Astrum."
Skechers GOrun 6, Skechers,92.0,90.0,88.0,$100,$60 (save 40%), Road, Neutral, Men: 6.7oz , Women: 5.3oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm, Jan 2018, Normal | Normal, Skechers GOrun 7+,"6 reasons to buy
The knit upper gained some fans because it apparently gave a sock-like fit.
The cushioning system felt supportive and agreeable, several consumers commented.
According to some testers, the simple slip on-and-off collar was efficient in its purpose.
The design and colorways were lauded for being stylish.
A consumer reported that the toe box was wide enough for the spreading of the toes.
The lightweight disposition of the Skechers GOrun 6 went well with a lot of runners.
2 reasons not to buy
Putting on the shoe caused the foot to slip out of the knitted collar immediately, a tester complained.
Some reviewers noted that the ride wasn’t as dynamic as expected because they didn’t feel as if their feet were adequately locked in place.
Bottom line
The Skechers GOrun 6 received positive reviews from neutral runners and casual shoe enthusiasts. They welcomed this road shoe’s lightweight nature, its eye-catching color schemes, and satisfying cushioning platform. They also gave praise for its sock-lick cover system. But the collar unit wasn’t as positively received; some testers felt that it hindered the rest of the upper from keeping the foot snug and secure."
New Balance 780 v5,,79.0,,139.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Some runners liked the comfortable and lightweight construction of the New Balance 780 v5.
The upper construction of the shoe is very lightweight and breathable.
Most runners noticed the enhanced cushioning and improved ground feel of the shoe.
The midsole have the dual layer foam that provides added cushioning for long distance runs.
An affordable shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners felt that the 5th version of the New Balance 780 has a too wide toe box.
Others don’t like the laces of the shoe.
Bottom line
The New Balance 780 v5 is a road running shoe designed for neutral pronators. The updated version of the shoe offers added cushioning and promotes a responsive ride. This shoe is reliable for high-mileage runs and good as a daily training partner."
Adidas Climacool Fresh 2.0,,88.0,87.0,72.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.9oz , Women: 6.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The Adidas Fresh 2.0 is as ultra-breathable as the original model.
The cool design in 4 different color schemes will not fail to catch the attention of people.
The CC Fresh 2.0 is very light.
It is extra flexible.
The cushioning is adequate for longer runs, according to a few testers.
It is very affordable.
Some runners valued the Fresh 2.0’s superb durability.
2 reasons not to buy
The lack of arch support and the high heel offset may not be suitable for a good number of runners.
Wet conditions will certainly damper the runner’s mood as the foot can be soaked in no time.
Bottom line
The Adidas Climacool Fresh 2.0 just like the popular Adidas running shoe, the Ultra Boost will allow runners to fly like the wind in an extremely breathable run. It is not built for entry level runners or those who love more structure and arch support in their running shoes. Runners who want to get a little taste of what a minimalist shoe feels like can do so in the CC Fresh 2.0."
Salomon S-Lab Wings,,88.0,87.0,18.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 9.8oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,, Salomon S-Lab Wings 8,"7 reasons to buy
The upper unit features the Stretch Air Mesh, which allows breathability and freedom for foot movement.
The S-Lab Wings from Salomon has a set of comfortable upper and mid-sole components that many wearers welcomed, especially since it’s created for the trails.
The shoe itself has a semi-glossy look that improves visibility in low-light conditions.
Runners appreciate the standard length of this shoe, making it a good fit for many foot types.
The durability of its individual parts is impressive.
This running shoe was created with a unisex design, making it work well for both men and women.
It may look like a bulky shoe, but the Salomon S-Lab Wings shoe has a moderate weight.
3 reasons not to buy
There were testers who did not sit well with the sock liner because they had instances when it folded near the mid-foot area.
The tongue could also use additional padding to support the upper part of the foot.
This one is a pricey running shoe.
Bottom line
Many runners received the S-Lab Wings well because of its receptive upper fit, the adequate nature of its cushioning system and the reliability of its trail-specific features. It’s a neutral shoe that doesn’t offer a lot of stability underfoot, but has dependable qualities."
Salomon Sense Mantra 2,,88.0,,87.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,, Salomon Sense Mantra 3,"5 reasons to buy
Many noticed the impressive ground contact the shoe can offer.
Many liked the quick lacing system, allowing runners to tie laces efficiently.
It delivers a glove-like fit.
The shoe has excellent support features and enough cushioning for trail running.
According to a few users, the shoe feels light and fast.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners mentioned that they developed blisters.
Some think that the Sense Mantra 2 was poorly designed.
Bottom line
The Salomon Sense Mantra 2 is reshaped to be a better training shoe for runners. It is a minimalist running shoe designed for trail running that offers glove-like fit and impressive ground contact. Though the shoe has minor issues, users still found the Sense Mantra 2 a dependable trail partner. "
New Balance 910 v4,,88.0,88.0,28.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.6oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The outsole effortlessly gripped wet roots and rocks, expressed some reviewers.
The New Balance 910 v4 was a supportive trail shoe, according to a customer.
One runner claimed it was a comfortable shoe that easily enabled them to log more miles.
Another said it was lighter compared to other similar trail shoes.
A user was pleased that the shoe did not require a break-in period.
The beveled heel design helped the shoe feel nimble on technical trails, a reviewer praised.
Many runners commended the cushioning of the REVlite foam.
5 reasons not to buy
A user experienced a narrow fit with the 910 v4.
The shoe implemented zero toe protection despite the installed bumper, complained a buyer.
The sock liner was quite thin, a disappointed wearer said.
One reviewer cited that the rock plate made the shoe stiff and rigid.
Some commenters mentioned the 910 v4 was a heavy shoe.
Bottom line
The New Balance 910 has successfully introduced a reliable runner with their fourth release, as users appreciated the shoe’s construction and performance. Meanwhile, some experienced fit and feel issues. However, despite the adverse claims it received, the 910 v4 has still emerged as a shoe with efficient features."
Asics Roadhawk FF 2 Twist, Asics,86.0,80.0,71.0,$100,$60 (save 98%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
The majority of the users commented that the Asics Roadhawk FF 2 Twist is lightweight.
A significant number of testers said that the shoe is comfortable.
Several consumers admired its fantastic fit.
A lot of buyers loved its fantastic color options.
One of the purchasers said that the shoe absorbs the shock well. 
According to those who have tried it, the shoe is best used for different walking or running activities. 
The running shoe is well-cushioned, a reviewer noted. Based on the reviews, the shoe has a roomy toe box.
1 reasons not to buy
One of the buyers commented that the shoe is not durable. The cloth material has been easily punctured. 
Bottom line
The Asics Roadhawk FF 2 Twist is considered by many as a go-to choice of running footwear. Almost all of them were happy and contented with the responsive feel the shoe has offered. Though one of the testers found that the mesh upper is not as durable as other running shoes, others still enjoyed the personalized fit it provides after several runs. Overall, the majority of the users found the Asics Roadhawk FF 2 Twist as a perfect partner in their activities because of its comfort level, great style, affordable value, and excellent cushioning. The Asics Roadhawk will surely become an instrument in their running performance."
Altra Lone Peak 2.0,,83.0,84.0,112.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.4oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,, Altra Lone Peak 4.5,"6 reasons to buy
The Quick-Dry Trail Mesh does exactly what it’s supposed to do: stave off moisture.
The FootShape™ toe box allows normal toe splaying to take place, maximizing natural performance from stepping to lifting off.
Runners appreciated the inclusion of the StoneGuard™ Rock Protection unit, which shielded their feet from debris and other hazardous surfaces.
A bouncy underfoot cushioning system meets the foot, and it works with the EVA foam in delivering sure comfort and support to the runner.
Sticky Rubber makes up the outsole unit and it has gripping lugs that hold onto surfaces with ease.
It has a moderate weight, which won’t make the runner feel as if the shoe is dragging them down.
1 reasons not to buy
The outsole treads have easily worn off for some runners.
Bottom line
Runners are able to relax their feet and experience a more freeing running technique with the Altra Lone Peak 2.0. Meant to enable a more natural foot shape when worn, this shoe gives neutral runners the cushioning and protection that they need for those trail adventures and other off-road treks."
Adidas Vigor Bounce, Adidas,85.0,,991.0,$82,$80 (save 20%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,, Normal | Normal,,"8 reasons to buy
Some runners stated that the Adidas Vigor Bounce was suitably lightweight for their trail-running experiences.
The snug & secure fit was lauded by a tester.
A lot of testers noted that they liked the appealing design and color-schemes of this running shoe.
The cushioning system felt responsive and bouncy, commented some users.
There were those who listed ‘shock absorption’ as a pro when they reviewed this model.
One commenter wrote that the traction given by the outsole made it great for off-road running and for outdoor sports like softball.
Many were impressed by its durability because it lasted longer and didn’t suffer any noticeable damage.
A majority of the runners who tried the Adidas Vigor Bounce noted that it was true to its size.
4 reasons not to buy
There was a reviewer who felt that the Adidas Vigor Bounce fit a little larger than the usual.
Several consumers reported that this shoe was not as comfortable as the other ones with the ‘Bounce’ technology.
The forefoot section was a bit restrictive, complained a tester.
A runner observed that its upper unit wasn’t breathable; his feet felt hot while wearing it.
Bottom line
Outdoor adventures are much more comfortable with the Adidas Vigor Bounce. Hugely positive comments and reviews make this model very agreeable to those who want a reliable neutral shoe for their off-road treks and for their forays into outdoor sports."
Reebok Zigwild TR 2, Reebok,92.0,,354.0,,, Trail, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal, Reebok Zigwild Trail 6.0,"6 reasons to buy
Many runners were satisfied with the shoe’s zigzag sole that provides reliable grip and added cushioning for an enhanced performance.
The upper coverage is breathable and flexible enough to hug the foot comfortably.
Some users admired the flexibility of the shoe due to the flex grooves in the forefoot.
The SmoothFit element provides irritation-free environment for the foot.
According to some comments, the shoe is very comfortable to wear on the trail.
The shoe is affordable.
1 reasons not to buy
Some runners noticed that tread of the Reebok Zigwild TR 2are coming off after few months of use.
Bottom line
The Reebok Zigwild TR 2 neutral running shoe designed for trail running. It provides a combination of responsive cushioning, impressive fit and comfort. The shoe comes in a low-cut design for enhanced mobility. Based on user reviews, the shoe is not only affordable but indeed, reliable."
Puma Ignite Limitless SR evoKNIT, Puma,87.0,,67.0,$130,$40 (save 97%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
One of the reviewers mentioned that the shoe felt like a glove.
A tester said that the Puma Ignite Limitless SR evoKNIT has a fantastic fit.
The cool-looking design of the shoe was admired by a purchaser.
Some of the buyers said that the footwear was stylish.
According to a consumer who has tried it, the shoe was comfortable.
2 reasons not to buy
The outsole has come apart after only a couple of uses, said a buyer.
Some reviewers claimed the shoe is not suitable for extended periods of running or walking.
Bottom line
Overall, runners loved the Puma Ignite Limitless SR evoKNIT because of its style and construction. They appreciated the comfort that it provided. Although some users have problems with durability, others still recommend the Puma Ignite Limitless SR evoKNIT because of its excellent design, fit and performance."
Under Armour Charge RC 2, Under Armour,83.0,81.0,48.0,$120,$60 (save 50%), Road, Stability, Men: 8oz , Women: 6.3oz, Men: 7mm , Women: 7mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
The Under Armour Charge RC 2 is very lightweight and breathable according to some reviews.
This shoe has an impressive traction, according to several runners.
The foot-hugging HeatGear technology in the upper provides a breathable fit.
It has a padded tongue and a toe cap that gives foot protection while running.
It features an external heel counter for an enhanced fit.
It has a roomy toe box which is extremely favorable for wide foot runners.
3 reasons not to buy
The Charge RC 2 is a moderately high-priced shoe.
Some runners found this shoe too stiff for them.
According to runners with high arches, the underfoot sole felt hard and become uncomfortable.
Bottom line
The Under Armour Charge RC 2 is a breathable and lightweight running shoe. The updated version provides enhanced fit, arch support, protection, and durability. It is best for short and long distance runs as well as on racing days."
Adidas Alphaboost Parley, Adidas,80.0,,14.0,$150,$79 (save 47%), Road, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Jun 2019, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
People who have tested the Adidas Alphaboost Parley welcome the spacious forefoot section, stating that the toes are able to splay naturally because of it.
The steadying pods that are located on the outsole unit provide stable lateral movements, according to several consumers.
The quality of the cushioning has received praise from those who desire reactive steps and well-attenuated foot-strikes.
Several purchaser laud the design of this Adidas running shoe for being modern and ready for both performance and casual use.
Based on a handful of reviews, the traction capacity of the outsole is reliable and precise.
1 reasons not to buy
Some consumers report that the Parley Ocean Plastic™ yarn used for the upper unit is a bit irritating to the skin.
Bottom line
All-in-all, the feedback given for the Adidas Alphaboost Parley has leaned towards the positive side. Many consumers claim that the quality and versatility of this running shoe permit them to perform well on the roads. The traction-ready rubber outsole, the roomy toe-box and the contemporary looks are also highlighted as superb elements. On the other hand, there are those who feel like the environment-friendly upper unit has a tendency to scratch the skin, causing irritation.
The Adidas Alphaboost Parley is a product that’s meant for enthusiasts of neutral running shoes and asphalt-optimized footwear."
Nike Free Shield 5.0,,93.0,84.0,391.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.2oz , Women: 6.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The 5th version of the Free Shield features a water-resistant upper better comfort and protection.
It is very responsive, according to several testers.
Although it is of average weight, this running shoe runs a lot lighter than its weight based on the remarks of several users.
Comfort is something that many testers appreciated.
The shoe is a bit flexible as noted by a handful of runners.
9 color combinations for an insane number of choices.
The Flywire technology gives the shoe a better personalized fit.
2 reasons not to buy
Some testers were confused about the shoe’s lack of plush cushioning.
A very small number of runners were frustrated that the soles came apart without piling enough miles on this shoe.
Bottom line
The Nike Free Shield 5.0 provides great arch support for neutral and mild over-pronators. It uses an 8mm offset with a relatively high stack height that both heel and midfoot strikers will agree on. This can rightfully be called a lightweight trainer that can do very well in marathons and ultra-long runs."
Saucony Endorphin Racer 2, Saucony,73.0,81.0,16.0,$125,$59 (save 53%), Road, Neutral, Men: 4.1oz , Women: 4.1oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm, Feb 2017, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
Many of the users who reviewed the Saucony Endorphin Racer 2 said that they were comfortable.
For most runners, the shoe felt lightweight but still gave enough protection underfoot.
Some users loved the colorway of the shoe.
One user was impressed with the overall barefoot experience the shoe provided.
Another user said that the grip was sufficient on asphalt even when it was raining.
One runner appreciated how quick and responsive the shoe was.
Most testers felt that the shoe was highly breathable.
5 reasons not to buy
A lot of runners mentioned that the toe box was narrow.
One tester felt that the shoe was slightly expensive.
Another user was disappointed to find out that the insoles were not removable.
A majority of the reviewers mentioned that the bottom of the shoe was stiff. It apparently caused them to experience foot pain while walking or running.
Two users narrated that their shoe developed a tear on the lateral sides after about 2 to 3 months of usage.
Bottom line
Saucony’s Endorphin Racer 2 is a neutral, road running racing flat, with a number of features that make it light yet innovative. With a zero heel-to-toe drop, runners will have a better feel for the ground without worrying about underfoot protection. The price for this speedy pair is a bit on the higher range, but the technologies and its durability as a racing flat makes up for it. There’s no denying that this shoe was built to go fast."
Vibram FiveFingers Seeya,,84.0,81.0,759.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 4.8oz , Women: 4.6oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"4 reasons to buy
The shoe is very light and very flexible, according to some reviews.
It has an impressive ground feel, said most runners.
The upper of the Vibram FiveFingers Seeya features a polyester stretch fabric that is very lightweight and thin.
Some runners were impressed by the grip of the Seeyah especially when used in wet condition.
4 reasons not to buy
The shoe materials were not very durable according to some reviews.
Toes were uncomfortable based on some runners’ feedback.
Some runners were not impressed by the top strap; it failed to provide a tight fit.
The heel area felt loose, said some reviews.
Bottom line
The Vibram FiveFingers Seeya is very light and highly flexible that will not disappoint runners in getting the barefoot running experience. It has an impressive traction, minimal support, and little foot protection. It also received negative comments because others found it to be less durable and uncomfortable. In summary, the shoe still needs some improvement but it is still worth-trying."
Hoka One One Mafate 4, Hoka One One,84.0,79.0,68.0,,, Trail, Stability, Men: 12.2oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
The 4th version of the Mafate provides more support and protection, as observed by some runners.
Many applauded the durable construction of the Mafate 4.
This version features an added medial support that is needed for long distance runs.
The no-sew light construction of the upper keeps the skin free from irritation and blistering.
It has Protective TPU Toe cap technology for added foot protection, especially when running on tough surfaces.
This shoe offers a wider toe box for a more natural forefoot placement when running.
3 reasons not to buy
The heavy nature of this running shoe didn’t sit well with some runners.
The price of the Mafate 4 is expensive.
Some noticed that this version looked bulky and feels firmer than the previous versions.
Bottom line
If you are looking for an added medial support, this shoe is the perfect option for you. The Hoka One One Mafate 4 is a trail running shoe that provides plenty of cushioning and support for overpronators. This shoe is a great partner for trail running and long-distance runs."
Asics GT 2000 5 Trail, Asics,84.0,,943.0,$120,$70 (save 42%), Trail, Stability, Men: 11.7oz , Women: 9.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Apr 2017, Normal | Normal, Asics GT 2000 8 Trail,"8 reasons to buy
The comfort of the 5th version of the GT 2000 Trail was greatly appreciated by a moderate number of runners.
It is a versatile trail shoe that can also handle the roads.
The shoe is lighter than its predecessor.
More than a handful were very satisfied with the GT 2000 5 Trail’s style.
The use of seamless overlays on both sides of the shoe should lessen the risk of blisters.
It is quite supportive, based on the comments of some runners.
More than a handful were happy with this shoe’s traction on the trail and the road.
A few reviewers commended the breathability of the latest version of the Asics GT 2000 5 Trail.
2 reasons not to buy
It feels a little stiffer compared to the prior model, according to a few runners.
A handful deemed the price tag to be above its value.
Bottom line
The GT 2000 5 Trail is the off-road version of the regular model. With a trail-specific lug and tackier rubber in the outsole, it provides enough traction for less technical, rocky, or muddy trails. The shoe handles middle distance runs and daily training without trouble. It has superior comfort, good arch support, and a very breathable upper for those moderately fast or easy days on the trail."
Reebok Fusion Flexweave, Reebok,82.0,68.0,323.0,$120,$50 (save 99%), Road, Neutral,,,,, Mar 2018," Normal, Wide | Normal",,"8 reasons to buy
Most of those who have tried the Reebok Fusion Flexweave were happy with its unique look and color schemes.
Some people used this running shoe for gym workouts, and they stated that it worked well.
The width profile catered to the expectations of many runners.
The underfoot cushioning system was lauded for being efficient and responsive.
Several purchasers felt that the weight of this product was agreeably light.
Consumers greatly appreciated the traction capacity of the outsole rubber.
Certain reviewers thought that the general durability of the Fusion Flexweave was reliable.
People have often described the in-shoe experience to be ‘comfortable,’ even with long-term use.
4 reasons not to buy
Several testers noted that the upper unit didn’t support the foot very well; they observed sideward rolling or forward slipping during the running session.
A purchaser stated that this shoe took a while to break in.
A few reviewers complained that the materials looked cheap.
Durability wasn’t a strong aspect of this shoe because some consumers noticed the upper easily separating from the platform.
Bottom line
Neutral runners and athletic shoe enthusiasts mostly welcomed the Reebok Fusion Flexweave. They liked its lightweight configuration, its versatile design, the responsive cushioning system and the comfortable fit. Conversely, there were complaints about a cheap-looking façade, an extended break-in period, and an unsupportive upper. Overall, this road companion, while not being perfect, gained a following of avid testers."
Zoot Ultra Race 4.0, Zoot,84.0,82.0,65.0,$120,$40 (save 67%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"4 reasons to buy
The Ultra Race 4.0 features an UltraFit upper for next-to-skin comfort.
This shoe has an adjustable Boa Closure System for precision fit and high performance.
The Z-Bound technology provides an unmatched well-cushioned ride, which gained positive responses from most runners.
Many were satisfied with the shoe’s lightweight and comfortable construction.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners mentioned that areas near their heels were hurt when running sockless.
Available in limited color options.
A moderately expensive shoe.
Bottom line
Get the fast speed you needed on your race day with this Zoot Ultra Race 4.0. It is light weight and provides a responsive ride for your entire run. This neutral running shoe can also double as a great daily trainer."
Altra Provision 3.0, Altra,88.0,86.0,824.0,$120,$100 (save 17%), Road, Stability, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm, Nov 2016, Normal | Normal, Altra Provision 4.0,"9 reasons to buy
Some runners appreciate the new design and overall construction of the Altra Provision 3.0.
Most runners found the Provision 3.0 breathable and comfortable.
The quick-drying mesh in the upper works efficiently, as noted in some reviews.
It has a wide toe-box that promotes natural toe splay.
Many runners noticed the enhanced support that the shoe provides.
Overpronators liked the redesigned Guide Rail technology that helps reduce excess pronation.
The stability is perceptible, in a good way, based on the comments of a handful of runners.
According to some testers, this is the first Altra that looks like a “normal” shoe, despite the FootShape toe box.
Multiple color options available.
3 reasons not to buy
A couple of runners mentioned that the sole of the shoe is not durable.
A handful of runners felt like it is a tad smaller than the earlier version of this shoe.
A few expert reviewers noted that it required considerable break-in time.
Bottom line
The Altra Provision 3.0 is a moderately-cushioned running shoe ideal for road and light-trail running. It is designed for runners who need extra support. Many runners applauded the enhanced fit, comfort and breathability of the shoe, but there are also a few who found the shoe to be smaller and less durable. Overall, the Provision 3.0 is still considered by some as a successful update. "
New Balance 940 v3, New Balance,86.0,,229.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 14.4oz , Women: 11.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Dec 2016," Narrow, Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Narrow, Normal, Wide", New Balance 940 v4,"11 reasons to buy
Several runners exclaimed that the 940 v3 is easily one of the most comfortable running shoes on the market today.
The thick cushioning absorbs shock well.
The support is great, according to some reviewers.
It is very breathable, based on the comments of a few runners.
The shoe comes in wide and extra wide widths.
A handful noted that it is quite durable.
The addition of the ABZORB cushioning softens the impact with each landing.
The extra widths were appreciated by a good number of reviewers.
A good number of runners loved the fit of the 3rd iteration of the 940.
A handful of users complimented the sleek and updated look.
Gym workouts is another option for this shoe, as mentioned by a few reviewers.
4 reasons not to buy
The 3rd version of the 940 is significantly heavier than the past model.
It runs a bit clumsy, according to a few reviewers.
It is a bit expensive.
More than a few runners were disappointed that the heel collar does not come up high enough to prevent their foot from slipping out of the shoe.
Bottom line
The New Balance 940 v3 is ideal for those with moderate to severe overpronation.With more cushioning and with deeper grooves for more flexibility, the shoe aims to strike the balance that every runner looks for in a beast of a stability. At the cost of weight and a slightly higher price tag, this is a shoe that shines as intended."
Asics NitroFuze 2,,78.0,,258.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Several runners noted that the Asics NitroFuze 2 was aptly lightweight.
Many consumers described the cushioning system as comfortable for daily use.
The design was lauded for being sporty and contemporary.
The available widths were accurate to the expectations of most purchasers.
Some users welcomed the durable construction of the materials.
Many people appreciated that it performed well on flat surfaces like the asphalt.
1 reasons not to buy
A consumer complained of some discomfort when she was wearing this shoe.
Bottom line
The Asics NitroFuze 2 was mostly well-received by consumers who wanted to have a neutral shoe for their adventures on the road. They appreciated its lightweight design, its appealing looks, and its apparently capable components. A person didn’t have a positive experience with this product, but it’s an isolated response that’s drowned by mostly positive reviews."
New Balance 810 v3, New Balance,78.0,,115.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 7.2oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
It has a very appealing style as noticed by testers.
It is a light shoe for trail purposes.
This is a great outdoor shoe for different activities based on the reviews of several users.
The New Balance 810 v3 has great grip on off-road terrain as noted by a handful of runners.
The fit is great for wide foot is one common comment from users on reviews.
It is a good trail running shoe with low drop profile for a closer ground feel without sacrificing protection.
3 reasons not to buy
The cushioning is lacking according to some testers.
The upper part wears out easily as tried by some testers.
Those with narrow feet will not like its roomy toe box and mid-foot structure.
Bottom line
The New Balance 810v3 is a comfortable and stable running shoe for moderately rugged trails. But, it has the responsive, lightweight outsole construction that runners can depend on when used on outdoor soft grounds. It is a great shoe for its value."
Inov-8 Trailroc G 280, Inov-8,82.0,87.0,7.0,$150,$80 (save 56%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 9.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Aug 2018," Normal | Normal, Wide",,"5 reasons to buy
The traction capacity of the Inov-8 Trailroc G 280’s outsole is welcomed by trail running shoe enthusiasts.
According to a few consumers, the outsole design allows transitioning to roads with ease.
The general durability of the materials is appreciated by various users.
A couple of reviews have observed the midsole unit to be supportive and energizing.
The breathability of the upper unit is praised by consumers.
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of testers believe that the toe box is a bit too restrictive to permit natural toe-splay.
The inner sleeve has a tendency to rub uncomfortably against the skin of the foot, based on a few reviews.
Bottom line
The overall feedback towards the Trailroc G 280 is positive. People welcome this Inov-8 running shoe because of its durable construction, the traction capacity of the outsole, the comfortable midsole, and the ventilated in-shoe feel. Hard, rocky trails are made easier with the cushioning and protection offered by this running shoe."
Salomon Speedcross 4 CS, Salomon,89.0,91.0,1541.0,$145,$125 (save 14%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Oct 2016, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
Water-repellent upper coverage worked impressively in keeping the feet dry, according to some reviews.
A few number of runners high-appreciated the shoe’s superb grip on rough terrains.
Several runners found the Speedcross 4 CS durable.
Based on the observations of few runners, the shoe is comfortable to wear.
The shoe’s cushioning gained positive remarks from some runners.
The shoe is surprisingly lightweight, based on some comments.
One runner mentioned that the Speedcross 4 CS felt more secure than the older version.
3 reasons not to buy
The Salomon Speedcross 4 CS is expensive.
Some runners noticed that the shoe is less breathable because of the anti-debris mesh.
One runner mentioned that the shoe was unstable due to high heel height.
Bottom line
The Salomon Speedcross 4 CS is a reliable trail running shoe that is designed for neutral foot movement. Comes with a water-repellent upper coverage, this shoe keeps the foot dry even on wet conditions. It offers great cushioning, breathability, and protection needed while running on technical trails."
Jordan Grind 2, Jordan,80.0,,27.0,$115,$100 (save 13%), Road, Neutral,,,,, Jul 2018, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
People who have tested the Jordan Grind 2 were happy with its design and aesthetics.
The cushioning system offered a balance between flexibility and firmness, according to consumers.
The upper unit’s midfoot strap helped in keeping the foot in place, a tester noted.
This shoe worked well as a casual or walking sneaker, a couple of users stated.
Several runners liked the general quality of the components, stating that they had a premium look and feel.
2 reasons not to buy
Some consumers felt a bit of tightness in the forefoot section.
A tester felt that it had a break-in period; the upper apparently needed to be stretched out via a few uses before accommodating the natural shape of the foot.
Bottom line
The Grind 2 from the Jordan brand of running shoes was welcomed by those who have tried it. The fresh aesthetics, comfortable underfoot experience, and quality materials were elements that supposedly made this road shoe an appealing one. But some people complained of tightness, with one emphasizing a need to break-in the façade and others feeling a restrictive forefoot construction."
Nike Zoom Rotational 6, Nike,76.0,,13.0,$110,$100 (save 9%), Road, Neutral, Men: 12.1oz , Women: 12.1oz, Men: 2mm , Women: 2mm,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
The Zoom Rotational 6 is an elite-level throwing/athletic shoe molded comfortably into the foot, according to testers.
This shoe offers amazing comfort as what some athletes say.
The Nike Rotational 6 is a technically-designed shoe focused mainly for throwing purposes.
A perfect grip in the foot while spinning is felt and noticed by some testers.
Stylish upper is very noticeable.
Reviewers say that the best features of the Rotational 6 are its cushioning, weight, and grip.
Durability is one of the things users love about this shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
This is not ideal for new throwers who are not yet expert in balancing while spinning.
It is a bit pricey.
Bottom line
The Nike Zoom Rotational 6 is designed for rotational movement or spinning in some athletic sports like hammer throwing, discus, and shot putting. It has similar construction and technicalities as a running shoe, is mainly limited to athletics. The price is worth its looks, design, and features, and helps improve athletic performances at a more comfortable and efficient way."
Salomon X-Scream 3D, Salomon,87.0,82.0,400.0,$125,$60 (save 52%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,," Normal | Normal, Wide",,"5 reasons to buy
A few runners were impressed by the foothold feature of the Salomon X-Scream 3D that is very efficient on dynamic directional changes.
It features a quick lacing system for easy-on and easy-off.
The multi-surface grip of the shoe is very effective especially on wet and soft surfaces, said some reviews.
This shoe offers a responsive ride and very consistent even on uneven surfaces, according to some comments.
Available in several color options.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners experienced heel blisters after long distance runs.
Others felt that the X-Scream 3D is a bit heavy.
A moderately high-priced shoe.
Bottom line
The Salomon X-Scream 3D is a neutral running shoe that offers impressive traction on different surfaces. It has a reliable construction and design. This shoe will never disappoint, especially for runners who are looking for a responsive, well-cushioned ride. Overall, the shoe offers above-average performance on the road."
Brooks PureGrit 4, Brooks,87.0,81.0,396.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,, Normal | Normal, Brooks PureGrit 8,"7 reasons to buy
Overall comfort is an asset that has impressed more than a few runners.
Most of the runners raved about how the shoe delivers some great service while doing some off-road running.
The responsive mid-sole unit has the flexibility and springiness that’s quite appreciable.
Many of the testers were amazed by the PureGrit 4’s durability.
It is comparably lighter than some trail shoes that have more than sufficient cushioning.
The underfoot cushioning in this model is plush without being too soft or unwieldy.
The outsole unit has high quality components, which offer protection from debris, abrasion and wear.
3 reasons not to buy
A good portion of the reviews remarked how the shoe runs narrower than the standard fit.
A few runners also noted that the PureGrit 4 was a bit stiff.
Several trail enthusiasts wished for a few more anti-debris features in the upper unit.
Bottom line
The PureGrit 4 does its best to accommodate many types of runners for a more universal trail running shoe experience. While it has a fairly high-profile feature, the shoe compensates for it by utilizing a near-flat offset. It creates a cushioned run with just enough stability on uneven surfaces. Running in marathons or ultra-long races are some of the best activities for this shoe."
Asics Gel Sileo, Asics,82.0,,6.0,$75,$42 (save 44%), Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 10oz,,,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Most of those who have purchased the Asics Gel Sileo believe that the price is affordable.
The materials of this neutral running shoe are said to have reliable durability.
The Gel® cushioning system has received positive feedback from those who appreciate its impact-attenuating capacity.
The surface grip is an aspect of the external pad that people believe is dependable and precise.
Some consumers have expressed their happiness due to the breathability of the upper unit.
2 reasons not to buy
Some consumers believe that the upper unit is a bit restrictive.
A few people have stated that the midsole is unable to support the foot during extended running sessions.
Bottom line
People’s reaction towards the Gel Sileo has been mostly positive. This Asics running shoe is welcomed for its affordable price, dependable traction capacity, and responsible cushioning mechanisms. On the other hand, the restrictive wrap and the inconsistent underfoot support are criticized.
Fans of road running shoes are the ones who can enjoy the Asics Gel Sileo."
Adidas Climacool Ride,,69.0,72.0,9.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.2oz , Women: 7.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The CC Ride stays true to the Climacool aim of providing 360 degrees of ventilation.
The Adidas Ride is very flexible.
It runs so much lighter than its weight shows, as noted by several runners.
The cushioning is sufficient to absorb shock and to provide underfoot protection for long runs.
Some runners find the Climacool Ride as ideal for cruising along or for going on a fast-paced clip.
A few testers recommend the shoe as exceptional for a more natural running style.
A snug upper hugs the foot really well, according to a small number of runners.
2 reasons not to buy
A sizeable number of runners found the fit as too narrow.
The Adidas CC Ride is a bit expensive.
Bottom line
The Adidas Climacool Ride, just like the popular Adidas Ultraboost 19 is an exceptionally versatile neutral running shoe. It has the makings of a race day shoe, but delivers enough underfoot protection and arch support for rigorous poundings during everyday training. While the sole is a bit firm, which is ideal for racing, it is also slightly forgiving for those high-mileage sessions."
,,,,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6oz , Women: 5.1oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,
New Balance 1500 v4, New Balance,94.0,93.0,795.0,$110,$59 (save 89%), Road, Stability, Men: 8.6oz , Women: 7.1oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm, Jan 2018," Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Normal, Wide", New Balance 1500 v6,"5 reasons to buy
Several consumers noted that the toe box of the New Balance 1500 v4 was noticeably roomier than the previous version, making the experience better.
Many people felt that the sizing scheme followed their expectations.
The upper maintained a cool and dry experience on the roads, a tester commented.
Several runners noted that the weight of this running shoe was fittingly light.
The stability mechanism in the midsole wasn’t too obvious that it became a noticeable bump, a reviewer noted.
2 reasons not to buy
There is less support than what was expected from the shoe, according to some wearers.
The reflectivity wasn’t as prominent as the previous version, a tester noted.
Bottom line
People were chiefly appreciative of the New Balance 1500 v4. They welcomed this stability road shoe’s roomy toe box, the breathable façade, its lightweight nature, and the unobtrusive stability mechanism. But the sizing scheme was apparently inconsistent, and that reflectivity wasn’t as efficient."
Brooks Ghost 11 GTX, Brooks,90.0,,515.0,$150,$113 (save 25%), Road, Neutral, Men: 11.8oz , Women: 10.4oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,, Normal | Normal, Brooks Ghost 12 GTX,"6 reasons to buy
The overall quality of the materials used for the Brooks Ghost 11 GTX was lauded by consumers.
Many people felt that the width profiles followed their fit preferences.
Most consumers thought that the waterproof upper offered reliable protection against wetness.
Some testers considered the weight of this running shoe to be perfect for long adventures on the roads.
The outsole worked well on the trails, according to several runners.
A couple of people who had ankle and knee disorders claimed that the cushioning system responsibly staved off discomfort.
2 reasons not to buy
Some purchasers felt that this model needed various color schemes to heighten visual appeal.
A few individuals noted that the sizing scheme was half-a-size smaller than the usual.
Bottom line
Most of those who have tested the Brooks Ghost 11 GTX were happy with its various features. The waterproof upper and cushioning system were highlighted for being valuable and precise at their purpose. The quality and versatility of this road shoe’s build were also given renown. On the other hand, the sizing scheme was thought by some to be a bit small."
The North Face Ultra TR III,,80.0,90.0,7.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The shoe provided a locked-down and solid fit, a commenter wrote.
The cushioning was ample in the areas that needed it most, according to a reviewer.
The Ultra TR III was lighter and softer compared to other trail running shoes, stated a runner.
One user said that the FastFoam™ midsole felt “springy and cushiony.” Another mentioned it was plush yet responsive.
A wearer was pleased that the upper was lightweight and supple.
The outsole offered both grip on trails and ground contact on roads, making the Ultra TR III versatile shoe, a user claimed.
The shoe excelled in mountain trail running, including a snow-covered glacier pass, a runner experienced.
2 reasons not to buy
One user was dismayed with the shoe’s performance on muddy ground.
Some runners described the tongue as paper-thin, with its minimal padding that did not allow enough protection. Others said that it “looked and felt weird.”
Bottom line
The North Face Ultra TR III was a consumer favorite, as proven through the praises it obtained regarding fit, cushioning, and weight. Few criticisms were relayed towards design elements, but these were not significant to the shoe’s overall account. With how users described its performance and efficiency, the Ultra TR III has shown that it was a worthy investment and a pleasant running gear."
Arc’teryx Norvan LD GTX, Arc'teryx,72.0,83.0,11.0,$195,$137 (save 30%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.6oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm, Apr 2018, Normal | Normal, Arc'teryx Norvan LD 2 GTX,"7 reasons to buy
Majority of Arc’teryx Norvan LD GTX users like the shoe’s efficient breathability.
Most wearers are commending the shoe for being durable.
Several users say that the shoe’s trail running performance proved to last all-day.
A lot of users also give praise to the comfort provided by the Norvan LD GTX on extended trail runs.
A number of users note that the shoe’s single-layer mesh upper is lightweight and air-permeable.
Most of the wearers say that the shoe’s GORE-TEX® feature delivers reliable waterproof performance.
The shoe’s excellent arch support is well received a lot of wearers.
2 reasons not to buy
One reviewer has said that the shoe is roomy at both the front and rear saying it may cause the shoe to be too wide for wearers with narrow feet and heels.
Some users say that some Norvan LD GTX shoes are manufactured not to have good quality when it comes to the waterproofing feature.
Bottom line
The Arc’teryx Norvan LD GTX is explicitly designed for extended trail runs across different types of weather or trail conditions. Users mostly praise the shoe for its lightweight construction, and functional support. The shoe’s outsole is also commended for its versatile grip on technical trails. If anything, it’s just that some Norvan LD GTX shoes were manufactured with less waterproofing capabilities that were noted by some users. Other than that, this trail running shoe from Arc’Teryx has received positive reviews for its overall excellent running performance, especially on challenging trails."
Adidas 90s Valasion, Adidas,79.0,,80.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,, Jul 2019,,,"5 reasons to buy
Most people believe that the underfoot cushioning offered by the Adidas 90s Valasion is comfortable.
The ‘90s-inspired aesthetics of the silhouette is lauded by consumers who welcome nostalgia.
A break-in period is not necessary, according to some consumers; this running shoe is agreeable from the get-go.
The durability of this running shoe is welcomed by those who like long-lasting shoes.
All-day use is attainable with the Adidas 90s Valasion because it has a form-welcoming structure, based on several reviews.
2 reasons not to buy
A few consumers believe the in-shoe experience is a bit restrictive.
Some users have noted that breathability is not the strongest aspect of the 90s Valasion due to the abundance of leather overlays.
Bottom line
People generally like the 90s Valasion. This Adidas running shoe apparently offers cool aesthetics, a comfortable underfoot experience, and durability that is reliable. The overall design is also lauded for being versatile enough to handle any activity. The complaints revolve around the restrictive in-shoe feel and the limited breathability.
Fans of neutral running shoes that can be used for any activity are the target market of the Adidas 90s Valasion."
Asics Gel FujiLyte,,82.0,86.0,74.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 6.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Some testers like the lightweight construction of the Asics Gel FujiLyte.
Many reviewers mentioned that this shoe is comfortable to wear.
Many runners considered this as a fast shoe.
The shoe is very breathable according to some reviews.
Provides protection against stone bruising.
2 reasons not to buy
This is an expensive shoe.
Many mentioned that the sole wears out quickly.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel FujiLyte is a lightweight and fast trail running shoe that is equipped with the necessary technologies designed for effective trail running. It delivers a combination of comfort, speed and cushioning. This is ideal for speed training and long-distant runs."
Nike Air VaporMax Flyknit,,87.0,82.0,350.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Nike Air VaporMax Flyknit 2,"6 reasons to buy
Many purchasers loved the design of the Nike Air VaporMax Flyknit’s upper unit, stating that it looked cool.
The different colorways that are available for this shoe received positive feedback.
This shoe felt suitably lightweight for daily use, noted a number of runners.
Most of those who have tried this shoe wrote that the mid-sole was comfortable enough to carry their feet responsibly throughout various activities.
There were individuals who were able to use this shoe for gym exercises and other sports and they felt that it was efficient.
There were comments about the VaporMax Flyknit’s underfoot feel, which was apparently as soft as running on clouds.
4 reasons not to buy
While moving around with this shoe, there were runners claimed to hear some annoying squeaky noises from the midsole.
The Flyknit upper apparently caused some pressure as it encompassed the feet of some testers.
The shoe is expensive.
The midsole was not as soft or bouncy as some runners had expected.
Bottom line
The Nike Air VaporMax Flyknit generally received mixed reviews from consumers and testers. Many of them felt that this neutral road running shoe was inefficient in giving comfort and security to their feet. They also felt that it was an expensive product that didn’t provide the quality that they expected. Overall, this lightweight shoe needs more improvement. "
Asics Gel Surveyor 3,,90.0,,192.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.2oz , Women: 9.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Surveyor 5,"6 reasons to buy
It features a removable sockliner for added comfort and cushioning.
Some runners liked the durable construction of the Gel Surveyor 3.
The gel cushioning in the rearfoot and forefoot promotes a smooth transition, remarked quite a number of runners.
Several runners noticed the enhanced stability and support of this shoe.
As noted in some reviews, this shoe is comfortable to wear.
Based on a couple of reviews, the transition is effortless and efficient.
4 reasons not to buy
The Asics Gel Surveyor 3 is an expensive shoe.
Lacks cushioning based on some runners experience.
The toe box is too narrow for some runners.
A bit heavy.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Surveyor 3 is designed for overpronators. It offers cushioning, support and smooth ride on both light and rough trail. Overpronators will surely love the stable platform of this shoe to achieve a great running experience. Though it received both positive and negative feedback, it is still safe to say that the Surveyor 3 is a winning release."
Under Armour Micro G Assert V,,90.0,,155.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.7oz , Women: 7.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
It has a lightweight and breathable mesh upper for comfort and support.
Micro G Assert V has an ultra flexible midsole.
Most runners are impressed with the Under Armour Micro G Assert V increased traction and durability.
The Micro G Assert V features durable leather overlays for stability.
The Micro G Assert V is very affordable.
1 reasons not to buy
Few runners are unimpressed with the shoe's overall durability.
Bottom line
Micro G Assert is the right shoe for regular training. With its well-ventilated upper as well as its cushioning system, you will definitely feel comfortable. The shoe acquires positive feedbacks from runners. because of its price, flexibility, and comfort."
Nike Free RN 2017 Shield,,90.0,76.0,538.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 6.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Nike Free RN 5.0 Shield,"6 reasons to buy
Several people appreciated the durability of the Nike Free RN 2017 Shield.
The color options made the product more visually appealing, according to a few testers.
The traction capacity of the outsole was lauded for being agreeable and efficient.
The cushioning system proved to be comfortable and responsive, most purchasers noted.
Many users are pleased that the shoe is lightweight.
Numerous purchasers agree that the Free RN 2017 Shield is versatile and could be worn for activities other than running.
3 reasons not to buy
A couple of users observed static buildup from the shoe, which made it uncomfortable to wear.
The sole unit started to wear out after only a few months, according to some buyers.
Various wearers claimed the shoe gave them blisters.
Bottom line
The Nike Free RN 2017 Shield proved to be an agreeable shoe, according to most testers. They appreciated its comfortable design, its durable components, and its responsive underfoot experience. But several people warned of discomfort and quick wear-out."
Reebok Zig Pulse SE, Reebok,90.0,,155.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 9oz,,,, Normal | Normal,,"8 reasons to buy
Most users mentioned that the shoe felt comfortable.
Some testers with foot and knee problems said that they did not feel any pain while wearing the Reebok Zig Pulse SE.
Most runners commended its lightness.
Plenty of users appreciated the design of the upper and the platform.
One user with a bigger body build mentioned that he felt the shoe provided plenty of support for his weight.
A majority of users said that the price was affordable.
A good number of reviews stated that the cushioning provided was sufficient.
The shape of the shoe caters to a wider foot, said some testers.
2 reasons not to buy
A lot of reviews mentioned that pebbles easily get stuck on the crevices of the sole.
Some testers were not pleased that it only came in two colorways.
Bottom line
The Reebok Zig Pulse SE is a unique-looking, neutral road shoe that many considered to be a refreshing take on modern footwear. Despite the cool design, some were not pleased that tiny pebbles got stuck on the crevices of the sole. Others wished that there were more colorways available. Nonetheless, the majority still appreciated the shoe for its affordable price, comfort, and cushioning."
Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 33 Shield,,90.0,83.0,852.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
The Shield version of the Pegasus 33 is ultra-comfortable, based on most comments.
A water-repellent upper makes it an ideal trainer for slightly inclement weather.
Flywire cables provide excellent midfoot hold, support, and lockdown feel.
Several runners consider the Pegasus 33 Shield as excellent when piling on the miles and when going for quick-pace training.
4 different color options.
It continues to be very smooth like many of the Pegasus versions of years past, according to a handful of loyal fans.
Some runners noted that the cushioning is just right while being responsive.
The traction is simply awesome, according to several users.
It runs quite light, based on the comments of more than a few reviewers.
7 reasons not to buy
It is a bit narrower than the previous model, based on the observations of some runners.
It is a little heavier than before.
A handful were not happy with the increase in price because of the water-repellent upper.
The upper felt a little too stiff because of the water-resistant tech used, according to a few runners.
A good number of runners wished for more reflectivity as this is one of the reasons they opted for the Shield version.
The outsole showed early signs of wear and tear, as mentioned in the comments of several runners.
There were a couple of runners who needed more room in the toe box while using this shoe.
Bottom line
After 32 iterations, Nike brings a water-repellent or Shield model in the Pegasus 33. This is precisely the regular model, but with more protection against the elements including the water-resistant cleatie for more comfort and warmth. The shoe is superbly comfortable and is built as a versatile trainer. It offers excellent traction, durability, and the looks to be one of the best all-around trainers year after year."
Mizuno Wave Rider 20 GTX,,90.0,85.0,25.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,, Apr 2017,, Mizuno Wave Rider GTX,"7 reasons to buy
Several testers appreciated the colorful design of the Mizuno Wave Rider 20 GTX.
The upper and mid-sole components were lauded by some consumers for being comfortable.
The toe box was roomy enough to welcome the natural spreading of the toes, noted a reviewer.
The heel collar gained some fans for its ability to keep the foot in place.
The waterproof Gore-Tex® membrane was appreciated by many because it remained breathable even as it staved off the water.
Runners relayed that the grip capability of the outsole unit was dependable.
The overall performance of the Rider 20 GTX received positive recognition from shoe enthusiasts.
3 reasons not to buy
There’s an extra piece of fabric in the tongue area that rubbed uncomfortably against the skin of a tester.
The water refused to drain out of the shoe whenever it entered the foot-chamber, a disgruntled purchaser complained.
The upper unit felt bulky, a consumer observed.
Bottom line
The Mizuno Wave Rider 20 GTX was loved by many for being a neutral running shoe that’s great for the rainy season or for generally wet conditions. They were mostly impressed with the inclusion of the waterproof Gore-Tex® membrane, which staved off water efficiently. They also lauded its efficiency as a shoe for active lifestyles. Conversely, there were complaints about some of its features, which apparently caused some grievances."
Puma Speed Ignite Netfit,,81.0,85.0,6.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,, Puma Speed Ignite Netfit 2,"8 reasons to buy
Most users said that the upper of the Puma Speed Ignite Netfit was very innovative.
The shoe looks very stylish, said a majority of users.
Because of its construction, some runners felt that this running shoe was worth the price.
Several testers said that the fit of the shoe was true to size.
A lot of users mentioned that it was comfortable.
Some runners observed that the fit was adjustable and supportive.
The color of the shoe was complimented by several testers.
A few users were glad about the lightweight yet supportive nature of the Speed Ignite Netfit.
4 reasons not to buy
One user said that the mouth of the shoe felt a little tight.
Another runner mentioned that the sole might not last if the shoe was used for running.
Some runners expressed that the sizing of the shoe was a tad small for them.
A lot of users felt that it needed to have more color variations.
Bottom line
Puma’s Speed Ignite Netfit is a premium, road running shoe built with neutral support. The style of the shoe may receive most of the praise, but the focal point is really the lacing system which can cater to various foot shapes. On top of that, the shoe is lightweight with cushioning that is sufficiently responsive. Runners looking for all four characteristics – customized fit, stylish, fast, responsive – should definitely check this pair out."
Hoka One One Clifton 5 Knit,,90.0,89.0,219.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.4oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The upper unit was considered by testers to be just like a breathable sock.
The underfoot experience of the Hoka One One Clifton 5 Knit was dutifully comfortable, according to several consumers.
Some individuals stated that the generous thickness of the platform contributed to tendons and muscles that didn’t feel strained.
The weight was deemed light enough to handle all-day wear.
People liked the precise traction given by the outsole unit.
1 reasons not to buy
A purchaser complained that the knitted upper was loose and didn’t hold the foot appropriately.
Bottom line
Many people liked the Hoka One One Clifton 5 Knit and what it had to offer. The well-ventilated upper unit, the sock-like coverage, the supportive platform, and the lightweight build were elements that received praise. Conversely, the sizing scheme and fit configuration received criticism for being inconsistent."
Nike Zoom Rotational 6,,76.0,,13.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.1oz , Women: 12.1oz, Men: 2mm , Women: 2mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The Zoom Rotational 6 is an elite-level throwing/athletic shoe molded comfortably into the foot, according to testers.
This shoe offers amazing comfort as what some athletes say.
The Nike Rotational 6 is a technically-designed shoe focused mainly for throwing purposes.
A perfect grip in the foot while spinning is felt and noticed by some testers.
Stylish upper is very noticeable.
Reviewers say that the best features of the Rotational 6 are its cushioning, weight, and grip.
Durability is one of the things users love about this shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
This is not ideal for new throwers who are not yet expert in balancing while spinning.
It is a bit pricey.
Bottom line
The Nike Zoom Rotational 6 is designed for rotational movement or spinning in some athletic sports like hammer throwing, discus, and shot putting. It has similar construction and technicalities as a running shoe, is mainly limited to athletics. The price is worth its looks, design, and features, and helps improve athletic performances at a more comfortable and efficient way."
Mizuno WaveKnit R1,,,94.0,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Mizuno WaveKnit R2,
Brooks Vapor 3,,94.0,93.0,69.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.4oz , Women: 9.9oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The shoe’s upper is breathable enough and the overall construction is very comfortable.
It has conformable saddle with adaptable eyelets that wraps the midfoot for a more secure fit.
The Brooks Vapor 3 has segmented crash pad for a smoother heel-to-toe transition.
The BioMoGo DNA offers a custom mid-sole that conforms to the exact shape of the wearer’s foot.
Some runners were impressed by the shoe’s Progressive Diagonal Rollbar, which guides the foot to a more neutral position.
The Flextra Technology encourages better toe-offs and enhances flexibility.
3 reasons not to buy
The 3rd version of the Brooks Vapor has a moderately heavy weight.
There were issues with the outsole unit because the protective rubber came apart after a few months.
The design and color schemes used in this shoe are limited and unappealing.
Bottom line
The Brooks Vapor 3 is a road running shoe that offers a combination of smooth performance and protective comfort. The technologies used in this stability shoe made it reliable for regular and up-tempo training. Generally, runners liked the comfortable construction of this shoe."
Skechers GOrun 600 - Refine,,94.0,,201.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 6.5oz,,,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Several consumers have expressed their appreciation of the Skechers GOrun 600 Refine’s stylish design.
The materials that are used for this running shoe are deemed durable enough to last for many miles.
Some testers feel that the upper unit is able to ventilate the foot for extended running sessions.
The lightweight structure of this product is praised by those who welcome footwear that doesn’t weigh them down.
‘Comfortable’ is a word that many testers have used to describe their time wearing this Skechers running shoe.
The cushioning system is appreciated for being responsive and flexible enough to handle all types of activities.
The price is considered affordable by runners and casual shoe enthusiasts who didn’t want a hefty price tag on their foot-apparel.
2 reasons not to buy
Several purchasers claim that the Skechers GOrun 600 Refine demands a break-in period before being entirely comfortable.
A few people lament the lack of arch support, stating that the midfoot area isn’t accommodating of those whose feet get tired quickly.
Bottom line
The overall response towards the Skechers GOrun 600 Refine has been mostly positive. People emphasize this product’s highly accommodating build, the appealing looks, the comfortable midsole, and the wallet-friendly price. On the other hand, the initial break-in period and the lack of perceivable arch support has been lamented by some testers.
Fans of road running shoes are the target market of the GOrun 600 Refine."
Salomon Spikecross 5 GTX,,74.0,,6.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 12.9oz , Women: 12.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The majority of the users said that the Salomon Spikecross 5 GTX is comfortable.
Based on the reviews, the running footwear is breathable.
It is durable, according to those who have tried it.
Several consumers loved the traction it provides on wet and dry surfaces.
Most of the buyers admired the high-quality materials used in crafting the shoe.
One of the testers noted that the footwear provides good arch support.
Some of the buyers commented that the Salomon Spikecross 5 GTX is best used for trail running and hiking.
2 reasons not to buy
The shoe is expensive, according to those who have bought it.
Based on a review, the Spikecross 5 GTX has a sloppy toe box.
Bottom line
Based on positive feedback, the Salomon Spikecross 5 GTX is definitely a well-favored and admired running shoe. 
This trail running partner excellently performed in different activities, as evident in the reviews. Overall, breathability, comfort level, and durability of the shoe received attention and praise.  Despite issues on the price and toe box, this running shoe is still lauded by the majority of the consumers. "
Reebok Print Run ULTK, Reebok,89.0,,73.0,$80,$75 (save 6%), Road, Neutral,,,,, Jan 2018, Normal | Normal,,"8 reasons to buy
Most recognized the Print Run ULTK’s lightness.
A lot of testers agreed that the upper is quite stylish.
Many users appreciated its versatility. Most of them used it on the daily, for the gym, walking, exercising, and light running.
A majority of reviewers were in agreement with regard to the comfort delivered. One user even said that the platform felt like clouds underfoot.
Some runners mentioned that the construction felt sturdy.
The upper’s breathability was noteworthy for some users. One user said that the upper helped his foot stay dry during his long runs.
One tester said that the instep was good for high arches. Another tester felt that there was enough support on the arch.
Many agreed that the price was reasonable for this well-constructed shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
Male reviewers noticed that the shoe was a tad smaller. Also, some described the width as narrow.
A couple of purchasers thought the shoe is expensive compared to other Reebok running shoes.
Bottom line
Reebok’s Print Run ULTK is a neutral running shoe with plenty of versatility to offer. Most described it as being the perfect blend of style and comfort, which was why it was used in different activities from daily use to gym workouts. There were those that noticed a discrepancy in the size. Nevertheless, the shoe is still something to consider for users looking for a reasonably-priced, well-constructed, and versatile footwear."
New Balance 880 v7 GTX,,75.0,,5.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 9.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, New Balance 880 v9 GTX,"6 reasons to buy
Some wearers agreed that the New Balance 880 v7 GTX was a good-looking shoe.
The upper was very comfortable and felt like it was embracing the foot, according to a reviewer.
Each stride was filled with comfort and stability, wrote a consumer.
The shoe provided excellent support for the Achilles, a runner observed.
Several users thought the 880 v7 GTX to be a durable shoe that was able to withstand daily long distances.
A dependable waterproof shoe that proved to be effective in rainy day runs, a customer said.
3 reasons not to buy
A reviewer said the 880 v7 GTX was too tight and hurt the foot even after short-time
The shoe was a little heavy, a wearer said.
A user mentioned the shoe was stiffer compared to the previous version.
Bottom line
The New Balance 880 v7 GTX did not stray far from its base shoe, regarding how consumers received it. This waterproof shoe for running has earned mostly positive comments about its comfort, fit, and support. Only a few wearers experienced issues with the shoe’s structure. Overall, users felt that the New Balance 880 v7 GTX was a shoe worth recommending to peers."
Reebok ZPrint 3D, Reebok,87.0,77.0,135.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.4oz , Women: 6.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
A runner stated that wearing the Reebok ZPrint 3D felt like wearing a comfortable pair of socks.
A tester said that it had an adequately lightweight nature.
The vivid color scheme of this shoe made a positive impression on some runners.
Those who were picky about the performance of their running shoe were pleased about this model’s overall quality.
It fit perfectly, noted some users.
‘Comfortable’ was a word that many used to describe this running shoe.
1 reasons not to buy
A tester noted that it felt a bit narrow.
Bottom line
The Reebok ZPrint 3D was able to give quality service to many testers and reviewers. They appreciated its appealing looks, its responsive features, and its 3D-mapped platform. Many trusted this neutral shoe; one runner even planned on purchasing extra pairs."
Saucony Kinvara 10 Tie-Dye,,78.0,,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 6.7oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The Saucony Kinvara 10 Tie-Dye is a very comfortable shoe, some runners commented. 
A lot of the wearers appreciate the lacing system of the shoe because it keeps the foot secured and it does not easily unravel. 
The Kinvara 10 Tie-Dye is good for long-distance running and for other daily activities, remarked numerous reviewers. 
Some of the testers have complimented the lightweight construction of the shoe. 
Several users praise the responsiveness of this road running shoe.
The forefoot of the shoe is very roomy, several runners expressed. 
A few purchasers commend the shoe’s versatility; it has good traction on different surfaces.
2 reasons not to buy
Some testers have expressed their disappointment regarding the Saucony Kinvara 10 Tie-Dye’s lack of arch support. 
Some users have stated that there is too much padding in the forefoot which pushes the foot into the toe box which eventually causes pain. 
Bottom line
This colorful special edition shoe from Saucony has been graced with an overwhelmingly positive response from different people. The comfort that the shoe delivers is one of the highlights of the different experiences of these users. The lightweight construction of the shoe has also been a subject of appreciation as it helps the runners conserve energy. The overall construction of the shoe lives up to the promise of the Saucony Kinvara 10 Tie-Dye to deliver a smooth and energetic ride while promoting style."
Adidas Asweerun,,93.0,,10682.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 5.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
The majority of the reviewers noted that the Adidas Asweerun is a comfortable running shoe.
A significant number of testers said that the shoe is lightweight.
Based on some reviews, the footwear is stylish.
It provided a perfect fit, according to a lot of buyers.
Many consumers loved the shoe’s excellent quality.
The shoe was breathable, according to those who have tried it.
Several reviewers said that the shoe has an affordable price.
The Adidas Asweerun is best for running and walking activities, according to some of the buyers who have tried it.
2 reasons not to buy
One of the purchasers noted that the stripes on the side easily fell off after several uses only.
The shoe runs larger than the usual, according to some users.
Bottom line
The Adidas Asweerun made a lot of consumers happy because of its fantastic design, perfect fit, and quality. Although some of them encountered problems with the sizing and durability, others still recommend the shoes because of the comfort it provided during the session. In general, the Adidas Asweerun is a good option for those who are seeking for an affordable and functional running shoe."
Salomon Sense Escape,,,,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Salomon Sense Escape 2,
Mizuno Wave Prodigy,,,,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Mizuno Wave Prodigy 2,
Asics Gel FujiTrabuco 4,,91.0,81.0,283.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.7oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel FujiTrabuco 8,"7 reasons to buy
Asics uses the new Mono-Sock Fit System in the FujiTrabuco 4 to enhance the shoe’s comfort and personalized fit.
The outsole lugs in the Gel FujiTrabuco 4 are slightly larger and more aggressive than past models for improved traction on different trails and off-road surfaces.
Some testers loved its numerous trail-protection features.
It is a very comfortable shoe based on the observation of a large number of runners.
The generous toe box of the Asics FujiTrabuco 4 is a significant part of its very comfortable ride.
A good number of runners loved the way it supports the foot, particularly on uneven trail.
A few runners liked the 4 different color options as they are stylishly done.
3 reasons not to buy
Few runners mentioned that the shoe feels heavy.
It does not do very well on technical trail.
All the comfort and stability compromised the shoe’s ground feedback.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel FujiTrabuco 4 is an extremely-muscled trail shoe that adheres to the standards of traditional trail shoes. Runners will not be disappointed by its arch support and stability despite being a neutral shoe. It is a very comfortable shoe that slogs through the poundings of an everyday run."
Salomon Speedcross 3 GTX,,91.0,85.0,392.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 12oz , Women: 12oz, Men: 11mm , Women: 11mm,,, Salomon Speedcross 5 GTX,"5 reasons to buy
The GORE-TEX membrane offers waterproof protection for the foot in any weather.
Water-resistant textiles make up the rest of the upper unit of the Speedcross 3 GTX, making sure that the foot stays dry and cool even when inside the shoe.
Runners were generally receptive of all the features that were included as a means to heighten the protection of the foot.
The cushioning system keeps the foot well-supported and cradled, ensuring a responsive ride.
The outsole unit is made up of the Mud and Snow Contagrip, a durable layer that functions well even on wet surfaces.
4 reasons not to buy
The shoe break down after only a few months of use.
The outsole gripping lugs of the 3rd version of the Speedcross GTX were observed by some runners to break off easily.
Some felt that the arch needed additional support.
This is a heavy running shoe.
Bottom line
The Speedcross 3 GTX from Salomon is a well-known trail shoe that presents itself with effective systems and features that are meant for the trail runner. It has some support mechanics that keep the foot comfortable and cradled while keeping performance consistent."
Mizuno Wave Ibuki,,,,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.5oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Mizuno Wave Ibuki 2,
Topo Athletic Terraventure,,91.0,87.0,66.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 8.2oz, Men: 3mm , Women: 3mm,,, Topo Athletic Terraventure 2,"6 reasons to buy
Some runners loved the wide toe box. It allowed their toes to spread out naturally.
A lot of testers commented that the shoe was comfortable and well-cushioned.
A good number of reviewers mentioned that the Topo Athletic Terravneture was versatile, durable and responsive.
A few runners were impressed with the traction on a variety of terrain.
According to some consumers, the lacing system of this running shoe was amazing. They never adjusted the lace during their running activities.
According to some buyers, it was reasonably priced.
3 reasons not to buy
A small number of reviewers said that the tightly-spaced lugs on the outsole struggled to shed mud.
A few testers wished there were other color options for them to choose from.
A runner said that the mesh upper was not able to provide warmth in cold temperatures.
Bottom line
A lot of runners agreed that the Topo Athletic Terraventure was marketed as a shoe for rugged running activities. They were impressed with the good amount of traction the shoe provided in different types of terrains. Although some reviewers were not contented with the tightly-spaced lugs in the outsole, others still recommended this shoe because of its responsiveness, durability, and versatility. Other runners also wished for more color scheme options."
Salomon Wings Flyte 2,,91.0,84.0,182.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Some runners were able to wear the Salomon Wings Flyte 2 for longer periods of time and they wrote that they remained comfortable.
The Quicklace™ System gained some fans because it allowed them to easily adjust the fit.
It looked visually appealing, according to many of those who have tried it.
The underfoot cushioning system worked well, based on the comments posted by consumers.
Many purchasers didn’t worry about mud because this shoe prevented it from lodging or clinging onto its façade.
There were runners who were able to use it on hard concrete and they wrote that it didn’t feel awkward or out-of-place; for them, it still functioned well.
The outsole gripping lugs received praise because they held onto the different types of terrain with ease and sureness.
Generally, the durability of the Wings Flyte 2 was lauded; for runners, it lasted a long time.
4 reasons not to buy
The speed-lacing system broke on a tester after only five weeks of use.
The underfoot platform and the forefoot section of the upper unit felt stiff, a runner commented.
A runner complained that after only 4 weeks of use, the heel cup had already come apart.
The outsole unit’s gripping lugs wore off quickly for a number of consumers.
Bottom line
The Salomon Wings Flyte 2 neutral trail shoe was generally well-received by those who have tried it. They wrote that they were able to perform well on the trails while wearing this model. They felt that it was efficient and that it didn’t short-change them in terms of functionality. A few felt that it was a bit small in size and width, and there were those who experienced some discrepancies in terms of the lifespan."
Nike Air Zoom Streak 5,,82.0,90.0,38.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.7oz , Women: 6.5oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Nike Air Zoom Streak 7,"6 reasons to buy
It features a double-layer midfoot and forefoot mesh for additional comfort.
According to some reviews, the Air Zoom Streak 5 has impressive ventilation attributes.
The seamless toe construction prevents irritation and promotes stitch-free comfort.
The Streak 5 has a blown rubber waffle outsole for a firmer cushioning, traction and durability.
The mono mesh tongue of the Nike Air Zoom Streak 5 gives additional shoe ventilation.
Reasonably-priced shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners mentioned that the glued-insoles need improvement.
Stones enter the shoe while running, according to some testers.
Bottom line
The Nike Air Zoom Streak 5 offers a well-ventilated and comfortable ride. It has enough support and cushioning needed for short and long-distance runs. It is a lightweight neutral road running shoe that will not disappoint on a race day. Based on reviews, the Streak 5 has indeed proven to be a successful release."
New Balance 590 v5,,74.0,,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.6oz , Women: 6.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Oct 2016,,,"9 reasons to buy
The plush interior and soft fabric give the 5th version of the New Balance 590 a very comfortable feel.
It is very affordable.
It is quite light.
The cushioning handles impact well, according to some runners.
Several reviewers loved its stylish looks.
It comes in 5 different color combinations.
The traction makes it a good option, even on light trails, based on the comments of a few runners.
More than a handful have used it for everyday wear.
Shoe breathability is excellent, based on the comments of a small number of reviewers.
4 reasons not to buy
A handful reported that the exposed midsole in the midfoot showed wear and tear quickly.
It is a bit smaller, according to a few comments.
A moderate number of runners mentioned that the 590 v5 is too narrow all over.
Durability shouldn’t be this bad, even for a very affordable shoe, lamented a few disgruntled buyers.
Bottom line
New Balance comes up with a superb mix of style and performance in the 590 v5. The shoe can handle almost any distance or speed with ease. With superior comfort, great traction, decent arch support, and an unbeatable price tag, the shoe promises to be one entry-level and elite runners should seriously consider."
Adidas Supernova Glide Boost 7,,95.0,88.0,486.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 9.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The engineered mesh material used in the upper of the Adidas Supernova Glide Boost 7 provides breathable and non-irritating coverage.
Synthetic overlays add more structure to the upper unit, while also helping the fabric in wrapping the foot securely.
The forefoot area benefits from the mild protection given by a fused toe bumper.
Runners appreciated the inclusion of the boost™ technology, which cushioned and propelled their feet responsibly.
The TORSION® SYSTEM is a mid-foot support mechanism that encourages natural foot movement.
The testers welcomed the Continental™ Rubber technology, which gave them traction over many types of surfaces and surface conditions.
2 reasons not to buy
This shoe has a moderately heavy weight, which was noticed by some runners.
Its price is slightly expensive.
Bottom line
The Adidas Supernova Glide Boost 7 makes running comfortable and effortless. The systems that make this neutral running shoe possible all work together to make the running experience of the wearer as enticing and enabling. It looks great as a casual running shoe and as a sports companion."
Reebok Floatride Run ULTK,,77.0,74.0,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Many testers of the Reebok Floatride Run ULTK are happy with the comfort that it gives them.
The transitions of the step when tackling the roads are hailed as precise and accommodating.
Several consumers have noticed the modern aesthetics of this running shoe, stating that the design and color schemes are visually appealing.
The lightweight configuration of this product has garnered positive remarks from those who like footwear that doesn’t drag them down.
A lot of runners welcome the breathable aspect of the upper unit.
The toe box is deemed roomy enough to accommodate the natural splaying of the toes.
The versatility of the construction is praised by people who welcome a shoe that is able to handle athletics and casual strolls.
2 reasons not to buy
Several consumers claim that the underfoot experience isn’t as supportive as they would’ve liked.
The collar of this shoe rubbed against the skin below the ankles irritatingly, according to a few testers.
Bottom line
All-in-all, the feedback for the Reebok Floatride Run ULTK has been positive. The people who have purchased this model are generally happy with what it has to offer. The flexible midsole, the arresting visuals, the lightness of the build, and the breathable upper are examples of what makes this shoe appealing to most runners. The lack of arch support and the irritating collar make up the areas that need improvement.
Fans of Reebok running shoes that are for neutral foot pronation are the ones who are likely to enjoy the Floatride Run ULTK."
Under Armour HOVR Sonic 3,,90.0,91.0,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
A lot of runners appreciated the Under Armour HOVR Sonic 3’s overall quality. 
This running shoe is comfortable to wear, based on reviews. 
Several users mentioned that this shoe is highly durable. 
One commenter noted that it is suitable for both hot and cold conditions. 
The shoe offers just the right amount of support, some buyers claimed. 
The shoe’s performance tracking feature was praised by a lot of satisfied wearers. 
A few purchasers appreciated this shoe’s lightweight structure. 
This running partner is flexible, according to some reviewers.
4 reasons not to buy
Some runners felt that the Under Armour HOVR Sonic 3 is a bit tight. 
One user noted that the sweat stains are visible on the upper. 
It is a bit expensive compared to other running shoes, according to a buyer.
A couple of testers experience tracking issues with the MapMyRun app. 
Bottom line
The Under Armour HOVR Sonic 3 is packed with advanced technologies helping the user become a better runner. It is designed to provide a light and well-protected ride, making the platform perfect for long-distance runs. This neutral running shoe is suitable for runners who are looking for cushioning, flexibility, and versatility. 
 "
Reebok Harmony Road 3.5,,83.0,,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 9.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Several people are happy because the underfoot cushioning system of the Reebok Harmony Road 3.5 is comfortable.
Some users have deemed this model as a suitably lightweight running shoe for all-day use.
According to some testers, this product is versatile enough to handle gym workouts and casual strolls.
Most comments have highlighted the steadiness given by the underfoot platform.
Breathability is a trait of the upper unit that has been noted by those who desire a cool and dry in-shoe experience.
2 reasons not to buy
A few consumers believe that the midsole unit has a tendency to sag after a few weeks of constant use.
A couple of runners claim that the front part of the upper is quick to lose durability.
Bottom line
The Reebok Harmony Road 3.5 is performance footwear that is meant for those who want a versatile partner on the roads. It has a sporty look that aims to be a compelling element when observed. But functionality is still a big part of its construction as it has a platform that delivers steadiness and an upper that brings breathability. Anyone can use this shoe and enjoy it for any activity."
Salomon Spikecross 5 GTX,,74.0,,6.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 12.9oz , Women: 12.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The majority of the users said that the Salomon Spikecross 5 GTX is comfortable.
Based on the reviews, the running footwear is breathable.
It is durable, according to those who have tried it.
Several consumers loved the traction it provides on wet and dry surfaces.
Most of the buyers admired the high-quality materials used in crafting the shoe.
One of the testers noted that the footwear provides good arch support.
Some of the buyers commented that the Salomon Spikecross 5 GTX is best used for trail running and hiking.
2 reasons not to buy
The shoe is expensive, according to those who have bought it.
Based on a review, the Spikecross 5 GTX has a sloppy toe box.
Bottom line
Based on positive feedback, the Salomon Spikecross 5 GTX is definitely a well-favored and admired running shoe. 
This trail running partner excellently performed in different activities, as evident in the reviews. Overall, breathability, comfort level, and durability of the shoe received attention and praise.  Despite issues on the price and toe box, this running shoe is still lauded by the majority of the consumers. "
Adidas Climacool Ride,,69.0,72.0,9.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.2oz , Women: 7.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The CC Ride stays true to the Climacool aim of providing 360 degrees of ventilation.
The Adidas Ride is very flexible.
It runs so much lighter than its weight shows, as noted by several runners.
The cushioning is sufficient to absorb shock and to provide underfoot protection for long runs.
Some runners find the Climacool Ride as ideal for cruising along or for going on a fast-paced clip.
A few testers recommend the shoe as exceptional for a more natural running style.
A snug upper hugs the foot really well, according to a small number of runners.
2 reasons not to buy
A sizeable number of runners found the fit as too narrow.
The Adidas CC Ride is a bit expensive.
Bottom line
The Adidas Climacool Ride, just like the popular Adidas Ultraboost 19 is an exceptionally versatile neutral running shoe. It has the makings of a race day shoe, but delivers enough underfoot protection and arch support for rigorous poundings during everyday training. While the sole is a bit firm, which is ideal for racing, it is also slightly forgiving for those high-mileage sessions."
New Balance Hanzo S v2,,,,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6oz , Women: 5.1oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,
Mizuno Wave Prodigy,,,,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Mizuno Wave Prodigy 2,
Saucony Hurricane ISO 3,,85.0,86.0,201.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Saucony Hurricane ISO 5,"6 reasons to buy
Many runners felt that the 3rd version of the Hurricane ISO from Saucony had an overall better performance than its predecessors.
The color schemes for this running shoe gained some fans; they welcomed its vibrant hues and shades.
The upper fabrics were comfortable to the skin, commented several consumers.
Those who needed additional support appreciated the stability mechanics present in this shoe.
A reviewer observed that there was a bit more cushioning in the forefoot area compared to version 2 of the Hurricane ISO, and he welcomed it.
The outsole unit’s grip capability was lauded by those who have tested it.
3 reasons not to buy
A number of consumers felt that this shoe’s price was expensive.
A tester wrote that though the underfoot foam looked bulky, it wasn’t able to give a springy and responsive ride.
The bottom part of the sole unit came apart after a few uses, a runner reported.
Bottom line
Most of those who have tried the Saucony Hurricane ISO 3 were positive about its features and what it had to offer in general. Some even thought that its performance was relatively better than the previous ones in the series. But there were others who complained about several of its components, stating that they were not as efficient as expected. Still, the majority of the testers believed that it’s a solid option for those with overpronated foot motion."
The North Face Ultra TR III,,80.0,90.0,7.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The shoe provided a locked-down and solid fit, a commenter wrote.
The cushioning was ample in the areas that needed it most, according to a reviewer.
The Ultra TR III was lighter and softer compared to other trail running shoes, stated a runner.
One user said that the FastFoam™ midsole felt “springy and cushiony.” Another mentioned it was plush yet responsive.
A wearer was pleased that the upper was lightweight and supple.
The outsole offered both grip on trails and ground contact on roads, making the Ultra TR III versatile shoe, a user claimed.
The shoe excelled in mountain trail running, including a snow-covered glacier pass, a runner experienced.
2 reasons not to buy
One user was dismayed with the shoe’s performance on muddy ground.
Some runners described the tongue as paper-thin, with its minimal padding that did not allow enough protection. Others said that it “looked and felt weird.”
Bottom line
The North Face Ultra TR III was a consumer favorite, as proven through the praises it obtained regarding fit, cushioning, and weight. Few criticisms were relayed towards design elements, but these were not significant to the shoe’s overall account. With how users described its performance and efficiency, the Ultra TR III has shown that it was a worthy investment and a pleasant running gear."
Saucony Mirage 4,,89.0,84.0,469.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The shoe has great cushioning according to some reviews.
The upper is light and breathable.
The shoe provides a good and comfortable fit.
Many runners mentioned that the Mirage 4 is a fast shoe perfect for competition.
Available in different color options.
3 reasons not to buy
The shoe is heavier than the previous version.
Some runners noticed that the outer materials of the shoe wear off quickly.
It was also noted in some reviews that the shoe is a lot stiffer than the usual.
Bottom line
The Saucony Mirage 4 is a road running shoe that is designed for neutral foot movement. It is light and fast perfect for high mileage runs and competition."
Reebok Jet Dashride 6.0, Reebok,84.0,,121.0,$80,$45 (save 44%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
A good number of purchasers observed that the shoe was comfortable to wear.
Several testers admired its perfect fit.
The shoe has a well-constructed upper, according to a lot of reviewers.
Based on observations, the shoe looked great.
The majority of the runners noted that the Reebok Jet Dashride 6.0 has an affordable price.
Several buyers noted that the shoe has excellent cushioning.
3 reasons not to buy
A handful of testers said that the shoe has poor quality.
A lot of reviewers commented that the Reebok Jet Dashride 6.0's sole was not durable.
One of the users felt a little pain in the leg area after several hours of walking and standing.
Bottom line
The Reebok Jet Dashride 6.0 has made many users satisfied and happy because of its excellent cushioning and impressive fit. Aside from its structure, the shoe also offers the right amount of comfort that the runner needed in every activity. While others have issues with its durability and quality, others still recommend the shoe because of its fantastic performance and well-constructed upper. Overall, the Reebok Jet Dashride 6.0 is an excellent option for those who are seeking a comfortable, visually-appealing yet affordable running shoe."
Nike Free RN 2017 Shield,,90.0,76.0,538.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 6.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Nike Free RN 5.0 Shield,"6 reasons to buy
Several people appreciated the durability of the Nike Free RN 2017 Shield.
The color options made the product more visually appealing, according to a few testers.
The traction capacity of the outsole was lauded for being agreeable and efficient.
The cushioning system proved to be comfortable and responsive, most purchasers noted.
Many users are pleased that the shoe is lightweight.
Numerous purchasers agree that the Free RN 2017 Shield is versatile and could be worn for activities other than running.
3 reasons not to buy
A couple of users observed static buildup from the shoe, which made it uncomfortable to wear.
The sole unit started to wear out after only a few months, according to some buyers.
Various wearers claimed the shoe gave them blisters.
Bottom line
The Nike Free RN 2017 Shield proved to be an agreeable shoe, according to most testers. They appreciated its comfortable design, its durable components, and its responsive underfoot experience. But several people warned of discomfort and quick wear-out."
Nike Dual Fusion Trail 2, Nike,90.0,,103.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
The softly-padded interior makes trail-running enjoyable and comfortable in the 2nd version of the Dual Fusion Trail.
It is very affordable.
Some runners loved its lightweight ride.
A good number appreciated the smooth ride of the Dual Fusion Trail 2.
It is very breathable, as remarked by several.
There were more than a few who got compliments because of how the shoe looks.
Ground feedback was felt by a few.
Arch support is very good, based on quite a number of users.
2 reasons not to buy
It felt a big snug for a handful.
The traction on wet areas left something to be desired, according to some runners.
Bottom line
The 2nd iteration of the Dual Fusion Trail is a versatile and lightweight trail runner that can do quick runs or high-mileage sessions. Designed mostly for light to moderate trail on dry conditions, the shoe breathes extremely well, moves smoothly, provides good ground perception, and with the style to turn heads. Above all, the price is unbeatable for a do-it-all trail companion."
Puma Ignite Dual,,90.0,82.0,265.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Many runners noticed how light and flexible the Puma Ignite Dual is.
According to some users, the shoe is very comfortable to wear.
The upper is breathable enough to keep the foot well-ventilated, based on some reviews.
A number of reviews mentioned that the shoe provides great value for money considering the quality, design and features of the shoe.
Style and designed were highlighted by some users.
Few runners took note of the soft and comfortable cushioning of the Ignite Dual.
1 reasons not to buy
Based on few comments, the shoe is too narrow.
Bottom line
The Puma Ignite Dual is a lightweight road running shoe. It delivers a good blend flexibility, cushioning and powerful rebound. The speed and light nature of the shoe made it ideal for uptempo training and long distance road running. This shoe is ideal for those who are looking for an affordable yet reliable road running companion."
Mizuno Wave Rider 20 GTX,,90.0,85.0,25.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,, Apr 2017,, Mizuno Wave Rider GTX,"7 reasons to buy
Several testers appreciated the colorful design of the Mizuno Wave Rider 20 GTX.
The upper and mid-sole components were lauded by some consumers for being comfortable.
The toe box was roomy enough to welcome the natural spreading of the toes, noted a reviewer.
The heel collar gained some fans for its ability to keep the foot in place.
The waterproof Gore-Tex® membrane was appreciated by many because it remained breathable even as it staved off the water.
Runners relayed that the grip capability of the outsole unit was dependable.
The overall performance of the Rider 20 GTX received positive recognition from shoe enthusiasts.
3 reasons not to buy
There’s an extra piece of fabric in the tongue area that rubbed uncomfortably against the skin of a tester.
The water refused to drain out of the shoe whenever it entered the foot-chamber, a disgruntled purchaser complained.
The upper unit felt bulky, a consumer observed.
Bottom line
The Mizuno Wave Rider 20 GTX was loved by many for being a neutral running shoe that’s great for the rainy season or for generally wet conditions. They were mostly impressed with the inclusion of the waterproof Gore-Tex® membrane, which staved off water efficiently. They also lauded its efficiency as a shoe for active lifestyles. Conversely, there were complaints about some of its features, which apparently caused some grievances."
Salomon Sense Pulse,,86.0,,69.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.7oz , Women: 10.7oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Some heel strikers took note of the generous cushioning of the Sense Pulse.
Open mesh upper features breathability and quick drying trait.
Most runners applauded the easy one pull lacing system of the Salomon Sense Pulse.
This shoe offers impressive traction while running on varied terrains as mentioned in some reviews.
This shoe features Sensifit overlays for a closer and secure fit.
Some runners took note of the improved ground feel and comfort that the Salomon SensePulse offers.
3 reasons not to buy
The Sense Pulse is a moderately high-priced shoe.
Some runners noticed that this shoe is a bit heavy.
As noted on some reviews, the anti-debris protection needs improvement.
Bottom line
The Salomon Sense Pulse is a neutral running shoe that offers generous cushioning. It is ideal for heel strikers and performs well on both road and off-road runs."
Asics Gel Sonoma 4 GTX,,81.0,,253.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 12oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Sonoma 3 GTX,"10 reasons to buy
Many consumers are happy about Asics Gel Sonoma 4 GTX’s stylish design and color scheme. 
This Asics trail running shoe is very supportive and comfortable, according to many testers. 
Several buyers appreciated this running gear’s durability and lightweight construction. 
This waterproof running shoe is perfect for trail running. It also looks fashionable enough to be used for work and casual walks, some people mentioned. 
This shoe has better gripping ability and traction on wet surfaces compared to other Sonoma versions, explained a reviewer. 
The quality of the components was not overshadowed by the price, several purchasers noted. 
A buyer, who had issues with overpronation and osteoarthritis, testified that Asics Gel Sonoma 4 GTX has given him the most stable walk he had in ages. 
The shoe's amazing ability to keep the user’s foot dry and comfortable in rainy weather was praised by many runners.
A consumer, who has a narrow foot, was very happy about this running companion’s perfect fit. 
Asics Gel Sonoma 4 GTX is easy to clean, and mud washes off easily, according to several commenters.
2 reasons not to buy
One tester mentioned that it feels like the shoe has a plastic bag inside of it as it makes an audible crinkling sound when walking or running, which makes the shoe uncomfortable to wear. 
A few of those who have purchased the Asics Gel Sonoma 4 GTX expressed how narrow the shoe felt. 
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Sonoma 4 GTX trail running shoe was welcomed by many shoe enthusiasts and runners. They lauded the affordability, durability, and lightweight nature of the shoe. Although a few users were disappointed with the uncomfortable fit and the weird popping noise that it makes while walking, others still recommended this running shoe for its improved cushioning system and gripping ability."
Nike Air Max Excellerate 4,,86.0,85.0,221.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.9oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Many testers thought that the Nike Air Max Excellerate 4 was visually appealing, with its color schemes and modern design.
There was a runner who noted that the price was better than he thought because the shoe he got for it was very comfortable and stylish.
The mid-sole wasn’t too spongy; nor was it too hard, which was great for a lot of runners.
There were those who noticed that the mid-sole was able to retain its durable nature, even after many uses.
The Air Max unit in the heel was able to cushion the foot of runners well and many of them loved it.
The upper unit felt good on the feet, as observed by a tester.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners noted that the Nike Air Max Excellerate 4 was initially stiff and that it needed a couple of runs to break in, which left them uneasy at first.
A few users thought that this shoe looked bulky, which tended to mar their running performance.
A runner complained that the rubber/latex logo caused pinching and blistering on the top of his small toe.
Bottom line
Comfort and protection are just some of the features offered by the Nike Air Max Excellerate 4. Many runners welcomed its appealing design, durable & comfortable cushioning, and its reliable service. Some warned that it required a breaking-in period because it was stiff at first, but it didn’t stop them from appreciating this neutral shoe in the end."
Asics Gel FujiLyte,,82.0,86.0,74.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 6.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Some testers like the lightweight construction of the Asics Gel FujiLyte.
Many reviewers mentioned that this shoe is comfortable to wear.
Many runners considered this as a fast shoe.
The shoe is very breathable according to some reviews.
Provides protection against stone bruising.
2 reasons not to buy
This is an expensive shoe.
Many mentioned that the sole wears out quickly.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel FujiLyte is a lightweight and fast trail running shoe that is equipped with the necessary technologies designed for effective trail running. It delivers a combination of comfort, speed and cushioning. This is ideal for speed training and long-distant runs."
New Balance Fresh Foam Lazr Hyposkin,,89.0,88.0,62.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 8.2oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Many people were happy with the fashionable design of the New Balance Fresh Foam Lazr Hyposkin.
The interior of this shoe was appreciated for providing a smooth and sock-like fit.
Some consumers welcomed the midsole foam because it gave a comfortable underfoot experience.
Most of those who have tested it felt that it was true to size.
The breathability of the upper unit gained positive remarks.
1 reasons not to buy
Some people were taken aback that the colorway of the actual product was different from what’s advertised in websites’ photos.
Bottom line
The New Balance Fresh Foam Lazr Hyposkin was welcomed as one of the contemporary shoes that’s good for running and casual walks. They felt that it was a comfortable option for their daily activities. It’s also worthy to note that the breathable upper and the regular sizing scheme worked well. The caveat is that the color options didn’t match the ones in the online photographs."
Brooks Vapor 3,,94.0,93.0,69.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.4oz , Women: 9.9oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The shoe’s upper is breathable enough and the overall construction is very comfortable.
It has conformable saddle with adaptable eyelets that wraps the midfoot for a more secure fit.
The Brooks Vapor 3 has segmented crash pad for a smoother heel-to-toe transition.
The BioMoGo DNA offers a custom mid-sole that conforms to the exact shape of the wearer’s foot.
Some runners were impressed by the shoe’s Progressive Diagonal Rollbar, which guides the foot to a more neutral position.
The Flextra Technology encourages better toe-offs and enhances flexibility.
3 reasons not to buy
The 3rd version of the Brooks Vapor has a moderately heavy weight.
There were issues with the outsole unit because the protective rubber came apart after a few months.
The design and color schemes used in this shoe are limited and unappealing.
Bottom line
The Brooks Vapor 3 is a road running shoe that offers a combination of smooth performance and protective comfort. The technologies used in this stability shoe made it reliable for regular and up-tempo training. Generally, runners liked the comfortable construction of this shoe."
Saucony Breakthru 2,,94.0,84.0,86.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.5oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Saucony Breakthru 4,"8 reasons to buy
Its responsive low-type of cushioning is admired greatly by many neutral runners who already tested it.
Its outsole is still amazing for many runners who love the softer IBR and XT-900 carbon rubber.
It is light enough for tempo runs.
Many runners find it stiffer, offering a firmer and more responsive ride.
Stability is enhanced with the POWERGRID to distribute and reduce impact.
There is no bulky overlay observed with the Breakthru 2’s new FlexFilm over the toe box.
Stylish use of the reflective material is an attractive design for many testers.
The price is affordable.
2 reasons not to buy
Some testers find messy stitching on top of the sole when the insole is pulled up.
Durability is not reliable as the FlexFilm wears out easily, making it ideal only for training and other routines.
Bottom line
The Saucony Breakthru 2 is a versatile shoe that was built using high quality technologies. Its construction allows for an easy transition from softer running shoes to much firmer ones with its firm yet responsive midsole. Most of the materials and construction are pretty similar to its previous version, with a slight change in the upper. It is an affordable shoe for running but it a worthwhile choice."
Mizuno WaveKnit R1,,,94.0,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Mizuno WaveKnit R2,
New Balance Fresh Foam 1080 v6,,89.0,80.0,416.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 8.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, New Balance Fresh Foam 1080 v10,"8 reasons to buy
A runner noted that the New Balance 1080 v6 kept their feet comfortable, even when they were using it all day.
The upper fabrics gained praise for its capability to wrap around the contours of the foot snugly and securely.
Several runners commented that the toe box was roomy enough to accommodate the natural splaying of the toes.
Its weight profile was welcomed by many because it felt agreeably light to them.
The underfoot experience felt responsive and springy to a lot of testers.
Even after many uses, the mid-sole unit of this model actually stayed efficient and robust for many of those who tried it.
Traction was reliable, according to users.
A reviewer stated that even though the New Balance 1080 v6 was expensive, its efficient components and features made it a great investment.
3 reasons not to buy
A runner observed that the instep had rough edges that cut through socks and caused some blistering.
The stitched overlays were too hard, according to several testers; they actually wrote that these add-ons caused the mesh to rub uncomfortably against the skin.
This model felt a little too tight for a few reviewers.
Bottom line
The 6th version of the New Balance 1080 was able to provide a great number of neutral runners with quality service and performance. They felt secure and comfortable when they wore it. Some of them even used this road shoe for long periods of time and they didn’t report any issues. But such wasn’t the case for some testers. For them, it was too narrow and some of its components rubbed uncomfortably against their feet."
Asics Gel Exalt 3,,89.0,,441.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Exalt 4,"6 reasons to buy
This shoe is very comfortable to wear as mentioned in some reviews.
It comes with a wider toe box that made some runners happy.
The Asics Gel Exalt 3 features the Duomax Support System that enhanced its stability and support.
It has rearfoot gel cushioning for a smooth transition.
The Gel Exalt 3 is durable, said some testers.
An affordable running shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
Available in limited color options.
Some runners felt that this shoe lacks the technology needed for high mileage running.
Bottom line
Expect durability, cushioning and comfort with the Asics Gel Exalt 3. This shoe is best for road running but not reliable when it comes to long distance runs. The 3rd version is still durable, with enhanced stability and support. The shoe is ideal for those overpronators who are looking for an affordable yet reliable road companion."
Asics 33-FA,,87.0,80.0,487.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The 33-FA features a lightweight open mesh, which is highly breathable.
The Amplifoam of the shoe provides consistent and uniform cushioning that’s great for those who desire a more responsive platform.
Most runners applauded the overall construction, cushioning and fit of the Asics 33-FA.
The ComforDry Sock Liner delivers anti-microbial features, moisture protection and added cushioning.
Some runners took note of the durable features of the shoe.
The FluidAxis grooves in the sole unit encourage natural freedom of motion.
The 33-FA has an affordable price.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners noted that the outsole grip needs improvement.
The shoe was a bit narrow in the midfoot area for some runners.
Bottom line
If you are looking for a shoe that offers comfort and a stable ride, this shoe is perfect for you. The Asics 33-FA is a neutral running shoe that performs well on the roads. This is great for daily training and other athletic activities."
Saucony Seeker,,89.0,,56.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 7.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The lightweight mesh material used in the upper of the Saucony Seeker is breathable and comfortable to the skin.
The overlay system has been hot-melted onto the upper, turning it into a single unit that’s free from unnecessary layers, excess stitching and added weight.
Cushioning for the dimensions of the foot is given by the padded tongue and collar.
Runners welcomed the inclusion of a comfortable sock liner, which offers contoured support for the individual wearing the shoe.
Shock attenuation and responsible underfoot cushioning are given by the high-quality mid-sole foam units.
The XT-600 rubber is appreciated by many because it provided long lasting protection against wear and tear, as well as traction over the asphalt.
1 reasons not to buy
There were complaints that the Saucony Seeker looks somewhat bulky, which went in contrast to its lightweight nature.
Bottom line
The Saucony Seeker is gaining ground as a go-to shoe for those who want to have lightweight and comfortable performance on the roads. It’s designed for neutral runners who want to have a great shoe for their athletic activities, but it’s also efficient when it comes to casual purposes."
Adidas Ultraboost X 3D, Adidas,77.0,,8.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Many users agreed that the  Adidas Ultraboost X 3D is comfortable. 
Consumers loved the stylish design and fit of this shoe. 
This running shoe is lightweight, according to several buyers. 
The Adidas Ultraboost X 3D is flexible and responsive, based on some reviews. 
A few testers noted that the shoe is perfect for running and casual walks. 
Some people said that the upper hugs the foot without restricting natural foot movements.
Numerous runners testified that the shoe was supportive. 
3 reasons not to buy
Some purchasers mentioned that the forefoot area of this shoe is a bit narrow. 
A wearer noted that the shoe makes a lot of noise while running. 
The arch support band causes pain, said a commenter. 
Bottom line
The prevailing impression of the consumers confirms the quality of performance of the Adidas Ultraboost X 3D. This neutral running shoe features the Adidas’ latest technologies and materials that help enhance the speed. Despite the criticisms received from some dissatisfied users, many still recommended the shoe for the responsive cushioning and support that it provides. "
Saucony Kinvara 10 Tie-Dye,,78.0,,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 6.7oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The Saucony Kinvara 10 Tie-Dye is a very comfortable shoe, some runners commented. 
A lot of the wearers appreciate the lacing system of the shoe because it keeps the foot secured and it does not easily unravel. 
The Kinvara 10 Tie-Dye is good for long-distance running and for other daily activities, remarked numerous reviewers. 
Some of the testers have complimented the lightweight construction of the shoe. 
Several users praise the responsiveness of this road running shoe.
The forefoot of the shoe is very roomy, several runners expressed. 
A few purchasers commend the shoe’s versatility; it has good traction on different surfaces.
2 reasons not to buy
Some testers have expressed their disappointment regarding the Saucony Kinvara 10 Tie-Dye’s lack of arch support. 
Some users have stated that there is too much padding in the forefoot which pushes the foot into the toe box which eventually causes pain. 
Bottom line
This colorful special edition shoe from Saucony has been graced with an overwhelmingly positive response from different people. The comfort that the shoe delivers is one of the highlights of the different experiences of these users. The lightweight construction of the shoe has also been a subject of appreciation as it helps the runners conserve energy. The overall construction of the shoe lives up to the promise of the Saucony Kinvara 10 Tie-Dye to deliver a smooth and energetic ride while promoting style."
The North Face Ultra Endurance XF Futurelight,,,,,,, Trail, Neutral,,, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,
Nike Free RN 2018 Sun,,90.0,,901.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Several consumers welcomed the flexible configuration of the Nike Free RN 2018 Sun; they stated that it allowed the natural bending capacity of the foot.
The underfoot platform was deemed comfortable by most testers.
A few consumers noted that the reflective details on this running shoe were helpful in maintaining visibility at night.
A runner claimed that the upper fabrics were stretchy enough to accommodate a larger foot-shape.
The versatility of this product was lauded by those who have tried it; they stated that it worked well during short running sessions and gym exercises.
1 reasons not to buy
The interior of this running shoe felt a bit warm to the foot, according to some consumers.
Bottom line
The Nike Free RN 2018 Sun gained mostly positive reviews from those who have purchased it. They liked its flexible and comfortable underfoot platform, its reflective accents, and its versatile design. For them, it’s a reliable option for the roads. On the other hand, some people complained of a heat-retaining upper unit that hindered the quality of the in-shoe experience."
Asics Gel FujiRacer 3,,84.0,84.0,52.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.7oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
The FujiRacer 3 is a light shoe.
Reviewers noted that the shoe has ample support despite being lightweight.
A majority of runners nodded in approval to the Gel FujiRacer 3’s exceptional traction.
The low profile design allows freedom and flexibility of movement.
Most runners valued the ideal ground feedback delivered by this shoe.
Good price considering its performance and quality as noted by several users.
Most users were impressed by the comfort of the Gel FujiRacer 3.
More than sufficient trail-specific protection features.
2 reasons not to buy
The sizing runs a bit small.
The Asics FujiRacer 3’s 8mm heel offset is not the best feature for those who are looking for transition shoes with lower drops.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel FujiRacer 3 is so good that runners find it very hard to find a knock against this shoe. It works as designed and performs so much more than its price tag. Neutral runners on the trail will get the ideal arch support out of this shoe."
Under Armour SpeedForm Fortis Twist,,84.0,92.0,10.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"10 reasons to buy
Most reviewers found the SpeedForm Fortis Twist to be very comfortable.
It is very light.
The ArmourVent upper provides excellent breathable coverage.
The 360° of reflectivity make this a great option for low-visibility running.
Several runners have used it for casual wear with or without jeans.
A handful loved the way the soft cushioning felt.
Some runners consider the price to be worth the shoe’s performance and style.
A good number of reviews mentioned how cool the shoe looks.
Under Armour designed the shoe for gym workouts as well.
The shoe is remarkably durable, based on the reviews of more than a few runners.
3 reasons not to buy
A handful of runners experienced irritation or blisters in their ankles.
The upper lacks any sort of structure, according to some users.
It runs a bit small.
Bottom line
Under Armour brings a new Twist in the SpeedForm Fortis by providing a fabric-like upper that is very breathable and supremely comfortable. The shoe has enough arch support for almost any kinds of runs at a fast or moderate clip. It is a rather versatile shoe as it is designed not just for miles on the road, but also for the pressures and necessities of gym workouts. The shoe matches style and performance at quite the reasonable price."
Reebok Instalite Lux, Reebok,90.0,,92.0,$60,$32 (save 47%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
One of the users commented that the Reebok Instalite Lux feels lightweight.
The running shoe was durable, according to a purchaser.
A reviewer said that the shoe has an excellent design.
According to some comments, the Instalite Lux also works well on long walks, and gym workouts.
Most buyers lauded the shoe’s excellent quality.
3 reasons not to buy
The Reebok Instalite Lux runs small.
According to a user, the width of the shoe was too wide.
Based on a review, the shoe was not supportive.
Bottom line
The majority of the purchasers were satisfied and contented with the Reebok Instalite Lux' design and durability. Aside from its excellent structure, they admired its performance on long, and short-distance walks and runs. Although some of the buyers had an issue with its length and width, others still lauded the shoe because of its lightweight construction. Overall, the Reebok Instalite Lux was accepted by many because of its design, affordable price, and fantastic performance."
Asics Gel Quantum 360 Shift,,83.0,,1492.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.6oz , Women: 10oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The Asics Gel Quantum 360 Shift is a comfortable running shoe for all-day use, stated several consumers.
This shoe looked beautiful, some testers commented.
A good number of people claimed that durability is high in this shoe.
According to a majority of purchasers, the cushioning system was efficient and responsive.
The sizing schemes gained praise for being true to the expectations of runners.
The testers appreciated the upper unit for not causing any skin irritation during the running session.
1 reasons not to buy
A few testers thought that the Asics Gel Quantum 360 Shift was a bit narrow for their feet.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Quantum 360 Shift is a road running shoe designed for runners with a neutral foot mechanism. The general feedback for the shoe was positive. Many runners welcomed this shoe’s comfortable underfoot platform, it’s appealing design and its apparently durable construction. Only a few people had gripes with it."
Saucony Nomad TR, Saucony,83.0,82.0,206.0,$110,$75 (save 88%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Most runners took note of how lightweight the Nomad TR is as compared to other trail running shoes.
A significant number of runners applauded the cushioning and flexibility of this shoe.
The inner material of the Saucony Nomad TR is very smooth and comfortable as mentioned in some reviews.
This shoe features a PWRTRAC outsole for excellent traction and durability.
It comes with an oblique toe shape for exceptional fit.
3 reasons not to buy
As some reviews mentioned, the shoe is not breathable enough especially when used in warm condition.
The width of the Nomad TR runs wide, which is not impressive to narrow-footed runners.
Some runners felt that toe protection needs improvement for rocky surfaces.
Bottom line
The Saucony Nomad TR is a neutral running shoe that performs well on short trail running. It has a firm cushioning and impressive grip. It is praised by some runners for being comfortable, lightweight and durable. Though it also gained negative comments, overall, the shoe is still impressive. "
Nike Quest 2 SE, Nike,85.0,,5.0,$75,$50 (save 33%), Road,, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"8 reasons to buy
Some users agree that the Nike Quest 2 SE is light enough for all-day use.
‘Comfortable’ is a word that people have used to describe their time wearing this road running shoe.
The aesthetics and color schemes of this model are welcomed by a number of wearers.
Several individuals claim that the underfoot cushioning is able to offer a suitably cushioned ride.
The soft underfoot experience is pleasant during casual strolls, according to some.
Most people have stated that the price of the Quest 2 SE is affordable.
The traction given by this product’s outsole unit is appreciated by those who desire precise movements and sure grip on the asphalt.
The general flexibility of this shoe is liked by purchasers.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people have reported that the midsole unit is unable to sustain effective cushioning during extended running sessions.
Some users have observed the shoelaces losing tautness and fiber after merely several uses.
Bottom line
Nike aims to deliver an agreeable performance on the roads with the Quest 2 SE, with its lightweight and flexible build complementing its affordability and accessibility. The versatile visual design also permits people to use this running shoe for activities other than speed-oriented exercises. Conversely, caution is advised because there have been reports of short-term efficacy when it comes to the cushioning and a flimsy set of shoelaces."
Nike Air Max Tailwind 8,,86.0,,1015.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 13.4oz , Women: 11oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The stylish, good looking appearance of this shoe is appealing to many Nike lovers.
It is a comfortable shoe that can be worn all throughout the day.
Training is enhanced with while wearing this shoe while it also allows safe and comfortable work outs, according to some testers.
The Max Air units in the sole improve the underfoot comfort, based on a couple of reviews.
A snug fit feel is noticed and felt by many runners.
The clear rubber outsole of this shoe provides plenty of traction on different trails as noted by quite a good number of users.
3 reasons not to buy
The support is not enough as complained by some runners.
It is a heavy shoe for high performance and speed works.
It is a very expensive shoe according to many runners, especially for beginners.
Bottom line
The Nike Air Max Tailwind 8 is a heavyweight running shoe designed for endurance training. With Air Max as the main feature of the shoe, it is expected to meet the line’s benchmarks of comfort and performance. A supremely comfortable shoe made of high-quality materials that is as expensive as it looks."
Altra Lone Peak 3.0,,91.0,85.0,1418.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,, Altra Lone Peak 4.5,"11 reasons to buy
Most runners loved the comfort of the Foot-Shaped Toe Box and moderate cushioning of the Lone Peak 3.0
The price point is well within the range of most lightweight trainers, according to several.
A good number of runners prized the traction of this 3rd iteration of the Lone Peak.
The 5mm footbed adds to the cushioning and comfort.
Several comments highlighted the shoe’s versatility as a speed trainer and hiker.
A few noted that despite the cushioning and stack height, there is still noticeable ground feedback.
The Altra Lone Peak 3.0 tackles all kinds of trail surfaces (and some road too!), except deep mud or very rocky ground, based on the comments of some runners.
A handful of color options available already.
A small number of runners commented that the 5th edition of the Lone Peak (there were versions 1.0, 1.5, 2.0, and 2.5, respectively) runs rather light despite the cushioning and substantial lugs.
There were more than a couple of expert reviewers who pointed out that the upper is more precise and structured than the last model.
The Gaiter Trap allows for convenient gaiter attachment.
5 reasons not to buy
Quite a number of Lone Peak loyalists were disappointed that the Lone Peak 3.0 is clearly narrower than any of the past models.
A handful did not like the shoe’s inability to dry quickly.
Some mentioned that Altra could certainly improve the line’s bland looks.
There were several runners who had durability issues in the upper and the outsole of this shoe.
Breathability is no longer as good as the earlier models, as expressed by a few disappointed Lone Peak fans.
Bottom line
Altra’s first-ever trail shoe continues to be very popular among trail lovers because of its zero-drop platform and Foot-Shaped Toe Box. This time around, Altra dialed in the fit to give runners a secure foothold when tackling uneven terrain. The shoe has decent cushioning, excellent traction, and improved durability for miles of enjoyment on the trails."
Merrell Agility Peak Flex,,91.0,84.0,71.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,, Merrell Agility Peak Flex 3,"6 reasons to buy
The customers felt extremely comfortable with the soft cushioning of the Merrell Agility Peak Flex.
A majority of the runners preferred this shoe for trail running and trail walking, owing to its flexible build that’s suited for rough terrains.
Many of its wearers were happy with the supportive mid-sole because they felt less pressure under their feet.
Customers were also happy with the snug fit and adjustable nature of the shoe; it remained true to their size on almost every ground level.
A few buyers were attracted by the colors available for this shoe.
A runner felt an increase in his mobility in these shoes during his run; the shoes adjusted to the feet’s movements better than any shoes he had tried in the past.
2 reasons not to buy
A customer felt some reduction in his grip on the ground during his uphill runs.
Another user was dissatisfied with the construction of the upper’s heel area because it didn't provide enough support as other running shoes he had used before.
Bottom line
Merrell Agility Peak Flex, known for its agility and support on a variety of terrains, is an ideal shoe for trail running and hiking. It also satisfies the fashion sense of conscious customers through its nice aesthetic look and may be used daily as casual footwear. Overall, the shoe is an excellent package of comfort and flexibility and provides a perfect fit for the runner's foot."
New Balance Fresh Foam Hierro,,89.0,83.0,100.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.5oz , Women: 8.7oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, New Balance Fresh Foam Hierro v5,"5 reasons to buy
Synthetic materials make up the fabric and overlay system of the upper unit.
Most runners appreciated the technologies that make up the upper unit of the Fresh Foam Hierro, including the SURE LACE design, the anti-debris tongue and the Ortholite anti-microbial sock liner.
The Fresh Foam system offers a plush underfoot platform that supports the foot all throughout the gait cycle.
A handful of runners welcomed the AT Tread Outsole, which is a trail-specific outer unit made to improve the durability of the shoe, as well as the traction that it gives.
Aggressive gripping lugs help the runner hold onto the various types of surfaces found on the trails.
3 reasons not to buy
The Fresh Foam Hierro has a mildly high price.
Some reviewers felt that it was a bit narrow along the forefoot area.
The men’s version is noticeably heavier than the women’s.
Bottom line
The Fresh Foam Hierro from New Balance is a great-looking trail shoe that offers aggressive components that would effectively act against the harsh nature of the trails. It offers mild underfoot support while also providing a comfortable experience for everyday training."
La Sportiva Ultra Raptor GTX,,90.0,82.0,183.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 14.5oz , Women: 11.6oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Air mesh and abrasion resistant microfibers make up the main components of the upper unit.
Many reviewers appreciated the inclusion of the GORE-TEX membrane to ensure breathable and waterproof support for the feet.
The MEMIex compression molded mid-sole component responsibly carries the foot and protects it from impact.
The outsole unit of the Ultra Raptor GTX features the FriXion®, a sticky rubber material with gripping lugs, which assumes control over the various surfaces when running.
The Impact Brake System was well-received because more traction is given to the runner though gripping lugs that face multiple directions.
4 reasons not to buy
There were runners who noticed parts of the sole unit getting peeled off after a few months of use.
Some reviewers felt that the Ultra Raptor GTX was a bit too tight.
It has high price tag.
It has a very heavy weight.
Bottom line
The Ultra Raptor GTX from La Sportiva is a well-known trail shoe that offers reliable protection for many runners. It is a neutral shoe that can be used on a daily basis for adventures or running activities. The shoe received both positive and negative feedback but the negative ones are not enough to overshadow the positive comments. Overall, the Ultra Raptor GTX is a dependable waterproof trail shoe."
Adidas Alphaedge 4D Reflective,,83.0,,7.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,, Nov 2019,,,"5 reasons to buy
The reflective upper unit of the Adidas Alphaedge 4D Reflective is welcomed by a lot of consumers.
Some have mentioned that the upper’s one-piece opening is secure and able to support the ankles.
The general durability of the materials is lauded as they make the shoe as sturdy as possible.
Most purchasers have noted that the breathable facade of this Adidas running shoe permits all-day use.
The Continental™ rubber outsole provides sure traction over the asphalt, based on a handful of reviews.
2 reasons not to buy
The expensive price tag of this Alphaedge 4D Reflective is disliked by a majority of consumers.
Some users have noted that the 4D lattice midsole is not very responsive.
Bottom line
The overall feedback towards the Adidas Alphaedge 4D Reflective has been positive. This neutral running shoe is welcomed because of its eye-catching reflective upper, its quality construction, and the sure surface grip. Inversely, the costly price and the apparently not-too-agreeable midsole unit are criticized.
Fans of road running shoes that are designed for daily wear can enjoy the Adidas Alphaedge 4D Reflective."
Mizuno Wave Connect 3,,89.0,83.0,12.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Many runners applauded the average weight and durable construction of the Mizuno Wave Connect 3.
It features the X10 Mizuno technology, which gives protection to high wear areas and adds efficient traction.
The AP+ mid-sole technology promotes a smooth ride and a plush underfoot feel.
The updated version of the Wave Connect features the SR Touch light heel cushioning, which promotes quick energy bounce.
Some runners liked the comfortable and protective attributes of the Wave Connect 3.
3 reasons not to buy
The Wave Connect 3 has an expensive price.
There were runners who found the shoe too narrow in the mid-foot area.
Some of the testers noted that the outsole rubber wore off easily after a few months.
Bottom line
A combination of cushion and stability is what the Wave Connect 3 from Mizuno offers to runners. The technologies used in this model make it reliable during long and short distance runs. As noted by some runners, this shoe is reliable and efficient."
Skechers Synergy,,89.0,,3283.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Some testers liked the lightweight construction of the Skechers Synergy.
The design of the Synergy gained positive feedback from some reviews.
This shoe has Microperforated side panels that keep the foot cool and dry.
It has padded tongue and collar for added comfort.
This shoe is very affordable.
3 reasons not to buy
This shoe wears out quickly based on some reviews.
Not as comfortable as expected since some runner experienced pain while running.
The memory foam is thin as observed by some testers.
Bottom line
The Skechers Synergy is a neutral off-trail running shoe. According to some reviews, it lacks the durability, cushioning and support needed for long runs. Some users also felt that this shoe is only for casual running. Overall, the Synergy still needs some improvement to fully capture the approval of its users."
Zoot Ultra Kane 3.0,,89.0,88.0,54.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"4 reasons to buy
This shoe features a lightweight fabric upper that is flexible and breathable.
The Zoot Ultra Kane 3.0 uses the Z-Bound technology that aims to rebound the runner’s energy in order to reduce foot fatigue and stress.
Some runners took note of the added cushioning on the 3rd version of the Ultra Kane.
Many gave positive feedbacks on the overall construction and design of the shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners felt that this shoe is too narrow and too tight for them.
It is a bit uncomfortable in the heel, according to some reviews.
Slightly expensive.
Bottom line
Achieve a stronger, faster and longer run with the Zoot Ultra Kane 3.0. This version offers added cushioning, arch support, solid traction, and promotes a smoother ride. This shoe is great for long distance runs and daily training."
Asics Gel DS Trainer 20, Asics,89.0,82.0,117.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 8.7oz , Women: 7.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel DS Trainer 25,"7 reasons to buy
Open mesh makes the cover system of the Asics Gel DS Trainer 20 comfortable and breathable.
Skin irritation is avoided via the seamless construction of the upper.
The heel is wrapped by an exoskeletal clutching system, efficiently keeping the foot in place.
The mild stability mechanics this shoe has in its sole unit were appreciated by many.
The snug fit kept runners’ feet from wobbling around or getting removed from the shoe.
Shock absorption and responsive cushioning are handled by the mid-sole unit.
Traction, durable protection, and flexibility are given by the outsole unit.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners felt that the Asics Gel DS Trainer 20 was a bit narrow for their feet.
Isolated complaints were about the heel fabric, which tore apart after a few weeks of use.
Bottom line
Daily training and running are functions that suit the Asics Gel DS Trainer 20. This running shoe offers protection, cushioning and a liberal amount of stability mechanics to make each running experience as comfortable as possible. Most of those who tried the shoe considered the performance average compared to other road running shoes."
Brooks PureCadence 4, Brooks,89.0,74.0,73.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 7.1oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Brooks PureCadence 7,"6 reasons to buy
Durable mesh with an open construction provides breathable coverage.
The NAV BAND is an elastic unit in the mid-foot that supports the arch and provides a secure fit.
The anatomic last provides the runner with a glove-like fit that’s easy to acclimate into.
Runners welcomed the BioMoGo DNA technology, which delivered customized underfoot cushioning.
The big toe area of the sole unit has been split to accommodate a more efficient toe-off.
Durable rubber covers the contact points of the outsole, shielding them from wear and tear.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners noted that it was a bit narrower than the previous model.
The traditional tongue design has been employed here, and it rubbed against the skin uncomfortably for others.
Bottom line
The Brooks PureCadence 4 is a lightweight running shoe that’s meant to deliver a form-fitting coverage to the runner. It’s also flexible, so the natural running performance of the wearer is afforded freedom. Neutral runners and those who need mild mid-foot support are going to appreciate it."
Mizuno Wave Hitogami 4,,89.0,95.0,33.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 6.7oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Those who have tried the Mizuno Wave Hitogami 4 generally felt comfortable while wearing it.
The fans of the Hitogami series lauded this product’s apparent adherence to the classic look and feel of many Mizuno shoes.
The feet eased well into the shoes, fitting snugly yet securely, according to several reviewers.
A consumer reported that the toe box was wide enough to accommodate natural toe-splay.
A purchaser commended its price for being affordable.
The materials used in this running shoe lasted long, based on the comments of some runners.
The Hitogami 4 felt suitably lightweight, stated a tester.
1 reasons not to buy
A reviewer observed that it wasn’t great for long running sessions because it caused her to feel the ground too much.
Bottom line
The Mizuno Wave Hitogami 4 became popular among neutral pronators who have tested the previous iterations. They felt that it was a solid update because of its comfortable components, its efficient performance and its cool design. There was a gripe about its limitations when it came to long-term use, but that isolated observation was still overshadowed by the appreciation given to it."
Vibram FiveFingers Trek Ascent Insulated,,89.0,86.0,191.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 6.2oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
Most of the reviewers exclaimed that the Vibram FiveFingers Trek Ascent Insulated is easily the most comfortable shoes they have ever worn in winter.
The testers agreed that the wool-lined upper unit was able to provide warmth during the cold seasons.
A large number of users considered the price as truly reasonable.
The shoe is easy to wash, commented several runners.
The outsole’s tread gained positive feedback for being efficient on dry and wet surfaces.
Some runners have used it on the trail and on the road.
There are enough ground feel and adequate protection, according to more than a handful of users.
Several consumers lauded the lightweight nature of this running shoe.
Runners observed that the Vibram FiveFingers Trek Ascent Insulated was flexible enough to accommodate natural foot-movement.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners pointed that a heel loop would have made shoe entry and exit substantially easier.
A few complaints were made about how difficult the shoe was to dry once it got wet.
The water-resistant upper barely shielded the shoe from water, according to a handful of reviewers.
Bottom line
Vibram FiveFingers created a winter version of the massively popular Trek Ascent line in the wool-insulated model. The more aggressive and ultra-sticky outsole makes running on icy and wet conditions a breeze. Provided that runners don’t run on puddles or tackle more than 1 inch of snow, their feet should feel the comforting warmth of the wool collar and sockliner. It delivers a rightful blend of the great traction and superior comfort that barefoot runners can hardly find in today’s market."
Reebok Print Lux, Reebok,86.0,,32.0,$70,$38 (save 94%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
The majority of the testers commented that the Skechers GOrun Fast - Valor is comfortable.
A significant number of purchasers said that the shoe is stylish.
Based on some reviews, the shoe was best used for running, walking, and everyday wear.
Many users loved its lightweight structure.
According to those who have bought it, the running shoe is breathable.
A good number of wearers said that it is well-cushioned.
It held and supports the foot properly, noted by a reviewer.
3 reasons not to buy
The Skechers GOrun Fast - Valor was not true to size. It runs smaller than usual, according to several buyers.
The shoe needed to break in, based on a review.
A purchaser commented that the shoe is not durable.
Bottom line
The shoe gained appreciation from the majority of the users; they were contented with the shoe’s design, comfort level, and breathability. Despite the negative comments, the Skechers GOrun Fast - Valor is still preferred by many because of its fantastic construction and performance on the roads. Overall, the Skechers GOrun Fast - Valor is considered by many as a versatile running shoe with excellent cushioning."
Nike Air Zoom Winflo 3,,94.0,,262.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7.7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Nike Air Zoom Winflo 7,"10 reasons to buy
“Very comfortable” is almost a unanimous expression from a large number of reviews.
The Winflo 3 is very affordable.
Several users appreciated the soft midsole cushioning.
It runs light, according to a handful of reviewers.
Some reviewers noted that it is quite fashionable.
The Zoom Winflo 3 has decent durability, based on a few comments.
A small group of users has used it for other activities, besides running.
There are more than a dozen color combinations to choose from.
Some runners opined that the Winflo performed like the Pegasus without the jarring Zoom Air pocket in the forefoot and with a cheaper price tag.
It requires no break-in period to get the most out of the Winflo 3’s fit and performance.
4 reasons not to buy
A few runners remarked that the traction suffers on wet surfaces.
It is a bit narrow for a few runners.
A handful were disappointed with the outsole durability.
A small number of runners remarked that it runs a tad smaller than its predecessor.
Bottom line
The Nike Winflo 3 is a dependable trainer that can mix runs of almost any length. It is a shoe that delivers decent arch support, great comfort, a nice style, and pillow-like cushioning at a very wallet-friendly price. The shoe is a really solid option for those who are looking to blend functionality and style without breaking the bank."
Newton Gravity IV,,93.0,85.0,62.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.1oz , Women: 6.7oz, Men: 3mm , Women: 3mm,,, Newton Gravity 9,"7 reasons to buy
The Gravity IV is a brilliantly comfortable shoe comes as a common expression from a multitude of reviews.
The wraparound fit of the upper delighted most reviewers.
It is very light and flexible.
It works superbly well for races and endurance training.
A good number of comments focused on the unique responsiveness of the shoe.
Several noticed that the outsole is as durable as advertised.
The traction is really good, according to a few.
3 reasons not to buy
A handful mentioned that the new tongue design slightly causes a blip in the shoe’s performance.
Runners not experienced with the Newton lug system will take some time to adjust to the unique forefoot lugs.
A very expensive shoe.
Bottom line
The Newton Gravity IV is a performance trainer that offers an exemplary choice for those who want a very responsive shoe to handle races and high-mileage training. It has decent arch support, superb traction, and delivers that fast-paced tempo for those who want to lower their personal best times."
Reebok Driftium Ride, Reebok,89.0,,316.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.6oz , Women: 10oz,,,,, Reebok Driftium Ride 2,"6 reasons to buy
Several runners praised the Reebok Driftium Ride as the most comfortable shoe they have ever worn.
A lot of buyers were pleased with the shoe’s affordable price.
The fit of the shoe was appreciated by many: some mentioned the Driftium Ride fit nicely, while others said it was true to size.
Some users commented that the shoe was good enough for both indoor and outdoor runs. Others claimed it also performed well on gym workouts.
The shoe was very easy to clean, according to a couple of purchasers.
The Driftium Ride was a very lightweight shoe, as reviewed by many.
2 reasons not to buy
The inner material of the upper ripped quickly after one use, a user complained. Meanwhile, another wrote that the mesh seemed too thin and showed the outline of the toes.
Some users thought negatively about the Driftium Ride’s durability: one user thought it felt flimsy and not appropriate for running, while a couple of others said it looked cheap and easily ruined.
Bottom line
Based on the number of positive reviews it received, it is easy to see that users were very satisfied with their purchase of the Reebok Driftium Ride. The shoe was commended for its comfortable platform, accurate fit, and reliable performance. On the other hand, some were skeptical about the durability of the shoe because of how it fared based on their experiences. Despite the criticisms, the Reebok Driftium Ride has managed to come on top as an affordable everyday runner."
Adidas Alphabounce CK,,93.0,,195.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.3oz , Women: 10.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Several runners loved its stylish design.
A good number of wearers appreciated its excellent grip on paved surfaces.
A few testers lauded its quality.
Many buyers commented that the shoe was comfortable.
Some purchasers mentioned that the shoe has a good quality.
A good number of users admired the versatility of the Adidas Alphabounce CK; users noted that they’ve been using the shoe for weightlifting, plyometrics, running and casual activities.
2 reasons not to buy
Based on observations, Adidas should have used better color combinations for the shoe.
According to a buyer, the sole is stiffer when compared to other Adidas shoes.
Bottom line
A good number of purchasers commented that the Adidas Alphabounce CK was a comfortable and stylish running shoe. Aside from its design, they loved its excellent quality. Although several of them said that the color combinations were not that great, others still recommended the shoe because of its reliable traction. Overall, the majority of the wearers said that the Adidas Alphabounce CK was a good option for those who want quality and comfortable yet casual road running shoe."
Brooks Adrenaline ASR 12,,83.0,83.0,33.0,,, Trail, Stability, Men: 11.2oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Brooks Adrenaline ASR 14,"6 reasons to buy
Element Mesh offers breathable and water-repellent protection to the exterior of the shoe, while the Element Lining does the same to the interior environment.
Most of the upper unit of the Adrenaline ASR 12 has water-resistant parts, so many runners liked how it strives to keep the feet cool and dry.
The BioMoGo DNA offers an adaptive cushioning technology that adapts to the specific needs of the wearer in terms of the underfoot platform.
Stability is afforded by the Progressive Diagonal Rolllbar, the DRB Accel, and the Caterpillar Crash Pad.
The Omega Flex Grooves and the Flextra provide flexibility to the runner without compromising the cushioning available, according to a few testers’ comments.
The outsole unit is a robust set of protective elements, which also ensure abrasion-resistance, durability, and even skid-resistance & traction.
3 reasons not to buy
There were runners who felt that it wasn’t able to accommodate wide feet because the fit was narrow.
The Adrenaline ASR 12 has a moderately heavy weight.
It has a slightly expensive price.
Bottom line
Support on the trails is a very important feature of the Adrenaline ASR 12 from Brooks. It’s comfortable, durable and very stable. This Brooks trail running shoe is a great choice for daily trainings and even for transitioning from the trails to the roads."
Nike Reax Run 5, Nike,78.0,,7.0,,, Trail, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"9 reasons to buy
The majority of the testers commented that the Nike Reax Run 5 provides the right amount of traction.
A good number of users agreed that the shoe is supportive.
It has a roomy toe box, according to several buyers.
Many consumers love its affordable price.
A lot of purchasers mentioned that it feels like walking on air when wearing the shoe.
According to those who have tested it, the running shoe is durable.
The shoe is stylish and good looking, based on reviews.
A significant number of reviewers said that the running footwear perfectly matches every outfit.
The shoe is best used for a gym workout, walking, jogging, treadmill, hiking, and running, noted by several consumers.
3 reasons not to buy
Some buyers mentioned that the Nike Reax Run 5 requires a break-in period.
One user commented that the top and flop on the ankle feels tight.
A few runners observed that the Reax Run 5 is a heavy shoe.
Bottom line
The excellent performance of the Nike Reax Run 5 made the majority of the users happy and satisfied. The support, traction, and the price of the shoe exceeded the expectations of many consumers. With the utilization of unique features and innovative technologies in crafting the running footwear, many users loved the fact that their overall performance has improved. In general, the fantastic construction, quality materials, and structure of the shoe made it suitable for different activities like jogging, walking, and running as well as various gym activities. They love the idea of adding the Nike Reax Run 5 as their running companion in tackling a wide range of challenging terrains."
Saucony Razor Ice+,,78.0,82.0,18.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.6oz , Women: 10.6oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"11 reasons to buy
The fleece-lined upper of the Razor Ice+ keeps the foot warm and comfortable during winter.
The reviewers were unanimous in praising the traction of this shoe.
A built-in gaiter makes winter running more convenient as it keeps water and snow out.
A handful noted that it is quite light for a winter-specific shoe.
The shoe works fine when hiking, according to a small number of runners.
It felt responsive all throughout the runs of several runners.
The Runshield upper provides water-resistant protection.
It handles speed and distance with equal ease, according to a couple of expert reviewers.
The cushioning is excellent in the Razor Ice+, based on more than a few observations from reviewers.
The outsole lugs do not prevent runners from using the shoe on icy city streets or pavements.
Some runners highly-appreciated the unique aesthetic attraction of this shoe.
4 reasons not to buy
Saucony’s claim of making ice irrelevant is not fully justified, according to several runners.
The price is expensive.
More than a few users had trouble getting their foot inside as the fit is quite tight.
The neoprene upper is very thin and suffered abrasions, even after a few miles, based on the comments of a few runners.
Bottom line
The Razor Ice+ is designed by Saucony to tackle icy or wintry conditions. There is no doubt that the traction is absolutely insane, it just does not replace spikes or crampons. But, for trail running, wet and icy conditions are there for the taking. The shoe has quite a responsive ride with the presence of the Everun while a water-resistant upper should be a huge asset when running in the conditions this shoe is made for."
Inov-8 RoadTalon 240,,87.0,86.0,97.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.5oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"4 reasons to buy
Most consumers welcomed the lightweight nature of the Inov-8 Roadtalon 240.
Several users admired the durable construction of the RoadTalon 240.
The shoe offers a great level of comfort, as noted in some user comments.
The design and color schemes of this running shoe were lauded; many felt that the product was visually endearing.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners complained that the midsole unit didn’t suitably cushion the foot.
A consumer reported that the upper fabric’s lightness prevented it from giving a snug and secure fit.
Bottom line
Many people appreciated the lightweight construction of the Inov-8 Roadtalon 240, as well as its eye-catching looks. But others felt that this neutral shoe’s negative aspects far outweighed its potential to be a dependable companion for the roads. The width profiles received some flak for being inconsistent; the upper unit and underfoot platform also got criticized for being inefficient. These seemingly simple concerns were mainly the reason why most purchasers didn’t consider it as their go-to footwear for their running sessions."
Arc’teryx Norvan LD GTX,,72.0,83.0,11.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.6oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,, Arc'teryx Norvan LD 2 GTX,"7 reasons to buy
Majority of Arc’teryx Norvan LD GTX users like the shoe’s efficient breathability.
Most wearers are commending the shoe for being durable.
Several users say that the shoe’s trail running performance proved to last all-day.
A lot of users also give praise to the comfort provided by the Norvan LD GTX on extended trail runs.
A number of users note that the shoe’s single-layer mesh upper is lightweight and air-permeable.
Most of the wearers say that the shoe’s GORE-TEX® feature delivers reliable waterproof performance.
The shoe’s excellent arch support is well received a lot of wearers.
2 reasons not to buy
One reviewer has said that the shoe is roomy at both the front and rear saying it may cause the shoe to be too wide for wearers with narrow feet and heels.
Some users say that some Norvan LD GTX shoes are manufactured not to have good quality when it comes to the waterproofing feature.
Bottom line
The Arc’teryx Norvan LD GTX is explicitly designed for extended trail runs across different types of weather or trail conditions. Users mostly praise the shoe for its lightweight construction, and functional support. The shoe’s outsole is also commended for its versatile grip on technical trails. If anything, it’s just that some Norvan LD GTX shoes were manufactured with less waterproofing capabilities that were noted by some users. Other than that, this trail running shoe from Arc’Teryx has received positive reviews for its overall excellent running performance, especially on challenging trails."
Nike LunarStelos,,93.0,,287.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.3oz , Women: 9.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Aug 2016,,,"9 reasons to buy
Extremely comfortable is an expression that comes up in most of the reviews of the LunarStelos.
It is very affordable.
A handful of runners loved its lightweight design.
There are more than enough color options available
It is very flexible, based on some comments.
A couple of runners valued the cool looks of this shoe.
Breathability is very good, as noted by more than a few.
This is a good training partner in the gym, according to more than a handful of reviewers.
Some of those who are on their feet all day valued the cushioning and support of this shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
A significant number of runners were hugely disappointed by the overall lack of durability coming from this shoe.
Although quite thick, the shoe does not have enough cushioning, according to some reviewers
It is a bit narrow for a few runners.
Bottom line
The LunarStelos has all the makings of a handy, reliable, and lightweight trainer. Besides being very affordable, the superior comfort, excellent breathability, good arch support, and really cool looks should make this an easy option for neutral runners. The shoe has the speed to take on up-tempo runs as well as the cushioning and support for piling on the miles. Although an entry-level shoe, it should also be a very solid choice for seasoned runners during recovery days or for long and easy runs."
Nike Air Zoom Structure 21 Shield,,88.0,90.0,16.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Nike Air Zoom Structure 22 Shield,"6 reasons to buy
One of the consumers said that the design of the product was lovely and appealing.
A runner commented that the cushioning was bouncy and flexible.
The shoe was comfortable, according to a reviewer.
A lot of testers mentioned that the breathable nature of the Nike Air Zoom Structure 21 Shield was reliable.
This shoe was lauded for utilizing durable materials.
A runner noted that the rubber sole provided enough traction, even in wet conditions.
1 reasons not to buy
According to one of the users, the shoe was expensive.
Bottom line
Many consumers commented that the Nike Air Zoom Structure 21 Shield was comfortable, breathable and durable. They were also happy with the product's flexible and bouncy cushioning. Although one consumer said that the shoe was expensive, others still recommended it mainly because of its appealing and great-looking design, as well as the excellent traction that it provided."
Scott Palani SPT,,76.0,78.0,7.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 11mm , Women: 11mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Many wearers were satisfied with the support implemented by the Scott Palani SPT.
One user stated the shoe delivered a comfortable ride.
The shoe had a nice amount of cushioning yet still lightweight, according to a wearer.
It felt like a high-quality shoe despite its low-price tag, some consumers praised.
A runner appreciated how the outsole was useful in giving adequate grip on both rough and smooth pavements.
4 reasons not to buy
Some users felt the midsole was thick and clunky, and the additional bulk felt utterly
A user complained that the shoe was stiff where rebound was needed, yet floppy in areas that required support.
Another commented the heel cup felt too squishy and loose.
A couple of buyers reported the toe box was small and felt too rigid.
Bottom line
Numerous consumers felt that the Scott Palani SPT came through with its promise of giving stability, as many users were impressed by its performance. However, there was a negative reception from other wearers regarding the shoe’s structure and design elements."
Asics Gel Pursuit 2,,92.0,,98.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The comfort provided by the Pursuit 2 comes mainly because of its amazing fit.
The versatility offered by the Gel Pursuit 2 is appreciated by most runners.
A few testers believed that it’s a great option for entry-level runners.
It has an affordable price.
Traction is superb on the road, noted a handful of users.
It has sufficient cushioning, yet it still promotes natural running movement.
A good transition shoe for those looking for a more minimalist experience.
2 reasons not to buy
The grip needs improvement when conditions get wet, according to a handful of runners.
Some wearers noted that the forefoot area and the toe box are narrow.
Bottom line
Mixing traditional features with a bit of minimalist flair is the concept behind the Asics Gel Pursuit 2. Asics has hit the ball out of the park as the shoe delivers good arch support, sufficient cushioning and unbelievable comfort without having to spend more than necessary."
Under Armour Speed Swift 2, Under Armour,92.0,,144.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.7oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,," Normal, Wide | Normal",,"9 reasons to buy
Some of the runners commented that the Under Armour Speed Swift 2 had an affordable price.
Some reviews mentioned that it has excellent cushioning.
A handful of consumers agreed that the shoe has good quality.
A lot of users observed that the fit was perfect for them.
Several purchasers commented that it performed well on different running activities.
A good number of reviewers said that the shoe was comfortable and lightweight.
Several wearers lauded the product's breathability.
Some testers did not only recommend the Under Armour Speed Swift 2 for running and walking sessions, but also for basketball and workout activities.
Based on some reviews, its design and appearance were attractive and stylish.
2 reasons not to buy
One of the users said that the Under Armour Speed Swift 2 was not supportive.
The sole fell-off easily after several uses only, according to a purchaser.
Bottom line
The majority of the users commented that the Under Armour Speed Swift 2 is a breathable and comfortable shoe. They were happy with its perfect fit and lightweight structure. They loved wearing the product not only for short and long-distance running and walking activities but also for basketball and gym workout sessions. Although several of them stated that it was not supportive or durable, others still recommended the product because of its attractive appearance, fashionable design, good cushioning, and excellent performance."
Mizuno Wave Sayonara 2, Mizuno,92.0,86.0,218.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.4oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Mizuno Wave Sayonara 4,"8 reasons to buy
The soft and supple upper together with the very soft lining of the interior encases the runner’s foot in comfort in the Sayonara 2.
Some runners mentioned that the durability is more than decent for a shoe that can handle speed training or high-mileage runs.
The price is great for a race day shoe / daily trainer.
It is even lighter than the already light previous model.
A handful observed that the flexibility is evident despite the Wave Plate and firm midsole foam.
The grip is superb due to the race specific lugs.
Several reviews mentioned the adequate room in the toe box for the toes to splay.
The ride is quite responsive as noted by quite a number of runners.
2 reasons not to buy
A few mentioned that the ride borders on being hard.
Others noted that it is not as well ventilated as the original Sayonara.
Bottom line
The Mizuno Wave Sayonara fits the bill for those who are looking for a lightweight shoe that can handle time sessions as well as mileage runs. There is sufficient arch support, a firm but responsive ride, and very low to the ground feel despite the 24mm stack height and 10mm heel offset."
Skechers GOmeb Razor,,92.0,87.0,123.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.7oz , Women: 6.1oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Skechers GOmeb Razor 2,"7 reasons to buy
Many users liked the stretchy and breathable upper of the Skechers GOmeb Razor.
According to some reviews, the shoe is comfortable.
The durability of the shoe was commended by most of those who have tried it.
Some testers took note of the shoe’s roomy toe box, which allowed their toes to spread comfortably.
A lot of runners admired the shoe’s cushioning system, which offered them a soft yet springy ride.
The lightweight nature of the GOmeb Razor received praise from many runners.
The unique color schemes were lauded by consumers for being appealing, but not overbearing.
1 reasons not to buy
One runner mentioned that he experienced heel slippage.
Bottom line
The Skechers GOmeb Razor is a lightweight, fast, and responsive everyday trainer built for short and long-distance runs. Aside from the sock-like fit, the shoe also offers durability and reliable traction while running on the road. Many users commended the overall design of the shoe and would recommend it to other running enthusiasts."
Newton Gravity V,,89.0,83.0,178.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.1oz , Women: 6.7oz, Men: 3mm , Women: 3mm,,, Newton Gravity 9,"5 reasons to buy
Most runners liked the light weight and comfortable construction of the Newton Gravity V.
Many were impressed by the updated features of the Newton Gravity including the 4-way stretch mesh metatarsal panels and new reinforced eyelets.
The 5th version of the Newton Gravity offers pre-molded heel counter for enhanced fit and improved form.
The improved bottom of this shoe, which provides maximum cushioning and improved flexibility, gained positive feedbacks from testers.
It has a 360-degree reflectivity feature.
2 reasons not to buy
The Gravity V is an expensive shoe.
Available in limited color choices.
Bottom line
The Newton Gravity V is a running shoe for long distance runs, daily training, and uptempo runs. Made lightweight and with enhanced cushioning, flexibility and comfort, this shoe will not disappoint when used on the roads. Despite being expensive, many users still recommend the shoe for road running. "
Puma NRGY Star, Puma,76.0,,20.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,," Narrow, Normal | Narrow, Normal",,"6 reasons to buy
Some of the users commented that the Puma NRGY Star is comfortable.
A reviewer noted that the shoe provides excellent traction.
Its perfect fit was loved by the majority of the consumers.
According to those who have bought it, the shoe is durable.
As observed by a purchaser, the shoe delivers a bouncy ride.
The majority of the buyers admired Puma NRGY Star's style and attractive design.
2 reasons not to buy
Based on a review, the shoe has a thin outsole.
A tester commented that the back of the shoe is too hard and high. This left the user's ankle with some bubbles and blisters.
Bottom line
The Puma NRGY Star is a shoe that uses features and technologies that improve the user's running experience. With the comfort level, good traction, and durability it delivers, the majority of the consumers are happy and satisfied. They are contented with the way the shoe is constructed and designed, making it a perfect choice for different walking and running activities."
Adidas Duramo 6, Adidas,89.0,83.0,1127.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 11mm , Women: 11mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The mesh material used in the upper unit covers the foot responsibly and even allows air to enter the shoe.
The overlay system has been stitched onto the upper, and they assist the main fabric in wrapping around the foot securely.
Runners appreciated the responsiveness and flexibility of the platform, which allowed their feet to feel well-cushioned.
Flex grooves are cut into the sole unit to provide more natural movement for the runner.
The outsole rubber protects the rest of the sole unit from the abrasive nature of the asphalt.
Different color schemes allow runners to have a shoe that’s more accommodating of their aesthetic preferences.
2 reasons not to buy
A few runners thought that the cushioning system wasn’t as springy as they’d hope.
Some noted that the upper material looked cheap, like a plastic material that’s glossed with reflective coating.
Bottom line
Quality performance for the daily runner and the casual shoe enthusiast is what the Adidas Duramo 6 is all about. It’s a solid option for those who are athletic and want to have a reliable running experience from a shoe that doesn’t have a hefty price tag. It’s a neutral shoe that works."
Merrell Trail Glove 4 Knit,,90.0,90.0,407.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 7.6oz , Women: 5.9oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Many users were surprised at how comfortable the Trail Glove 4 Knit was, considering it is a barefoot shoe. A couple of other wearers claimed it was the most comfortable shoe they have owned.
The instep gave a perfect fit, wrote a commenter.
Several runners asserted that the shoe was lightweight.
A lot of users relayed praises regarding the comfort and protection of the knit upper.
The shoe gave just the right amount of pressure on the Achilles, mentioned a wearer.
The toe box gave enough room to enable long distance runs, a runner stated.
Various purchasers noted the excellent arch and foot support.
For a trail shoe, the Merrell Trail Glove 4 Knit was terrific even as casual footwear, a couple of buyers shared.
3 reasons not to buy
The fit was not as good as the original Trail Glove 4, according to a reviewer.
The plastic toe cover was too rigid, a user observed.
A buyer thought that the absence of a pull tab made it inconvenient to wear the shoe.
Bottom line
Many have found the Trail Glove 4 Knit to be a likable upgrade, with some even stating that it felt superb on foot, and other similar compliments on the fit and performance. Others expressed their appreciation on how the shoe delivered comfort and style without sacrificing efficiency. Although there were a few who found flaws in the shoe’s construction, the Trail Glove 4 Knit could still be considered as a success."
Salomon Sense Escape,,,,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Salomon Sense Escape 2,
Puma Carson 2 X, Puma,89.0,87.0,197.0,$60,$35 (save 42%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
The Puma Carson 2 X was a comfortable shoe, according to a number of
Several users agreed that the shoe gave an accurate fit.
A lot of buyers mentioned that the shoe looked great and did not look cheap at all.
One customer said the Carson 2 X felt like slippers because of its low weight, while another compared the experience to being barefoot.
Some wearers enjoyed the easy pull-on feature of the shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
Some buyers were disappointed with the shoe’s durability: One shared that the stitches on the upper started to unravel after only a week, while another thought the shoe was not cut out for intense
One commenter wrote that the Carson 2 X felt tight at first, and needed breaking in.
Bottom line
The simple and straightforward construction of the Puma Carson 2 X allowed it to be a commendable shoe with most of its buyers. The shoe was praised for its appearance, fit, and weight. Because of how lightweight and comfortable the Carson 2 X was, many users reported their desire to buy another pair as they were satisfied with their experience of wearing the shoe."
Asics Gel DS Racer 11,,72.0,84.0,48.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 6.6oz , Women: 5.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Many applauded the lightweight construction of Asics Gel DS Racer 11.
Some found that this shoe offered impressive flexibility and natural freedom of motion.
The 11th version of the Gel DS Racer features the Open Mesh, which is responsible for the breathability and comfort.
It features the Solyte technology for added durability and responsive cushioning.
The mild over-pronation of the foot is handled by effective mid-sole components, such as the dual density DuoMax Support System, the Trusstic System, and the Guidance Line.
This is an affordable running shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
Some felt that this shoe fits too tight for them, particularly in the forefoot area.
Others felt that cushioning needs improvement.
A few testers felt that the shoelaces weren’t able to stay secured and they irritatingly came loose frequently.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel DS Racer 11 is a lightweight, supportive running shoe ideal for road running. It is equipped with the necessary technologies that help runners survive long distance races and marathons. Some users were happy with the shoe's performance while others expressed disappointments. In summary, the shoe still needs improvement especially in terms of cushioning and fit. "
Asics Gel Nimbus 20 SP,,82.0,,964.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 13mm,,, Asics Gel Nimbus 21 SP,"5 reasons to buy
A lot of people were happy with the aesthetics of the Asics Gel Nimbus 20 SP.
The width profiles were lauded for being able to follow user expectations.
The cushioning system was praised as a comfortable and responsible base for the foot.
The traction capacity of the outsole was deemed as dependable.
Supinators (underpronators) felt that the cushioned platform was able to center their gait when running.
2 reasons not to buy
According to a lot of testers, the toe box wasn’t very spacious; they didn’t feel there was wiggle room.
Some people lamented the lack of arch support in the midsole.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Nimbus 20 SP had garnered its fair share of positive remarks. Most people were appreciative of its design, the grip-ready external pad, and the supportive underfoot experience. But a majority of those who have tested this road companion wasn’t happy because it had a narrow forefoot design. So, it is highly recommended to try on this shoe first before deciding on a purchase."
New Balance Vazee Summit v2,,82.0,94.0,32.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.3oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
Most of the users mentioned that the mesh upper of the shoe provided maximum breathability.
The shoe’s Toe Protect material gained positive feedback from some runners; they said it effectively protected their toes from the damaging nature of the trail.
The New Balance Vazee Summit v2 is a very comfortable shoe, said some runners.
Many runners mentioned that the shoe is very fast and responsive.
Few testers mentioned that the shoe gave a reliable grip on varied surfaces.
One user really admired how the tongue was attached to the upper; it didn’t deviate or shift around during his run.
The outsole was durable and reliable, some runners noted.
It is an affordable trail running shoe, said a few purchasers.
Most of the testers admired the lightweight construction of the Vazee Summit v2.
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of wearers felt that the forefoot area was too tight for their preferences.
The insole has cracked after only a few uses, according to a purchaser.
Bottom line
The New Balance Vazee Summit v2 is packed with reliable technologies needed for long-distance runs and technical trail running. Many admired the shoe’s light construction, as well as its fast acceleration and responsive ride. The shoe also delivers a good combination of protection, comfort, and durability."
Mizuno Wave Rider GTX,,82.0,,6.0,,," Snow, Trail", Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Many runners liked the waterproof feature of the Mizuno Wave Rider GTX.
A lot of wearers consider the shoe's platform to be well-cushioned.
The shoe provides adequate warmth even during the cold weather, according to a reviewer.
The running shoe's outsole grips excellently on snow-laden trails, said a runner.
The versatility of the Wave Rider GTX was appreciated by some users.
2 reasons not to buy
Some wearers thought the running shoe to be heavy.
A few purchasers have noted that the shoe is plain-looking.
Bottom line
The Mizuno Wave Rider GTX takes pride in its squishy, cushioned midsole. Additionally, its aggressive outsole allows for easy pavement-to-trail transitions without losing their touch, no matter if it rains, snows, or shines. The Wave Rider GTX is a stable, all-terrain runner that is ready to run wherever and whenever you want."
La Sportiva Helios 3.0,,78.0,,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 6.2oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The grippy outsole of the La Sportiva Helios 3.0 has received praises from a lot of users. 
Several consumers confirm that this running partner is flexible. 
This running shoe is highly breathable, based on reviews. 
Many runners appreciate the lightweight construction of the shoe. 
It is comfortable to wear, according to numerous purchasers. 
A few commenters have testified that this shoe is supportive.
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of testers have mentioned that La Sportiva Helios 3.0 is a little tight. 
One reviewer who prefers plush cushioning said that this shoe is a bit firm.
Bottom line
Equipped with trail-ready features, the La Sportiva Helios 3.0 is designed to withstand hard-packed dirt and rocky terrains. This neutral running shoe works best for runners with normal gaits or those who do not overpronate. It is a great shoe for consumers seeking breathability, durability, comfort, and protection."
Under Armour Micro G Assert 7, Under Armour,90.0,,1982.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.1oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Some of the delighted customers highlighted the lightweight construction of the Under Armour Micro G Assert 7.
A lot of testers said that the shoe is very breathable.
The shoe is flexible, said some wearers.
According to some runners, the midsole of the Micro G Assert 7 is capable of delivering long-lasting cushioning.
Several reviewers mentioned that the Assert 7 is very durable.
Many people admired the street-ready and good-looking design of the shoe.
The shoe is very affordable, said some users.
A few users commented that the shoe is also good for casual walking and gym workout.
2 reasons not to buy
Many wearers observed a tight fit in the heel and forefoot sections.
The underfoot platform wasn’t as responsive as the previous iteration’s midsole, based on more than a handful of reviews.
Bottom line
Many runners were impressed with the performance of the Under Armour Micro G Assert 7. They highlighted the lightweight and street-ready design of the shoe, as well as its affordable price tag. However, several people had complaints about the construction, especially in comparison to its predecessor. Concerns were also raised about its apparently unresponsive underfoot experience."
Saucony Excursion TR 13 GTX,,78.0,,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.5oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A good number of testers love the Saucony Excursion TR 13 GTX's lightweight structure.
Some users commented that the shoe is comfortable to wear.
One of the reviewers mentioned that the running footwear is flexible.
According to a consumer, the shoe is breathable. The foot is kept dry all the time.
Based on the reviews, the Excursion TR 13 GTX is best used in both wet and dry conditions.
The shoe fits perfectly, a buyer noted.
It was stylish, a purchaser commented.
2 reasons not to buy
One of the consumers observed that the Gore-Tex lining of the shoe is not durable. The stitches are easily undone.
According to a review, the waterproofing material used in the shoe begins to leak after several uses only.
Bottom line
The Excursion TR 13 GTX is a trail running shoe that is strategically designed for those who have neutral foot motion. With the comfort and fit it provides, the majority of the users were satisfied with their purchase. The Gore-Tex membrane incorporated into the shoe made them more appreciate its versatility. The shoe has proven itself a successful release because of its performance and functionality on a wide variety of terrains."
Puma Faas 300 v4,,87.0,80.0,110.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 6.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
This shoe features the neutralCELL technology for cushioning and flexibility that promotes efficient and smoother ride.
It has the AirMesh upper for breathability and comfort.
Most runners applauded the no-sew overlays, which enhance the structural fit of the upper.
The Puma Faas 300 v4 features 360 degrees of reflectivity for better low-light visibility.
Many runners took note of the lightweight construction of the Faas 300 v4.
It has an affordable price.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners mentioned that this shoe was too narrow for them.
The sole of the Faas 300 v4 is not as durable as expected.
Available in limited color options.
Bottom line
The Puma Faas 300 v4 is a neutral running shoe that provides flexibility and cushioning. This is for runners who are looking for a lightweight shoe that delivers a smoother ride. This shoe is a great racing partner and a reliable daily running gear."
Hoka One One Constant 2,,87.0,,137.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The Air Mesh fabric on the upper gives a well-ventilated experience to the runner.
The TPU External Heel Counter secures the rear section of the foot, preventing accidental shoe removal.
The wide toe box is a great feature for those who have wider feet.
The Constant 2 has a padded tongue for additional comfort.
The combination of EVA and RMAT technology offers durable support, according to some reviews.
The Active Foot Frame lets the foot relax and sink into the mid-sole unit, essentially delivering an underfoot platform that’s specific to the needs of the wearer.
3 reasons not to buy
It is an expensive shoe.
Its weight is moderately heavy.
There were runners who noted that the outsole rubber wore off easily after a few months.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Constant 2 is a reliable stability road running shoe. It can function well for long distance runs and daily training, as well. The construction of the shoe provides enough cushioning and adequate support. Given all the negative and positive comments, the Constant 2 still needs some improvement but should be able to deliver average performance for casual runners."
Nike Air Zoom Wildhorse 4,,87.0,81.0,56.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Nike Air Zoom Wildhorse 6,"8 reasons to buy
According to some comments, the Nike Air Zoom Wildhorse 4 is very comfortable.
Based on some user reviews, the shoe provided the right amount of cushioning needed for trail running.
Several runners found the rock plate very helpful as it kept the foot well-protected from stones and other rubble.
A significant number of wearers said that the mesh upper material was able to keep the foot well-ventilated throughout the run.
Most of the runners were highly appreciative of the multi-directional lugs that provided increased traction over varied surfaces.
Some runners admired the shoe’s roomy toe-box; it allowed their toes to splay naturally.
Based on a few comments, the shoe was able to provide agreeable ankle support that’s needed for light trail running.
Many purchasers found the Wildhorse 4 affordable.
1 reasons not to buy
A couple of users mentioned that the outsole lugs wore off after only a few uses.
Bottom line
Most of those who tried the Nike Air Zoom Wildhorse 4 admired the overall functionality of the shoe. In this version, Nike already addressed some issues experienced from the past iteration. Ideal for light trail running, the shoe offers a good combination of comfort, traction, protection, and durability."
Inov-8 Parkclaw 240,,77.0,,6.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.5oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Several users mentioned that the Inov-8 Parkclaw 240 is lightweight in structure.
A good number of testers said that the shoe is well-cushioned.
Some of the buyers noted that the running footwear is comfortable.
Many users love its wide toe box.
According to those who have tested it, the shoe provides excellent traction.
It is best used on grassy and sandy trails and roads, based on the reviews.
3 reasons not to buy
One of the consumers observed that the laces keep on coming undone during the running activity.
The tongue is too short, according to a buyer. Stones and grass seeds quickly get in the shoe.
A purchaser commented that the Inov-8 Parkclaw 240 is not durable.
Bottom line
The Inov-8 Parkclaw 240 provided a high level of comfort, cushioning, and traction that users expect from a versatile road and trail running shoe. The majority of the consumers were contented with the outstanding performance brought about by the Parkclaw 240. The well-constructed outsole, midsole, and upper area of the shoe were admired and accepted by many people to be a perfect partner in their running careers and adventures."
Mizuno Spark,,68.0,,12.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Excellent comfort is not compromised in an entry level shoe as delivered by the Mizuno Spark, according to most reviews.
It is a very budget-friendly shoe.
The cushioning is soft, but not overly so, based on the observation of several runners.
The Spark is offered in 5 great color combinations.
It looks way better than its price tag indicates, noted some runners.
A handful of runners who have had back or knee issues were able to enjoy their runs once more in the Spark.
2 reasons not to buy
The tradeoff in price and plush cushioning is durability, based on a several comments.
The traction gets a little tricky on wet surfaces, noted a few runners.
Bottom line
Without any bells and whistles, the Spark provides entry level runners another superb option for their initial forays into road running. The shoe has good arch support, superb comfort, and maximum breathability. Mizuno produces another no-hassle shoe that works as designed."
Adidas Terrex Fast R GTX,,91.0,85.0,181.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 14.5oz , Women: 13oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The GORE-TEX membrane maintains a dry environment for the foot by completely shielding the shoe from water.
Breathable mesh and synthetic overlays add more security and comfort.
The OrthoLite Sock Liner offers additional underfoot comfort and a healthy interior environment for the feet, according to a handful of runners.
Responsive cushioning and motion control are provided by the FORMOTION mid-sole material.
The adiPRENE+ gives additional comfort to the forefoot area while also allowing a better forward motion.
Continental rubber and the TRAXION outsole tech bring the Terrex Fast R GTX durable protection and traction over many types of terrain based on several reviews.
3 reasons not to buy
There were testers who felt that the heel area was a bit tight and uncomfortable to the skin.
The Fast R GTX has an expensive price.
Its weight is heavy.
Bottom line
The Adidas Terrex Fast R GTX is a robust trail running shoe for anyone who needs support, durability and waterproof protection. It is reliable over any type of outdoor terrain and sturdy enough to function extremely well. Given all the positive praised, the Terrex Fast R GTX is indeed a worthy investment."
Salomon Speedcross Pro 2,,91.0,,79.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The Salomon Speedcross Pro 2 had reliable grip, based on some Consumers mentioned that they used the shoe on tight trails, slushed sidewalks and streets without slipping.
One tester said that she did not feel any soreness on her feet even after 12 hours of standing and walking.
Most runners agreed that the inside feel was comfortable.
One user noticed that the shoe felt lighter than the Speedcross 3 and 4.
Another tester was happy that it was ready to be used for running right off the box. There was no need to break it in.
2 reasons not to buy
Almost all reviewers observed that the fit ran long and narrow. Most mentioned that these unfamiliar measurements were not good for the lateral stability of the foot.
One user noticed that the interior of the Spreedcross Pro 2 felt less padded compared with the Speedcross 3.
Bottom line
The Salomon Speedcross Pro 2 is a premium, trail running shoe that has received a lot of praise from runners and users alike. Most were impressed with the grip and traction that it provided. Regarding comfort, it also did not disappoint. There were some complaints about the fit as it proved long and narrow. Despite this, many still found the Speedcross Pro 2 to be an excellent addition to their Salomon collection."
Asics Gel Kayano 24 Lite-Show,,91.0,,4855.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 9.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 13mm,,, Asics Gel Kayano 25 Lite-Show,"8 reasons to buy
Some testers commented that the Asics Gel Kayano 24 Lite-Show has a roomy toe box.
Most of the runners loved its improved heel clutch system.
A handful of consumers appreciated the soft underfoot feel of the shoe.
A good number of reviewers lauded its great-looking appearance and style.
Several consumers noted that the product was lightweight supportive.
A lot of users observed that the shoe was best for indoor and outdoor activities.
Many testers agreed that the shoe fitted perfectly for them.
According to those who have tried it, they felt no foot pain while wearing the shoe.
1 reasons not to buy
The majority of the consumers said that the Asics Gel Kayano 24 Lite-Show is expensive.
Bottom line
A lot of consumers commented that the Asics Gel Kayano 24 Lite-Show was a comfortable, supportive and lightweight running shoe. They appreciated its roomy toe box and improved heel clutch system. They said that the fit was perfect. As a result, they felt no pain while on the roads. They loved wearing the product not only in outdoor running and walking sessions but also in different indoor activities. Although some of them said that the price was not budget-friendly, others still recommended the Asics Gel Kayano 24 Lite-Show because of its versatility."
Nike Air Zoom Vomero 10,,93.0,90.0,327.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Nike Air Zoom Vomero 14,"9 reasons to buy
Despite the noticeable firmness, most runners still loved the comfortable ride of the Vomero 10.
Many reviewers were surprised by the light ride of this shoe.
The lightweight upper offers good support without overlays.
Several comments mentioned how smooth the transition was in their runs.
Flywire cables enhance the fit and midfoot hold.
The full internal sleeve increases plush fit and comfort.
The cushioning is really good without that being squishy, noted several.
It is lighter than the previous model.
The traction is excellent, according to some.
3 reasons not to buy
The price is too stiff for many.
A handful noted that the outsole wore out quickly.
Some needed time break-in time in the 10th version of the Vomero.
Bottom line
The Nike Vomero 10 is a reliable and lightweight trainer that can tackle long-distances with ease and comfort. There is a new firmness in the midsole that only enhances the support and responsive feel of this shoe. With a newly redesigned Flywire design, runners can get a very personalized fit for a comfortable run from beginning to end."
Under Armour HOVR Phantom SE Glow,,77.0,,6.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 10.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The HOVR Phantom SE Glow is comfortable, based on reviews. 
People are happy because it enables them to track their performance. 
Some commenters praised the overall quality of the shoe. 
It is supportive, according to a reviewer. 
Buyers loved the shoe’s stylish design.
3 reasons not to buy
A runner reported that the shoe is not able to track performance when running in a remote area. 
A disappointed user mentioned that the heel compartment is not durable. 
The shoe is tight, according to a consumer. 
Bottom line
The Under Armour HOVR Phantom SE Glow is a neutral running shoe that is designed to accommodate runners who need cushioning, flexibility and versatility. It is manufactured using cozy materials to provide optimal comfort and breathability during the entire running session. This stylish running shoe is also suitable for work and casual walks. "
Reebok All Terrain Thunder 2.0,,81.0,76.0,109.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.4oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
The All Terrain Thunder 2.0 works best in the mud and on water with its drain holes in the toe box area, according to some testers.
The upper, which is made of Terrain skin technology, is a good feature that most testers appreciated in this shoe.
Water drains out well.
The Reebok All Terrain Thunder 2.0 dries out fast during the run and after washing as experienced by a handful of users.
The speed lace system is easy to do without holding the lace, especially when it is already muddy, according to testers.
Washing the shoe after the run is as easy as wearing them noted some runners.
The treads underneath allow the runner to get through soft and muddy grounds based on the remarks of a few testers.
According to several runners, it looks great, feels great, and works great.
4 reasons not to buy
Heavy shoe due to the treads.
Too stiff and sturdy as observed by testers.
It fits wide and big according to many runners who tried it.
The Velcro that holds and locks the lace comes undone through the course according to runners.
Bottom line
The Reebok All Terrain Thunder 2.0 is the all-terrain trail running shoe that offers a very reliable shoe to get you through obstacle races in the wild and the muddy grounds. Its tread and sole are intended to allow safe and easy running on wet or tough trails, but they make the shoe heavy. Although it is a bit wider, it makes a great running buddy on the wild areas. Because of the All Terrain Thunder 2.0’s performance and quality, it is a shoe that is well worth the stiff price tag."
Scott Kinabalu RC,,81.0,86.0,6.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,, Scott Kinabalu RC 2.0,"7 reasons to buy
Some runners mentioned that he Scott Kinabalu RC was one of the best running shoes they have ever purchased.
Several reviewers agreed that this shoe was suitably lightweight and durable.
This shoe was not only ideal for trail running, but also for long walks, according to a buyer.
A good number of testers were pleased with the shoe’s new foam cushioning.
According to some reviewers, the shoe was optimized for trail running activities.
Few consumers commented that the shoe performed better when compared to previous models.
One of the buyers said that the shoe worked superbly on wet surfaces.
3 reasons not to buy
According to some runners, the shoe was expensive.
Some testers mentioned that they had issues with the outsole durability.
Few testers commented that the shoe does not have a breathable upper.
Bottom line
A good number of testers agreed that the Scott Kinabalu RC was a durable and lightweight option for trail running. They were pleased with its performance and responsiveness. Some runners also mentioned that the updated foam cushioning was great. Although there were testers who commented that the shoe didn’t have an affordable price, some reviewers still recommended it because it provided enough traction on wet and dry terrains."
Salomon S-Lab Sonic,,81.0,88.0,14.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Salomon S-Lab Sonic 2,"5 reasons to buy
The Salomon S-Lab Sonic is very lightweight.
The light upper built is also very breathable as mentioned in some reviews.
The outsole of the shoe is very durable and delivers enough traction while running on the road.
Has enough room for toe splay.
Many runners noticed the flexibility of the shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
It is an ultra expensive running shoe.
The upper mesh wears out quickly.
Bottom line
The Salomon S-Lab Sonic is an impressively light running shoe designed for neutral foot motion. It performs well on the road and great on daily training and high mileage runs. The shoe delivers great amount of cushioning, flexibility and outsole durability."
Altra Lone Peak 3.0 NeoShell Low,,92.0,95.0,94.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The majority admired the shoe’s capability of resisting water as it kept the foot dry and cool, even in harsh climates.
Most runners thought that this product was made using very durable materials, which allowed it to perform exceedingly well on rough terrains.
The purchasers noted how the Altra Lone Peak 3.0 Neoshell Low delivered optimal levels of weather resistance and breathability.
The users were impressed with the outsole unit’s amazing traction on wet surfaces.
A few runners praised the snug fit of the shoe since it made their feet feel protected during longer runs or workouts.
A few purchasers highlighted the lightweight cushioning because it helped them in covering longer distances without worrying about the chafing or fatigue.
A looks-conscious customer thought that the shoe had an incredible aesthetic look.
3 reasons not to buy
Some purchasers mentioned that they preferred the Altra Lone Peak 2.5 over this shoe since the earlier version provided a better fit.
A user did not like the newly added feature of the heel cup in the shoe as it apparently caused some irritation in the back of his foot.
A runner found its fit a little bit narrow for his feet.
Bottom line
With its incredible gripping qualities, high water resistance and optimal lightweight cushioning, the Altra Lone Peak 3.0 Neoshell Low is now in the limelight among the running fanatics. It is, indeed, a very wise option for neutral runners looking for high weather resistance and breathability in a shoe."
Reebok Floatride Fuel Run,,83.0,,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The upper unit of the Reebok Floatride Fuel Run is breathable according to many users.
People have stated that the materials that are present in this neutral running shoe are durable.
Most testers consider this shoe to be lightweight.
Most purchasers have commented that this shoe has an affordable price.
Consumers are happy with the traction capacity of the outsole unit.
2 reasons not to buy
Several runners have complained about the forefoot section’s apparently restrictive construction.
A few testers are stating that the raised sidewalls of the midsole have a tendency to irritate the arch.
Bottom line
The Reebok Floatride Fuel Run is aiming to be a reliable partner for speed training sessions. The overall design of this road running shoe centers on straightforward performance, with a welcoming upper unit working alongside a responsive underfoot platform to encourage speedy and agreeable steps. Also, a relatively affordable price tag allows this product to be sought by entry-level runners."
Saucony Hurricane ISO 2 Reflex,,76.0,,18.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
The Saucony Hurricane ISO 2 Reflex gained praise for its use of reflective materials that enhance visibility.
The visual aesthetic of this shoe was appreciated by many consumers.
The underfoot cushioning felt comfortable, according to a lot of those who have tried it.
The forefoot area’s foam platform was plush and responsive, stated a tester.
According to several reviewers, this shoe was true-to-size.
The midfoot support system of this unit received recognition from runners who needed some stability.
The upper fabric was adequately breathable, noted some purchasers.
Runners were able to use this for long races and they didn’t feel any discomfort during these running sessions.
Some runners consider the Reflex model of the Saucony Hurricane ISO 2 as an amazing gym shoe.
4 reasons not to buy
The heel area of the cushioning system felt a bit stiff for one tester.
The toe box could use a little more room, based on the observations of a handful of buyers.
Some runners required a break in period to get really comfortable in this shoe.
There were a few who were frustrated with the shoe’s durability.
Bottom line
The Saucony Hurricane ISO 2 Reflex performed well for many of those who have tried it. The stability mechanic that’s present in this running shoe was lauded because purchasers felt that it was efficient and precise. The reflective upper also garnered positive attention from those who preferred nighttime running."
Nike LunarEpic Low Flyknit,,86.0,80.0,412.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.1oz , Women: 7.7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Nike LunarEpic Low Flyknit 2,"6 reasons to buy
Most runners mentioned that the shoe is comfortable and feels light.
The upper construction provides a seamless, sock-like fit.
A number of runners were satisfied with the durability of the Nike LunarEpic Flyknit Low.
The shoe provides a plush and flexible ride, according to some reviews.
Available in many color options.
True to size.
3 reasons not to buy
Some users complained that small debris get stuck in the sole and hard to remove.
The shoe lacks the needed support as mentioned in some user reviews.
It is expensive.
Bottom line
The Nike LunarEpic Flyknit Low is a road running shoe designed for neutral foot movement. This shoe provides a blend of cushioning, comfort and responsive ride. It is great to use for daily training and short mile runs. Though the shoe received a few negative comments, some happy users still appreciate and found the shoe as a worthy investment."
Mizuno Wave Sonic 2,,,,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 6.3oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,
Nike Air Max 2016,,89.0,80.0,593.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 13.3oz , Women: 11.4oz, Men: 13mm , Women: 13mm,,, Nike Air Max 2017,"9 reasons to buy
The Nike Air Max 2016 was suitably lightweight for many testers.
The variety of colors that are available for this model made it aesthetically appealing, noted some runners.
Many took note that this running shoe was ‘comfortable’.
Several users wrote that the upper unit’s fabrics were smooth and non-irritating to the skin.
It had an adequate width and length, according to a number of reviewers; their feet acclimated well to it.
The 2016 model was more superior compared to its predecessor when it came to its features and service, some runners commented.
The underfoot cushioning gained praise for its springy and responsive performance.
A reviewer wrote that the shoe was a bit heavy, but not cumbersome.
Some testers stated that with the responsive mid-sole, the heel-to-toe transitions became smooth and effortless.
2 reasons not to buy
The Nike Air Max 2016 looked awkwardly bulky for several testers, and they wrote that the bulky look didn’t make it visually endearing.
Some runners reported that the Air Max unit of this shoe burst, rendering the mid-sole unit virtually unusable.
Bottom line
The Nike Air Max 2016 was trusted by many runners with neutral gaits and under-pronated foot motion. For them, the mid-sole supported their feet and gave adequate cushioning. They were able to run comfortably using this product. The upper also received great reviews because of the smoothness of the coverage. But it wasn’t very endearing to a number of testers. They stated that it wasn’t a great investment because the Air Max platform burst on them, as if it was made from cheap materials."
Under Armour SpeedForm Velociti Graphic, Under Armour,83.0,,74.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
The fabrics of the Under Armour SpeedForm Velociti Graphic’s upper unit are praised for delivering a secure yet flexible coverage.
A handful of purchasers have expressed their happiness with the breathable silhouette.
Some testers have mentioned that the underfoot cushioning system is responsive enough.
A few runners claim that the midsole has a thicker structure which contributes to a fuller underfoot feel.
The lightweight nature of this Under Armour running shoe is welcomed by many consumers.
The flexibility of this product is lauded by runners.
2 reasons not to buy
A few testers claim that the forefoot section of the upper unit has a tendency to rub irritatingly against the skin of the foot.
A couple of people have noticed the heel cup rubbing against the ankles.
Bottom line
All-in-all, people love the Under Armour SpeedForm Velociti Graphic. This running shoe is a solid choice for daily exercise sessions. The midsole unit’s reactive yet robust construction and the upper’s breathable and form-fitting design are the highlighted elements. On the other hand, some reviewers have criticized the irritating in-shoe experience given by the upper unit.
Fans of road running shoes that cater to the neutral pronation of the foot are the target market of the SpeedForm Velociti Graphic."
Merrell Nova Rainbow,,83.0,,8.0,,, Trail, Neutral,,,,,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The flexibility of the Merrell Nova Rainbow’s construction allows it to function well in a variety of activities, according to several testers.
Those who have tested this running shoe are happy with the versatility of its lightweight structure.
The rainbow color scheme is welcomed because it is eye-catching and able to make the product appealing as a casual sneaker.
A handful of consumers have exclaimed their appreciation for the responsive midsole unit of this Merrell trail running shoe.
The aggressive lug configuration is lauded for having flat ends that still encourage steady steps on even planes.
Various testers believe that the forefoot section has a roomy construction that permits the natural splaying of the toes.
2 reasons not to buy
The minimal ankle support is lamented by some runners who desire a bit more security from the collar.
A few reviews tackle the upper unit and its apparently quick-to-rip nature.
Bottom line
People are generally happy with the Merrell Nova Rainbow and what it has to offer. This trail running shoe is deemed efficient and versatile, especially when handling daily tasks. The colorful facade has been highlighted as the element that elevates the performance-to-fashion capacity of the design. On the other hand, the flimsy collar hug and some instances of the upper fabrics ripping apart make up the negative points.
Enthusiasts of neutral running shoes that are for the off-road paths are the target market of the Merrell Nova Rainbow."
Newton Sir Isaac S,,86.0,,24.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.6oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Many customers described the Newton Sir Isaac S as comfortable.
The midsole has provided fantastic support and cushioning, according to several wearers.
A couple of users reported that the pains on their knees and shins were gone after using the Sir Isaac S.
The shoe gave an excellent performance during races, as experienced by a runner.
A lot of users expressed that the shoe felt great even when worn right out of the box.
1 reasons not to buy
Some wearers thought the Sir Isaac S was slightly heavy.
Bottom line
Majority of the users were welcoming and happy about the comeback of the Newton Sir Isaac S. Numerous commenters stated they have purchased more than one pair because of how efficient their running is with the shoe. While some were not a fan of the shoe’s weight, its comfort level and supportive quality were more significant."
Merrell All Out Crush 2 GTX,,86.0,,113.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.9oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The waterproof capacity of this running shoe’s upper unit was lauded by testers.
The comfort given by the midsole foam was noticeable, a purchaser observed.
Several consumers stated that the general quality of the materials used for the Merrell All Out Crush 2 GTX was reliable.
The aesthetics of this product were appreciated for being pleasant to the eyes.
A couple of users felt that the toe box was broad enough to accommodate toe-splay.
The arch was well-supported by the midsole, claimed a runner.
1 reasons not to buy
A few individuals complained that fit was a bit narrow.
Bottom line
The Merrell All Out Crush 2 GTX is a waterproof running shoe that was received well by its purchasers. Many neutral runners were happy of this trail companion’s waterproof upper, the comfortable underfoot platform, and the high-quality design. Moreover, they liked its apparently good-looking façade. On the other hand, some testers felt that the width was inconsistent."
Adidas Ultraboost 2.0, Adidas,82.0,90.0,7.0,$180,$170 (save 50%), Road, Stability,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
The majority of the users say that the Adidas Ultraboost 2.0 has eye-catching colorways.
The running shoe is best used for walking and running and gym activities, according to those who have tried it.
Based on several reviews, it is comfortable.
A lot of testers love its snug fit.
Several purchasers agree that the shoe is stylish.
Many buyers are amazed by the quality of this running shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
A significant number of consumers say that the shoe is not true to size. According to them, it runs bigger than usual.
Some of the buyers noted that the width of the shoe is narrow.
Bottom line
The response for the Adidas Ultraboost 2.0 was very positive. According to consumers who have tried it, the shoe was stylish and comfortable. They were delighted with what they have experienced during their walking and running sessions. Aside from its design, users were happy with the shoe's excellent structure and quality. On the other hand, some testers had issues with its width and size, but these problems did not stop others from buying this pair of shoes. Overall, the Adidas Ultraboost 2.0 is still recommended by many because of the quality, performance, and experience the runners will be able to enjoy from this stability running shoe."
Asics Gel Fujirado,,87.0,79.0,71.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 9.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Some testers commented that the Asics Gel Fujirado was comfortable.
A handful of purchasers admired the snug fit of the shoe.
Most of the runners said that it runs true to size.
Several consumers agreed that the shoe was lightweight in structure.
According to those who have bought it, the lace system was incredible.
A lot of testers were impressed with the shoe's perfect grip on a wide variety of surfaces.
Numerous runners said that it was supportive.
As noted by many buyers, the Asics Gel Fujirado was durable.
4 reasons not to buy
Some of the testers noted that the upper area was not breathable.
Based on observations, the shoe has a firm midsole.
A good number of buyers said that it was expensive.
Several runners were disappointed because of the shoe's poor cushioning.
Bottom line
In general, a handful of consumers agreed that the Asics Gel Fujirado is an excellent deal for those who want to spend extra bucks for a supportive, snug-fitting and comfortable running shoe. They were satisfied with the shoe's lace system. They admired the durability of the outsole as well. Although some were disappointed because of the shoe's breathability and poor cushioning, others still lauded its excellent traction and fantastic lace system."
Brooks Caldera 2,,92.0,93.0,76.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Brooks Caldera 4,"7 reasons to buy
The tread in the outsole was efficient even without a rock plate, according to a runner.
The Brooks Caldera 2 was a versatile shoe that brought a remarkable performance no matter the terrain, distance, or pace, wrote a reviewer.
A runner commented that the midsole offered a soft, but not mushy, underfoot cushioning.
The outsole gave excellent stability and promoted foot agility, a tester remarked.
One user said the lugs were aggressive enough to handle even snow; while another mentioned that the grip was superb on wet rock and mud.
Some wearers agreed that the Caldera 2 gave a smooth ride, as well as exceptional support and stability.
A reviewer appreciated the BioMoGo DNA cushioning that was well-cushioned and was able to leave the foot and leg feeling fresh.
3 reasons not to buy
A runner said the toe box was too cramped and narrow.
Another purchaser said the Brooks Caldera 2 gave their foot blisters.
One reviewer felt the outsole was too stiff and that it lacked ground sensitivity.
Bottom line
It is worth noting that Brooks achieved success based on the number of praises for the Caldera 2. Numerous positive feedback was towards the efficiency of the shoe’s construction and the quality of performance it delivered. There were only a few bad experiences from users regarding fit and feel. Overall, the Caldera 2 was an above average trail running shoe – although not perfect – but still worth recommending."
Inov-8 X-Talon 210,,,96.0,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 7.4oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 3mm , Women: 3mm,,,,
The North Face Ultra Vertical,,90.0,83.0,19.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 10.8oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The gripping lugs of The North Face Ultra Vertical’s outsole offered reliable traction on the surfaces, according to a lot of testers.
The fit was very agreeable, based on general feedback.
‘Comfortable’ was a word that’s frequently used to describe the experience with this running shoe.
Some people were able to use this product for daily walks and casual events, noting that it remained reliable throughout those activities.
The quality and construction of the materials and components were deemed dependable.
Several consumers were happy with the weight of this running shoe, claiming that it was suitably lightweight.
1 reasons not to buy
The material used in the upper unit was a bit hard, according to a tester. He felt it rubbing uncomfortably against the foot.
Bottom line
Many runners were happy with The North Face Ultra Vertical. They noted that it was a well-made shoe and that it gave them the quality and performance that they needed. There was an isolated complaint about the upper unit being uncomfortable, but it didn’t overshadow the overall positive feedback for this product."
Puma Ignite Disc,,90.0,82.0,77.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11oz , Women: 9.3oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The Ignite Disc is unbelievably comfortable, according to most reviews.
A form-fitting fit that can be had in a split second is greatly appreciated by a good number of runners.
So many of the users utilize the shoe for casual wear.
It has an eye-catching design that makes can be likened to a fashion statement, based on the comments of some.
The breathable mesh ensures a cool and sweat-free run.
It is flexible.
It runs light, noted several runners.
3 reasons not to buy
The Disc system was quickly broken in the shoes of a few runners.
Many consider the price as too stiff.
Several runners were disappointed by the 12mm heel drop.
Bottom line
Puma’s revolutionary Disc Fit system is relaunched in the Ignite Disc. It is now lighter, sleeker, and faster-tuning than the original model. It creates a glove-like fit with a simple twist of the disc. Puma offers not only a foot-hugging upper by a very responsive ride through the Ignite foam. The shoe has a moderate arch support and tons of comfort for logging the miles."
Adidas Supernova Sequence Boost 7, Adidas,90.0,86.0,162.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The engineered mesh upper adapts to many types of feet and gives breathable coverage.
A sock-like fit is employed in the Adidas Supernova Sequence Boost 7 to keep the foot free from irritation.
The mid-sole features an EVA stable frame to provide full-length support to the foot.
The boost™ technology gives high quality cushioning and springiness to every step.
The TORSION® SYSTEM assists the foot in achieving a more balanced stride.
Runners welcomed the inclusion of the medial and lateral supports, which stabilize the gait of over-pronators.
The outsole has a rubber compound that’s able to hold onto dry and wet surfaces with ease.
2 reasons not to buy
A few testers didn’t feel the arch support that this shoe was supposed to provide.
Others didn’t like the color scheme of the Supernova Sequence Boost 7, which was bland and muted for them.
Bottom line
Comfortable and stable, the 7th version of the Supernova Sequence Boost from Adidas provides runners with service that is reliable and effective. Though its looks aren’t too eye-catching, it still works well for those who want to get a robust running experience on the roads."
Adidas Terrex X King,,90.0,86.0,180.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 9.6oz,,, Apr 2016,,,"9 reasons to buy
The general durability of the Adidas Terrex X King received some praise from those who have tried it.
Several runners were able to use this running shoe for a variety of trail-specific activities, and they wrote that it stayed efficient and intact.
It was reasonably lightweight, according to a number of consumers.
The outsole’s capability to deliver traction was lauded by many trail enthusiasts.
A lot of runners agreed that this shoe was true-to-size.
Its design had a positive effect on many of its purchasers; they stated that it was visually endearing.
Runners described this running shoe as comfortable and reliable.
Some consumers were able to use this shoe on the roads and they wrote that they didn’t feel any discomfort while doing so.
A reviewer noted that though cushioning system wasn’t too substantial, it was helpful in keeping the foot comfortable, even when traversing aggressive terrain.
3 reasons not to buy
The locking mechanism of the lacing system wasn’t as efficient, according to a tester; the string laces came loose easily for them.
A reviewer reported that there was a bit of twisting in the heel during their running session.
It’s an expensive shoe, noted several consumers.
Bottom line
Based on the feedback of runners, the Adidas Terrex X King was a success. For them, it performed admirably and surely. They welcomed its unique design, its protective components, and its trail-optimized features. It was able to deliver great service to neutral runners, though a few had some qualms with some of its components."
Reebok Astroride 2D, Reebok,71.0,,5.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 8oz,,,, Normal | Normal,,"8 reasons to buy
The majority appreciated the excellent cushioning of the Reebok Astroride 2D.
A few individuals admired the good quality of the shoe.
Several runners appreciated the agreeably snug fit of the upper.
A few purchasers mentioned that the light weight of the shoe made it easier to run in these shoes.
Some customers liked the overall look of the shoe.
An individual lauded the reasonable price of the footwear.
A runner praised the inner sole of the Reebok Astroride 2D since it made him feel like he was hitting the ground with less impact which reduced the strain on his legs.
A wearer said that the shoe had excellent grip on the wet surfaces.
1 reasons not to buy
For several runners, the sole started to come off after only a few miles of running.
Bottom line
The Reebok Astroride 2D is a neutral shoe most suitable for purchasers looking for a good quality road running footwear at a reasonable price. The shoe offers high comfortability, enhanced flexibility and an excellent grip on asphaltic surfaces. Also, its stylish looks make it a preferable choice for most fashionistas."
New Balance Fresh Foam Gobi Trail v2,,95.0,92.0,111.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.1oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,, New Balance Fresh Foam Gobi Trail v3,"6 reasons to buy
Several consumers were happy to note that the New Balance Fresh Foam Gobi Trail v2 was able to give an agreeable fit.
The design and color options for this running shoe were appreciated by those who have tested it.
Some runners stated that it was efficient as both a running shoe and an option for daily walks.
The durability and quality of the materials were held in high regard by a handful of people.
The price was deemed affordable.
This trail companion was lauded for being lightweight.
3 reasons not to buy
According to a few users, the heel area wasn’t able to lock the foot in place and that it tended to cause some slippage.
Several runners claimed that the outsole tread peeled off after only a few uses.
Based on some reviews, the underfoot platform could’ve benefited from an arch stabilizing mechanism.
Bottom line
The New Balance Fresh Foam Gobi Trail v2 was well-received by trail-running enthusiasts and other consumers. They welcomed its adequate width profiles, its agreeable color options, its affordability, and its versatility. But there were those who complained of heel slippage, inconsistent outsole durability, and an unstable midsole construction."
Puma Ignite Limitless SR, Puma,88.0,,324.0,$115,$38 (save 67%), Road, Neutral,,,,, Feb 2018, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
The design of the Puma Ignite Limitless SR was lauded by many shoe-enthusiasts.
Many considered the price of this shoe to be affordable.
The heel section of the platform helped the upper in supporting the foot and keeping it in place, a consumer noted.
The width profile of this running shoe agreed to the expectations of many testes.
The upper unit was breathable, several people observed.
2 reasons not to buy
The durability of the materials wasn’t really appreciated; people had seen the upper and outsole wearing off after only a few uses.
A disgruntled consumer claimed that the upper offered a very loose fit.
Bottom line
The Puma Ignite Limitless SR was well-liked by most of its purchasers. Its affordable price, appealing looks, and comfortable underfoot cushioning were highlighted. Inversely, the durability of this neutral shoe wasn’t appreciated by runners who complained of early material breakdown. The width profile was also in contention as some believed it to be correct while others felt that it was loose."
Inov-8 Roadclaw 275,,84.0,80.0,113.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Inov-8 Roadclaw 275 v2,"5 reasons to buy
Many applauded the lightweight construction of the Inov-8 Roadclaw 275.
The upper is breathable and comfortable to the foot, based on some reviews.
The sole gives necessary traction especially on wet surfaces.
The meta-flex grooves made the shoe very flexible.
The shoe runs true to size.
2 reasons not to buy
The shoe is available in limited color options.
Some testers noticed that the outer sole wears out quickly.
Bottom line
The Inov-8 Roadclaw 275 is a road running shoe designed for neutral runners. It is designed to deliver the maximum amount of traction while running on the road. Though a few noticed that the shoe lacks the expected durability, the majority are still happy with how it performs. This shoe is ideal for daily training and long distance road running."
Adidas Climachill Cosmic Boost,,80.0,82.0,41.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 7.7oz , Women: 6.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Jun 2015,,,"7 reasons to buy
Some runners took note of the shoe's flexible and supportive upper.
The Seamless Primeknit offers a sock-like fit, thus maintaining a non-irritating environment for the skin.
During warm conditions, the shoe provides reliable ventilation, according to some reviews.
The Boost foam tech help the runner get more propulsive energy by providing a plush and responsive underfoot platform.
The sole unit offers flexibility and natural movement.
The outsole features a rubber material that delivers dependable traction.
Available in several color options.
4 reasons not to buy
Some runners complained that there was a noticeable rubbing and chafing in the instep that irritates the foot.
The fit is small and narrow.
The testers felt that the inner sleeve needed padding to secure the foot well and reduce irritation.
Socks may get wet when running on wet ground because the upper isn’t waterproof.
Bottom line
The Adidas Climachill Cosmic Boost is a well-cushioned stability running shoe. The Climachill tech maintains constant breathable coverage, and though it doesn’t do well when it comes to staving off moisture or keeping water off at all, it is still worth spending for if you are an active runner."
Adidas Response ST,,80.0,,14.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.7oz , Women: 10oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
A lot of people liked the visual aspect of the Adidas Response ST; they stated that this shoe was pleasing to the eyes.
‘Comfortable’ was a word that was used to describe the experience of wearing this road companion.
The upper unit felt soft and smooth against the skin, several people noted.
A couple of consumers felt that the overall quality of the materials was top-notch.
The midsole was able to support flat arches properly, several testers commented.
Most runners stated that the lightweight nature of the Response ST allowed them to wear it all day.
1 reasons not to buy
The shoe fits too narrow to some wearers.
Bottom line
The Adidas Response ST was able to captivate a lot of those who have tested it. This stability shoe apparently performed well on the roads. The lightweight shoe design, cool aesthetics, comfortable underfoot platform, and stable midfoot were highlighted as the aspects that were most noticeable. On the other hand, the fit leaves much to be desired, based on several reviews."
Asics NitroFuze,,80.0,,210.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics NitroFuze 2,"10 reasons to buy
Many runners enjoyed the appealing design of the Asics NitroFuze.
Several testers noted that this running shoe was agreeably lightweight.
A reviewer commented that it was also good for casual use.
‘Comfortable’ was a word that many used in order to describe their time wearing this product.
Purchasers were able to use this for running and working out, and they wrote that it remained efficient.
The versatility of this running shoe extended towards sports, and a tester noted that it handled such activities with ease.
The fit was adequate, according to those who have tried it.
The general durability of this shoe’s components received some praise; runners wrote that it held up pretty well.
According to some reviewers, the cushioning system was lightweight, but responsive.
The rubber material in the outsole was lauded because it provided reliable surface traction.
1 reasons not to buy
A tester complained that their feet got sweaty while wearing this shoe.
Bottom line
The Asics NitroFuze performed really well, according to those who have worn it. They wrote that it was comfortable and efficient on the roads. Some of them were even able to use it for activities other than running. Generally, it became a trusted shoe for those with neutral foot pronation, though there was a tester who felt that it lacked ventilation."
Puma Ignite v2 PWRCOOL,,75.0,,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.5oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Many runners wrote that wearing the Puma Ignite v2 PWRCOOL kept their feet comfortable.
According to some reviewers, it was suitably lightweight.
Its aesthetics gained some appreciation from runners who enjoyed its eye-catching design and color schemes.
It was true-to-size, noted a number of purchasers.
It was the best-fitting shoe for a purchaser; for them, it was able to hug the foot in a snug, secure and all-encompassing manner.
Runners enjoyed the PWRCOOL technology, saying that it was efficient in providing a cool and dry coverage, including the underside of the foot.
The cushioning system was able to provide responsive performances, wrote several consumers.
The durable rubber of the outsole didn’t disappoint the testers.
2 reasons not to buy
The color scheme looked a bit too bright for a runner.
It felt a bit narrow for a tester.
Bottom line
The Puma Ignite v2 PWRCOOL was liked by many. It was able to deliver the same comfortable service as the regular version of the Ignite v2, but with the added cooling effect of the PWRCOOL print in the tongue, heel and insole. This road shoe become a reliable choice for neutral runners. A few had some complaints, but such minor oddities didn’t stop them from enjoying this version."
New Balance Fresh Foam Zante v3,,88.0,89.0,542.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,, New Balance Fresh Foam Zante v4,"11 reasons to buy
The 3rd version of the Zante is amazingly comfortable, according to many of the reviewers.
At $100, the price is easily worth the value.
Several runners loved the added stability in this shoe.
The Zante 3 has more substantial reflective details than any of the past models.
It remains to be very light.
A handful of runners valued the shoe’s traction, even on wet surfaces.
A good number of reviewers noticed that it is very breathable.
Some runners felt really fast because of the firmer ride.
Optional widths are available.
A few runners said that they received complimentary looks while wearing the Fresh Foam Zante v3.
Some expert reviewers agreed that the shoe is more responsive and efficient than the prior model.Some expert reviewers agreed that the shoe is more responsive and efficient than the prior model.
2 reasons not to buy
More than a few experts consider the New Balance Zante v3 as a couple of levels below the ride quality and performance of the original Zante.
A handful of reviewers found it to be a hair smaller and narrower than the previous editions.
Bottom line
The Zante v3 is easily one of New Balance’s most popular and sought after shoes. Not only because of the very reasonable $100 price tag, but also because of the magic brought about by the original shoe’s release. It brings a stiffer, more stable, and faster ride than any of the past models. The shoe may not necessarily keep the original’s fans, but should also gain a new following of its own. At its price point, it is hard NOT to see and enjoy what this shoe brings to the table."
Nike Free RN Distance Shield,,86.0,,640.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.1oz , Women: 7.3oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"10 reasons to buy
Comfort is considered by many as the best asset of the Free RN Distance Shield.
The deep hexagonal configuration in the outsole delivers exceptional flexibility in a well-cushioned shoe.
According to some reviewers, the shoe runs even lighter than its weight shows.
There is more cushioning in this shoe than any in the Free series when the aim is to go the distance.
There are 4 stylish color options.
More than a few received enviable looks from other runners.
The ride is buttery smooth, based on a handful of observations.
It is a lightweight trainer that can be a superb race day shoe.
Reflective details help runners become more visible at night or early dawn.
A handful of runners have used it for gym workouts or for casual wear.
4 reasons not to buy
Some runners were disappointed by the price increase due to the addition of the Shield technology.
Outsole durability was an issue, according to a couple of runners.
It runs a bit smaller.
A number of very few runners felt that the upper was too loose.
Bottom line
The Free RN Distance Shield is Nike’s attempt to make a very popular shoe even more versatile with the addition of a water-repellent upper. It is the first in the Free series where the cushioning can really take the runner comfortably for longer distances. The shoe has amazing comfort, enough arch support, unbelievable flexibility, and promotes a natural running motion that few others can match. This is a neutral shoe that offers a superior combination of performance and style."
Reebok Liquifect Spring, Reebok,85.0,,7.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
The Reebok Liquifect Spring is considered a lightweight running shoe for all-day use.
Some testers have noted that the breathability of the upper unit is reliable and ever-present.
The cushioning system of this product is welcomed by most consumers who appreciate supportive midsole units.
People are stating that the Liquifect Spring has an affordable price.
The grip of the outsole unit is considered efficient and accommodating, based on more than a handful of reviews.
2 reasons not to buy
Several consumers have noted that the in-shoe experience is generally restrictive.
A few people have noted that the raised arch of the midsole has a tendency to irritate the underfoot.
Bottom line
The Liquifect Spring is a Reebok running shoe that is meant to provide reliable performance on the roads. The sporty yet uncluttered design works to provide an expectation that this model can function well as a companion for speed training exercises. A supportive midsole unit works with a traction-ready outsole to ensure confident steps on the asphalt."
Nike Flex Fury,,91.0,80.0,432.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.4oz , Women: 6.8oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,, Nike Flex Fury 2,"8 reasons to buy
A great number of runners welcomed the cool-looking design of the Nike Flex Fury.
The color schemes of this shoe made a positive impression on those who tried it.
Many users commented about this model’s lightweight nature, writing that they were satisfied with it.
A lot of reviewers wrote that this shoe was comfortable for their feet.
There were runners who stated that it was able to fit them nicely.
The cushioning system was efficient and responsive, according to consumers.
The grip of the outsole didn’t disappoint the testers.
The flexibility of this shoe was lauded because it allowed the foot to move as naturally as possible.
3 reasons not to buy
The mesh material used in the upper was hard to clean, noted a tester.
The insole tended to slip away, according to a reviewer.
The lacing system kept unraveling on a runner, which annoyed them.
Bottom line
Neutral runners were able to enjoy the natural performance given by the Nike Flex Fury. This road shoe became their go-to footwear for their running sessions. They welcomed its flexible and agreeable nature. But a few weren’t able to acclimate well to some of its components, saying that they were a bit flimsy."
Puma Speed Racer, Puma,,92.0,,$120,$36 (save 70%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,
Asics Gel Zaraca 4,,89.0,,775.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The breathable upper unit features a mesh material and a thin layer of synthetic overlays for support.
Most of the testers appreciated the mesh lining, which offers a comfortable in-shoe experience.
Runners who have neutral foot pronation are the ones who are going to fully appreciate how the Zaraca 4 was constructed.
The Gel Cushioning System, which is located in the heel area, gives shock absorption to the runner.
The Asics High Abrasion Resistant rubber compound covers the outsole unit, making it more protected and secured.
The Gel Zaraca 4 is affordable.
2 reasons not to buy
The 4th version of the Zaraca has a moderately heavy weight.
Some runners felt that the toe box of this shoe was narrow, rubbing against their toes uncomfortably.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Zaraca 4 is a neutral shoe that anyone can enjoy for their daily activities. It provided runners with durable protection, comfortable underfoot experience, and a well-ventilated upper unit. The shoe is a good option for those who are looking for an affordable yet reliable road running partner."
Newton Motion V,,89.0,86.0,104.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 8.4oz , Women: 6.9oz, Men: 3mm , Women: 3mm,,, Newton Motion 9,"5 reasons to buy
Many runners were happy with the Motion V’s lightweight construction.
The shoe is extremely comfortable as mentioned in several reviews.
This updated version of the Motion uses the new reinforced eyelets, new padded tongue and updated heel counter for an improved fit.
This shoe features the new 4-way stretch mesh metatarsal panels for additional comfort.
It has 360 degrees of reflectivity for visibility while running in low-light environments.
2 reasons not to buy
The Newton Motion V is expensive.
Some were disappointed by the light colors of this shoe.
Bottom line
The Newton Motion V is a stability running shoe that is improved to provide fast and comfortable runs. It is ideal for uptempo runs, racing and daily training. With the impressive technologies available, this shoe will not disappoint any runner."
Reebok ZQuick Lite,,89.0,76.0,101.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.9oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The ZQuick Lite is supremely comfortable, according to a large number of reviews.
It lives up to its Lite name as it is feather-light, based on the remarks of several runners.
More than value for the money price, as stated in some comments.
The breathability is quite nice for a handful of runners.
There are 5 color options.
It allows a full range of motions as experienced by more than a few.
A few have used the shoe for everyday wear.
2 reasons not to buy
A handful of runners has had pebbles stuck in the outsole when running.
The heel area caused blisters in the foot of a small number of runners.
Bottom line
After the popular release of the ZQuick, Reebok follows it up with a Lite version. As the name suggests, this is a stripped down version, but does not take away much of the shoe’s fantastic comfort, good arch support, and nice looks. It really runs light with just enough cushioning, exceptional freedom of movement, and support to be an all-around trainer."
Reebok ZPrint 3D, Reebok,87.0,77.0,135.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.4oz , Women: 6.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
A runner stated that wearing the Reebok ZPrint 3D felt like wearing a comfortable pair of socks.
A tester said that it had an adequately lightweight nature.
The vivid color scheme of this shoe made a positive impression on some runners.
Those who were picky about the performance of their running shoe were pleased about this model’s overall quality.
It fit perfectly, noted some users.
‘Comfortable’ was a word that many used to describe this running shoe.
1 reasons not to buy
A tester noted that it felt a bit narrow.
Bottom line
The Reebok ZPrint 3D was able to give quality service to many testers and reviewers. They appreciated its appealing looks, its responsive features, and its 3D-mapped platform. Many trusted this neutral shoe; one runner even planned on purchasing extra pairs."
New Balance 880 v9 GTX,,75.0,,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.4oz , Women: 10.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The New Balance 880 v9 GTX is comfortable, said many users. 
It is supportive, according to some buyers. 
One runner noted that the shoe is very lightweight. 
People appreciated the waterproof feature of the shoe. 
A few consumers commended the stylish design of the shoe. 
The shoe is also great for light hiking, based on some reviews. 
Some buyers mentioned that it offers just the right amount of cushioning. 
3 reasons not to buy
Many testers reported that the toe box is a bit narrow. 
The shoe requires a break-in period, according to a purchaser. 
A consumer reported that the outsole is not durable enough. 
Bottom line
The New Balance 880 v9 GTX is a neutral running shoe that features an ultra-responsive midsole cushioning. Many runners have appreciated the addition of the Gore-Tex® technology, which made the shoe perfect for wet walking or running. Though there were users who dislike the shoe’s narrow toe box, the majority of the consumers praised the shoe’s supportiveness, responsiveness, and comfort level. "
Puma Ignite Ultimate, Puma,89.0,82.0,119.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.3oz , Women: 10.7oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The Puma Ignite Ultimate offers comfort as one of its best features, according to most comments.
After 200 miles, the shoe barely shows signs of wear and tear, based on the observations of a few testers.
The performance and quality of the shoe is worth its average price.
Some runners liked the way the foot moves through the gait cycle.
The cushioning is plush with a hint of responsiveness as noticed a handful of users.
The ultra-breathable mesh makes it an ideal option for warm and humid climates.
The Ignite Ultimate has superb flexibility due to the substantial flex grooves from the heel to the forefoot.
4 reasons not to buy
A large number of runners felt that the shoe was a little heavier than they would have wanted.
It is slightly clunky on the road is another downside, based on a small group of runner’s comments.
A few mentioned that the 12mm height makes it a traditional shoe that favors heel strikers only.
It is not the best option for those who live in inclement-weather places.
Bottom line
Puma’s Ignite Ultimate relies on its responsive cushioning and superior comfort to give runners a treat on the road. The shoe has moderate arch support, traction, and maximum breathability. The substantial cushioning is compensated by the several flex grooves to give it a nice blend of flexibility."
Asics Patriot 11 Twist,,73.0,,16.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.3oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The visual aspect of the Asics Patriot 11 Twist is praised by those who appreciate a performance-ready yet fashion-forward running shoe.
According to a couple of comments, the upper unit has a breathable nature which permits all-day wear.
The use of printed overlays is lauded by those who don’t want a cluttered or bulky-looking shoe-facade.
Some positive words highlight the midsole unit of this Asics running shoe, which is said to deliver responsive underfoot support.
The traction capacity of the outsole is appreciated by runners who like surface control at all times.
The flexibility of the platform is deemed sufficient for energized toe-offs.
2 reasons not to buy
The forefoot section of the facade is criticized for developing a hole after merely a few uses.
A couple of comments tackles the outsole apparently wearing off quickly.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of people for the Asics Patriot 11 Twist has been mostly positive. This product is considered a solid option for those who like a daily runner that is accommodating and highly versatile. The flexibility of the sole unit and the uncluttered design of the silhouette are highlighted. On the other hand, the flimsy durability of the outsole and upper have become the elements that garnered criticism.
Fans of road running shoes that are the target market of the Patriot 11 Twist."
Merrell Fiery,,70.0,,8.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 24oz , Women: 20.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The traction capacity of the outsole unit is praised for being precise and dependable.
Some testers believe that the materials of the Merrell Fiery are dutifully long-lasting and robust.
A couple of runners note the inner sleeve of this Merrell trail running shoe as non-irritating.
The ghillie lacing system is appreciated by many for not being a source of material bunching/hot spots.
The padded tongue and collar are admired because they prevent in-shoe wobbling.
A few reviews have noted the supportive and shock-attenuating midsole unit.
2 reasons not to buy
A few testers have claimed that the forefoot section of the upper unit is quick to absorb water.
A consumer has reported that the traction of the outsole on wet ground is flimsy and inconsistent.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of runners towards the Merrell Fiery has been mostly positive. The structural elements of the Fiery turn this trail running shoe into a reliable option for daily adventures off the road. It provides an agile and maximum-protection ride that makes it suitable for rugged mountain terrains.
Neutral running shoe enthusiasts that like to take to the trails are the target market of the Merrell Fiery."
Saucony Excursion TR 10,,86.0,,866.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 8.2oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Saucony Excursion TR 14,"10 reasons to buy
Comfort is a prime asset of the 10th instalment of the Excursion TR, based on most reviews.
It is very affordable.
The shoe is quite light despite the numbers on the weighing scale, according to several runners.
A handful of users noted its excellent breathability.
A good number of the reviews mentioned the shoe’s exceptional durability.
The cushioning absorbs shock very well, according to some runners.
The upper does a very good job of keeping dirt out, as noted in a couple of reviews.
As observed by more than a few runners, the traction is very good.
A small number of people who are up on their feet most of the day, valued the cushioning of the Saucony Excursion TR 10.
This is an all-exercise shoe, as claimed by a handful of users.
6 reasons not to buy
The Excursion TR 10 is quite stiff.
The break-in period is considerable, as stated by several.
It looks too cumbersome or heavy for a few.
A moderate number of runners felt that the fit is tighter and smaller than the past versions of this shoe.
There is absolutely no ground feedback from this shoe, according to several reviewers.
The heavily-padded ankle collar, tongue, and midsole prevent the shoe from drying quickly.
Bottom line
The Excursion TR 10 is a burly, durable, and comfortable trail fiend that can handle moderately difficult terrains. It has exceptional comfort, good traction, and surprisingly runs lighter than how it looks or what the numbers indicate on the scale. The very affordable price, superb protection, and no-fuss functionality should make this shoe a worthy candidate for any trail enthusiast."
Mizuno Wave Ultima 7,,96.0,90.0,159.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 10.3oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Mizuno Wave Ultima 11,"5 reasons to buy
Most runners liked the overall design and style of the Ultima 7.
Most runners felt that the Wave Ultima 7 is very comfortable and well-cushioned.
It has a breathable and cool air mesh upper for maximum comfort.
The shoe features a full-length ventilation to remove the humidity and heat.
It has a removable premium insock for added cushioning and comfort.
2 reasons not to buy
The Ultima 7 is a bit expensive.
This is too narrow for some runners.
Bottom line
The Mizuno Wave Ultima 7 is a reliable neutral running shoe that is designed for performance training. This shoe offers maximum protection, enough cushioning and enhanced traction. Runners applauded the overall construction of the shoe as well as its comfort and durability."
Under Armour Surge,,75.0,,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.9oz , Women: 7.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Under Armour Surge 2,"5 reasons to buy
The underfoot cushioning of the Under Armour Surge is comfortable and supportive to many users.
Some testers believe that the in-shoe experience is accommodating and secure.
Several comments have emphasized the versatility of this product.
The price of this running shoe is deemed affordable.
A handful of purchasers are happy with the traction capacity of the outsole unit.
2 reasons not to buy
According to a few testers, the upper unit of this product has developed a tear after only a few uses.
The materials look and feel flimsy and cheap, some buyers remarked.
Bottom line
The overall feedback for the Under Armour Surge has been mostly positive. People know what they want from a cheap running shoe, and they got most of it. The Surge offers a secure in-shoe experience and an accommodating midsole design. Running activities and workouts on the road are amplified by the shoe’s cushioned construction that provides a comfortable feel."
Reebok QuickChase, Reebok,83.0,,690.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 10.3oz,,,," Normal, X-Wide | Normal",,"9 reasons to buy
Many runners mentioned that the QuickChase is extremely comfortable.
The shoe is lightweight, as noted in some reviews.
The Reebok QuickChase is flexible, according to some users.
Some runners applauded the breathable upper coverage of the QuickChase.
A couple of runners liked the looks of the shoe.
The price is affordable.
Available in different color options.
Extra wide width available.
Some runners loved the understated appeal of this shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners found the shoe to be too tight for their liking.
Several runners had varying issues regarding the shoe’s durability.
Some runners were not happy with the support coming from this shoe.
Bottom line
Reebok QuickChase is road running shoe designed for neutral foot movement. The shoe delivers a good blend of comfort, breathability, and flexibility. With its low-cut and lightweight design, this shoe is best for long distance running and uptempo trainings."
Asics Gel Cumulus 20 SP,,,,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Cumulus 21 SP,
The North Face Flight RKT,,82.0,87.0,17.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 6.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Most users positively welcomed the ultra-lightweight design of The North Face Flight RKT.
The shoe is extremely breathable, said some delighted customers.
A few runners admired the design of the Flight RKT; they said they are stylish and good-looking.
A couple of reviewers mentioned that the shoe feels fast and responsive.
Some users said that the shoe fits like a glove.
The shoe runs true to size, based on some user reviews.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners felt disappointed when the sticky rubber pads in the outsole started to rip off after a few miles of trail running.
One user was annoyed because the tongue did not stay in place; he needs to stop frequently to fix it.
The shoe is slightly expensive.
Bottom line
The North Face Flight RKT has made several runners happy because of its breathability, lightweight construction, and responsiveness. Many were satisfied with the performance, and some found the stylish design a great plus. Though it is slightly expensive, the Flight RKT is still a must-try shoe for trail running."
Puma Speed Ignite Netfit,,81.0,85.0,6.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,, Puma Speed Ignite Netfit 2,"8 reasons to buy
Most users said that the upper of the Puma Speed Ignite Netfit was very innovative.
The shoe looks very stylish, said a majority of users.
Because of its construction, some runners felt that this running shoe was worth the price.
Several testers said that the fit of the shoe was true to size.
A lot of users mentioned that it was comfortable.
Some runners observed that the fit was adjustable and supportive.
The color of the shoe was complimented by several testers.
A few users were glad about the lightweight yet supportive nature of the Speed Ignite Netfit.
4 reasons not to buy
One user said that the mouth of the shoe felt a little tight.
Another runner mentioned that the sole might not last if the shoe was used for running.
Some runners expressed that the sizing of the shoe was a tad small for them.
A lot of users felt that it needed to have more color variations.
Bottom line
Puma’s Speed Ignite Netfit is a premium, road running shoe built with neutral support. The style of the shoe may receive most of the praise, but the focal point is really the lacing system which can cater to various foot shapes. On top of that, the shoe is lightweight with cushioning that is sufficiently responsive. Runners looking for all four characteristics – customized fit, stylish, fast, responsive – should definitely check this pair out."
Skechers GOrun Forza,,93.0,83.0,182.0,,, Road, Motion control, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 8.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Skechers GOrun Forza 3,"5 reasons to buy
Many reviewers thought that the GORun Forza is an adequate mix of responsible cushioning and underfoot stability
Many runners greatly welcomed the array of color schemes that comes with the release of this model.
It has a medium width, so the fit can be snug without being too tight.
The lightweight cushioning offers a bit of bounce while also propelling the runner forward.
The Resalyte Medial Posting slows the rate of the over-pronation of the foot.
3 reasons not to buy
Some reviewers criticized the bonding materials in the sole unit.
The price is moderately high.
Some runners hoped to have more protective materials in the outsole other than the rubber layer.
Bottom line
The GORun Forza from Skechers is one of the well-received running shoes because of the arch support mechanics, the responsive cushioning, and the appealing design. Some testers had issues with its durability, but it is no doubt ideal for daily performances."
New Balance 3190 v2,,84.0,62.0,126.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.1oz , Women: 7.2oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Synthetic materials and mesh make up the more breathable and comfortable upper unit, according to some reviewers.
The synthetic lining is easy on the skin, while the included removable insole adds a bit more cushioning.
Several runners appreciated the REVLite mid-sole cushioning system, which is a lightweight underfoot platform that the foot can rest upon.
Durable rubber covers the outsole unit, effectively protecting the shoe from abrasion and wear.
The appealing design of the 2nd version of the 3190 caught the attention of many runners.
2 reasons not to buy
Others noted that it was too tight for wide feet.
A few testers thought that it was a bit stiff and unfavorable for natural foot movement.
Bottom line
The 3190 v2 from New Balance is a great update to a starting series that has given a lot of quality service to many runners. It’s efficient in its purpose and with decent arch support, even if it’s a bit tight around the forefoot area."
Merrell All Out Crush Light,,84.0,78.0,367.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 7oz , Women: 6oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Many runners liked the lightweight built of the All Out Crush Light.
It is a reasonably priced shoe.
Some testers took note that this shoe is very comfortable.
Delivers reliable traction while running on trail, based on some comments.
True to size.
2 reasons not to buy
The sole of the All Out Crush Light wears out quickly as mentioned in some reviews.
Some noticed that cushioning is not a priority in this shoe.
Bottom line
The Merrell All Out Crush Light is a lightweight trail running shoe designed with durable traction. With its moderate level of cushioning, this shoe is only ideal for light trail. It does not provide the right protection for technical terrains and long distance runs."
Nike LunarEpic Flyknit Shield,,93.0,86.0,61.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.5oz , Women: 6.7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"11 reasons to buy
A large number of reviewers swear by the comfort delivered by the Shield version of the LunarEpic Flyknit.
The inclusion of the water-repellent upper and inner sleeve gives it better protection when the conditions get a bit cold or wet.
Several noticed how breathable the shoe remains despite the water resistant upper.
Flywire cables hold the foot down in security and support.
A handful noticed just how flexible the shoe is.
The traction is surprisingly superb on wet conditions, based on the observations of some runners.
It comes with a set of 4mm sockliners.
A few used the shoe for long-distance running or for up-tempo runs.
A couple of expert reviewers found the cushioning to be very good in absorbing shock.
It is good for distance running or even racing when the weather forecast isn’t too good.
A handful of runners said that the 10mm drop feels much lower, like a 6mm drop.
6 reasons not to buy
An already expensive shoe becomes even more expensive in the LunarEpic Flyknit Shield.
A handful found the fit to be too narrow.
The mid-rise design was a bit weird and funny for some runners.
Some runners complained about irritation on their ankles or Achilles due to the mid-rise design.
Small stones are sucked into the outsole.
A handful were disappointed that it runs small.
Bottom line
One of Nike’s most eye-catching and innovative shoes, the LunarEpic Flyknit becomes an all-weather shoe with the inclusion of a water-repellent upper and water resistant cleatie. The Shield version of the LunarEpic Flyknit continues to have a snug, socklike wrap up until around the ankle due to the revolutionary mid-rise design. It is very light, extremely comfortable, offers good arch support, and loads of traction. If the price is well within reach, the shoe is easily one of the best in the business."
Salomon S-Lab Sense Ultra 5,,88.0,81.0,52.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Salomon S-Lab Sense Ultra,"6 reasons to buy
The Open Mesh upper with reflective detailing offers breathable coverage that’s visible in low-light conditions.
Most reviewers appreciated the Endofit sock-like construction, which allows runners to wear the Ultra 5 without putting on socks first.
Runners generally welcomed the inclusion of anti-debris mechanisms, from the tongue to the toe area.
Triple-density EVA offers a plush underfoot platform on which the foot can rest.
The Wet Traction Contagrip lets runners traverse all types of terrain conditions, whether dry or wet.
This shoe has a lightweight nature.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners experienced the mid-sole unit easily breaking down after a few months.
The outsole lugs were torn after a few treks through the trails, according to some trail enthusiasts.
The 5th version of the S-Lab Sense Ultra has a very expensive price.
Bottom line
Many runners have enjoyed the Sense Ultra series through the years and the 5th version lives up to the standards of this line. The comfortable and protective components are reliable. It’s a neutral trail shoe for almost everyone."
Puma Faas 500 v4, Puma,88.0,87.0,66.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 7.1oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Some noticed the added cushioning of the 4th version of the Faas 500.
This shoe features the EVERFIT 2.0 upper lockdown for security and neutral foot movement.
The Faas 500 v4 has an OrthoLite® sockliner for unmatched step-in comfort.
Many gave positive feedback regarding the shoe’s Protective TPU toe cap that offers added toe protection when running on various terrains.
Some runners applauded the overall reflective overlays of the Puma Faas 500 v4 for added safety while running on low visibility.
Greatly priced shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
Too narrow for some runners are mentioned in reviews.
Some runners were disappointed by the durability of the shoe.
Many were disappointed by the color and design of the Puma Faas 500 v4.
Bottom line
The Puma Faas 500 v4 is a lightweight road running shoe that offers runners a combination of comfort, protection and smoother ride. It provides enough support that most runners need. This shoe is best for uptempo training and a great daily trainer."
Vibram FiveFingers Spyridon MR,,88.0,82.0,269.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 7.4oz , Women: 5.6oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The Vibram FiveFingers Spyridon MR is a lightweight minimalist shoe.
Some runners took note that this shoe has an impressive grip on trail.
This shoe is great for soft and hard surfaces based on some reviews.
The sole is thicker but maintains ground contact.
Many applauded the design of the Spyridon MR.
4 reasons not to buy
Size runs small and feels to tight for some runners
The fabric is not durable.
Upper built is ineffective since it does not prevent dirt from entering the shoe.
Some runners note that this shoe is not as comfortable as other Vibram shoe models.
Bottom line
The Vibram FiveFingers Spyridon MR is minimalist running shoe designed for off-road running. It is equipped with the necessary technologies to survive the toughest terrain. It is delvers a good combination of durability, comfort and traction."
Asics Gel Pulse 8, Asics,88.0,,1845.0,,, Road, Neutral,,, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal, Asics Gel Pulse 12,"6 reasons to buy
A very comfortable ride is for the taking in the Gel Pulse 8, according to many of the reviews.
Some of the reviewers consider the shoe’s price as very reasonable.
A handful noticed that it runs quite light.
There are several who have used it for gym workouts and other cardiovascular exercises to great effect.
The open mesh upper guarantees a very breathable ride.
Quite a few noted that their runs were effortless.
2 reasons not to buy
A small number of users disliked the shoe’s traction on wet surfaces.
It is a bit stiff right out of the box for a small number of runners.
Bottom line
A trusted and dependable performance continues to be the main offering of the 8th iteration of the Gel Pulse. The shoe has excellent comfort, decent arch support, adequate cushioning, and ultra-breathable coverage that should make this a very ideal for runners of all levels, particularly beginners or middle of the pack road enthusiasts."
Brooks Ghost 10 GTX,,88.0,,104.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 9.8oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Brooks Ghost 12 GTX,"5 reasons to buy
The cushioning system of the Brooks Ghost 10 GTX gained the favor of many consumers. They stated that it was soft and comfortable.
The steady underfoot platform was able to provide support for those who have underpronated foot motion.
The waterproof capability of the Gore-Tex® membrane evidently kept the foot dry, several runners observed.
When it comes to durability, most runners didn’t have a problem with it. They noted that it was able to last long.
Heavyset runners were happy that the underfoot platform was robust enough to accommodate their weight, even during all-day wear.
2 reasons not to buy
Some people didn’t like the design of the Ghost 10 GTX, stating that it looked bulky and unappealing.
A lot of consumers were disappointed with the lack of a wide-width option.
Bottom line
Runners were mostly happy with the Brooks Ghost 10 GTX. The highlighted its comfortable nature, its supportive platform, and its profoundly robust construction. This road running shoe worked well, apparently. Conversely, several people had problems with its looks and its inconsistent fit and sizing."
Nike Dart 12,,86.0,,1383.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
The Nike Dart 12 was suitably lightweight, according to many of those who tried it.
Several testers noted that it had an adequate fit.
Based on a number of reviews, this model was able to deliver comfort and support to the foot, thus making the running experience more agreeable.
Many testers actually felt the air as it flowed into the foot-chamber and cooled their feet.
Some consumers wrote that wearing this shoe reduced, and even prevented, knee pain.
Though the color schemes were subtle, they still enticed those who have reviewed this version.
The price of the Nike Dart 12 gained many fans and they said that it was affordable.
The underfoot experience didn’t leave a lot to be desired, according to many runners; they felt that it cushioned the foot well.
The rubber compound in the outsole received praise because it didn’t wear off easily, and because it gripped the asphalt with ease.
6 reasons not to buy
Several testers noted that the arch support mechanism in this model wasn’t as efficient as the one in the previous iterations.
The upper fabrics started ripping off after only a few months of use, some runners reported.
The fabrics of the inner sleeve tore off on a consumer, causing some discomfort to their skin while wearing the shoe.
According to a purchaser, the underfoot platform felt stiff and it looked like it was made from plastic.
A tester reported that the cushioning system wore out on them after only a month of use.
A number of runners were actually unsupportive of the general quality of this shoe because its different sections generally fell apart on them over time.
Bottom line
The Nike Dart 12 received praise from runners who appreciated its affordable price, its agreeable underfoot cushioning system, and its overall functionality on the asphalt. Many welcomed its modern look. For them, it didn’t look too overwhelming, but it was able to satisfy their expectations. But such wasn’t the case for some consumers because they felt that it wasn’t durable and that some of its mechanisms felt lacking in terms of efficacy."
Merrell All Out Crush 2,,91.0,85.0,165.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 6.6oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Many people felt that the Merrell All Out Crush 2 was comfortable.
The upper was lauded for preventing trail debris and soil from infiltrating the interior foot-chamber.
Many consumers appreciated the grip of the outsole on soft surfaces and rocks.
Most runners liked the lightweight nature of this running shoe.
The spacious toe box allowed natural toe-splay, based on several reviews.
The durability of the materials used for the All Out Crush 2 was deemed reliable.
1 reasons not to buy
According to a tester, the lightness of this product was a catalyst for in-shoe wobbling and foot instability.
Bottom line
The Merrell All Out Crush 2 received quite a positive response from trail running enthusiasts who wanted dependable surface traction and agreeable in-shoe coverage. Most of those who have tested this neutral shoe liked its lightweight build, as well. Conversely, several people griped about its sizing scheme and its unstable interior fit."
Adidas Galaxy 3,,87.0,,652.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Adidas Galaxy 4,"8 reasons to buy
The Adidas Galaxy 3 was comfortable, even for all-day wear, said most reviews.
Plenty of users appreciated the simplistic yet stylish design of the upper.
A lot of testers agreed that the shoe was of good value.
Many users said that it was versatile. Most used it as a sneaker, a shoe for work, for the gym, and for running.
Some runners mentioned that there was a good selection of colorways.
A majority of testers agreed that the fit was true to size.
Some reviewers said that they felt supported during their runs.
A lot of users concurred that it felt lightweight.
5 reasons not to buy
One user said that the 4E option wasn’t wide enough. Many users seemed to agree that options with wide width don’t fit well on wide feet.
Plenty of female reviewers said that the wide variation was a tad large.
One female tester observed a tear at the side of the upper. Her pinky toe was showing through after a month of usage.
Another reviewer saw that a hole formed at the top of the big toe after only four months.
A user said that the shoe displaced his weight. It put most of it on his heel which caused a bit of pain.
Bottom line
The Galaxy 3 by Adidas proved to be a versatile neutral shoe used in a variety of activities such as walking and working out. There were only a few who used it for running. Because of its minimalistic upper, it was also commonly used for daily use or as footwear for work. Some felt that the wide version didn’t fit wide feet well, but many still agreed that the shoe was of good value. The quality was good enough for its price."
Puma Cell Regulate Woven, Puma,75.0,,7.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
The majority of the consumers commented that the Puma Cell Regulate Woven is comfortable.
Many users said that the shoe is good not only for running but also for casual walks.
Several purchasers admired its lightweight structure.
Based on some reviews, the footwear is stylish. They loved the color options available.
It is affordable.
2 reasons not to buy
The Puma Cell Regulate Woven is not true to size, according to those who have tried it.
It has a narrow toe box, noted by a lot of buyers.
Bottom line
Those who have tried the Puma Cell Regulate Woven were generally happy with the shoe’s performance. This road running shoe offers a good level of comfort. Despite the problems others have to deal with its narrow toe box and size, the majority of them still recommend the Puma Cell Regulate Woven because of its lightweight structure, design, and performance."
Asics Gel Galaxy 8,,78.0,,50.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 10.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Asics introduces moisture-wicking and anti-microbial features in the Galaxy 8.
The Gel Galaxy 8 oozes with comfort based on the majority of comments from runners.
There is very consistent plush cushioning in the shoe as noted by a handful of users.
The Asics Galaxy 8 comes in standard sizes.
Many runners appreciated its affordable price.
Reliable durability is evident in the individual parts of this shoe.
The great support provided by the shoe’s fit is something many runners valued.
2 reasons not to buy
The high heel offset may not appeal to everyone.
A few noted that it looked really bulky and feels heavy.
Bottom line
Asics continues to promote the old school type of running in the Gel Galaxy 8. It has the design and structure of a traditional shoe, which limits its appeal to those who are looking for average or low drop shoes and with lesser weight. Overall, the Galaxy 8 is a durable trainer with good arch support and plush cushioning."
Under Armour HOVR Phantom Highlighter,,78.0,,7.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The bright colorways of the Under Armour HOVR Phantom Highlighter are welcomed by most runners.
Some testers claim that the upper unit has a form-fitting structure that accommodates the natural shape and motion of the foot.
The midsole unit has moderate flexibility that encourages energized forefoot lifts, based on a handful of reviews.
A few purchasers believe that the traction given by the outsole unit encourages plausible movement control over the surfaces.
According to a couple of consumers, the design of this Under Armour running shoe is versatile enough to handle workouts that aren’t running-oriented.
Based on several reviews, the breathability of the upper is on-point.
2 reasons not to buy
The stretchy ends of the Under Armour HOVR Phantom Highlighter’s collar are apparently causing some irritation on the skin of some consumers.
A few testers believe that the midsole is too bouncy to be used for extended running sessions.
Bottom line
The overall reaction towards the Under Armour HOVR Phantom Highlighter has been positive. This neutral running shoe is believed to deliver reactive performances and appealing looks. The highlights of the praise include the traction of the outsole, the flexible wrap of the upper, and the responsiveness of the midsole. On the other hand, the irritating one-piece collar design and the too-springy midsole are criticized.
Fans of road running shoes are the target market of the Under Armour HOVR Phantom Highlighter."
Asics LyteRacer 2, Asics,,,,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral,,,,,,,,
Reebok Grasse Road,,90.0,80.0,10.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The Reebok Grasse Road is very comfortable because of its cushioning, claim some users. 
A lot of reviewers say that the shoe has good traction on varied surfaces. 
One user mentions that the shoe is worth the price.  
The cushioning of the shoe is very responsive, according to several commenters.  
Some runners say that the overall aesthetic of the shoe is very appreciable. 
A few buyers state that the shoe’s upper is very flexible and breathable. 
The forefoot of the shoe is firmer which helps in propelling the runner’s toe-off, says one user.
3 reasons not to buy
One of the materials found in the upper was too rigid that it caused some pain on the foot, mentions one disappointed runner. 
One of the runners claims that the shoe’s arch is too high. 
The shoe’s fit is too tight, says one runner. 
Bottom line
The Reebok Grasse Road shoe received numerous praise for the comfort brought about by its maximal cushioning. A lot of the runners also lauded the responsiveness of the shoe’s cushioning, and the flexibility that the shoe offered. A lot agreed that the shoe was affordable. On the other hand, some mentioned that the shoe contains materials that are too rigid, especially on its upper, which caused pain on the foot."
Salomon Sonic Aero,,91.0,82.0,211.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.5oz , Women: 7.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The Salomon Sonic Aero is very lightweight and responsive as mentioned in some reviews.
The cushioning of the running shoe delivers a springy feel.
Many runners applauded the lightweight design of the shoe.
The Sonic Aero has a very breathable upper.
The grip of the shoe is as impressive as it promises, based on testers’ comments.
2 reasons not to buy
The rubber outsole of the shoe wears out too quickly than expected as mentioned in some comments.
Some mentioned that they develop blisters while running on this shoe.
Bottom line
The Salomon Sonic Aero is a lightweight neutral running shoe ideal for road running. It is designed to help runners experience a smoother heel to toe transition and it has the right amount of traction and protection. This shoe is ideal for uptempo training and short distance runs. While some people have some issues with durability and comfort, others are very satisfied with the shoe's lightweight structure, responsive cushioning and breathable upper. "
Adidas AdiPure Gazelle 2, Adidas,83.0,84.0,14.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 5.7oz , Women: 5.3oz, Men: 7mm , Women: 7mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
The Gazelle 2 is made of durable materials, making it a worthy investment.
Aside from running, this shoe can be used in various activities such as physical exercises.
Features the adiPRENE component that maximizes the protection for the runner’s foot.
Incredible lacing system.
Through the elastic TechFit technology on the shoe’s upper mesh, the toes and forefoot are allowed to move freely and comfortably, according to a few testers.
Comfortable to wear based on several runners’ observation.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners complain about the stretchy upper of the Adidas AdiPure Gazelle 2 because it does not hold the foot very well.
It is hard to maneuver especially when running on wet surfaces.
Because of its design, a couple of runners said that the 2nd version of the AdiPure Gazelle easily wears off.
Bottom line
The Adidas AdiPure Gazelle 2 is a running shoe that is designed for underpronators and intended for road use in a dry weather condition. Since this is a lightweight shoe, it is designed for speed work such as racing. Runners who love barefoot or minimalist running are the ones who can appreciate the performance of this shoe."
Inov-8 Trailroc 255,,83.0,81.0,21.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The Natural Fit is a schematic kind that forms an anatomical design to enhance comfort.
The Injected EVA allows a plush and adequate underfoot platform on which to rest the foot during idle moments and actual performance noted some runners.
The Shoc-Zone employs a low-profile drop from the heel to the toe, essentially taking advantage of a more natural running efficacy.
The Meta-Shank Generation 3 offers more underfoot protection for improved confidence on the trails.
The Trailroc design on the outsole gives more traction over the unpredictable terrain, according to many runners.
The average weight of the Trailroc 255 allows runners to acclimate well to it without worrying that it’ll drag them down.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners experienced the outsole unit get separated from the shoe after only a few uses.
The price is slightly expensive.
A few felt that it needed more cushioning to add a plusher underfoot experience.
Bottom line
The Inov-8 Trailroc 255 is a trail shoe that offers flexible performance and comfort in the off-road paths. Those who need stability are going to enjoy this one because it cradles the midfoot adequately. Given the praises and negative comments, Inov-8 still needs to improve some aspects of the shoe to fully get the approval of the majority."
Brooks Glycerin 17 Reflective, Brooks,83.0,,10.0,,, Road,, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Some of the users commented that the Brooks Glycerin 17 Reflective is comfortable.
Several purchasers said that the shoe is lightweight.
According to those who have tried it, the running footwear fits perfectly.
Based on the reviews, the shoe has a wide toe box.
The majority of the consumers noted that the Glycerin 17 Reflective is well-cushioned.
Its great look was loved by many buyers.
A reviewer noted that the shoe provides excellent arch support.
3 reasons not to buy
One of the testers commented that the running shoe provides a firm feeling on foot while running.
A buyer observed that the Brook label wear off quickly.
According to some testers, the outsole rubber is not durable.
Bottom line
The overall feedback of consumers for the Brooks Glycerin 17 Reflective has been positive. The excellent performance and structure of the shoe made the majority of the users happy and contented. Though some have issues with its durability, others still lauded the shoe because of its fantastic construction, amazing performance, and attractive design. "
Mizuno Wave Daichi,,74.0,,23.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Mizuno Wave Daichi 4,"6 reasons to buy
A handful of runners loved the comfortable fit of the Daichi.
Most of the reviewers were really impressed by the traction of this shoe.
Some of the comments mentioned the exceptional form-fitting wrap of the upper.
It is a versatile runner built for almost all kinds of distance or speed, according to a few.
More than a few valued the perceptible ground feel.
The laces stay tied throughout their runs, as observed by a small number of users.
2 reasons not to buy
For some, the $120 price tag is already at par with some of the most popular and tested trail shoes around.
It is really stiff, based on the observations of a handful.
Bottom line
Mizuno aims to replace the Kazan with the Wave Daichi as a versatile trail partner that can take on the most rugged outdoor surfaces in a lightweight package. The collaboration with Michelin gives the Mizuno Daichi impressive traction on almost any challenging and technical trail. It has excellent comfort, very responsive, and offers noticeable ground feel despite the lugged outsole."
On Cloudventure Midtop,,74.0,85.0,31.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
Many testers noted that the On Cloudventure Midtop was good-looking.
Several runners wrote that the overall experience with this shoe was comfortable.
The inner layer of the upper unit received some praise because runners felt that it exuded a sock-like fit.
Some consumers were able to use it in wet conditions and they wrote that the upper generally staved off mild water infiltration.
The durability of this model was lauded by a number of runners; they wrote that it held up well through many running sessions and weather conditions.
There were those who were able to use it on the roads and they didn’t report any problems with it.
A few noted that this shoe was able to conform nicely to the foot, giving secure coverage and support without causing any irritation.
The CloudTec® cushioning system received praise from those who felt that it was responsive and agreeable to their performance on the trails.
A reviewer commented that the platform wasn’t flimsy or thin as to let them feel rocks and other potentially painful surfaces.
5 reasons not to buy
The lack of a traditional shoe-tongue put off a tester; they wrote it can be difficult for those with wider foot-dimensions to wear the shoe.
It wasn’t fully waterproof, stated a runner.
Several consumers noted that the price of this running shoe was expensive.
A purchaser didn’t like the shoelaces because he thought that it was too thin and difficult to tie.
According to a number of reviewers, the inner cleatie design made it difficult to put on the shoe.
Bottom line
Generally, the On Cloudventure Midtop received high praise from those who have tried it. They wrote that it was comfortable and secure. Many welcomed its water-repellent upper, stating that it allowed them to tackle wet conditions with ease. The durability of this model also received some recognition. A few of its design conventions left some runners taken aback, but that didn’t stop them from enjoying this trail running shoe."
Under Armour SpeedForm Gemini 3 Graphic,,91.0,87.0,316.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
There was an exceptional grip on the outsole, a buyer remarked.
One runner was thoroughly impressed with the supportive structure of the shoe that they likened it to “walking on sunshine.”
Many users agreed that the SpeedForm Gemini 3 Graphic was a lightweight shoe.
Various wearers described the shoe as comfortable.
The shoe performed well in other activities aside from running, mentioned a customer.
4 reasons not to buy
The toe box of this shoe was smaller than the first release, according to a wearer.
The shoe made the shins stiff and sore after each wear, a user observed.
Some customers thought the SpeedForm Gemini 3 Graphic was an expensive shoe.
The laces did not do an excellent job of keeping the foot secure, a runner claimed.
Bottom line
Based on the varied reviews it has received, the Under Armour SpeedForm Gemini 3 Graphic was neither a hit or miss with the market. On the one hand, the shoe was praised for its thorough construction and efficient performance. On the other hand, complaints were made about structural details and price. Overall, the shoe has met user expectations with just a few criticisms."
Adidas Adistar Raven Boost,,87.0,80.0,43.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.9oz , Women: 11oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Mesh and ballistic welding make up the upper construction of this running shoe, keeping it secure and intact.
The synthetic overlays add more durability for the upper while also keeping the fit more customizable.
The Raven Boost features the boost™ mid-sole, which is responsible for providing a return of energy to the runner.
Runners greatly appreciated the inclusion of the robust Continental™ Rubber outsole on top of the ADIWEAR™ layer.
Reviewers generally welcomed the superb fit that this shoe offers.
The overall durability of the Adistar Raven Boost keeps runners engaged even when it comes to daily running.
3 reasons not to buy
Most of the complaints about this running shoe stemmed from it being a bit small for some runners’ feet.
There were testers who thought that the Raven Boost stayed tight even after many uses.
Some runners took the design of this shoe to be too plain.
Bottom line
The Adistar Raven Boost from Adidas is now one of the most popular trail running shoes on the market because of its comfortable mid-sole, durable outsole, and robust upper unit. It offers a bit of support for the mid-foot, but it’s mostly designed for neutral runners."
Adidas Energy Bounce 2.0,,87.0,,305.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The mesh material on the upper unit offers a well-ventilated coverage and an appealing look.
Synthetic overlays on the medial and lateral sides secure the foot as they respond to the adjustments made to the lacing system.
Many testers felt comfortable with the breathable mesh lining, which maintained the airiness of the shoe.
The average weight of the Energy Bounce 2.0 was appreciated by many runners as it didn’t drag their feet down when they performed.
The anatomically structured flex grooves in the outsole provide flexibility and natural freedom of movement.
The BOUNCE mid-sole technology provides a platform that launches the wearer towards the next step, making each performance explosive.
Many reviewers liked the affordable price of this update.
2 reasons not to buy
There were testers who didn’t like the plastic look of this model, particularly when it came to the overlay system and the rear area of the shoe.
Though it was bouncy, the mid-sole unit lacked thickness for a few runners who said they needed a more robust cushioning system.
Bottom line
Coming out of the success of its predecessor, the 2nd version of the Energy Bounce from Adidas offers a close-to-the-ground running experience that’s responsive and flexible. Just like the popular running shoe, Adidas Duramo 9, the Energy Bounce 2.0 is a great option for those who are looking for a road running shoe that’s efficient for daily use."
Inov-8 Roclite G 290,,87.0,93.0,9.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Users are pleased with the traction capacity of the Inov-8 Roclite G 290. Some of them also mentioned that the shoe delivers a superb grip even on wet surfaces. 
This trail running shoe offers a ride that was not overly bouncy, said some reviewers. Another commenter mentioned that it allows for a maximum ground feel. 
Several runners expressed that the upper unit of this shoe offers unmatched breathability. 
The flexibility of the upper material allows for natural movements, according to a couple of purchasers. 
Inov-8 Roclite G 290 is a great companion for a long day out, as mentioned in some reviews. 
Consumers noted that in terms of durability, this running gear is worth their money. 
Roclite G 290 is incredibly comfortable and supportive, stated some runners. 
2 reasons not to buy
A consumer complained that the sole of this shoe squeaks while running and it made him feel uncomfortable. 
Some testers mentioned that the forefoot section of the shoe is too roomy and loose. 
Bottom line
The Inov-8 Roclite G 290 received a mixed response from the consumers. Although a few buyers found the shoe to be too roomy, many have expressed their contentment and considered it as a worthy investment. People were happy about the shoe’s comfortable underfoot platform and flexible mesh upper. The outsole’s durability and traction capacity also gained positive feedback from runners. "
Reebok Trilux Run, Reebok,87.0,,139.0,$80,$38 (save 53%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
A couple of runners found the Reebok Trilux Run to be a lightweight road running shoe.
A lot of wearers gave positive remarks on the shoe’s stylish design and impressive colors; some said they get compliments every time they wear the shoe.
Several users highlighted that the shoe is very comfortable.
Some reviewers were happy with the shoe’s overall fit; some said the Reebok Trilux Run is best for wide-footed runners.
The shoe is affordable, said a few purchasers.
Some people used the Trilux Run for gym workouts, and they said that it worked well.
2 reasons not to buy
One disappointed user mentioned that the sole is not durable, it came loose after a few miles.
The mesh upper is too thin that the toes could already be seen, according to a wearer.
Bottom line
The Reebok Trilux Run is a lightweight running shoe with a stylish design. Many runners admired the shoe, but others could not help but mention a few criticisms. Though there are a few who are unsatisfied, the shoe is still well-received by others, and they would still recommend the shoe for those who are looking for a lightweight, comfortable, and affordable road running shoe."
Brooks Neuro 3,,87.0,89.0,62.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,, Brooks Neuro,"5 reasons to buy
Most people felt that the lightweight nature of the Brooks Neuro 3 contributed to an effortless performance on the roads.
The underfoot platform was deemed responsive enough to encourage energized steps.
The sizing scheme was considered by many to be agreeable to expectations.
Some consumers noted that the quality of the materials that were used in the making of this product was superior.
Runners also gravitated toward the sporty yet subdued aesthetics.
2 reasons not to buy
Several runners felt that the outsole rubber wouldn’t last long; it was apparently too soft.
A few people stated that the color schemes weren’t as appealing as the ones for the Neuro 2.
Bottom line
The Brooks Neuro 3 was considered by its testers to be a worthy successor to Brooks Neuro 2, its prior iteration in the relatively fresh series of road running shoes. The underfoot cushioning and the lightweight nature of the materials were considered sources of comfort. The looks of this model were also given praise. And though some doubted the lasting power of the outsole, such comments didn’t become hindrances to the overall quality of this neutral running footwear."
Puma Voltage, Puma,87.0,,32.0,,, Road, Neutral,,, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Most runners appreciated the comfortable ride in the Puma Voltage.
Very durable, is a common point from several users.
The cushioning is plush, according to a handful of runners.
A good number oA very breathable mesh translates into a cool and dry run.f reviews appreciated the stylish design of the Voltage.
The seamless upper reduces risks of developing blisters.
4 reasons not to buy
Several found the price as too expensive.
Traction is not what some runners expected.
Others found the shoe as a bit heavy.
A handful said that the Voltage technology is the same as other normal cushioning.
Bottom line
The Puma Voltage is a highly-durable trainer that aims to provide responsiveness for low-mileage and easy runs. Even though this does not have ultra-cushioning, the shoe is quite plush right out of the box. The moderate arch support, luxurious comfort, and decent responsiveness make it a great option for middle of the pack runners or those who want a Rolls Royce for easy runs."
Asics Gel Innovate 7, Asics,87.0,,19.0,,, Road, Stability,,, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Most of the testers mentioned that the Gel Innovate 7 is a comfortable shoe.
Some runners were impressed by the good support the shoe provides.
The cushioning system gained positive feedback from users because it efficiently attenuates shock during impact.
The Innovate 7 is a versatile shoe; few runners also used the shoe for gym workout.
True to size.
2 reasons not to buy
Some users noticed that the shoe wore out quicker than expected.
The shoe is slightly expensive.
Bottom line
Design for everyday and short runs, the Asics Gel Innovate 7 is great for overpronators. It delivers a good combination of comfort, cushioning and performance. Some users admired the shoe's sizing and versatility. Though some users thought that the shoe is poorly made, many fans would still recommend it because it is comfortable and supportive."
Asics GT 3000 4,,87.0,86.0,28.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 8.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics GT 3000 5,"8 reasons to buy
The 4th version of the GT 3000 is extremely comfortable for most of the reviewers.
It is much lighter than the earlier model.
It is well worth the price compared to other Asics stability shoes, according to several runners.
Some runners with varying concerns like shin splints and bunions have had really good runs without problems in the GT 3000 4.
It is stylish, based on a handful of comments.
Durability is really good, as noted by more than a couple of runners.
A few runners have run in them right out of the box without any problems.
It is excellent for gym workouts as well because of the adequate cushioning and great support.
3 reasons not to buy
More than a few were disappointed that the colors are not exactly what they appear in pictures.
A handful noted that the cushioning is a bit stiff.
It is a tad narrower than the previous version, according to a small number of users.
Bottom line
The 3000 4 is the top dog of the GT series. It provides the most structure, support, and cushioning than any other shoe in this collection. The shoe has a rather firm ride compared to other top-of-the-line stability shoes from Asics. Runners will notice the responsiveness of their runs because of this midsole characteristic. It is a great shoe for those with moderate to slightly above average overpronation."
Salomon Wings Flyte 2 GTX,,87.0,80.0,160.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 12oz , Women: 10.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
The Wings Flyte 2 GTX is so comfortable that several runners use it for daily use.
Breathability is quite good, even with the waterproofing membrane, according to some runners.
A majority of the reviewers loved the amazing grip of the 2nd version of the Wings Flyte GTX.
The QuickLace system allows easy and convenient fit adjustment.
A handful of reviewers noted the excellent arch support of this shoe.
Ground feedback is adequate, as experienced by a small group of runners.
The SensiFit overlays hold and support the foot very well.
The shoe drains very well, according to several testers.
4 reasons not to buy
A handful of runners noted that it runs a bit small.
A few had durability issues in the upper.
It is expensive.
The shoe is a bit heavy for some runners.
Bottom line
The Salomon Wings Flyte 2 GTX is another trail running monster that is built for the rigors of outdoor training. It has many of Salomon’s trademark technologies that allow runners to tackle rugged and technical trail a little better. The shoe has superb traction, excellent comfort, a breathable mesh that is fully waterproof. Trail runners who are looking for a burly outdoor trainer that can take the runner from the road to the trails should find this shoe a worthy option."
Dynafit Feline Vertical Pro,,,87.0,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm, Feb 2016,,,
Brooks Ravenna 9,,93.0,90.0,1625.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Brooks Ravenna 11,"8 reasons to buy
Many users were impressed with the speed lent to them by the Ravenna 9.
The shoe provided sufficient arch support, runners claimed.
Some buyers praised the shoe for its minimal weight.
A couple of neutral pronators who bought the Ravenna 9 were satisfied with its ride.
The midsole was very supportive without feeling too rigid, stated a wearer.
A comfortable shoe right out of the box, wrote a commenter.
One reviewer mentioned that the Ravenna 9 was bouncier, lighter, and faster compared to other Brooks running shoes.
A shoe that delivered fantastic stability even on steep roads, a runner remarked.
4 reasons not to buy
Numerous runners felt that the Ravenna 9 was too narrow, despite the various width options.
The toe box was tight-fitting, even after some miles, a disappointed user said.
One wearer experienced shin splints while running in the shoe.
The shoe rubbed uncomfortably against the lateral side of the foot, a runner observed.
Bottom line
The Brooks Ravenna 9 was admired by wearers on how it delivered comfort, support, and speed. There were many praises on the shoe’s midsole construction as well. On the other hand, users have rated poorly the Ravenna 9’s fit, primarily by some who experienced injuries while in the shoe. Overall, the Ravenna 9 was an acceptable stability running shoe for overpronators, but runners who are partial to fit might be wary before purchasing a pair."
Adidas Climachill Sonic Boost,,89.0,,309.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 6.7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Many runners welcomed the appealing design of the Sonic Boost.
It has the Climachill technology, which keeps the feet cool throughout any workout.
The Boost technology in the mid-sole adds energy-return and responsiveness.
The testers appreciated the cleatie design because it delivered maximum comfort.
Responsive cushioning and springiness are felt in the shoe.
The affordable price is also a positive comment among the reviewers.
It is a lightweight shoe and comfortable to wear for different routines.
3 reasons not to buy
There were complaints that the stretch band in the shoe entry felt a bit awkward and caused irritation to the skin.
This shoe is for neutral runners only.
Others noted that it lacked stability and support.
Bottom line
The Climachill Sonic Boost, just like the popular Ultra Boost is an Adidas running shoe built on the Boost technology that’s designed for optimum performance, comfort and efficacy. It’s an affordable shoe that’s great for any running routine."
Brooks PureFlow 5,,83.0,79.0,432.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Brooks Pureflow 7,"7 reasons to buy
The natural shape of the foot is followed by the upper unit, which was created with the Anatomical Last.
Most reviewers noted that the glove-like fit of the upper helped to heighten the responsiveness of the materials, as well as the comfort felt by the foot.
The 3D Fit Printed Overlays offers security and added overall support.
The BioMoGo DNA LT helps the mid-sole unit acclimate to the shape of the wearer’s foot, while the Flex Grooves provide flexibility without sacrificing the level of cushioning.
The custom ride follows the weight and gender of the wearer, making it more ideal when getting a customized shoe experience.
Blown rubber in the outsole is a durable layer that’s responsive and flexible.
The PureFlow 5 has an average weight that anyone can enjoy.
3 reasons not to buy
There were runners who felt that it had a narrow heel area, making the ball of the foot uncomfortable.
Some testers noted that the outsole was already noticeably getting worn after a few months of use.
Others thought that it needed some arch support to cater to those who need it.
Bottom line
The Brooks PureFlow 5 is lightweight neutral shoe for road running. Many users have been given quality performance from the PureFlow 5. It is a responsive running shoe that offers ventilation, flexibility and customized underfoot support for a better running experience all throughout."
Salomon S-Lab Sense Ultra 5 SG,,94.0,89.0,127.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The upper of the shoe features an anti-debris mesh that works as intended, according to some reviews.
Most of the runners applauded the midsole construction of the S-Lab Sense Ultra 5 SG that provides impressive stability, motion control and cushioning.
The quick lace fit system of the shoe promotes tight-fitting and agility gained several positive reviews.
Some runners were happy with the welded construction and lightweight materials used in this shoe.
The low to the ground construction and Profeel Film technology is a great combination that promotes balanced terrain feel and protection.
Most runners were satisfied with the aggressive lug design of the Salomon S-Lab Sense Ultra 5 SG that provided impressive grip while running on wet, muddy or soft surfaces.
3 reasons not to buy
The S-Lab Sense Ultra 5 SG is an expensive shoe.
The anti-debris mesh is not breathable as observed by most runners.
Not as durable as expected by some runners.
Bottom line
The Salomon S-Lab Sense Ultra 5 SG is a reliable trail shoe for neutral runners. It gained positive reviews because of the overall construction that offers superb cushioning and stability. Due to its impressive performance on varied trail surfaces, many runners would recommend this shoe not just to professionals but also to casual trail runners."
Merrell All Out Crush Tough Mudder 2,,94.0,80.0,168.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 6.7oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Most reviewers commended the grip the outsole provided. They expressed that they did not experience slipping and sliding as much as other Tough Mudder competitors. Another runner said that the grip was also sufficient on uneven terrain.
One user said that the laces did not unravel throughout the competition.
A good number of testers observed that the shoe was draining well.
The weight was light but the midsole still had enough cushioning for long runs on moderate terrain, said one runner.
The shoe is reasonably-priced.
2 reasons not to buy
Debris easily got into the shoe through the ankle area, based on a good number of reviews. This caused one runner to feel pain while running downhill.
One runner said that the collar rubbed on his ankles causing tender spots.
Bottom line
The Merrell All Out Crush Tough Mudder 2 was specifically designed for the Tough Mudder Competition. Users who used it for that purpose said that the shoe performed well, and took on the demands of the trail. Water was even draining well from the shoe. However, one major drawback some reviewers found was that pebbles and debris easily got into the shoe which caused some discomfort."
Salomon Kalalau, Salomon,94.0,10.0,106.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 7.4oz,,,, Normal | Normal,,"9 reasons to buy
Most of the runners admired the lightweight construction of the Salomon Kalalau.
The majority of the wearers were highly-appreciative of the shoe’s comfortable feel.
A good number of users liked the versatility of the Kalalau; they said it is also good for gym training, walking and as a casual shoe.
The shoe is easy to put on, based on some comments.
The Kalalau is affordable, according to some purchasers.
Several runners lauded the lacing system of the shoe, which they thought was easy to adjust.
The aesthetic design of the shoe gained positive feedback from a significant number of users.
The mesh material of the shoe’s upper unit is very breathable, said some testers.
Based on several comments, this shoe offered reliable traction while running on the trail.
2 reasons not to buy
Some of the purchasers mentioned that this shoe ran half-a-size smaller than what they were used to.
A few wide-footed users said that the shoe was too tight for them.
Bottom line
The Salomon Kalalau is a breathable and lightweight shoe that is packed with innovative technologies needed for light trail running. This neutral running shoe generally received positive praises from some runners because of its design, functionality, and comfort. Though a few users were disappointed because of the shoe’s sizing and fit, overall, the Kalalau has still emerged as a shoe with efficient features."
New Balance FuelCore Sonic v2,,91.0,,60.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.3oz , Women: 7.2oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
A few users mentioned that the New Balance FuelCore Sonic v2 is a very comfortable running shoe.
According to some reviews, the shoe feels like a sock.
Several wearers admired the Boa system of the Sonic v2; they said it is easy to adjust.
The slip-on design of the shoe gained positive feedback; some runners mentioned that it facilitates the shoe’s easy on and off.
Some buyers said that the shoe runs true to size.
The shoe has a breathable upper coverage, said some reviews.
A few wide-footed runners lauded the wide sizing of the FuelCore Sonic v2.
The New Balance FuelCore Sonic v2 is a nice-looking shoe, based on some comments.
1 reasons not to buy
One user disliked the midfoot strap because it created a tight and painful wrap on the top of the foot.
Bottom line
The New Balance FuelCore Sonic v2 has managed to meet the expectations of the users in terms of comfort, performance and fit. Positive comments were made regarding the shoe’s good-looking design, lacing system, and the availability of wide sizing. Overall, the customers are truly happy with the 2nd version of the FuelCore Sonic. To them, it is a worthy purchase."
Adidas Terrex Two Ultra Parley, Adidas,83.0,,8.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 9.9oz,,,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The majority of the buyers commented that the Adidas Terrex Two Ultra Parley is comfortable.
According to those who have bought it, the running shoe is well-cushioned.
Based on the reviews, the outsole is efficient in providing traction.
Many users mentioned that this running footwear has a perfect fit.
The attractive design of the shoe is admired by several consumers.
The shoe is versatile enough to be used in hiking, walking, and running trails, noted by a good number of testers.
3 reasons not to buy
One of the purchasers said that the running shoe lacks arch support.
A consumer said that the Adidas Terrex Two Ultra Parley needs some time to break-in.
As observed by a user, the shoe gets a little warm after a long period of running.
Bottom line
The overall response towards the Adidas Terrex Two Ultra Parley was positive. Most of them agree that the trail shoe is constructed according to the specific needs of neutral runners. With the utilization of high-quality materials and technologies, consumers enjoy comfort, fit, and excellent traction. Overall, the Adidas Terrex Two Ultra Parley was accepted by many as a perfect companion in achieving their running performance and goals."
Nike Air Zoom Terra Kiger 3,,91.0,83.0,79.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7.2oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Nike Air Zoom Terra Kiger 5,"6 reasons to buy
The Terra Kiger 3’s seamless upper design is valued by most runners as it is less irritating to the foot.
Most runners welcomed the inclusion of the Dynamic Flywire system, which improves the fit by adjusting with the lacing system.
The EVA sock liner follows the shape of the heel and arch, helping to cradle the foot responsibly.
The Zoom Air cushioning system offers low-profile underfoot support by means of pressurized air pockets.
A heel crash pad helps to lessen the impact shock when landing the foot on the ground based on the reviews of some runners.
Dual density outsole with multi-directional lugs offer durable protection and traction.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners felt that it was a bit heavier than the previous version.
Others thought that the Kiger 3 is limited to trail running.
A few noted that the upper unit was thicker, thus making it less breathable.
Bottom line
The Air Zoom Terra Kiger 3 from Nike is a popular trail shoe that gives exceptional service to runners and hikers who want a protective shoe for their adventures. It offers mild stability and a good amount of shock absorption mechanics."
Reebok Metreon, Reebok,83.0,,7.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral,,,,, Nov 2019,,,"5 reasons to buy
Several people are happy that the underfoot cushioning system of the Reebok Metreon is comfortable.
Some users believe that this Reebok running shoe is light enough for all-day use.
A handful of people are saying that the generously thick midsole offers responsible impact attenuation.
Heavyset consumers write that this product is able to support the weights of their bodies.
The upper unit feels secure and sturdy, according to most purchasers.
2 reasons not to buy
A few users believe that a break-in period is needed before the upper and underfoot platform can become fully form-welcoming.
Some consumers are stating that the exaggerated midsole piece makes the product look obnoxiously bulky.
Bottom line
The Reebok Metreon aims to blend stylishness and performance-readiness in a single package. The entire design is meant to channel the sleek look and functionality of running shoes, though its vibrant color schemes and max-level cushioning implementation can lean towards the conventional silhouettes of women sneakers. Users can wear this product for a variety of activities because it has a modern yet ready-to-go design scheme."
Under Armour Drift 2,,83.0,,227.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.3oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
One user said this running shoe was great for everyday sprints, as well as long city walks and quick workouts.
Many wearers felt it was lightweight and convenient for all-day wear.
A reviewer was satisfied with the foot-wrapping fit of the shoe.
A lot of runners liked the no-lace-tying construction as it enabled laid-back
The exclusive upper material was easy to clean, according to a customer.
Some users were impressed with the performance of the outsole.
4 reasons not to buy
The back of the upper rubbed against the skin and caused blisters, a reviewer said.
A customer said the entryway of the shoe was small and was quite a problem to wear.
The heel tended to slip while running, a user mentioned.
Several runners thought it needed a break-in period before getting comfortable to
Bottom line
With its practical and straightforward features, the Under Armour Drift 2 scored well with many of its wearers. Various runners had positive remarks on the shoe’s appearance and structure; on the other hand, some users experienced some size and fit issues."
Puma Ignite Limitless Weave, Puma,91.0,,93.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,, Mar 2018,,,"5 reasons to buy
Several consumers reported that the sizing scheme of the Puma Ignite Limitless Weave followed their expectations.
The design and color schemes of this model appealed to many testers.
According to some runners, the stretchy upper unit hugged the foot securely.
The cushioning system proved effective at keeping the foot comfortable, based on a couple of reviews.
Runners liked the lightweight nature of this running shoe.
1 reasons not to buy
A consumer claimed that this running shoe was uncomfortable to wear initially.
Bottom line
The Puma Ignite Limitless Weave was appreciated by most neutral runners because it was able to provide a comfortable underfoot experience, a lightweight ride, and secure coverage. Conversely, a person didn’t like this shoe at the start because it caused some discomfort to his foot. Overall, this road shoe proved to be a solid choice for everyday running."
Adidas Ultraboost Reflective,,82.0,,6.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The reflective elements that are present in this Adidas running shoe are welcomed because they make the runner extra visible in low-light.
People who have tested the Ultraboost Reflectiveare happy that the underfoot experience is responsive and comfortable.
The in-shoe experience is secure yet form-fitting, based on a couple of reviews.
A handful of consumers consider this product as a lightweight option for daily activities.
The modern and uncluttered aesthetics permit versatile use, according to purchasers.
2 reasons not to buy
Several consumers have noticed the reflective strips that are part of the overlay system coming off after only a few uses.
The mesh isn’t as durable as some users have thought; they have observed some holes near the toe area.
Bottom line
The overall reaction towards the Adidas Ultraboost Reflective has generally been welcoming. This road running shoe is appreciated because it apparently offers a stylish yet versatile purpose that can handle any activity. However, the durability of the upper unit has left a lot to be desired.
Fans of neutral running shoes that are for the roads can enjoy the Ultraboost Reflective."
Adidas Response 3,,92.0,,306.0,,, Road,, Men: 12.1oz , Women: 10.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Sep 2016,,,"7 reasons to buy
Many users believed that the shoe had the ‘best cushioning system ever’.
Many runners appreciated the roomy toe-box.
Several customers lauded the comfortably snug fit of the Adidas Response 3.
A few wearers said that the upper was fairly breathable owing to which their foot remained dry and cool throughout the running session.
Some of the users pointed out that the footwear was made using good quality materials.
A few purchasers liked the overall look and the colors.
A customer said that the Adidas Response 3 was certainly worth the money.
2 reasons not to buy
A few testers mentioned that the shoe felt a little narrow around the toe-box.
A customer was doubtful about the durability of the shoe since it started to show signs of wear after several miles of running.
Bottom line
The Adidas Response 3 has gained a competitive edge in the market owing to its exceptional cushioning system, an intelligent fit, and very decent looks. The neutral road running shoe suited most individuals in terms of the fit and sizing and its all-around features made it recommendable for those who are looking for a high comfortability and durability in their footwear."
Under Armour Surge 2,,83.0,,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.6oz , Women: 7.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The cushioning system that is present in the Under Armour Surge 2 has been lauded by those who have tested it.
Some users have mentioned that the breathability of the upper unit is reliable.
Several consumers believe that this road running shoe has a suitably lightweight build that can handle all-day use.
The traction capacity of the outsole unit is welcomed by runners who appreciated responsible surface control.
‘Versatile’ is a word that some people have used to describe this product as it can apparently handle different activities.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people have noted that the forefoot section restricts the natural splaying of the toes.
A handful of testers have stated that the upper unit is susceptible to tearing.
Bottom line
The Surge 2 is an Under Armour running shoe that is meant to accommodate those who are fans of road running. The silhouette is uncluttered, with breathable mesh and printed overlays governing the overall design. A springy performance is afforded by the full-length, industry-standard cushioning unit. Anyone can use the Surge 2 for any task that they fancy."
Adidas Energy Boost 2.0 ATR,,86.0,,101.0,,, Trail, Stability, Men: 11.2oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The TechFit upper provides structure with just a tad of flexibility.
The increasingly popular Boost midsole deliver premium and responsive cushioning.
Boasts of superior traction on a multitude of surfaces.
Almost all of the reviews noted how good the Energy Boost 2.0 ATR looks.
Most of the runners gave thumbs up to the shoe’s ability to lock down the foot.
Miles of running only showed minimal wear and tear according to many runners.
3 reasons not to buy
The Adidas Energy Boost 2.0 ATR is expensive.
It is on the heavier side of the spectrum.
A few users complained about its stiffness.
Bottom line
The Adidas Energy Boost 2.0 ATR is a bulked up and muscled version of the original model. It is a neutral shoe with significant arch support that slight overpronators can maximize. The slightly heavyweight and the stiff price will tone down the appeal of this Adidas running shoe."
Nike Zoom Pegasus Turbo Shield WP,,89.0,80.0,10.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Some testers believe that the Nike Zoom Pegasus Turbo Shield WP is naturally lightweight.
The midsole is praised for being comfortable.
The reflective elements on the facade are welcomed by nighttime runners.
Several purchasers are happy with the waterproof capacity of this running shoe.
A handful of testers have stated that the traction of the outsole is dependable.
2 reasons not to buy
Based on a couple of comments, the in-shoe experience is a bit stifling.
The inner sleeve irritates the skin of the foot, according to a tester.
Bottom line
The overall response towards the Nike Zoom Pegasus Turbo Shield WP has been positive. This Nike running shoe is considered a solid choice for urban adventures and rainy conditions. The waterproof and reflective features of the upper and the midsole’s comfortable design are highlighted allow road runners to continue their endeavors no matter the weather."
New Balance 1600 v2,,86.0,83.0,74.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 5.5oz , Women: 4.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"4 reasons to buy
Many liked the lightweight construction of the 1600 v2.
This shoe is very responsive and well-cushioned as mentioned in some reviews.
It features the DynaRide outsole technology for impressive traction without adding weight.
It has no-sew overlays that help secure the foot while running.
3 reasons not to buy
The shoe is too narrow and felt uncomfortable for some wide-footed runners.
Some runners have durability issues with the shoe.
Others don’t like the shoe’s light color.
Bottom line
The New Balance 1600 v2 is a lightweight running shoe that provides a combination of adequate cushioning, minimal arch support, excellent traction and responsiveness. The shoe gained positive and negative feedback but still managed to get the approval of the majority. The 1600 v2 is a great race day partner and works very well for speed training."
Merrell Fiery GTX,,86.0,,10.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 22.9oz , Women: 20.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A lot of consumers commented that the Merrell Fiery GTX is comfortable.
Based on the reviews, the shoe is lightweight in structure.
Some of the testers agreed that the running footwear provides a good amount of grip.
The shoe is supportive, one of the buyers said.
According to those who have tried it, the shoe is stable even when tackling uneven surfaces.
It has a roomy toe box, noted by many users.
The shoe is best used for muddy, rocky, and grassy paths, several buyers mentioned.
2 reasons not to buy
One of the buyers said that the waterproofing feature is not as efficient as expected.
The upper fabric of the shoe wears out easily after several uses only, according to a runner.
Bottom line
Overall, the majority of the testers consider the Merrell Fiery GTX as a comfortable running shoe. The technologies used in making the shoe provides enough support and stability to medium-footed runners. They love the materials employed in the shoe as it provides the right amount of traction and lightweight structure needed to complete the running session."
361 Degrees Pacer ST,,,86.0,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.4oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,,,
Brooks Defyance 10,,86.0,,21.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Many consumers felt that the Brooks Defyance 10’s sizing options followed their preferences.
The visual aspect of this running shoe was much appreciated for being appealing.
The underfoot cushioning system was deemed responsive and comfortable by several testers.
Some purchasers noted that the traction capacity of the outsole was reliable and precise.
The breathability of the upper unit gained the favor of most people.
1 reasons not to buy
The Brooks Defyance 10 looked a bit bulky, according to a few consumers.
Bottom line
The feedback for the Brooks Defyance 10 was positive. People were generally happy with this update to the long-running series. They felt that the cushioning was reactive and that the outsole was steady on the ground.  The aesthetics and the well-ventilated upper were also given praise. On the other hand, some consumers considered the structure of this neutral shoe to be bulky."
Puma Faas 300 S v2,,86.0,,60.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.1oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
A good number of reviewers were impressed by the comfort provided by the Puma 300 S v2.
It is affordable.
The shoe has a nice mix of light stability and flexibility.
More than a few loved the smoothness of their runs in this shoe.
Reflective details make it a good option for low-visibility running.
It is quite light.
Some runners really liked the cushy feel of the midsole.
There are several color options available.
The shoe looks sleek and fast, according to a handful of reviewers.
3 reasons not to buy
Several reviewers noted that it is narrow.
A few found the fit too snug.
A handful had durability issues with the upper.
Bottom line
Puma successfully blends a touch of stability, cushioning, and flexibility in the 2nd edition of the 300 S. This lightweight running shoe is versatile enough for up-tempo workouts or when piling the distance is the main focus. For those who will find the right fit, the shoe has exceptional comfort and the right amount of cushioning for everyday training. At a very affordable price, the shoe offers a sleek look and the kind of no-hassle performance most runners would look for in their shoes."
Puma Speed 600 Ignite,,86.0,87.0,43.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Puma Speed 600 Ignite 3,"7 reasons to buy
The substantial padding and luxurious interior provide runners a very comfortable ride in the Speed 600.
Some runners noted that the durability is above what one can expect from a daily trainer.
The reflective overlays look cool and help with precautionary measures when running in low-light conditions or areas.
Several runners have used the shoe for distances ranging from 10Ks to really long runs.
It looks awesome, according to most reviews.
The transition is fast and effortless, noted a few testers.
Excellent ground feel.
3 reasons not to buy
A handful of users believed that the price point is little too much.
It is a bit heavy for some.
A couple of testers felt beat up because of too much ground feel for a daily trainer.
Bottom line
Puma offers a daily trainer in the Speed series in the form of the 600. The moderate cushioning does not hinder the bouncy nature of the Ignite foam while ground feedback remains to be excellent. With good arch support and superior comfort in tow, runners can pile on the miles with this shoe."
Under Armour Charged Rogue Storm,,77.0,,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The traction of the Under Armour Charged Rogue Storm is praised by the majority of runners.
The uncluttered design is welcomed because it doesn’t look bulky or unappealing.
Some have stated that the cushioning system is supportive and comfortable.
Heel security is appreciated due to the presence of the stitched-on heel counter.
The water-repellent treatment of the upper gained some fans for its ability to stave off mild splashes.
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of testers have observed that the in-shoe experience is a bit stuffy, especially when under warm conditions.
The outsole has difficulty handling wet surfaces, according to a few consumers.
Bottom line
The overall feedback of people towards the Charged Rogue Storm has been positive. The highlighted accouterments of this Under Armour running shoe are the water-repellent upper, the traction-ready outsole, and the accommodating cushioning system. It offers flexibility and versatility that allows efficient road running in mildly wet conditions."
Reebok Driftium, Reebok,91.0,,232.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Majority of users describe the Reebok Driftium as a comfortable shoe. Others claim it does not require a break-in period.
Many runners are impressed with the precise fit that the shoe has provided.
The Reebok Driftium has terrific flexibility, according to some wearers.
A number of buyers agree that the Driftium is affordable.
The upper of the shoe is breathable, one user has mentioned.
The in-shoe room remains adequate even when a thick sock is worn, according to a reviewer.
4 reasons not to buy
A few users doubt the durability of the upper as they had experienced the mesh either tear up or wear a hole through itself.
A couple of runners had observed the Driftium’s lack of cushioning as they had to put in extra insoles for padding.
Some buyers dislike that the Driftium has limited width options.
One wearer claims that running in the Reebok Driftium has made their hip muscles sore.
Bottom line
The Reebok Driftium has received mixed reviews from its users. This road running shoe has impressed runners because of its accurate fit, affordable price, and comfortable details. Although some wearers have found structural issues such as durability and cushioning, the Reebok Driftium remains to be a great buy for the majority as they claim they would repurchase the shoe."
Inov-8 Roclite 325,,77.0,80.0,23.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.5oz , Women: 11.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Most reviewers said that the Inov-8 Roclite 325 was comfortable once it was broken in.
Several users said that it was supportive yet lightweight for a hiking shoe.
A lot of testers appreciated the simplicity of the shoe’s design.
Some runners were thankful for the above ankle support provided them.
The majority of reviewers mentioned that the shoe worked on any terrain. One user even said that the sole was efficient, even on uneven ground.
Plenty of testers said that the upper was sufficiently breathable.
2 reasons not to buy
A few users said that the Roclite 325 still needed quite some time to break in.
One user expressed that the eyelets of his shoe ripped after only six weeks of use.
Bottom line
With its versatile grip, the Roclite 325 is fit for fast-packing, mountain running, and trekking. It’s protective upper, built around the natural anatomy of the foot, ensures that runners have a sense of freedom, comfort, and safety while on the trail. Those looking for an adaptable trail running shoe for different outdoor adventures should check this out."
Salomon Wings Pro 3,,,93.0,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,,,
Puma Burst, Puma,93.0,,104.0,$65,$30 (save 63%), Road, Neutral,,,,, Oct 2016, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
The Puma Burst was visually appealing, noted several reviewers.
The overall construction of this shoe was appreciated by a majority of those who have tried it.
The price of this shoe was affordable, according to several runners.
It was true-to-size, stated consumers; they didn’t need to deviate from the sizing scheme that they were used to.
Based on the user-feedback, the width wasn’t too narrow or too wide.
It felt adequately lightweight, a reviewer commented.
Many testers have considered the Puma Burst to be a very comfortable shoe for their daily activities.
3 reasons not to buy
A consumer complained of some foot-pain while wearing the Puma Burst.
According to a tester, the top section of the sole unit was slippery and it didn’t keep the foot in place; he apparently always had the feeling that his foot was going to slip off the shoe.
The inner lining’s a bit thin, according to a few testers; for them, it wasn’t as agreeable as other shoes in the Puma stable.
Bottom line
Generally, the feedback for the Puma Burst was positive. Many of those who have tried it were satisfied with its service and functionality on the roads. They even lauded its looks, which, for them, was eye-catching. On the other hand, there was a runner who was not able to feel comfortable while wearing it."
Salomon S-Lab Sense 6 SG,,93.0,85.0,135.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 7.9oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Salomon S-Lab Sense 8 SG,"5 reasons to buy
A reviewer commented that the Salomon S-Lab Sense 6 SG has an aptly breathable upper.
One user was glad to report that the S-Lab Sense 6 SG had reliable durability.
A good number of users commented that the traction was excellent on wet & loose mud, as well as dry rock.
Several users were impressed by the high quality of this running shoe’s components.
Running felt light and fast, based on a variety of reviews.
3 reasons not to buy
One reviewer mentioned that the lace holes on his shoe were easily torn.
A tester said that the shoe is for a very specific purpose. It’s not as versatile in use as other running shoes.
A good number of users observed that the shoe felt tight or narrow.
Bottom line
The Salomon S-Lab Sense 6 SG was designed to be a neutral running shoe that focused on the runner’s performance on the trails. With its breathable and lightweight design, it was made suitable for soft ground conditions. The shoe possesses excellent grip on muddy, loose, or even wet terrain. It may not be as functional as other shoes because it was designed for specific conditions, but when the need is there, the runner is able to rely on the performance the Salomon S-Lab Sense 6 SG provides."
Under Armour Drift,,87.0,80.0,114.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Under Armour Drift 2,"5 reasons to buy
The Under Armour Drift is lightweight.
This shoe is very affordable.
Some reviews mentioned that this shoe is very comfortable to wear.
True to size.
According to some runners, this shoe has the right amount of cushioning.
2 reasons not to buy
The sole of the shoe wears out quickly.
The upper is not breathable as expected.
Bottom line
The Under Armour Drift is a road running shoe that delivers the right amount of cushioning, durability and traction. This shoe is great for runners with neutral foot motion and it is best for daily training and short distance runs."
Reebok Sublite Sport, Reebok,71.0,,17.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.4oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,," Narrow, Normal | Normal",,"6 reasons to buy
A runner noted that the Reebok Sublite Sport fit comfortably.
Many testers were in agreement when they commended this shoe for its lightweight nature.
Compared to its affordable price, the quality of this model was fairly good, noted one user.
The sole unit cushioned the foot well, even though it looked thin, commented a reviewer.
One reviewer noted that its comfortable design allowed them to use it for long periods of time.
The Reebok Sublite Sport looked appealing for those who have tried it.
2 reasons not to buy
The outsole has a weird slapping sound when it made contact with the ground, a user said.
A couple of reviewers noted that the upper material is rough.
Bottom line
Many runners welcomed the Reebok Sublite Sport. For them, it was great for a variety of activities. Casual shoe enthusiasts enjoyed its looks and its comfortable design. It’s affordable and well-crafted, thus making it great for those who need a reliable shoe for their daily activities."
Zoot Carlsbad,,84.0,,22.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The internal liner and open mesh in the upper of the Zoot Carlsbad offers maximum breathability.
Most of the runners applauded the durability of this shoe.
The Z-Bound technology of the Carlsbad provides soft responsive feel under the foot as what most runners observed.
Several runners were satisfied with the shoe’s seamless internal fit, which is designed to eliminate blisters.
Majority of the reviews noted the comfortable construction of the Zoot Carlsbad.
2 reasons not to buy
Some reviews took note of the limited color variations of the Carlsbad.
Slightly high-priced shoe.
Bottom line
The Zoot Carlsbad is a neutral running shoe that performs well on the road. The comfort, cushioning and durability of this shoe made it ideal for long-distance and short runs. This shoe is a great partner for daily trainings."
Reebok Floatride Run Smooth, Reebok,73.0,,7.0,$120,$54 (save 55%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Most users liked that the Reebok Floatride Run Smooth offers good midsole support.
A few runners mentioned how lightweight the shoe is during their runs.
A notable number of wearers liked the fact that the Reebok Floatride Run Smooth has good looking aesthetics.
Some buyers were delighted with the cushioning technology of the Floatride foam technology which provides the comfort of the shoe.
A lot of runners liked the breathability of the Floatride Smooth’s upper.
2 reasons not to buy
More than a couple of purchasers have noted that the midsole tends to be slightly stiff when comparing it to shoes in the same weight class.
A recent buyer has mentioned that she did not like the feeling of the upper mesh as it was too hard for her liking.
Bottom line
The Reebok Floatride Run Smooth promotes light and responsive feel from the first step until the last.  A lot of runners say that it gives out a feeling of floating when they wear it for their runs thus the shoe living up to its name Floatride Run Smooth. With the shoe’s Flexweave upper, it is appreciated by most wearers as it provides both breathability and flexibility.  Despite the number of not so savvy reviews about the shoe’s durability, the Reebok Floatride Run Smooth is still chosen by most buyers for its unique design and comfort. It is indeed a neutral running shoe that can be used for either daily training or the long distance runs."
Reebok Runner 4, Reebok,79.0,,9.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
The price of a pair of the Reebok Runner 4 is deemed extremely affordable.
Some runners have claimed that the lightweight structure of this road running shoe permits all-day use.
The forefoot section of this shoe’s interior permits natural toe-splay.
People have noted that the memory foam insole has a capacity to support the curves of the underfoot.
The traction given by the outsole is appreciated by those who like constant surface control when running.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people have mentioned that the in-shoe environment has a restrictive nature that limits natural foot movement
Some users have noticed signs of wear in the outsole, stating that the tread-pattern won’t last a long time.
Bottom line
The overall feedback towards the Reebok Runner 4 has been mostly positive. This neutral running shoe is welcomed because it has an affordable price that anyone can approach with ease. The lightness of the construction and the comfort given by the memory foam insole are also highlighted. Inversely, the restrictive in-shoe wrap and the flimsy outsole durability are criticized.
Fans of cheap running shoes that can handle the roads are welcome to test the Reebok Runner 4."
Under Armour Drift Mineral,,81.0,,42.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Sep 2016,,,"8 reasons to buy
Most of the customer reviews included comfort as a major asset of the Under Armour Drift Mineral.
The testers generally had positive remarks about its lightweight nature.
Many were very happy to receive compliments while wearing this shoe.
Some runners stated that it remained comfortable when used for casual walks or for gym workouts.
There are several color combinations available.
A few runners noted how well the shoe supported their arches.
More than a handful use it for all-day purposes.
According to a reviewer, the upper fabrics were stretchy enough to accommodate the natural form of the foot.
5 reasons not to buy
The Drift Mineral from Under Armour runs small, according to more than a handful of reviewers.
It does not hold up to usual wear and tear, based on the observations of a few runners.
A small number of runners thought that it fell narrow in the forefoot.
There were a couple of users who experienced rubbing and blisters in their heels.
Some consumers thought that the actual shoe didn’t look as appealing as it was on the pictures online.
Bottom line
The widely popular Under Armour Drift gets a slight twist in the Mineral version. It sports a fabric-like upper that really hugs the foot. The shoe has loads of comfort, very good arch support, and the looks to match many of the more expensive shoes in the market. With the kind of aesthetic value and performance this shoe brings, the already reasonable price tag should feel like a steal for runners who are looking for a lightweight shoe that can match speed mid-distance runs with ease."
Reebok PT Prime Runner FC, Reebok,77.0,,70.0,$60,$34 (save 43%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Many consumers described the Reebok PT Prime Runner FC as comfortable.
A bevy of testers looked at the façade and deemed it visually appealing.
The knit-material on the upper adequately hugged the foot, according to some reviewers.
The lightweight nature of this running shoe was lauded as runners were able to use this shoe for extended periods.
Purchasers flocked towards the affordable price of the Reebok PT Prime Runner FC.
The flexibility of the platform worked sufficiently to welcome the natural movement capacity of the foot.
2 reasons not to buy
The upper separated from the sole unit after only a few weeks of use, some testers complained.
A consumer claimed that the midsole sagged quickly.
Bottom line
The Reebok PT Prime Runner FC didn’t disappoint as an affordable running shoe with fresh aesthetics and a flexible build. Testers were happy because this neutral shoe offered them comfort and versatile performance on the roads. Moreover, the affordable price magnetized many shoe enthusiasts. On the other hand, the durability of the midsole and upper was given a thumbs-down rating by several people."
Adidas Aerobounce ST 2,,,,,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,
New Balance Fresh Foam Gobi Trail,,89.0,82.0,149.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,, New Balance Fresh Foam Gobi Trail v3,"6 reasons to buy
A lightweight and supportive fit is provided by an engineered upper that has a no-sew process.
Runners appreciated the inclusion of the Toe Protect™, a rubber compound that protects the forefoot from debris and surface contact.
The modern design of this shoe allows the runner to wear it for trainings, as well as for casual purposes.
The upper coverage of the Fresh Foam Gobi Trail is essentially irritation-free, allowing sockless wearing experiences.
A comfortable and natural ride is provided by the Fresh Foam, a lightweight sole unit.
The outsole unit uses a design that allows it to function well on both the roads and the trails
2 reasons not to buy
A few runners thought that the New Balance Fresh Foam Gobi Trail wasn’t as aggressive on the trails because it features some thin components and features.
A few noted that it didn’t have a shielding mechanism that works against water infiltration, which is helpful when tackling the unpredictable trail conditions.
Bottom line
Trails and roads aren’t going to be a problem for runners when they have the New Balance Fresh Foam Gobi Trail with them. This neutral running shoe was created to be versatile when it comes to its functionality and purpose, so it becomes truly helpful for road-and-trail adventurers and athletes."
Asics Gel FujiRunnegade 2,,78.0,,159.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 7.7oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The Gel FujiRunnegade 2 features a water-repellent upper.
The sock-like fit allows runners to wear it without using socks first.
This shoe has an anti-gravel tongue that keeps debris from entering the shoe.
The upper of this shoe is directly attached to the mid-sole for comfort and stability.
Based on some reviews, the shoe does not disappoint on uphill climbs and downhill traversals.
It features a solid rubber outsole for durability and traction.
Most runners applauded the overall durable construction of the Asics Gel FujiRunnegade 2.
2 reasons not to buy
The majority of the complaints were about its narrow heel, which apparently caused blisters to testers.
Damp terrain doesn’t do well for the upper fabric, which easily gets soaked and heavy when exposed to splashes of water.
Bottom line
The 2nd version of the Gel FujiRunnegade from Asics is a durable neutral trail shoe and a responsive training partner for outdoor training. This shoe is designed to give stability and support. This shoe is also great for daily treks and exercises."
Inov-8 Roclite 295,,85.0,82.0,110.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The Inov-8 Roclite 295 performed excellently on soft-surface trails, according to a runner.
One user praised the shoe’s water drainage system.
The tread of the outsole was outstanding and showed longevity, a reviewer mentioned.
The Roclite 295 was a great shoe to wear in both summer and winter weathers.
Several purchasers agreed it was a fantastic shoe that suited both long and short distance runs.
2 reasons not to buy
The lacing system started to fall apart after less than a month of usage, a user experienced.
Some wearers thought the shoe ran small.
Bottom line
The Roclite 295 is a lightweight trail running shoe for neutral runners. Many users were pleased with the quality of the Inov-8 Roclite 295 that they were convinced to purchase another pair. Positive comments surround the shoe regarding its features and performance, as well as the comfort it offered."
Newton Fusion,,85.0,,7.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 7.4oz , Women: 6oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
A lot of the runners appreciate the lightness of the Newton Fusion.  
The running shoe is very comfortable on the foot, claimed a few wearers. 
Several purchasers hail the versatility of the shoe. 
It has reduced knee pains, reported a number of customers. 
Some athletes have shared that the neutral running shoe increased their pace. 
The road running shoe has grippy traction, expressed various commenters.
3 reasons not to buy
According to some reviewers, the shoe is not suitable for long-distance running. 
Several racers have needed longer break-in time with the neutral shoe. 
Multiple critics are apprehensive about the security of the platform.
Bottom line
Sporting top-notch engineering, the Fusion from Newton highlights a premier cushioning system. Given such construction, the running shoe is set for optimal energy return. This targets unmatched propulsion and protection from impact. With the Newton Fusion, racers are equipped with all-day support and comfort."
Newton Motion 7,,83.0,86.0,40.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.1oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 3mm , Women: 3mm,,, Newton Motion 9,"12 reasons to buy
Based on observations, the shoe is lightweight in structure.
The majority of the users observed that the Newton Motion 7 was supportive.
Several reviewers admired its perfect fit.
Some testers commented that the shoe provided a springy ride.
The shoe has a well-constructed upper, according to a lot of consumers.
Several buyers noted that the Newton Motion 7 has a high-level of cushioning.
A handful of testers said that the shoe was best used in racing, training and tempo runs.
A lot of reviewers appreciated its responsiveness.
A good number of purchasers observed that the shoe was comfortable to wear.
The wide toe box made some purchasers happy.
The shoe was flexible, according to several wearers.
One of the users said that the Newton Motion 7 provided a painless running experience.
2 reasons not to buy
One of the buyers was disappointed because of the shoe's poor quality of stitching in the tongue unit.
Several consumers said that the shoe was expensive.
Bottom line
The Newton Motion 7 has made many users contented because of its spectacular cushioning and incredible fit. Aside from the lightweight structure, the shoe also offers the right amount of support, flexibility, and comfort. While others have issues with price and quality, others still appreciated the shoe because of its well-constructed upper and fantastic performance. Overall, the Newton Motion 7 is an excellent option for those who are seeking a responsive, supportive, comfortable, and lightweight shoe."
Brooks Dyad 7,,66.0,84.0,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.2oz , Women: 10.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Brooks Dyad 11,"6 reasons to buy
Breathable, moisture-managing mesh makes up the main upper fabric of the Brooks Dyad 7.
Synthetic overlays that are stitched onto the upper make the coverage feel secure.
The mid-foot fit is snugger because of the Internal Support Saddle.
Neutral runners appreciated the cushioning of this shoe, which was comfortable and springy.
Abrasion-resistant rubber protects the rest of the sole unit from wear and tear.
It has an affordable price.
1 reasons not to buy
Some runners thought that the color options were bland and uninteresting.
Bottom line
The Brooks Dyad 7 is a running shoe that’s great for neutral runners, though it offers adequate mid-foot support to keep the foot as comfortable as possible for longer races and running sessions. It doesn’t have a very expensive price, too."
Adidas Vigor 6 TR, Adidas,92.0,,500.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 13oz , Women: 9oz,,, Jun 2017,,,"7 reasons to buy
The Adidas Vigor 6 TR felt lightweight, stated a good number of consumers; it was able to carry them through the trails with ease.
Many testers noted that this running shoe had a good feel to it, from the upper to the underfoot platform.
The underfoot experience felt like standing or running on clouds, according to several users.
A lot of runners appreciated the available color schemes, stating that such designs made the product more appealing to look at.
The general quality of the materials received positive remarks.
The tread pattern on the outsole gave responsible traction, noted some reviewers.
There were purchasers who reported that the Adidas Vigor 6 TR stayed efficient, even when used for work or for gym exercises.
2 reasons not to buy
The toe box was a bit tight for many users.
The front section of the upper unit tore off after only 2 months, a disgruntled runner complained.
Bottom line
According to a majority of those who have tested it, the Adidas Vigor 6 TR was efficient as a trail running shoe and as a daily option for work and exercise sessions. They were appreciative of its features, its comfortable platform and traction-ready outsole. Conversely, there were detractors and they had a number of cautionary words about this neutral running shoe."
Puma Speed Ignite Netfit 2, Puma,,94.0,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.7oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,
Asics Gel Zaraca 3,,92.0,,397.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Zaraca 4,"6 reasons to buy
Fused overlays with stitched reinforcements allow the upper to wrap around the foot easily.
Many runners appreciated the durability of this running shoe.
The cushioning is soft and springy, which runners welcomed.
The moderate weight prevents runners from feeling as if the shoe is dragging them down.
Durable rubber shields the sole unit from wear and tear.
Breathable mesh makes the upper unit very comfortable on the skin.
2 reasons not to buy
The upper began to tear off for a few testers.
It runs a bit smaller than the usual.
Bottom line
The 3rd version of the Asics Gel Zaraca was engineered to move more naturally with the runner’s foot. It’s lightweight and flexible, so it won’t feel restrictive or limiting. It caters to the needs of neutral runners."
Under Armour SpeedForm Fortis Vent,,92.0,,101.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.5oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A lightweight, breathable and durable mesh material is used for the upper unit of the SpeedForm Fortis Vent.
Runners appreciated the next-to-skin comfort that this shoe’s design provided.
An adjustable lockdown strap keeps the rear of the foot in place.
The sock liner has been embedded into the mid-sole and it adds more cushioning and support to the foot, while also staving off moisture.
A dual-layer platform is made to absorb shock forces, transfer energy to the runner, and enables the foot to lift off more efficiently.
The natural stride is encouraged because of a well-cushioned heel area and grooves in the forefoot.
High impact areas of the external sole unit are covered with durable rubber.
2 reasons not to buy
The silicone grip in the rear area irritated the heel of a few runners.
A few noted that it was one size smaller than what they were used to.
Bottom line
A well-cushioned running experience is what the Under Armour SpeedForm Fortis Vent is all about. It assists the runner’s foot and carries it in a comfortable and unrestricted manner. Tackling the roads becomes easier for neutral runners because of this long-lasting, and great-looking running companion."
Inov-8 X-Claw 275,,92.0,87.0,64.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
One reviewer noted that the upper unit of the Inov-8 X-Claw 275 was able to remain flexible even though it had protective layers and overlays.
The upper unit was smartly reinforced to offer protection, wrote one tester.
A user wrote that the toe box was roomy enough to allow natural splaying of the toes for increased control over the trail surfaces.
The cushioning system of this shoe was greatly welcomed because it was adequately springy.
Some runners thought that the mid-sole was capable of resisting wear and tear, even after many uses.
Runners loved the grip of the outsole.
A tester liked the concept of a slightly higher collar because it seemed like it was capable of keeping rocks and dirt out.
3 reasons not to buy
A runner said that the Inov-8 X-Claw 275 had a lot of cushion, but little structure, which is not for over-pronators.
One tester observed that the aggressive gripping lugs of the outsole didn’t make it agreeable on hard-packed dirt trails and dirt roads.
Those who have narrow feet might feel that it’s too wide, noted one reviewer.
Bottom line
Many trail adventurers appreciated the comfortable cushioning, reliable outsole construction, and protective coverage of the Inov-8 X-Claw 275. They felt that their feet were well-shielded from dust and rocks, and they didn’t have a hard time traversing many types of surfaces. A few noted that it was a bit wide, and that the mid-sole wasn’t able to support over-pronated foot motion."
Asics Gel Kayano 26 MX, Asics,92.0,,34.0,,, Road, Stability,,,,,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Support: The majority of the reviewers express that the Asics Gel Kayano 26 MX is supportive. 
Comfort: This running companion is comfortable, according to a lot of users. 
Durability: Several buyers have testified that this shoe is built to last. 
Upper: The form-fitting upper has gained favor from many satisfied wearers. 
Weight: Some runners said that the shoe is fast and lightweight. 
Cushioning: Numerous buyers observe that the Gel Kayano 26 MX offers excellent cushioning. 
Style: Multiple consumers love the stylish design of this running partner.
2 reasons not to buy
Fit: A couple of users feel that the Asics Gel Kayano 26 MX is a bit tight. 
Price: A few commenters think that this shoe is too expensive.
Bottom line
Featuring a contemporary design, the Asics Gel Kayano 26 MX offers a balance of style and performance. This running shoe is equipped with stability features, which help minimize the impact of overpronation while guiding the foot for a more efficient toe off. It is suitable for consumers seeking a comfortable and durable stability running shoe."
Asics Gel Evate 2,,90.0,,199.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.2oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 13mm,,, Asics Gel Evate 3,"6 reasons to buy
The mesh upper covers the foot comfortably, while also remaining breathable.
Synthetic overlays that are stitched onto the upper provide a snug and secure fit.
The insole is cushioned, so it adds a bit more underfoot comfort; it can easily be replaced, as well.
The mid-sole unit utilizes a full-length foam that’s comfortable and very responsive to the performance needs of the wearer.
Many runners welcomed the durable nature of the Asics Gel Evate 2, which allowed them to use it many times without worrying about wear and tear.
The overall quality of this shoe, from the coverage to the cushioning, has been lauded by many testers.
2 reasons not to buy
A few runners thought that the Asics Gel Evate 2 was a bit wide around the heel and mid-foot, which made their feet wobbly inside it.
Some felt that it looked uncomfortably bulky for their tastes.
Bottom line
Responsive cushioning and comfortable coverage are important aspects of an Asics running shoe. The 2nd version of the Gel Evate provides such conveniences to runners who aim to be at their best when performing. Underfoot support and gait efficiency mechanics add stability to those who have under-pronated foot motion."
Saucony Peregrine 7,,88.0,87.0,291.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.4oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Saucony Peregrine 10,"12 reasons to buy
Many wearers enjoyed the breathable upper unit of the Saucony Peregrine 7.
A reviewer noticed that the padding in the heel collar was thicker than the previous version’s, and that it was shaped in a way that allowed it to hold the foot better.
Ground feedback is noticeable despite the presence of the very aggressive lugs, based on the comments of some reviewers.
Several testers appreciated the inclusion of protective components such as the rubber toe tip and the rock plate; they felt shielded from the harsh surfaces and objects.
A reviewer praised the upper unit’s TPU exoskeleton because it locked down the midfoot section of his foot incredibly well.
Several reviewers wrote that the external heel counter was efficient when it came to supporting and protecting the rear of the foot.
The mid-sole was fast and responsive, according to a number of purchasers.
A handful of runners lauded the seamless upper construction as it prevented them from getting hotspots or blisters.
The addition of the Everun top sole gives the shoe more bounce.
Several runners and expert reviewers loved the fact that the heel counter is no longer as rigid and as unforgiving as the one found in the earlier model.
The roomier toe box was appreciated by a handful of runners.
A moderate number of runners really liked the upper’s ability to keep off debris.
1 reasons not to buy
The toe bumper was soft and it wasn’t very efficient at protecting the front of the foot, according to a tester.
Bottom line
Many consumers considered the Saucony Peregrine 7 to be a worthy update to the popular series of trail shoes. They welcomed its design, its protective elements, as well as its strong features. Though some had some concerns with the effectiveness of some of its components, it was still generally lauded by neutral runners for its superb performance on the unpredictable terrains."
Asics Gel Kayano 25 SP,,93.0,,2068.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.9oz , Women: 9.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 13mm,,, Asics Gel Kayano 26 SP,"5 reasons to buy
Many people loved the color choices that are available for the Asics Gel Kayano 25 SP.
Some heavyset consumers stated that the underfoot platform was able to adequately support the weights of their bodies.
The upper unit didn’t bunch up and cause irritation to the skin of the foot, several testers reported.
The toe box was spacious enough to welcome a natural toe-spread, according to a few purchasers.
Runners who suffer from foot issues such as plantar fasciitis claimed that the midsole staved off any discomfort.
2 reasons not to buy
The Gel Kayano 25 SP has less cushioning compared to the original shoe, according to a tester.
Some users noted that the running shoe has a narrow toe box.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Kayano 25 SP received a lot of positive feedback from those who have tried it. The elements that garnered renown include the highly supportive underfoot cushioning system, the charming visuals, and the non-irritating upper unit. The negative point about this road shoe was apparently its sizing options which were said to be half-a-size smaller than the standard choices."
New Balance 910 v4 GTX,,75.0,,44.0,,," Trail, Snow, Mud", Neutral, Men: 9.6oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
A wearer commented that the upper fits like a glove.
The New Balance 910 v4 GTX offered excellent grip on technical trails, a user remarked.
The GORE-TEX® upper proved to be an outstanding feature, especially in snowy runs, wrote a reviewer.
The midsole’s close-to-ground feel helped enable a steady run, according to a customer.
A couple of runners appreciated the shoe’s lighter weight compared to the previous version.
The upper was comfortable and breathable even with the GORE-TEX® membrane wrapped around it, an impressed user said.
5 reasons not to buy
One buyer said the colors were loud and unpleasant to the eye.
Another felt the toe box was too narrow.
The shoe was not stable enough on uneven surfaces, experienced a runner.
Many users found that the shoe required a break-in period.
The collar was overly firm and rounded, thus making it rub on the ankle uncomfortably, a wearer complained.
Bottom line
The New Balance 910 v4 GTX has gathered many reviews in its favor, notably about the features and ride. However, there were criticisms about the shoe’s construction and fit. Overall, the shoe proved to be an efficient runner with promising qualities, but there is still a significant room for improvement."
Mizuno Wave Prophecy 5,,85.0,75.0,167.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.6oz , Women: 10.4oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Mizuno Wave Prophecy 9,"5 reasons to buy
Many runners applauded the Mizuno Intercool technology that keeps the foot dry and cool.
The upper has an air mesh that is breathable.
Some runners were impressed by how comfortable the Wave Prophecy 5 is.
It comes with a removable insock for added cushioning and comfort.
It has the Mizuno X10 technology that adds durability to high wear areas.
3 reasons not to buy
The Mizuno Prophecy 5 is very expensive.
Some runners felt that this shoe is very heavy.
Others felt that this shoe is not well-cushioned as promised.
Bottom line
The Mizuno Wave Prophecy 5 is a neutral running shoe that offers excellent feel, flexibility, and comfort. Some users admired the shoe's performance but there are also a few who had a negative experience in this shoe. Overall, the Prophecy 5 is best for performance training and for short and long distance road running."
Under Armour Thrill 2,,89.0,,340.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Jun 2017,,,"7 reasons to buy
The majority of runners called Under Armour Thrill 2 a pair of optimally cushioned shoes.
The users were impressed with the shoe’s lightweight nature.
The wearers noted how highly breathable its upper was after it kept their feet amazingly dry during longer workout sessions.
The purchasers seemed happy with the reasonable price of this running shoe.
A few runners mentioned how their legs felt different in the shoe owing to its excellent underfoot cushioning system.
The looks-conscious customers admired the overall design and color scheme of the Under Armour Thrill 2.
A few runners happily highlighted how well the shoe held up, even after many running sessions.
1 reasons not to buy
A user returned his pair since he thought that the cushioning on the sole was inadequate.
Bottom line
The Under Armour Thrill 2, a neutral road running shoe, is a great choice when it comes to high comfortability, maximum durability and good performance on asphalt. It is an all-rounder shoe for people who are looking for a visually appealing footwear in an affordable price range."
Saucony Echelon 6,,77.0,,76.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Saucony Echelon 7,"5 reasons to buy
Several consumers reported that the Saucony Echelon 6 was able to offer the perfect amount of cushioning.
A lot of people noted that this shoe was true to size.
The toe box was wide enough to accommodate toe-splay, some testers stated.
According to a runner, the foot-chamber was wide enough to allow custom orthotics that didn’t slide forward during the running session.
Most of those who have tried this product found its quality to be top-tier.
3 reasons not to buy
The limited color options didn’t sit well with a couple of runners. They would’ve liked more color schemes.
A tester complained that the laces were too short.
One person was concerned about the sizing scheme being too small for his tastes.
Bottom line
The Saucony Echelon 6 gained fans for its comfortable underfoot experience, its accommodating forefoot construction, and its quality design. The consensus is that it’s an excellent update to the long-running series. But some detractors had their say about this road running shoe, criticizing the lack of various color options, the shortness of the laces, and the inconsistency of the sizing."
Asics Endurant, Asics,85.0,,377.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.9oz , Women: 7.6oz,,, Jun 2017,,,"9 reasons to buy
The Asics Endurant fit perfectly around the feet of many runners.
The mesh material of the upper unit gained praise for being breathable.
Several consumers felt that the mid-sole unit was soft and agreeable for their feet.
The general durability of the shoe was lauded by those who have tried it.
Purchasers liked the visual aesthetic of this product.
Some users were able to use it for casual purposes and they wrote that it remained efficient.
A good number of consumers described this shoe as comfortable.
There were testers who thought that it had a suitably lightweight disposition.
Many runners thought that it was affordable.
3 reasons not to buy
The upper unit tore apart after only a month of use, reported a consumer.
A user complained that the materials featured in this shoe looked cheap and flimsy.
The cushioning system wasn’t as responsive or comfortable as several testers expected.
Bottom line
Many runners were appreciative of the Asics Endurant and its features. For them, it was good at what it had in store for them. Mostly, the design, the price and the majority of its components favored well to them. It’s a road shoe that worked well, according to neutral runners. But there were complaints about its cheap-looking parts, it’s apparently flimsy cushioning system and its questionable durability."
New Balance Vazee Breathe,,80.0,,46.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,, New Balance Vazee Breathe v2,"7 reasons to buy
Runners will feel unbelievable comfort in the Vazee Breathe, based on a large number of reviews.
It is a reasonably priced shoe.
The durability is more than average, according several runners.
Some testers appreciated the decent flexibility in this shoe.
New Balance provides an upper with ultimate breathability.
Most runners use the shoe for runs ranging from 10Ks to ultra-long ones.
A handful of runners noted the dynamic ride of the New Balance Breathe.
1 reasons not to buy
The shoe may not be the best options in areas with inclement weather.
Bottom line
The Vazee Breathe surprised more than a few runners as it did not get as much hype as other shoes of the Vazee series, but delivers performance and durability that can rival those of its better-known and more expensive cousins. It is an extremely breathable shoe for really hot temperatures, good arch support, and a very plush interior in a cleatie-style fit for superior comfort."
Nike Air Zoom Span,,80.0,84.0,18.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.1oz , Women: 7.7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Nike Air Zoom Span 2,"11 reasons to buy
Many runners were able to appreciate the design of the Nike Air Zoom Span; they welcomed its apparently cool-looking façade.
The color schemes available for this running shoe were welcomed by those who wanted more choices when it came to its visual aspect.
A lot of consumers embraced its lightweight nature; they felt that it didn’t weigh them down while running.
The ride is soft and agreeable to the foot, a reviewer noted.
The mild stability mechanic that is present in this model’s mid-sole unit was generally appreciated by consumers.
According to several testers, the flexible forefoot section caused the toe-offs to be more efficient.
A runner commented that the Nike Air Zoom Span was great for workouts, as well as speedy running sessions.
The outsole unit’s grip capability was precise and reliable, several reviewers noted.
A reviewer reported that the cushioning system, especially in the forefoot section, was responsive.
It is a value for the money shoe.
The premium materials utilized feels so much better considering its affordable price tag.
4 reasons not to buy
A consumer noted that the Nike Air Zoom Span was a bit wide even though the available width is medium.
Some testers mourned the lack of optional widths for this shoe.
Some runners were let down by the Span’s durability.
No optional widths.
Bottom line
For many, the Air Zoom Span was a successful offering from Nike. Overpronators and neutral runners alike lauded its features, especially its stable platform. They were also appreciative of its visual aesthetics and its overall performance on the roads. There were some who had concerns with the width, but it still worked well for many consumers."
Asics MetaRide, Asics,85.0,83.0,30.0,,, Road, Neutral,,, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Some of the users commented that the Asics MetaRide is supportive.
The majority of the purchasers noted that the shoe is comfortable.
Based on some reviews, this running shoe offers an excellent fit.
According to those who have tried it, the shoe delivered a smooth ride.
It is stylish, noted by a lot of consumers.
The Asics MetaRide was perfect for walking and running on level ground, according to several testers.
Some of the buyers commended the shoe’s excellent grip on the roads.
2 reasons not to buy
Many reviewers agree that the shoe is expensive.
For a long-distance running shoe, the Asics MetaRide is quite heavy, said a runner.
Bottom line
The Asics MetaRide gained positive feedback from most reviewers. They are generally satisfied with how supportive and comfortable the shoe is. The shoe also features a fantastic design and reliable technologies for a smoother ride. Though some have issues with the weight and pricing, overall, users lauded its functionality.
This road shoe is crafted for neutral runners and is a good option for those who are seeking style without compromising performance."
Nike Air Zoom Span 2,,82.0,80.0,13.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Some of the reviewers mentioned that the shoe was durable and supportive.
A lot of users said that the Nike Air Zoom Span 2 was best for running and workout activities.
Many consumers agreed that the product was comfortable. They felt no pain while wearing it.
The design was visually-appealing, according to several testers.
A good number of buyers commented that it was lightweight.
The price was deemed affordable by a majority of those who have purchased it.
Most of the testers claimed that the shoe fitted perfectly.
2 reasons not to buy
According to one of the users, the toe box of the Nike Air Zoom Span 2 was narrower when compared to the previous model.
A buyer said that the product had poor quality. It easily tore apart after only several uses.
Bottom line
The majority of the users agreed that the Nike Air Zoom Span 2 road running shoe was comfortable, lightweight and supportive. They said that it was best used for daily running sessions and workout activities. Although some users were unhappy about the shoe's poor quality and narrow toe box, others still recommended the Nike Air Zoom Span 2 because of its visually-appealing design and durability."
Zoot Coronado,,84.0,85.0,13.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 9.6oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The Coronado features a no-sew construction for added support.
The combination of the open mesh upper and Barefit internal liner technology offers exceptional breathability and comfort.
Most runners applauded the cushioning and durability of the Zoot Coronado.
This shoe promotes powerful and smooth toe-offs for effortless momentum.
Most reviews took note of the secure fit of the Coronado.
3 reasons not to buy
The Zoot Coronado is a slightly high-priced shoe.
Some runners are quite unsatisfied with the shoe’s limited color option.
The Coronado looks bulky as observed by some runners.
Bottom line
The Zoot Coronado gained positive reviews because it offers plenty of cushioning, stability and durability. This shoe is designed for long runs. The no-sew construction provides additional support and lessened the risk of blisters."
Asics Gel Kinsei 5, Asics,84.0,79.0,920.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The upper unit of the Asics Gel Kinsei 5 features a seamless construction, which reduces skin irritation.
The diverse color schemes of this shoe make it visually appealing.
Two layers of memory foam are placed in the collar to make the fit more customized to the wearer’s foot shape.
The responsive cushioning system of this running shoe was appreciated by many runners.
Durable rubber covers the sole unit and shields it from the adverse effects of surface friction and constant use.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners noted that they felt the heaviness of this shoe bearing down on their feet.
This shoe has a very expensive price.
Bottom line
High quality components make the Asics Gel Kinsei 5 very comfortable and efficient when it comes to tackling the roads. Its eye-catching looks make it endearing to runners. Though it has a steep price range, it still brings quality performance for runners."
Hoka One One Stinson ATR 4,,86.0,87.0,168.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.8oz , Women: 9.6oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,, Hoka One One Stinson ATR 5,"9 reasons to buy
Most buyers commended the wider toe box of the Stinson ATR 4.
Some runners liked that the latest version of the Stinson ATR is more cushioned, therefore softer and much more comfortable than its predecessors.
One user said that the durability has improved in the Stinson ATR with the fourth version’s new tread pattern.
Another user was impressed with the superior quality lugs that provide great traction.
Several wearers were satisfied with the performance of the Stinson ATR 4 on long-distance running: the underfoot foam provided enough comfort, and the rocker-shaped midsole delivered progressive transition and impact absorption.
It required almost no time to break-in and there is no experience of pain, according to some users.
A runner said that wearing this shoe helped alleviate the pain from their plantar fasciitis.
A couple of users felt that the Stinson ATR 4 is true-to-size.
According to a lot of consumers, the Hoka One One Stinson ATR 4 is a well-balanced and stable shoe that also provides adequate grip and level steadiness.
4 reasons not to buy
One user felt that the heel counter of the Stinson ATR 4 was too high and rigid.
Despite a wide toe box, many runners felt uncomfortable and bothered by the overlay on top of the toes; they said that it felt too stiff and that it rubbed against the sides of the toes.
Some runners felt that this shoe was lacking in responsiveness.
Several users commented that it was difficult to feel a secure fit with the Stinson ATR 4 because of its apparently loose upper construction.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Stinson ATR 4 is an all-terrain running shoe that is suitable for neutral runners. This latest version boasts a more accommodating fit that guarantees comfort and protection no matter the surface of the trail.  A shoe with a completely new structure yet the same experience of comfort and stability, the Stinson ATR 4 is guaranteed to catch the attention of runners who are after a maximal cushioned shoe for long-distance trails and ultramarathons."
Nike Free RN Commuter 2017,,86.0,,572.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.1oz , Women: 7.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Most of the runners admired the shoe’s apparently comfortable nature.
Many admired the sock-like fit of the shoe.
The majority of the users liked the lightweight construction of the Nike Free RN Commuter 2017.
The stretchy upper material is very breathable, said some wearers.
According to some testers, the Free RN Commuter 2017 is very versatile; they were able to use the shoe not just for running but also at work and on a casual day out.
A couple of purchasers said that they liked the stylish design and available colorways of the shoe.
The shoe is reasonably-priced, according to a few comments.
A significant number of purchasers commended the durability of this product.
2 reasons not to buy
Several users said that the shoe was too narrow for their tastes.
One user mentioned that the elastic strap in the ankle felt very tight.
Bottom line
The majority of the users were highly appreciative of the overall design of the Nike Free RN Commuter 2017. With the innovative materials and improved technologies, the shoe was touted to be efficient and agreeable to the foot. The shoe offers comfort, breathability, and style. Aside from being reliable as a running shoe for the road, it is also a good pair to wear for work or during casual walks.  "
Asics FuzeX Lyte,,86.0,68.0,924.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 8.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Asics FuzeX Lyte 2,"4 reasons to buy
Many testers applauded the lightweight construction of the Asics FuzeX Lyte.
It is available in many color options.
The FuzeX Lyte is an affordable price.
The seamless upper that reduces irritation gained positive feedback from runners.
3 reasons not to buy
The sole is not as durable as expected.
Some noticed that the shoe is a bit narrow and tight.
Some runners do not like the design of the FuzeX Lyte.
Bottom line
The Asics FuzeX Lyte provides the necessary technologies to survive road running. It provides a combination of comfort, speed and cushioning. This shoe is great for neutral runners. It is a great partner for daily training and short mileage runs."
Saucony Xodus ISO Runshield,,91.0,10.0,20.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"10 reasons to buy
The Xodus ISO Runshield oozes with comfort, based on most comments.
It has exceptional durability, according to some reviewers.
The protection is superb in the toughest conditions, as noticed by more than a handful.
The Runshield version is highly-water resistant.
More than a couple of runners were amazed by the shoe’s durability.
The Runshield version of the Xodus ISO is lighter than the previous model.
It is more responsive, as mentioned by a more than a few runners.
More than a handful loved the color combinations of this shoe.
Some testers confirmed that the FlexShell upper dries quickly when soaked with water.
A handful took the roads in this trail-specific shoe without any issues.
6 reasons not to buy
The traction is no longer as good as the Vibram version, according to several runners.
Some runners were irritated by the rocks that get stuck in the outsole.
It needs some break-in period, as noticed by a few.
The price would have been reasonable had it been a full waterproof version, as mentioned in a couple of reviews.
A few runners wanted a better mud-clearing outsole.
A handful of reviewers remarked that it is really smaller than the previous Xodus versions.
Bottom line
Saucony’s beast of a trail shoe unveils a new ISOFIT upper that keeps the weight off with more than enough support. Additionally, the Runshield takes the shoe to another level as the water-resistant upper makes it an even more versatile shoe where usage in inclement weather goes. The rugged shoe offers luxurious comfort and pretty light for a muscled trail monster."
Salomon X-Scream Foil,,91.0,,59.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"10 reasons to buy
Many of the reviewers loved the comfortable fit of the X-Scream Foil.
The entirely seamless upper ensures an irritant free coverage.
Several runners appreciated the exceptional durability of this shoe.
The price is bang for the buck, as expressed by a good number of reviewers.
It runs quite nimbly despite its size, according to a few comments.
The shoe comes in more vibrant color combinations than the usual black and red of most Salomon shoes.
A handful of runners have received compliments regarding the looks of their shoe.
Some reviewers mentioned that the traction is hands down the best part of the shoe.
Several runners loved the X-Scream Foil’s versatility as it can work on the road and on the trail.
The responsiveness of the midsole was appreciated by more than a few users.
3 reasons not to buy
A few runners noticed that it felt a little heavy.
A handful noted that the outsole gathers mud easily.
A small number of runners noticed that it runs a little narrow.
Bottom line
Salomon provides another option in the X-Scream line by coming up with the Foil. The shoe has tons of traction, superb comfort, and the protection for the runner for miles of daily training. It is an attractive option for entry-level runners because this is a lot of shoe for a very reasonable price with the kind of performance and durability that are usually associated with more expensive choices."
Under Armour Micro G Speed Swift 2,,91.0,,472.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm, Jun 2017,,,"6 reasons to buy
The Under Armour Micro G Speed Swift 2 was very comfortable to run in, said the majority of those who have tried it.
Many runners lauded its snug fit since it prevented any chafing of the skin against the side walls.
Several purchasers appreciated the quality of the materials with which the footwear was made.
A few users mentioned that they liked its overall look and design.
An individual said the shoe’s sturdy build held up well, even after several miles of running.
A purchaser found the price very affordable.
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of users noted the shoe gave them blisters on their toes.
For a buyer, the shoe started to wear off after only a few days of usage.
Bottom line
The Under Armour Micro G Speed Swift 2 is a smart choice for individuals looking for a running shoe that’s somewhere between maximum cushioning and minimalist design. According to the majority, the shoe is just the right combination of comfortability, responsiveness, and style at a good price."
Skechers GOmeb Speed 4,,91.0,87.0,369.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.6oz , Women: 5.8oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Skechers GOmeb Speed 5,"5 reasons to buy
Many users mentioned that the Skechers GOmeb Speed 4 fits true to size.
The lightweight construction of the shoe was impressive, based on several reviews.
A review noted that the heel felt soft and mild compared to other racing flats. This reviewer recommended this shoe for those who have sensitive Achilles tendons.
Testers were glad to see that the shoes can be worn without socks.
Several reviewers said that the upper of the shoe was very breathable but still gave enough supportive coverage on the dorsum of the foot.
3 reasons not to buy
A few users observed that the shoes needed to be broken in; it apparently didn’t feel comfortable upon initial use.
Some reviewers commented on how thin the outsole of the shoe was for them.
A tester wanted to highlight the absence of an Achilles dip on this shoe.
Bottom line
Light yet still durable, the Skechers GOmeb Speed 4 is an impressive performer when it comes to high mileage races. The updates made on this shoe, mainly on the design of the outsole, also makes this a solid choice for fast tempo runs. Runners should consider the GOmeb Speed 4 when looking for a quick shoe built for training."
Skechers GOtrail Ultra 4,,91.0,91.0,43.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11oz , Women: 8.6oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A consumer reported that there was no need to break in these shoes; for her, it was comfortable from the start.
There were runners who liked that the platform was able to support the arch during their runs.
The mid-sole unit of the Skechers GOtrail Ultra 4 felt plush and responsive, according to a number of testers.
Many shoe enthusiasts appreciated the price of this shoe, stating that it was relatively cheaper than other max cushioned shoes.
Some runners welcomed the apparently flexible forefoot section of the platform.
Several purchasers noted that the toe box of the GOtrail Ultra 4 was roomy and that it accommodated natural toe-splay.
The outsole’s grip capability gained positive remarks.
4 reasons not to buy
The toe box started to get a bit cramped after an hour or so of running, a tester reported.
The mid-sole felt a bit too firm for a runner; he didn’t feel a well-cushioned ride.
According to a purchaser, the heel cup felt loose and sloppy, and his feet kept exiting the shoe unintentionally.
A few testers stated that the GOtrail Ultra 4 was noticeably heavier than its predecessor.
Bottom line
The general feedback for the Skechers GOtrail Ultra 4 was positive. Many runners felt that it was comfortable and agreeable as a max cushioned shoe. They lauded its relatively plush mid-sole, its responsive upper, and its efficient outsole. But there were those who felt that it was a step back from the GOtrail Ultra 3, particularly when it came to the weight and the too-firm mid-sole."
Saucony Type A8,,80.0,80.0,44.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 5.9oz , Women: 5.1oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
The Type A8 was great to use even on wet and slippery roads, a user remarked.
A customer was very pleased with the how comfortable the upper was. Another noted it had a sock-like fit.
Some runners found the outsole to be firm but not hard.
Many buyers thought the shoe looked appealing.
A lot of commenters stated the Saucony Type A8 was a lightweight shoe.
Several users agreed the shoe had an accurate fit.
The midsole provided adequate cushioning that still promoted ground feel, claimed a runner.
The shoe delivered a snappy ride even during long-distance runs, a wearer mentioned.
The Type A8 was aggressive enough to run fast without causing damage, as quoted from a reviewer.
2 reasons not to buy
One user felt the tongue was too short as the laces rode up and rubbed against the foot.
The heel cup was unnecessary and needless to be included in the shoe, said a buyer.
Bottom line
Many users of the Type A8 found it challenging to look for flaws in the shoe, as most of their comments were optimistic. A lot of praises were directed towards the shoe’s practical features, precise fit, and capable performance. There were also several mentions that the shoe has significantly improved from its predecessor. Overall, the Saucony Type A8 has proved to be a fantastic shoe that is worth the purchase."
Puma Ignite v2,,89.0,86.0,154.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.6oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
A lot of consumers used the word ‘comfortable’ to describe the Puma Ignite v2 and their time wearing it.
This running shoe’s colorful upper unit was lauded by testers who stated that they made the façade very eye-catching.
The flexibility of the platform gained praise because it allowed the runners to move their feet more naturally.
The underfoot cushioning system was reliable, according to many testers.
Several testers reported that the platform was capable of absorbing impact shock during the landing phase of the gait cycle.
The price was affordable, according to runners.
Some consumers were able to use this running shoe for a variety of activities, and they said that it didn’t disappoint them in any way.
The runners reported that it was true-to-size.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners complained that the Puma Ignite v2 was too narrow for their feet.
A few runners were disappointed with the shoe’s thin tongue because it didn’t feel comfortable against their skin.
Bottom line
The Puma Ignite v2 gained positive feedback from many reviewers because of its impressive cushioning and the responsiveness of its components. A lot of them wrote that its mechanisms were durable, and that it was generally comfortable. This road shoe became highly recommended for those who need a reliable running companion."
Skechers GOrun Forza 2,,91.0,81.0,69.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Skechers GOrun Forza 3,"9 reasons to buy
Many agreed that the Skechers GOrun Forza 2 was best for distance running.
Runners mentioned that the shoe offered excellent support during long runs.
One user who wore the shoe every day reported that he did not see any signs of wear on the sole so far.
A majority of testers agreed that the shoe felt sufficiently comfortable.
Several users said that the protective nature of the components worked well during their outdoor runs.
One runner was glad that the underfoot platform did not aggravate his plantar fasciitis.
A lot of reviewers were happy with the performance of the underfoot platform during casual walks.
Many runners mentioned that the midsole foam cushioned the impact of their runs nicely.
Users appreciated the appealing colorways.
4 reasons not to buy
A user mentioned that the shoe did not have enough vertical toe space. This user’s big toe rubbed on the upper.
Some female users said that the shoe they received was too big for them.
Another tester said that the midfoot of the shoe was too flexible to be a stability shoe.
A number of runners expressed that the shoe was a tad heavy.
Bottom line
Built to offer stability, the Skechers GOrun Forza 2 received generally positive feedback from runners. It received a few criticisms but users believed that there is still room for improvement for the Forza 2. This mid-priced road shoe delivers excellent comfort, a responsive ride and enhanced support, making it agreeable for everyday running, walking and general workouts."
Mizuno Wave Emperor 3, Mizuno,,,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.7oz , Women: 6.7oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,, Normal | Normal,,
Saucony Mayhem 2,,74.0,,23.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.3oz , Women: 6.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The textile mesh and synthetic overlays make the upper unit more secure and comfortable.
The interior lining is made of a soft textile over adequate padding, which heightens the comfort of the foot as noted by a few testers.
Some runners appreciated the removable insole, which lets them add more cushioning if they wanted to.
Lightweight cushioning and shock absorption are handled by the EVA full-length mid-sole foam.
The Heel Grid System enhances the cushioning and impact protection for the rear section of the foot.
The XT-600 outsole offers durable protection and traction over the roads.
The men and women’s versions of the Mayhem 2 have average weights, making them great for most runners’ preferences.
2 reasons not to buy
There were runners who were turned off by its look because it was too shiny like some form of plastic.
A few noted that the mid-sole needed a bit more cushioning to fully provide a plush underfoot platform for longer races.
Bottom line
The Mayhem 2 from Saucony is a running shoe that’s reliable, very effective, and has moderate arch support. The individual parts work well and the comfort is superb. It’s a great option when it comes to running and other athletic activities."
Vivobarefoot Primus Trail Swimrun, Vivobarefoot,79.0,81.0,9.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 21.2oz , Women: 17.6oz,,,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The outsole unit offered sufficient traction over the surfaces, most runners noted.
The water-resistant upper kept the foot dry and cozy, according to several testers.
Some people lauded the agreeably light profile of the Vivobarefoot Primus Trail Swimrun.
This running shoe’s toe box gave enough space for the spreading of the toes, a couple of reviewers noted.
The flexible nature of the product received positive feedback.
A person was able to use this shoe for many types of terrain, including deserts and thick According to him, it remained durable and functional.
1 reasons not to buy
A couple of users claimed they get blisters on their heels when they lace the shoe too tightly.
Bottom line
The Vivobarefoot Primus Trail Swimrun gained mostly positive responses from the running community. People appreciated this neutral trail shoe’s capacity to function well in a variety of terrains and conditions. It apparently offered an overall comfortable in-shoe experience. The sizing scheme seemed to be off, based on a few testers’ reviews."
Asics LyteRacer TS 7,,75.0,,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.2oz , Women: 6.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The breathability of the upper was appreciated by several consumers.
The lightweight build of the Asics LyteRacer TS 7 was appreciated by those who have tested it.
The shoe is reasonably-priced.
According to some comments, the LyteRacer TS 7 is durable.
The shoe is comfortable, said a few comments.
3 reasons not to buy
This shoe didn’t drain well when exposed to copious amounts of water, a few people noted.
The upper unit looked and felt cheap, according to some consumers.
The midsole felt stiff and too thin, according to a runner.
Bottom line
Consumers were a bit disappointed with the Asics LyteRacer TS 7. Some of them felt that it did function well, that some of the components were bothersome or that the sizing scheme was off. Also, the design didn’t appeal to some people. Some of the positive traits of this road shoe that apparently stood out were the breathable upper and the lightness of the construction."
Adidas Sensebounce+ Street,,85.0,,7.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 11.4oz , Women: 9.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
A lot of users have testified that the Adidas Sensebounce+ Street is supportive. 
The shoe feels light on foot, according to several wearers. 
Numerous runners are satisfied with the comfort that it provides. 
Some consumers noticed that this shoe offers a bouncy and responsive ride.
Many buyers appreciated the quality of the materials used in the shoe. 
It offers just the right amount of cushioning, a few reviewers claim. 
A good number of purchasers love the clean and stylish design of the shoe.  
People are happy that the price for a pair of Sensebounce+ Street is affordable.
4 reasons not to buy
This shoe is a little narrow, a couple of testers observed. 
One user reported that the upper material makes the top of her foot hurt. 
A wearer mentioned that the shoe makes a lot of noise while walking.
The shoe is too firm, said a handful of commenters.
Bottom line
The Adidas Sensebounce+ Street is a supportive running shoe that features a dynamic design. It aims to provide a blend of comfort and function that are tailored to the streets. This road running shoe works best for runners with neutral gaits or those who do not overpronate. It is a good option for runners and athletes who are looking for a comfortable and budget-friendly running companion. 
 "
Reebok OSR Distance 3.0, Reebok,79.0,78.0,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.7oz , Women: 7.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
The cushioning had just the right amount of firmness that enabled a steady run, according to a buyer.
The shoe was comfortable even from the first use, a tester remarked.
Several consumers thought the OSR Distance 3.0 was high-quality yet affordable footwear.
One wearer said the outsole supplied adequate grip for running and even other activities.
Many customers agreed that the Reebok OSR Distance 3.0 was a stylish shoe.
4 reasons not to buy
The back side was too high and rubbed on the ankle, a user complained.
The toe box was very narrow and uncomfortable, some wearers commented.
A couple of runners felt the outsole was not very durable because it wore out quickly.
A disappointed purchaser said the arch was positioned incorrectly and thus provided no support.
Bottom line
While it seemed that the OSR Distance 3.0 was an in-demand shoe for the consumers, there were mixed reviews about it. The comfort level and cushioning of the shoe proved to be unparalleled, according to some. However, issues about structure were apparent to others. To sum up, many users felt that a lot still needs to be improved with this running gear."
Under Armour Charged Escape,,87.0,,236.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.1oz , Women: 7.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Under Armour Charged Escape 3,"6 reasons to buy
The design of the Under Armour Charged Escape was much appreciated by many consumers.
Most testers loved that the weight was suitably light.
The upper unit gained favor for being able to provide ventilation to the foot throughout the running session.
The smooth and uncomplicated design of the façade was appreciated; runners liked that there were no dense layers for overlays.
Several runners commented that this running shoe was robust in its performance.
The price was considered by many to be affordable.
3 reasons not to buy
A few consumers noted that it was a bit narrower compared to the shoes that they already had.
The grip of the outsole was inefficient, several testers complained.
A person noted that the front part of the mesh upper developed holes within six months of use.
Bottom line
The Under Armour Charged Escape received mostly positive reviews from runners and shoe enthusiasts. They welcomed its lightweight nature, its appealing looks, and its apparently proficient components. It performed well, according to their feedback. But this road running shoe was not free from detrimental scrutiny, receiving unfavorable reviews for inconsistent performance and questionable durability."
Asics Gel Kayano 26 Platinum,,83.0,,8.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The Asics Gel Kayano 26 Platinum offers excellent support, based on reviews. 
Many runners highlighted that this shoe is comfortable to wear. 
One consumer is pleased with the shoe’s shock absorption feature. 
A tester praised this running companion’s roomy toe box. 
Several wearers said that it is also suitable for workouts and casual walks. 
A lot of purchasers appreciated the shoe’s elegant design. 
3 reasons not to buy
A couple of users reported that the Gel Kayano 26 Platinum does not offer enough cushioning. 
It has a strong chemical smell, according to an unsatisfied buyer. 
One reviewer mentioned that the shoe is a bit expensive. 
Bottom line
Boasting a futuristic design, the Asics Gel Kayano 26 Platinum is a stylish road running shoe specifically designed for runners who exhibit mild to moderate overpronation. It provides long-lasting comfort and support to help the users achieve optimal performance. This running shoe is also perfect for work, school, and other non-strenuous activities. "
Adidas Adistar Boost 2,,83.0,,88.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9.6oz, Men: 11mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Being comfortable for the entire duration of the run is what the Adidas Adistar Boost 2 has the best to offer.
Features a more improved traction through the AdiWear Continental rubber outsole that provides a good and reliable grip on various surfaces.
Foot perfectly fits in the 2nd version of the Adidas Adistar Boost because of the presence of a snug-fit feature, which also acts as a second skin because of its contour.
Includes the boost™ technology that is responsible for energy return while running.
The Techfit™ offers a good fit and flexibility to runners and minimizes the chances of getting injured in the foot or ankle.
Lessened impact upon landing through the adiPRENE feature, which delivers outstanding cushioning effect.
3 reasons not to buy
This shoe is quite bulky according to some runners, making it a bit difficult to maneuver.
Poor lacing system.
A few runners said it feels a bit narrow when they wore it first.
Bottom line
The Adistar Boost 2 is one of Adidas’ finest stability running shoe creations. It offers medial arch support and is ideal to be used by mild to moderate overpronation. This road running shoe is designed to improve your performance on daily running such as workouts with a combination of good comfort and responsiveness."
Asics Gel Pursue 2,,83.0,82.0,9.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 9.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Pursue 5,"6 reasons to buy
An engineered mesh makes up the upper unit of the Pursue 2.
Most reviewers appreciated the seamless construction and the Heel Clutching System, which deliver a sock-like fit that’s secure and efficient.
The FluidRide mid-sole mixes springiness, responsible cushioning and durability in one layer, according to several expert reviews.
In the forefoot and heel area of the mid-sole is the Gel Cushioning System, which dissipates shock during landing and lets the foot fall into a safer underside platform.
Stability and balance are achieved with the Guidance Trusstic System and the Guidance Line in the mid-sole.
Durable rubber offers traction and protection from wear noted many runners.
3 reasons not to buy
The weight of the Gel Pursue 2 is moderately heavy.
There were testers who didn’t like the included insole as it made their feet feel uncomfortable.
A few noted that it was a bit stiff, limiting the natural movement of the foot.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Pursue 2 is a reliable neutral running shoe that offers protection, moderate stability and responsible cushioning for many types of activities. It is a great-looking model that any runner can enjoy, but a few users were disappointed because it is heavy and uncomfortable to wear. In summary, the Pursue 2 failed to impress the majority and still needs some improvement."
Adidas Springblade Ignite,,83.0,87.0,24.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12oz , Women: 11.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The style of this shoe is appealing because of the contemporary design and the presence of the unique outsole blades.
Many testers noted that the upper is reliable in terms of durability and breathability.
Most reviewers appreciated the cushioning because the foam-like effect of the blades work well.
The blades allow the runner more propulsive motion and bounce.
The moisture-wicking inner lining keeps the inner area of the Springblade Ignite cool and dry.
Neutral to mild over-pronators get ample amount of support.
3 reasons not to buy
It is not as responsive, as noted by some testers.
It is not ideal to wear on wet and slippery terrains.
The weight of the Springblade Ignite is moderately heavy.
Bottom line
The Adidas Springblade Ignite is a neutral running shoe worth purchasing if you are aiming for better propulsive movement and efficacy in performance. Its cushioning and forward-propelling system in the blades keeps you encouraged when it comes to your routines and trainings. Advanced athletes will also find this road running shoe a perfect match."
Asics Gel Phoenix 6,,83.0,,42.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The mesh material used in the upper unit offers breathable coverage.
Stitched-on overlays allow the upper to provide a snug and secure fit to the runner.
The mid-sole unit uses a lightweight foam unit to provide full-length cushioning to the runner.
Many testers welcomed the stability mechanics of the Asics Gel Phoenix 6, which is given by the dual-density foam in the mid-foot section.
High-wear areas are protected by rubber technology that’s durable and efficient.
The many colorways make it visually endearing.
1 reasons not to buy
One user observed that the shoe absorbs too much water.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Phoenix 6 gives support to those who have overpronated foot motion. It helps to balance the gait in order to maintain a comfortable running experience that’s free from potential injury. The overall quality of this stability shoe is dependable, thus making it a solid option for daily running sessions."
Salomon Snowcross CS,,94.0,83.0,79.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 12.9oz , Women: 12.9oz, Men: 11mm , Women: 11mm,,,,"4 reasons to buy
Many reviewers appreciated the waterproof ClimaShield membrane, which is capable of staving off wetness while also maintaining breathability.
The gaiter design of its collar was well-received as it offers more protection against rocks, dirt, and even snow.
The snow-specific construction and design keeps you comfortable in the winter
Mud and Snow Contagrip makes up the outsole of this model and it’s one of the most durable and effective technologies around.
4 reasons not to buy
There were reviewers who complained about the narrow heel area, which became uncomfortable after prolonged use.
The heavy weight was noted by some because it made them feel the shoe bearing down a bit.
A few runners thought the design was a bit overwhelming.
It comes with a high price.
Bottom line
The Salomon Snowcross CS is a suitable offering for the snowy weather as it provides protection and support for the foot even when tackling white-capped paths. It doesn’t offer much stability, but it’s a running shoe that’s great for a neutral foot motion."
Asics DynaFlyte 3 Sound,,86.0,,19.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.1oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Several testers stated that the underfoot experience felt like walking on a cloud.
People generally liked the aesthetics of the Asics DynaFlyte 3 Sound.
The comfortable in-shoe feel of this running shoe staved off any foot discomfort, some consumers claimed.
The lightweight nature of the materials was appreciated by many runners.
Some purchasers welcomed the durability of the DynaFlyte 3 Sound.
1 reasons not to buy
The DynaFlyte 3 Sound had a break-in period of a few days, a couple of consumers reported.
Bottom line
The DynaFlyte 3 Sound was able to gain the trust of most of its testers. The neutral running shoe was perceived as a high-quality product that accommodated the foot and provided comfort. The aesthetics and quality were elements that were also praised. On the other hand, some people noted that the break-in period caused some initial discomfort."
Puma NRGY Comet, Puma,,,,$60,$30 (save 63%), Road, Neutral,,,,,," Narrow, Normal | Narrow, Normal",,
Skechers GOrun Ride 5,,90.0,79.0,181.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 8.4oz , Women: 6.6oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Skechers GOrun Ride 7,"7 reasons to buy
This shoe is very lightweight, according to some reviews.
Many runners applauded the comfortable construction of the GOrun Ride 5.
It features a removable sock-liner for a custom fit.
The updated version has an increased Resalyte midsole for a responsive ride and protection.
The integrated inner support strap gained positive feedback from users since it offers secure and stable fit.
Some reviews noted that the Skechers Ride 5 has an attractive design.
The GOrun Ride 5 is an affordable running shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
Some observed that the GOrun Ride 5 lacks stability than the previous version.
This shoe is too narrow for some runners.
Bottom line
The Skechers GOrun Ride 5 offers impressive update as far as impact protection and responsive ride are concerned. This shoe is applauded by most runners because of the lightweight and comfortable construction. It is a stability shoe that is best for off-trail running."
Merrell All Out Terra Trail,,90.0,83.0,124.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The Merrell All Out Terra Trail has a deep-lugged Vibram outsole for reliable grip while running on loose surfaces, according to a few testers.
Most runners took note of the reflective details of the shoe that increases visibility when running on low light.
The majority of the runners found the All Out Terra Trail to be durable and comfortable.
Some runners were impressed by the design of this shoe.
The toe box of the All Out Terra Trail is roomy.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners found the inner sock uncomfortable because it rubs on the ankle.
Moderately expensive.
Bottom line
The Merrell All Out Terra Trail provides impressive 360° protection from debris and rocks while running on rough terrain. It comes with a built-in sock liner for added protection. The shoe is ideal for neutral runners who are looking for a lightweight yet reliable trail shoe."
Asics Gel Impression 8,,90.0,,181.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The comfort level of the 8th edition of the Asics Gel Impression has runners having a difficult time taking it off, according to a large number of comments.
Many of the runners loved its long-lasting performance.
The slightly soft cushioning gives a plush ride with enough pop in the returns.
A very breathable mesh keeps every run cool and sweat-free.
The Impression 8 has very nice stability for a neutral shoe, based on several reviews.
Several runners find the ride lighter than the weight on the scale shows.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners believe the price is a little higher than some of its competition.
Others wished for a shoe with better style, especially with the price stag of the Gel Impression 8.
Bottom line
Built for low-mileage runs, the Asics Impression 8 is a neutral running shoe with good stability, unbelievable comfort, and a very healthy interior. Although not as light as most lightweight trainers, it has a very compact and agile ride that most runners love to have in their shoes."
Saucony Peregrine 7 Runshield,,90.0,,25.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.6oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Some of the runners commented that the Saucony Peregrine 7 Runshield offered reliable performance.
Several wearers loved its aggressive design.
Many reviewers said that the product provided enough grip on the surfaces.
A lot of testers agreed that the fit was perfect.
According to some buyers, the shoe’s lightweight nature accommodated all-day wear.
It was durable, the majority of the users noted.
A good number of consumers said that it was best for walking and running activities.
Based on some reviewers, the shoe was comfortable.
4 reasons not to buy
One of the users said that the insole tended to slide forward from the heel. As a result, he felt discomfort while wearing the shoe.
Several runners commented that the product was not comfortable.
According to a consumer, the arch support was inadequate.
Some testers were disappointed because they had blisters after wearing the Saucony Peregrine 7 Runshield.
Bottom line
The majority of the users commented that the Saucony Peregrine 7 Runshield was a great and comfortable shoe. They were impressed with its lightweight structure and agreeable fit. Although several of them experienced blister problems, discomfort, and inadequate arch support, others still recommended the product because of its aggressive appearance, durability, and performance."
Inov-8 Roclite 320 GTX,,90.0,,49.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 11.3oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Several runners lauded the grippy outsole of the Inov-8 Roclite 320 GTX.
A few wearers admired the GTX upper of the shoe that keeps the foot dry throughout the run.
Some noted the softness and flexibility of this trail running shoe. 
A couple of buyers mentioned that the shoe has a stylish design; one highlighted that it looks good with jeans.
The tongue that has been attached to the vamp helps in preventing the debris from entering the shoe, one user noted. 
2 reasons not to buy
The Inov-8 Roclite 320 GTX is an expensive running shoe.
Most users agreed that the shoe is too narrow for their foot shape.
Bottom line
A trail running shoe design for rugged terrains, the Inov-8 Roclite 320 GTX gained significantly positive feedback from its users. They were satisfied with the shoe's performance, design, and waterproof feature. Though there are a few issues with its price and narrow measurement, overall, the shoe has impressed a lot of trail runners. The Roclite 320 GTX is a good option for users who are looking for a waterproof running shoe with a high-cut design. "
Mizuno Wave Ultima 8,,90.0,,98.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 10.9oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Mizuno Wave Ultima 11,"9 reasons to buy
The color schemes available for this model were welcomed by consumers, and they wrote that they made the shoe appealing to look at.
The breathable and moisture-wicking fabrics of the upper were well-received by runners.
A runner reported that the toe-box was spacious enough to accommodate the natural splaying of the toes.
Several testers commented that the Mizuno Wave Ultima 8 was able to deliver reliable underfoot cushioning.
A number of consumers described this running shoe as ‘comfortable’.
The grooved exterior of this shoe’s sole unit was appreciated because it allowed the foot to flex naturally.
A purchaser gave props to Mizuno for the quality of this version; for them, this product was reliable and consistent.
An expert reviewer wrote that the mid-sole technologies in this shoe were responsive and agreeable.
According to testers, the grip capability of the outsole rubber didn’t disappoint.
1 reasons not to buy
The tongue of this shoe tended to twist after a while, which annoyed a reviewer.
Bottom line
The Mizuno Wave Ultima 8 was able to deliver solid performances to those who have taken it for a spin. There were various comments about its components and functionality, most of them very positive. It’s gained the favor of those who have considered it as a reliable road running shoe for those with neutral gaits."
Asics GT 2000 4 Lite Show PlasmaGuard,,90.0,90.0,32.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics GT 2000 7 Lite-Show,"7 reasons to buy
The Asics GT 2000 4 Lite Show PlasmaGuard was lauded by consumers because of its use of a material that protects it from water exposure.
The upper didn’t easily get dirty, according to several runners; they wrote that it stayed clean and free from water exposure.
Several testers commented that they were comfortable wearing it for their running sessions.
Reviewers wrote that its high-quality materials made it look more robust and well-made.
Its general durability received some positive recognition; many runners stated that it lasted long.
It looked visually appealing, according to some consumers.
A runner welcomed the reflective detailing that’s present in this model; they wrote that it made this shoe more agreeable in low-light conditions.
4 reasons not to buy
The upper unit wasn’t as breathable as the original GT 2000 4 Lite Show version, according to a consumer.
A tester lamented the lack of a truly waterproof capability for the upper unit.
It was a bit larger than what a purchaser was used to.
A couple of runners complained because the mid-foot and rear sections of this shoe felt a bit too snug.
Bottom line
The Asics GT 2000 4 Lite Show PlasmaGuard is a stability running shoe that has gained some fans because of its comfortable and high-quality construction. Many were impressed with its appealing design, its water-repelling add-on, and its agreeable underfoot cushioning system. Inversely, some testers felt that some of its components weren’t able to work well."
Mizuno Wave Ultima 10,,90.0,,116.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 11.8oz , Women: 9.9oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Mizuno Wave Ultima 11,"6 reasons to buy
A number of purchasers hail the supportive fit of the Mizuno Wave Ultima 10. 
It is highly flexible, claimed several runners. 
The running shoe offers enough breathability, expressed some wearers. 
Various commenters appreciate the springy ride delivered by the shoe. 
According to a few reviewers, the road running shoe is very comfortable. 
Numerous testers attest to the ample protection provided by the platform.
3 reasons not to buy
After a couple of uses, some athletes have noticed some tearing on the upper.  
Multiple customers have reported that the shoe has a rigid underfoot feel. 
There are a couple of racers stating that the neutral running shoe caused abrasion on the foot.
Bottom line
With a design focused on optimizing both lightweight and responsive cushioning, the Wave Ultima 10 from Mizuno is ideal for runners looking for the smoothest ride. Because of the technologies incorporated into the running shoe, it enhances stability and security. With the features locked into the platform, it is perfect for racers who want versatile use."
Puma Ignite Limitless SR-71, Puma,89.0,,12.0,$100,$34 (save 66%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Those who have tested the Puma Ignite Limitless SR-71 believe that it has a lightweight build that permits them to run for extended periods.
The price of a pair of these running shoes is welcomed for being affordable.
Some purchasers have noted that the midsole unit is able to cushion each footfall with ease.
A couple of runners are happy with the general durability of the materials, stating that they didn’t experience the shoe quickly breaking apart.
The aesthetics are considered adequate for both running and casual strolls across the urban landscape.
‘Comfortable’ is a word that many have used to describe their time wearing the Puma Ignite Limitless SR-71.
2 reasons not to buy
A few consumers report that the gripping capacity of the outsole unit isn’t as efficient on slick surfaces.
A tester has complained that the ends of the one-piece collar are irritating to the skin of the ankles and heel.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of consumers towards the Puma Ignite Limitless SR-71 has been welcoming. This Puma running shoe is deemed efficient for running and casual use. The particular elements that received praise include the lightweight construction, the affordable price tag, and the comfortable cushioning system. On the other hand, the irritating collar and flimsy slick-surface traction have become the sources of ire.
Fans of neutral running shoes that are meant for a variety of activities are the target market of the Puma Ignite Limitless SR-71."
Asics Gel Quantum 90 SG,,81.0,,29.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.6oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The underfoot cushioning system of the Asics Gel Quantum 90 SG is deemed highly comfortable by most testers.
Several purchasers consider the modern design and color schemes as elements that elevated the aesthetics of the entire product.
The upper unit is praised for being breathable enough to tackle all-day adventures on the roads.
A handful of runners judge the padded tongue and collar as parts of the facade that are meant to prevent in-shoe quivering and positional deviation.
The outsole unit’s traction capacity is praised by purchasers who like an external pad that offers precise movements over the surfaces.
The affordable price of the Asics Gel Quantum 90 SG is welcomed by many.
2 reasons not to buy
Some consumers claim that the shoelaces are not flexible enough to be effortlessly secured in place.
A few people have stated that it was difficult to get the foot inside the interior compartment of this product.
Bottom line
All-in-all, the runners who have tested the Asics Gel Quantum 90 SG are happy with what it has to offer. This product is well-liked for its comfortable underfoot experience, accommodating upper, and traction-doling outsole. The wallet-friendly price is also highlighted by some. On the other hand, the apparently unwieldy shoelaces and the effortful means of wearing the shoe have gotten the ire of a handful of testers.
Enthusiasts of road-optimized shoes for neutral foot pronation are the target market of the Asics Gel Quantum 90 SG."
Adidas Ultraboost 19 Pride,,78.0,,7.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"6 reasons to buy
People are generally happy with the comfortable nature of the Boost™ midsole, stating that they enjoy extended running sessions with this technology in the shoe.
The updated colorways ensure that both functionality and stylishness are accommodated by the Adidas Ultraboost 19 Pride.
Some testers have noted that the thin panels on the sides of the upper unit are able to secure the foot properly.
The curved rear collar construction and the stretchy opening allow the foot to slip effortlessly into the interior compartment, according to most consumers.
The Continental™ rubber that is used for the outsole unit of this Adidas running shoe is appreciated for its grippy and durable nature.
A handful of runners vouch for the quality and longevity of this product’s materials.
2 reasons not to buy
Some purchasers claim that the fabrics and overlays aren’t enough to properly secure the foot in place; they experienced in-shoe wobbling.
A couple of testers report some buildup of hot spots when wearing the Ultraboost 19 Pride for extended periods.
Bottom line
The overall feedback towards the Ultraboost 19 Pride has been mostly positive. Runners believe that this product is a worthy member of the popular line of neutral running shoes from Adidas. The various elements that make up the whole silhouette gained attention for the good things that they are doing for the performance of the wearer. On the other hand, some in-shoe wobbling and hot spots have been noted by some disgruntled testers.
Enthusiasts of road running shoes that are meant for both active and fashion-centered lifestyles."
Asics Gel Quantum 360 Shift MX,,81.0,,95.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.5oz , Women: 10.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A good number of runners said that the shoe felt comfortable.
Plenty of testers complimented its lightness.
Many appreciated the upper’s design as well as the colorways it came in.
A lot of runners commended the breathability the shoe delivered.
Numerous female users mentioned that the fit was adequate.
Some people used the Asics Gel Quantum 360 Shift MX for their long work hours, and they stated that it remained efficient and agreeable throughout.
The Gel® cushioning units adequately cushioned the impact generated by the foot-strike, several consumers reported.
4 reasons not to buy
Some users were skeptical about the quality. A few of them experienced the heel or sole coming off only after using the shoe a few times. Another said that one eyelet ripped after tightening the laces.
A few felt that the Gel Quantum 360 Shift MX did not deliver enough support as a running shoe.
Some users thought it was not ideal for running or walking long distances.
The majority of reviewers did not like that the shoe was so expensive yet it had poor quality.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Quantum 360 Shift MX is a neutral road running shoe that’s highly breathable, light, and comfortable. There were those that did not feel like the shoe delivered quality and support, but it’s still a stylish shoe that many appreciated used for different activities."
Saucony Cortana 4,,80.0,76.0,115.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 6.2oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Most runners appreciated the comfort and lightweight that Cortana 4 offers.
The low profile design offers more freedom in terms of foot movement.
Most runners emphasized the secured fit in the arch and heel of the 4th version.
The significant redesigning and sleek appearance of the Saucony Cortana 4 is something most runners appreciate.
Runners with slightly wide feet are happy with the shoe because of the roomy toe box.
The durability is reliable and precise, even when it comes to the individual parts.
4 reasons not to buy
The shoe is expensive.
Few runners find the shoe irritating because of the heel cup that rubs the foot.
Some runners are unsatisfied with the reduced stiffness of the Cortana 4.
There were complaints of the forefoot area being a bit tight for the toes.
Bottom line
Most runners considered the Cortana 4 from Saucony as the definitive version of the series. It is a relatively lightweight neutral shoe that offers responsive cushioning and a comfortable ride. This shoe is best for both the track and the road."
Reebok One Cushion 3.0,,82.0,81.0,33.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 7.7oz, Men: 11mm , Women: 11mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The SmoothFuse upper offers comfort that’s rub-free and supportive in the One Cushion 3.0, according to a couple of reviews.
The low-cut design encourages freedom of movement.
Some runners greatly appreciated the triple foam mid-sole, which provides cushioning, propulsions and underfoot cradling.
NanoWeave found in the medial and lateral sides of the One Cushion 3.0 keeps the foot snug and secure.
Robust outsole components keep a durable external platform and a reliable protective section that fights wear and tearing noted a handful of users.
For a shoe that has a lot of features, it doesn’t have a very expensive price.
3 reasons not to buy
Some of the testers experienced a peeled off sole after just a few uses.
The Reebok One Cushion 3.0 has a narrow fit that many runners were disappointed with.
The heel area was too tight to a few runners, causing some blisters.
Bottom line
The Reebok One Cushion 3.0 is a lightweight road running shoe designed for neutral runners. It generally got a good grade from many runners because of its robust midsole, solid arch support, well-vented upper and a responsive outsole. The shoe excels as a daily trainer."
New Balance Vazee Coast,,82.0,74.0,294.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.4oz , Women: 6.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, New Balance Vazee Coast v2,"6 reasons to buy
The upper unit is made with a highly breathable mesh material that also features a lightweight overlay system.
Most of the testers appreciated the deconstructed heel counter, the areas that have no stitching, and the padded tongue & collar.
The REVlite mid-sole unit provides a plush yet flexible underfoot platform.
The outsole is made with a ground contact EVA component that brings shock absorption to the runner.
Some rubber in high-wear areas adds a bit more durability, according to a few testers.
The Vazee Coast is a lightweight running shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners wished that they could get more choices when it comes to the color schemes and some aesthetic modifications for the shoe.
There were reviewers who noticed the need for some stability mechanisms to help with foot pronation.
Others felt that the forefoot area was a bit narrow that it slightly clumped their toes together.
Bottom line
The New Balance Vazee Coast is a neutral shoe that can handle daily exercises and training. The shoe received praises and negative feedback from users. Though it still needs a few improvements, the Vazee Coast is a solid choice for runners who want to have a comfortable and reliable road shoe."
New Balance 670v1,,82.0,,220.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 8.2oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
The breathable mesh of the upper was welcomed by many because it didn’t let their feet feel warm, even during all-day use.
A lot of the testers generally described their experience with the New Balance 670v1 as very comfortable.
Runners noted that the width was adequate and that it didn’t feel tight or restrictive.
One user stated that the upper fabrics and the mid-sole prevented foot and ankle pain.
Runners acknowledged its appealing design because it was able to blend well with their casual attire.
The toe area was roomy, as noted by some testers.
The ABZORB® cushioning technology in the heel was able to provide support during each step, said users who tried it.
Runners said that this shoe’s price was affordable, even though it features high-quality components and technologies.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners felt that the lack of stability mechanics—or even an arch support unit—added risk for underfoot discomfort, especially after extended running sessions.
A small number of users felt the upper fabric tear apart after only a few months of use.
Bottom line
The New Balance 670v1 is a running shoe that’s greatly enjoyed by many because of its appealing design, its comfortable components, and responsive performance on the roads. It may be lacking a bit in support and durability, but neutral runners generally praised its service and performance."
Mizuno Wave Hayate 4,,,,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,, Mizuno Wave Hayate 6,
Reebok Print Run ULTK, Reebok,89.0,,73.0,$80,$75 (save 6%), Road, Neutral,,,,, Jan 2018, Normal | Normal,,"8 reasons to buy
Most recognized the Print Run ULTK’s lightness.
A lot of testers agreed that the upper is quite stylish.
Many users appreciated its versatility. Most of them used it on the daily, for the gym, walking, exercising, and light running.
A majority of reviewers were in agreement with regard to the comfort delivered. One user even said that the platform felt like clouds underfoot.
Some runners mentioned that the construction felt sturdy.
The upper’s breathability was noteworthy for some users. One user said that the upper helped his foot stay dry during his long runs.
One tester said that the instep was good for high arches. Another tester felt that there was enough support on the arch.
Many agreed that the price was reasonable for this well-constructed shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
Male reviewers noticed that the shoe was a tad smaller. Also, some described the width as narrow.
A couple of purchasers thought the shoe is expensive compared to other Reebok running shoes.
Bottom line
Reebok’s Print Run ULTK is a neutral running shoe with plenty of versatility to offer. Most described it as being the perfect blend of style and comfort, which was why it was used in different activities from daily use to gym workouts. There were those that noticed a discrepancy in the size. Nevertheless, the shoe is still something to consider for users looking for a reasonably-priced, well-constructed, and versatile footwear."
Topo Athletic Magnifly 2,,93.0,89.0,55.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The Topo Athletic Magnifly 2 was great for daily runs, wrote a reviewer.
The shoe excelled on long distances, said a wearer.
Some runners mentioned that the toe box was roomy.
One tester liked how the upper had an incredibly soft and natural feel.
The midsole of the Magnifly 2 was firm and delivered a snappy and responsive ride, according to a purchaser.
The shoe did not require a break-in period, a few users claimed.
A customer remarked that the midsole was exceptionally responsive to fast-paced running.
1 reasons not to buy
The outsole started showing signs of wear after only less than 50 miles, stated a runner.
Bottom line
The Topo Athletic Magnifly 2 was a success with most of its users, as evident in the positive remarks geared towards the shoe’s performance, construction, and fit. The durability seemed to be an issue, but there was no other criticism aside from it. In summary, the Magnifly 2 was a fruitful update, and consumers have said it was an enjoyable shoe to wear."
Reebok Zig Pulse SE, Reebok,90.0,,155.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 9oz,,,, Normal | Normal,,"8 reasons to buy
Most users mentioned that the shoe felt comfortable.
Some testers with foot and knee problems said that they did not feel any pain while wearing the Reebok Zig Pulse SE.
Most runners commended its lightness.
Plenty of users appreciated the design of the upper and the platform.
One user with a bigger body build mentioned that he felt the shoe provided plenty of support for his weight.
A majority of users said that the price was affordable.
A good number of reviews stated that the cushioning provided was sufficient.
The shape of the shoe caters to a wider foot, said some testers.
2 reasons not to buy
A lot of reviews mentioned that pebbles easily get stuck on the crevices of the sole.
Some testers were not pleased that it only came in two colorways.
Bottom line
The Reebok Zig Pulse SE is a unique-looking, neutral road shoe that many considered to be a refreshing take on modern footwear. Despite the cool design, some were not pleased that tiny pebbles got stuck on the crevices of the sole. Others wished that there were more colorways available. Nonetheless, the majority still appreciated the shoe for its affordable price, comfort, and cushioning."
Mizuno Wave Ultima 6,,89.0,,30.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 9.3oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Mizuno Wave Ultima 11,"6 reasons to buy
The stable and cushioned ride delivers comfort through miles and miles of training.
The Ultma 6 has a very reasonable price.
Durability is superb, noted some runners.
Most runners loved the soft feel of the upper and interior.
Several reviewers noted that the midsole is markedly responsive for a trainer with good cushioning.
It looks much better than the earlier version, according to a handful of observers.
3 reasons not to buy
A few did not like the break-in period needed.
Wet areas are not suited for the 6th edition of the Ultima, observed several.
It could have used a little weight reduction, according to a small number of comments.
Bottom line
Mizuno’s trademark stable ride is quite evident in the Wave Ultima 6 because of the Wave plate. In this version, the remodelled upper offers more comfort and better next to skin feel. Runners who love a cushioned ride with noticeable responsiveness that can pile on the miles should give this shoe some serious consideration."
Altra Paradigm 2.0,,89.0,82.0,207.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,, Altra Paradigm 4.5,"10 reasons to buy
Comfort comes mainly from the max cushioning and spacious room in the forefoot, according to most reviews.
Durability is worth noting in the books of many.
The Paradigm 2.0 is pretty light for a max-cushioned shoe, based on several comments.
Some runners with back or knee issues were able to enjoy their runs again in this shoe.
A good number of heavy-framed runners have used the 2nd version of the Paradigm both as an every day and fast-paced trainer.
A few mentioned the slight increase in the volume of the toe box, which made their runs even more comfortable.
The traction is really solid, as observed by a handful.
Reflective details make it great for low-visibility running.
This is a do-it-all shoe that can tackle short distances, marathons, and ultra-marathons on a variety of surfaces with ease, based on the reports of more than a handful of expert reviewers.
The mesh upper keeps the foot cool and comfortable, as explained by more than a few runners.
4 reasons not to buy
The Paradigm is a bit stiff for the wallet, based on some comments.
A break-in period was needed by several.
The wide toe box was just too much for a handful of runners who suffered blisters as their feet moved around easily in this shoe.
A small number of Paradigm fans found the sole and the ride as too firm.
Bottom line
Altra builds on the success and popularity of the earlier versions by keeping the staples in the Paradigm 2.0. Adding a more dialed-in fit and breathable mesh only ensures the loyalty of Paradigm fans while gathering even more to the bandwagon. It is a shoe with good arch support, very comfortable interior, and max cushioning that still retains a dose of flexibility and responsiveness."
Asics Gel FujiTrabuco 5,,89.0,85.0,162.0,,, Trail, Stability, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 8.7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel FujiTrabuco 8,"7 reasons to buy
Many runners felt comfortable in the most rugged conditions while running in the FujiTrabuco 5
The grip is as good as can be expected from several fans of the FujiTrabuco series.
The Gel cushioning system in the heel and forefoot continue to work as intended, noted a handful of reviewers.
Some runners mentioned that the upper is not as restrictive as before.
There is much better locked down feel in the heel, as observed by several runners.
The Rock Protection Plate provides decent foot protection without sacrificing ground feel.
A good number of reviews mentioned that it is more breathable than the previous model.
3 reasons not to buy
The $200 price is ultra-expensive for a large number of runners.
It is clearly stiffer than earlier models, according to a handful.
A few mentioned that it needs respectable mileage as a break-in period.
Bottom line
The 5th version of the FujiTrabuco remains to be a handy and reliable trail fiend that tackles the most rugged conditions. With excellent comfort and traction, running on the most adverse conditions in the trail can be easily handled by this blue-collar trail shoe. As long as runners can get past the hefty price tag, they should have a winner on the trail in the FujiTrabuco 5."
Reebok Sublite XT Cushion 2.0, Reebok,89.0,82.0,156.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.1oz , Women: 6.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal,,"10 reasons to buy
Several runners noted how comfortable the Sublite XT Cushion 2.0 is.
It is very wallet-friendly.
The shoe runs very light, based on the comments of some runners.
It is quite breathable, as noted by a handful.
The low cut design and flexibility makes it friendly to a runner’s natural stride, remarked a small number of runners.
It is very stylish, as remarked by a significant number of runners.
A large number of reviewers reported that it fits true to size.
The open mesh is excellent for breathability.
A heel tab allows for convenience during shoe exit or entry.
The gym is also another place where people can easily see this shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
A few reviewers took notice of the lack of traction during rainy days.
The durability was disappointing for a handful of runners.
A handful preferred more arch support from the 2nd version of the Sublite XT Cushion.
Bottom line
The 2nd instalment of the Subtlite XT Cushion is a lightweight trainer that can tackle most distances in different speeds. For a very affordable price, runners can enjoy a shoe that has decent arch support, superb comfort, soft cushioning, excellent flexibility, and aesthetic appeal that belies the price tag. It works the way Reebok designed it without fuss."
Puma Ignite PWRWARM,,89.0,88.0,43.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 9.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 9mm,,,,"11 reasons to buy
A lot of runners have called the Puma Ignite PWRWARM a ‘very comfortable’ running shoe.
Several consumers considered the fit to be adequate for their feet.
Some purchasers were able to use this shoe for casual purposes and they wrote that they remained comfortable throughout.
The molded sock liner, which offered additional cushioning to the arch, was welcomed by those who needed some comfortable support for the mid-foot.
A runner wrote that the mid-sole unit’s softness and responsiveness were able to evoke a feeling of stepping on the clouds.
A purchaser commented that this shoe’s apparently lightweight nature made it great for a variety of activities.
Many consumers applauded the general quality of this shoe, stating that it looked and felt well-made.
The traction-ready outsole worked efficiently, according to testers.
There are reflective details for low-visibility running.
The price is good value for money investment.
Several users received compliments because of the shoe’s looks.
4 reasons not to buy
Some runners complained of foot-discomfort while wearing this shoe.
A few purchasers reported that it was half-to-a-size bigger than what they were used to.
A reviewer felt that this shoe didn’t have enough cushioning for a comfortable running experience; he stated that it was better as a casual walking shoe.
No optional widths.
Bottom line
Runners generally had nice things to say about the Puma Ignite PWRWARM. Many were able to appreciate its components. For them, it was a solid option for running on the roads. There were those who certainly enjoyed its vibrant color schemes. But there were complaints, such as foot-aches and inconsistent sizing."
Scott Kinabalu RC 2.0,,,86.0,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 3mm , Women: 3mm,,,,
Under Armour Charged Lightning, Under Armour,85.0,,341.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.5oz , Women: 7.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Jun 2017,,,"8 reasons to buy
Most reviewers appreciated the sleek design of the Under Armour Charged Lightning.
The design of the shoe was described as adaptable because reviewers used it for several activities besides running.
Testers appreciated the variety of colorways.
The shoe exhibited excellent grip, based on some reviews.
Consumers said that the shoe felt comfortable, even when worn all day.
The Charged Lightening performed well during general gym workouts and short runs, multiple users said.
A majority of testers narrated that the shoe was true to size.
The light weight and breathability of the shoe was appreciated by a few reviewers.
4 reasons not to buy
A majority of reviewers mentioned that the right shoe produced a bothersome sound. The left shoe had no problem, but the sound the right shoe made was described as squeaky.
One user used his pair for running one mile. He mentioned that he had to stop because he felt pain in his foot.
A tester narrated that the collar rubbed on his heel, producing a raw spot that felt painful.
Some users said that the shoe felt narrow.
Bottom line
The Under Armour Charged Lightning is an affordable shoe made for various purposes. Although it was meant to be a running shoe, its sleek and minimalist design makes it a good-looking casual sneaker. Meanwhile, its features allow it to be a dependable shoe for general gym workouts and short runs. It’s a wise choice for those seeking a comfortable neutral running shoe that can be used every day for a variety of activities – short runs, working out, or simply being on one’s foot for a long period of time."
Salomon Sonic Pro 2,,85.0,85.0,30.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 7.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Most runners experienced a comfortable ride with the Sonic Pro 2.
The shoe was able to handle even rough pavements with ease, as observed by a couple of users.
One reviewer thought the silhouette had an excellent geometry which allowed an efficient cruising.
Several wearers said the shoe contoured well all around the foot.
It showed little signs of damage even after logging a couple of hundred miles, stated a tester.
A lot of consumers were amazed at the snug feel of the Sensifit™ technology.
The upper material worked well at drying off sweat and moisture, a reviewer mentioned.
4 reasons not to buy
The flat laces were hard to handle and tie, a tester complained.
A user noticed that the shoe felt sloppy when running downhill and at slow speeds.
The heel-to-toe transition was not as smooth as expected, some runners commented.
One buyer was disappointed that this shoe did not retain the QuickLace® feature from the previous edition.
Bottom line
The Salomon Sonic Pro 2 has delivered a lightweight and supportive package. Many users agreed that it is capable of performing well in fast-paced runs. Numerous runners were also satisfied with the technologies presented and have remarked that this shoe is worth recommending to their peers."
Hoka One One Challenger 2 ATR,,89.0,83.0,232.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,, Hoka One One Challenger 5 ATR,"5 reasons to buy
Most testers applauded the reliable cushioning and the good arch support of the Hoka One One Challenger 2 ATR.
Many mentioned that the shoe feels light and fast.
The shoe is comfortable enough to be used on long runs, as mentioned in some reviews.
Most users gave positive feedback of the shoe’s outsole that delivers reliable grip on varied surfaces.
The reinforced heel of the Challenger 2 ATR provides a secure locked down feel.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners found the Challenger 2 ATR too narrow and tight for their liking.
Hoka recommends the shoe for runners below 85kg as the sole may wear off quicker than expected.
Bottom line
The Challenger 2 ATR is a trail running shoe designed for long distance runs. It works perfectly well on dirt, grass and technical terrain. Due to its high stack height, this shoe is not best for overpronators. Overall, the Hoka One One Challenger 2 ATR has proven to be a successful release."
La Sportiva Helios 2.0,,83.0,81.0,45.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.4oz , Women: 6.5oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, La Sportiva Helios 3.0,"4 reasons to buy
Many runners appreciate the lacing system of the Helios 2.0.
This version delivers more cushioning as compared to the original version.
Some applauded the overall design of the shoe.
The HyDrain upper mesh is effective in delivering a moisture-free coverage as mentioned in some reviews.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners mentioned that the upper is not breathable enough to keep the foot cool especially on warm conditions.
The outsole wears out quickly than expected.
Bottom line
The La Sportiva Helios 2.0 is a reliable trail shoe that is equipped with the necessary technologies to survive the toughest terrain. It has plenty of cushioning and reliable traction for varied surfaces. This shoe is also best for uptempo training."
New Balance Fresh Foam Cruz Protect Pack,,81.0,88.0,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The New Balance Fresh Foam Cruz Protect Pack was lauded for being true to size.
The water-resistant construction of the upper unit received praise for being efficient.
A runner observed that the material on the upper maintained a warm environment during the rainy season.
Some consumers welcomed the subdued and near-monochromatic color schemes.
The midsole felt suitably comfortable, according to several reviewers.
2 reasons not to buy
A purchaser complained that the New Balance Fresh Foam Cruz Protect Pack had a tight fit and that sizing up didn’t remedy the problem.
A tester felt that the underfoot cushioning system felt stiff and looked cheap, likening the foam unit to Styrofoam.
Bottom line
The New Balance Fresh Foam Cruz Protect Pack received mostly positive reviews from those who have tried it. They liked this road shoe’s muted colorways, the standard sizing scheme, the water-resistant upper and the apparently comfortable midsole. But some neutral runners were taken aback by an inconsistency in width and cushioning capability."
Nike Air Zoom Elite 10,,84.0,92.0,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.2oz , Women: 6.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Several runners admired the durable design of the Nike Air Zoom Elite 10.
The Elite 10 is affordable.
The shoe has a roomy toe box, said some users.
According to a few comments, the shoe feels light and fast.
The shoe runs true to size.
The upper of the shoe offers breathability and enhanced support.
1 reasons not to buy
A few noticed that the shoe is not flexible.
Bottom line
The Nike Air Zoom Elite 10 is a lightweight road shoe designed for neutral runners. Some users were happy with the shoe's design, fit and breathable upper. A few noticed that the shoe is not flexible but overall, the shoe is still impressive and highly recommended. The Elite 10 is a good option for those who are looking for an affordable running companion."
Scott Palani RC,,83.0,81.0,10.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 7.1oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"3 reasons to buy
People liked the well-ventilated upper unit of the Scott Palani RC.
The general quality of the materials was lauded; this shoe was deemed well-built.
The durable construction of this product made it great for races like the half-marathon, according to a couple of reviewers.
5 reasons not to buy
Several testers felt that the underfoot experience was too stiff for enabled movements.
The tongue unit tended to bunch in the forefoot section, a few consumers observed.
The price of this shoe was criticized for being a bit expensive.
The width profile was deemed narrow by some runners.
People felt fatigued with the unexciting color scheme of this running shoe.
Bottom line
While the Scott Palani RC caught its fair share of positive feedback from runners, it has also been the recipient of criticism, particularly when it comes to the way that it was constructed. There were no problems with durability, but the platform of this neutral shoe apparently felt stiff while the tongue unit was irritating. The expensive price tag was also panned, as was the narrow fit and the bland colorways."
Altra Olympus 2.0,,85.0,82.0,416.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,, Altra Olympus 3.5,"5 reasons to buy
The Olympus 2.0 is lighter than the previous version.
Most runners noted that the traction, comfort and stability of this shoe were greatly improved.
It features a gaiter trap, which effectively shields the foot from debris.
Some runners were impressed by the shoe’s lugged Vibram outsole, which offered extreme durability and efficient traction.
The Altra Olympus 2.0 features the Natural Ride System for a more natural foot motion.
3 reasons not to buy
The 2nd version of the Olympus comes at an expensive price.
Some runners experienced heel slippage due to the lack of additional heel support mechanisms.
Others noticed that the upper unit broke off from the unit easily after a few months’ use.
Bottom line
The Altra Olympus 2.0 is a lightweight trail running shoe that offers plenty of cushioning and exceptional grip on the trails. With this shoe, runners can keep the feet stable and relaxed even on uphill climbs and downhill plunges. This shoe is best for hiking, trail running and trail racing."
Under Armour Freedom Assert 6, Under Armour,88.0,,7110.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
The Freedom Assert 6 has helped improved running speed, a couple of commenters said.
The shoe provided a snug fit that was not too tight nor too loose, a tester mentioned.
One wearer said that the shoe gave a stable underfoot support that made it suitable even for weightlifting and boxing. A few others resonated by saying it has versatile uses.
The upper worked in preventing the foot get hot and sweaty, some runners observed.
Several users felt just the right amount of cushioning in the midsole.
Many wearers described the shoe as “comfortable” and “durable.”
The shoe’s minimal weight has pleased various customers.
The mesh liner worked efficiently in preventing sand and dirt from getting inside the shoe, stated a buyer.
1 reasons not to buy
The shoe runs a bit small, a few users noticed.
Bottom line
The positive reviews for the Under Armour Freedom Assert 6 have greatly outnumbered the negative ones. Users who wore the shoe have shared their pleasant experiences because of its performance, ride, fit, and feel. Only a small percentage encountered an issue with sizing. As a conclusion, the Freedom Assert 6 has proven to be a successful release."
Reebok Zquick,,88.0,86.0,293.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 7mm , Women: 7mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Most runners appreciated how their feet fit well in the Reebok Zquick.
The breathable mesh material allows air to keep the foot well-ventilated.
A seamless construction gets rid of irritation for a better and more comfortable coverage.
Runners lauded the inclusion of the Nanoweb, a system that hugs the midfoot as the laces are adjusted.
The mid-sole unit delivers a plush underfoot experience that’s also flexible and tuned to the natural movements of the wearer’s foot.
An anti-abrasion rubber is placed strategically on the outsole for durable protection and traction.
Deep flex grooves allow the sole unit to flex more easily, making the foot move seamlessly through the gait cycle.
3 reasons not to buy
There were runners who noted that this shoe needed a stability mechanism to stabilize their feet and their positioning when running.
The forefoot section of the sole unit broke down after a few months, as accounted by some runners.
A few complained that the rear section of the collar didn’t have more cushioning because the material eventually rubbed against their heels.
Bottom line
The Reebok Zquick is a lightweight running shoe that’s great for runners who want to have a responsive and flexible running experience. Its appealing design is a testament to its functionality and efficacy when taken on short races and exercise sessions. This affordable shoe caters to casual runners and advanced athletes alike."
Brooks Aduro 4,,88.0,,83.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Testers welcomed the mesh material used in the upper unit because it provided breathable coverage.
The DNA cushioning technology gained popularity among many runners because of its capability to conform to the shape of the wearer’s foot.
Consumers appreciated the use of the durable BioMoGo mid-sole, which is made from biodegradable materials.
Those with neutral movements and stride were able to ease well into this shoe because it was made with a neutral platform that caters to their needs.
The blown rubber outsole received positive feedback because of its long-lasting and responsive nature.
A tester mentioned that the flexibility of the underfoot platform allowed them to move naturally through the gait cycle.
1 reasons not to buy
Some runners lamented the lack of a stability mechanism, which have left them wanting more support for long running sessions.
Bottom line
Many runners have lauded the Brooks Aduro 4. They welcomed its breathable upper unit, it’s interesting mid-sole technologies and its durable yet responsive outsole. For them, it’s a solid choice for the roads. Conversely, there were a number of runners who didn’t acclimate well to this shoe due to the lack of stability mechanics."
Adidas Ultraboost City,,74.0,,8.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The Adidas Ultraboost City offers a snug fit and security to the foot while running, several runners mention.
The shoe is very comfortable to wear, a lot of the users say.
A lot of the wearers commend the colorway of the shoe.
The shoe is very fashionable and versatile, as noted by some of the users.
Some runners commend the lightweight feel the shoe gives.
2 reasons not to buy
One of the runners claims that the shoe’s toe box is too narrow.
The top part of the upper was too tight; it causes pain when running, some of the runners claim. 
Bottom line
Generally, the Ultraboost City is well-received by a lot of runners. One of the most commended features of the shoe is the comfort that it provides. A lot of the users also lauded the fashionable exterior of the shoe. The shoe was also very versatile as it can be used for both casual and long-distance running. However, one of the identified downsides of the shoe is its tightness and that it caused pain when running. "
Hoka One One Challenger 4 ATR,,81.0,82.0,462.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,, Hoka One One Challenger 5 ATR,"5 reasons to buy
The Hoka One One Challenger 4 ATR had a roomy toe box that accommodated natural toe-splay, several people stated.
The heel collar adequately secured the foot and kept it in place, according to some testers.
Many runners noted that the upper unit was soft and comfortable.
A few people noted that they were able to use this running shoe for the trails as well as the roads; it apparently remained agreeable and capable on flat surfaces.
The design was considered by most consumers to be appealing to the eyes.
3 reasons not to buy
Some people commented that the outsole started to peel off after only a few uses.
The cushioning and shock-absorbing capacity of this shoe’s midsole was touted by many to be not as efficient as the Challenger ATR 3’s.
Several runners reported that the fit was broader than what they were used to in the medium width option.
Bottom line
Many runners liked the Hoka One One Challenger 4 ATR. They were receptive to its contemporary design, its spacious forefoot construction, and its overall comfortable build. But there were those who didn’t like this trail running shoe’s outsole durability, as well as its apparently insufficient cushioning capability."
Asics Gel Pulse 11 Lite-Show,,88.0,,23.0,,, Road, Neutral,,, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Many users said that the Asics Gel Pulse 11 Lite-Show offers excellent cushioning. 
A lot of runners mentioned that the shoe is lightweight. 
This running partner delivers a firm grip, according to several users. 
It is comfortable for walking and running, based on reviews. 
Several testers commented that this running shoe is breathable. 
People are pleased with the shoe’s overall performance.
2 reasons not to buy
Some reviewers mentioned that the shoe does not offer enough arch support. 
A couple of wearers dislike that the shoe requires a break-in period.
Bottom line
Specifically designed for medium-mileage runners, the Asics Gel Pulse 11 Lite-Show is crafted using up-to-date technologies for comfort and versatility. It incorporates reflective detailing for visibility and safety during night runs. This running shoe works best for neutral runners or those who do not overpronate."
Reebok Sole Fury Lux, Reebok,90.0,,32.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 7.1oz,,,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
One of the runners says that the Reebok Sole Fury Lux is a lightweight shoe. 
This Reebok running shoe, according to some reviewers, offers versatility as it can be worn for both running and casual occasions. 
Several runners remark that the shoe has a snug fit and provides security when running. 
The overall aesthetics of the shoe is lauded by a lot of people; the shoe is very stylish and looks very luxurious for its price.
The shoe is highly breathable as its upper is constructed with mesh material, as various wearers state. 
1 reasons not to buy
One runner complains that the shoe is uncomfortable to wear the first time. 
Bottom line
The overall reception of the Rebook Sole Fury Lux was mostly positive. One reviewer has mentioned that the shoe is uncomfortable to wear the first time, but many are still satisfied with how lightweight the shoe is. Many users like the overall aesthetics of the shoe and how versatile it is. A lot of the runners also like the breathability that the shoe offers. "
Under Armour Micro G Pursuit Twist, Under Armour,88.0,,335.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.7oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
Many consumers liked the stylish look of the Under Armour Micro G Pursuit Twist, stating that it was great for casual use.
The underfoot cushioning system was lauded for being responsive and supportive.
People stated that the price for a pair of these running shoes was very affordable.
The inside of the shoe has enough space for natural toe-splay, several testers commented.
Runners appreciated the various width options that were available for this shoe as they felt that the choices accommodated many foot types.
Some purchasers felt that the overall weight of this product was light enough to handle many kinds of activities, including gym training and all-day walking.
Most people observed that the sizing scheme welcomed their usual expectations.
2 reasons not to buy
Some purchasers complained that the midsole emitted an annoying squeaking sound whenever each step is taken.
The instep causes the foot to slip and hit the tip of the toe box, according to a few wearers.
Bottom line
The Under Armour Micro G Pursuit Twist is a road shoe that was welcomed with open arms. Those who have tried this product stated that they were happy with what it had to offer. Its price was commended for being wallet-friendly, its various width options were coveted, and its versatile construction was considered to be fashion-friendly. On the other hand, there were those who complained about a squeaking sound emitted by the midsole while others felt that the shoe could be more snug and supportive."
Brooks Cascadia 11,,87.0,80.0,190.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.8oz , Women: 9.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Brooks Cascadia 14,"5 reasons to buy
Runners applauded the rugged outsole of the Brooks Cascadia 11 that delivers great traction for rough and wet surfaces.
The Full-Length Segmented Crash Pad provides a smooth heel-to-toe transition, according to a couple of reviews.
It features a Ballistic Rock Shield that keeps foot well-protection while running on hard and rough terrains.
The mesh upper of the Cascadia 11 keeps foot cool and dry.
Cushioning is resilient, noted a handful of runners.
3 reasons not to buy
This shoe is slightly expensive for some runners.
Some runners felt that this shoe is a bit heavy for them.
Based on some reviews, the tongue feels off because it rubs the top of the foot.
Bottom line
The Brooks Cascadia 11 is a versatile trail running shoe that offers a balance of cushioning, support and protection. With the impressive traction, this shoe will not disappoint trail runners who love to run in rough terrains. Overall, the Cascadia 11 is an average trail running companion."
Adidas Adizero Tempo 8,,87.0,84.0,117.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Adidas Adizero Tempo 9,"8 reasons to buy
The Boost midsole provide dependable responsive cushioning in the Adizero Tempo 8.
The Tempo 8 looks sleeker and a bit more sophisticated than the past version.
Loyal fans of the line noticed an even improved flexibility from a shoe that is designed with stability features.
Comfort remains fantastic in the Adidas Tempo 8 based on several reviews.
A few testers called the shoe a sturdy trainer.
The traction is really good, even in wet areas, according to a handful of runners.
Several runners have used the Tempo 8 for gym workouts.
More than several users call it a reasonably-priced shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
Limited colorways.
A small number of runners find it a bit stiff out of the box.
Bottom line
The Adidas Adizero Tempo 8 may not be the speed demon that the name suggests, but it is still considered by experts as a great option for high-mileage runs. It shines, though, as a workhorse trainer because of the solid medial support and the tons of comfort."
Salomon Wings Flyte,,87.0,,64.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 12.3oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Salomon Wings Flyte 2,"6 reasons to buy
Uses a breathable mesh upper that is supportive and non-irritating.
The Wings Flyte features a fit system that reacts to every adjustment done to the lacing system.
Many runners took well the asymmetrical Quicklace system, which makes adjusting the fit easier and more responsive.
Testers were appreciative of the moderately roomy forefoot area.
The lateral movement of those with over-pronated foot motion will be alleviated by the mid-sole components.
The Contagrip outsole makes the underside of the shoe more formidable on the trails.
4 reasons not to buy
There were testers who felt that the mid-foot area was a bit too tight.
Some runners who want more freedom of movement detested the stiffness of the Salomon Flyte.
Moderately high price tag.
There were those who didn’t like the heavy weight and the bulky look of this shoe.
Bottom line
Favored by hardcore trail runners, the Wings Flyte offers durable protection against debris, responsible underfoot cushioning, effective pronation control mechanics, and a comfortable upper wrap. It’s heavy, but it’s a running shoe that has adequate arch support and great protective systems."
Reebok Zone CushRun,,87.0,,76.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Features a breathable mesh upper that is comfortable and lightweight.
The CushRun from Reebok has a low-cut design for extended mobility of the foot, which was appreciated by many testers.
Runners lauded the inclusion of a padded collar and tongue, which are important in preventing slips and injury.
Many thought that the fit was just right.
Reviewers thought that the durability of the Zone CushRun was reliable and constant.
The MemoryTech Sock Liner improves the fit and add a more adaptive cushioning because it conforms to the shape of the wearer’s foot over time.
Testers also took notice of the appealing and eye-catching design.
3 reasons not to buy
There were reviewers who thought that the CushRun was larger than their usual size of choice.
A big ankle area was observed by some reviews and that didn’t help much when it comes to how it fits.
Some testers also noted that the flexibility of this shoe wasn’t as effective as initially thought.
Bottom line
The Reebok Zone CushRun is a running shoe that is popular among those who need responsible cushioning, adequate fit and dependable durability. It’s a neutral shoe and no added stability mechanics or arch support modules."
Puma Mega NRGY Turbo, Puma,87.0,,32.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal, Puma Mega NRGY Turbo 2,"6 reasons to buy
Many buyers felt that this running shoe had a premium quality despite its low price.
A lot of runners complimented the shoe’s lightness.
The SoftFoam insole gave a relaxed ride that felt natural under the foot, commented a tester.
A few runners likened the performance of the shoe to other products from high-end brands.
One user said it was terrific from the first run and that it did not require a lot of time to break in.
The shoe was comfortable, and it did not deliver pains nor blisters, a consumer stated.
3 reasons not to buy
Several buyers mentioned that the shoe was not a perfect fit; it apparently ran a bit big.
The midsole was too stiff and seemed rigid while on the run, according to a user.
A couple of wearers did not like that the insole was not removable.
Bottom line
Many users of the Puma Mega NRGY Turbo were satisfied with the shoe’s performance; however, not a lot commented or noticed the technology that was intended to enable a faster running speed. Meanwhile, some consumers were disappointed with the midsole construction and the shoe’s overall fit."
Under Armour Micro G Speed Swift, Under Armour,87.0,,271.0,,, Road, Neutral,,, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,, Under Armour Micro G Speed Swift 2,"5 reasons to buy
The Under Armour Micro G Speed Swift is a fast and lightweight shoe.
It is an affordable shoe.
Some reviews mentioned that the shoe provides enough cushioning and stability.
Some testers liked the sleek design of the Micro G Speed Swift.
This shoe is very comfortable to wear.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners felt that this shoe is too narrow for them.
Some mentioned that this shoe runs small.
Bottom line
Designed for daily running and uptempo training, the Under Armour Micro G Speed Swift is equipped with the necessary technologies for enhanced performance. It delivers the right amount of cushioning, traction and protection. Though a few users have issues with the fit and sizing, the shoe is still considered by some as a worthy investment. "
Asics Gel FujiAttack 4,,87.0,71.0,70.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.4oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The mesh material and the synthetic leather work together in order to provide comfortable, secure and breathable coverage.
Runners appreciated the inclusion of anti-debris systems, the anti-gravel tongue and rock protection plate, which combat infiltration of trail hazards.
A lightweight mid-sole foam called the Solyte® provides reliable cushioning and durable protection.
The Gel® Cushioning System is able to protect the heel from impact shock during the landing phase.
The trail-specific outsole holds onto the terrain, giving much-needed traction to the runner.
The Asics Gel FujiAttack 4 is worth its price because of its quality features.
2 reasons not to buy
A few runners thought that it was a bit narrow.
The sole unit felt stiff for some who tried it.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel FujiAttack 4 gives comfort and security to runners who want to tackle the great outdoors. Its trail-optimized design and features make it a formidable running companion to those who need speed and efficacy on tough terrain. The shoe gathered positive and negative reviews from users but the negative ones are not enough to overshadow the positive feedback."
Puma Propel, Puma,87.0,,41.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.7oz , Women: 5.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
Some runners mentioned that the Puma Propel is very comfortable.
The price is super affordable.
The relatively large holes in the mesh guarantee a sweat-free and cool ride.
A handful noted that the transition is smooth.
There are more than a dozen color combinations up for grab.
It is quite light, according to a small group of runners.
A few loved the shoe’s ability for its everyday and all day appeal.
The heel tab makes shoe entry or exit more convenient.
Some runners made the Propel their gym partners as well.
3 reasons not to buy
A handful noticed that the Propel lacked the needed traction, particularly in wet conditions.
It does not have enough bounce back features, based on a few observations.
May not be the best option for inclement-weather areas due to the really open mesh.
Bottom line
Puma enhances the depth of their lightweight trainer category by adding a versatile and ultra-affordable shoe in the Propel. It does not have any added accessories, but allows runners to enjoy their runs by providing adequate arch support, tons of comfort, smooth transitions, and the fashion that makes it an everyday option."
Saucony Propel Vista,,87.0,,300.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
The majority of runners preferred Saucony Propel Vista for long distance runs due to its sufficient amount of cushioning.
Many users observed that the shoe adjusted itself according to their feet, providing a snug fit during their run.
Most of its wearers appreciated its lightweight nature since it evoked a feeling of wearing gloves on their feet.
Some customers were happy because the shoe accommodated their flat feet very well.
A handful of buyers liked the vibrant colors available in this shoe; they wore it as a part of their daily clothing.
Some users were happy with the attached tongue at the top since it made the shoe easy to wear.
Several buyers were happy with the apparently reasonable price of Saucony Propel Vista.
A runner was happy with its firm grip on snow during winter season.
3 reasons not to buy
A few customers complained about the responsiveness of this running shoe since it did not absorb enough shock and caused them to feel pain in their knees.
Some users were unhappy about the absence of arch support in the Saucony Propel Vista.
A runner declared the toe-box to be narrow and returned it.
Bottom line
Many runners enjoyed the Saucony Propel Vista because of its adequate cushioning and comfort. The shoe is lightweight, it adjusts accordingly to the runner’s foot, and it gives a snug fit. Its regular underfoot platform design makes it suitable for people who have medium arches. Moreover, it comes in bright colors that make it a suitable option for everyday use."
Salomon Sense Marin,,87.0,80.0,31.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 8.6oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The majority of the purchasers mentioned that the shoe is very comfortable.
The lightweight construction of the shoe received praise.
As mentioned in some reviews, the open mesh upper material of the shoe was able to provide breathable coverage.
A couple of users mentioned that they liked the quick and one-pull lacing system of the shoe.
The Sensifit technology gained positive feedback from several runners because it offered a secure and more personalized fit.
The shoe is reasonably-priced, according to purchasers.
A few runners admired the rugged outsole of the shoe, which allowed them to efficiently run on the trail.
2 reasons not to buy
A few wearers say the Sense Marin is too rugged to transition from trail to road running.
A user noticed some wear in the outsole after only a few miles of running.
Bottom line
Many were highly appreciative of the shoe’s overall design and performance. The Salomon Sense Marin is packed with the necessary technologies needed for a better trail running experience. The shoe offers a good blend of comfort, durability, and lightweight protection."
Adidas Galaxy Trail,,90.0,,728.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.1oz , Women: 9.1oz, Men: 7mm , Women: 7mm,,,,"11 reasons to buy
The Adidas Galaxy Trail is very comfortable, based on the comments of most reviewers.
It is super affordable.
The traction is great, according to a large number of comments.
It is breathable protection, as noted by some runners.
Several runners appreciated the excellent security and support on the trail in this shoe.
The Cloudfoam midsole offers adequate cushioning with clear responsiveness.
The moderately aggressive lugs enhance leverage and grip on rugged trails.
More than a handful received compliments about the stylish looks of the Galaxy Trail.
It is available in 5 colors.
Some runners also use the Galaxy Trail for hiking.
The durability is top notch, as reported by many reviewers.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners noted that it takes time for this shoe to dry.
A handful experienced hot spots in the forefoot or around the toe box.
Bottom line
The Adidas Galaxy Trail is another solid offering for trail runners who value a reliable, supportive, durable, and very comfortable training partner. While it does not have the bells and whistles of other trail running shoes, the performance is decidedly as Adidas designed it to be. This is a versatile shoe that can handle short runs or high-mileage running with equal ease. Few shoes have this kind of very affordable price with the performance of a much more expensive price tag."
Asics Gel Scram 3,,90.0,,1241.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Scram 5,"9 reasons to buy
A lot of reviewers stated that the Asics Gel Scram 3 was able to give a perfect fit.
It had an adequately lightweight nature, wrote a number of runners.
A consumer noted that its interior façade was well-padded and that it efficiently secured the foot in place.
Its parts and components lasted long, according to many of those who have tried it.
A reviewer conveyed that the outsole unit was efficient when it came to protecting the mid-sole from wear and tear.
Even though it’s primarily meant for the trails, there were wearers who were able to use the Asics Gel Scram 3 on the asphalt and they reported that it still functioned well.
There were runners who stated that they were able to get great value from this shoe; they even added that even though it was affordable, its quality was reliable.
Some consumers loved the color schemes of this version.
Many runners detailed that the traction given by the outsole unit did not disappoint.
4 reasons not to buy
A few testers reported that the sole unit gave off a squeaking sound when weight was applied to it, and it annoyed them.
After only a few uses, the outsole tread came off on a number of runners, disappointing them thoroughly.
Some consumers noted that this shoe was tight and narrow, even when disregarding the use of socks.
The forefoot section of the upper unit started to tear off after a few uses, according to a purchaser.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Scram 3 was efficient and a lot of runners were able to back up that claim. Many of them reported that when they wore it, their feet didn’t feel any discomfort. A number of them even noted that it was versatile because they were able to use it on both the trails and the roads, as well as daily wear. Conversely, several complainers highlighted its apparently noisy platform, which was perceived to give off an annoying squeaking sound during the running session."
Hoka One One Clayton 2,,88.0,88.0,118.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Most customers appreciated the intelligent cushioning system of Hoka One One Clayton 2.
Many runners also noticed the light weight of the shoe; they were happy since it did not tire their feet during long runs.
The customers commented that this running shoe got better with time; its upper adjusted to the shape of their feet and felt more comfortable.
A few runners admired the responsive ride of Clayton 2.
A user commented on the rubberized laces, which cinched down the shoe’s upper and prevented any sliding of the foot.
A few customers mentioned that Clayton 2 had solved the blistering issue of Clayton 1; one such customer mentioned that Hoka One One had readjusted the design of the shoe’s upper and also placed a substantial sock-liner to solve the issue.
A runner lauded the improvements in the upper; he liked how the shoe’s upper felt softer and more pliable during his runs.
2 reasons not to buy
A few runners had apparently experienced blisters while running in the Clayton 2.
A user was disappointed with the shoe’s perceptive lack of responsiveness; the midsole sucked the energy out of him with each stride.
Bottom line
Hoka One One Clayton 2 is a light, well-cushioned, durable pair of long-race running shoes that offer a very comfortable, springy ride for its users. While this newer model solves the blistering issue of Clayton 1, some consumers felt that it took a while before completely adjusting to the feet. Generally, this neutral road running shoe was well-received by fans and newcomers."
Adidas Adizero Feather 4,,70.0,86.0,8.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 6.3oz , Women: 4.9oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The Feather 4 is very light.
The decent cushioning in the Adidas Feather 4 makes it a doable option as a high-mileage option or marathon shoe.
It is very flexible.
Some runners heaped praised on the shoe’s outsole durability.
A fit that hugs really hugs the foot encourages runners to pick up their pace.
The responsive features of the midsole are very noticeable, according to a handful of users.
A few runners loved the smooth transition of the Adizero Feather 4.
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of the reviews mentioned a toe box that could use a little more room.
The price is a little expensive.
Bottom line
A feather in the cap of Adidas’ collection of shoes is the Adizero Feather 4. It seeks to carve a niche in the increasingly popular lightweight shoes with decent cushioning for long-distance running. The Feather 4 excels because of the foot-molding comfort and a barely-there arch support that is a minimalist’s dream come true."
Inov-8 X-Talon 230,,94.0,88.0,1333.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.1oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Several reviewers welcomed the sturdy yet lightweight nature of the Inov-8 X-Talon 230’s upper unit.
The water-repellent quality of the upper was lauded by testers, who stated that it efficiently staved off mild splashes.
The general durability of this running shoe received praise.
People were happy with the gripping capability of the outsole unit, stating that it prevented them from slipping on mud and other wet surfaces.
The underfoot platform was touted to be more comfortable than the previous iterations of the X-Talon series.
3 reasons not to buy
Several runners felt that the platform of this running shoe was too stiff.
The Precision Fit design, which has a slimmer fit construction, didn’t agree with some who had a medium or wide foot-dimension.
A reviewer wasn’t happy that the upper wasn’t as breathable as some options in the Inov-8 line.
Bottom line
Those who have tried the Inov-8 X-Talon 230 were happy with its performance. They welcomed the water-repellent capability of its upper unit, the comfortable underfoot cushioning system, and the guaranteed traction given by its trail-ready outsole. But some testers lamented its stiffness, the tight construction of the Precision Fit design, and the tightly woven upper."
Asics Gel Sonoma 2,,80.0,,623.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 9.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Sonoma 5,"9 reasons to buy
A runner wrote that the upper unit of the Asics Gel Sonoma 2 didn’t rub against their skin, thus preventing irritation and blistering.
Many consumers stated that this shoe felt great right out of the box; the word ‘comfortable’ was used many times to describe their time wearing it.
According to a number of runners, this shoe’s facade was visually appealing.
The mid-sole unit was supportive enough to correct supinated foot-motion, a tester noted.
The lugged outsole unit was able to provide sure surface traction, which made it easy for many testers to traverse the trails.
The rubber compound used in the outsole did not wear off easily, according to those who have tried it.
A lot of runners agreed that the price of this trail shoe was affordable.
Some purchasers wrote that the Gel Sonoma 2 remained efficient & comfortable when used on the pavement.
It felt lightweight, according to reviewers.
2 reasons not to buy
After a month of use, a runner noticed that a hole began to form on the lateral front section of the upper unit.
The rubber material on the side started fraying, a tester noted.
Bottom line
A lot of trail running enthusiasts were fascinated with the Gel Sonoma 2. They said that it performed well, that its cushioning system was agreeable, responsive and supportive. Appreciation was also given to its design, as well as its trail-ready outsole. Some even said that it worked well on both the trails and the roads. But, according to others, the durability of this trail shoe wasn’t up to the task. Apparently, the outsole and upper easily broke down on them."
Newton Kismet II,,90.0,87.0,64.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 8.2oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,, Newton Kismet 6,"10 reasons to buy
A majority of the reviewers really valued the comfortable ride of the 2nd coming of the Kismet.
Several runners who have had pains in their knees and feet experienced the remarkable absence of pain while using this shoe.
360° of reflectivity provides added safety measure when running in low-visibility areas.
Several runners noted how well they transition from middle distance running at a moderate pace to a bit of up-tempo workouts at shorter distances.
It is very breathable, according to a handful.
A handful observed that the Kismet II is quite responsive.
It is really smooth, based on a few comments.
Some runners use the Kismet II to double as a gym partner.
A few users noticed that it has better overall support than the original Kismet.
The stability is really noticeable without the run being jarring, as noted by a moderate numer of runners.
4 reasons not to buy
It runs a little smaller than the original Kismet, according to a handful who were familiar with the first edition of this line.
Despite adding a new color combination, the options are still limited.
It is a bit expensive.
A few runners who were new to the unique 5-lug P.O.P system in the forefoot experienced a bit of soreness after initially trying out the shoe.
Bottom line
The Newton Kismet II is a superb find for those who will be looking for a shoe with adequate support, stability, and distinct responsiveness. While the very unique outsole configuration may take a little time to get used to, the smoothness and the responsiveness of the ride, after a few tries, should come as a pleasant surprise. The shoe is excellent for long hours on the road and belies the weight on the scale by its performance when the runner calls for more speed."
Inov-8 Roclite 325 GTX,,84.0,82.0,40.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.5oz , Women: 11.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The majority of the runners were highly appreciative of the shoe’s comfortable feel.
The Gore-Tex® material worked incredibly in keeping the foot dry while running on wet conditions, said some runners.
Several users admired the reliable grip of the Inov-8 Roclite 325 GTX, especially on technical terrains.
According to a few wearers, the shoe is very flexible.
A couple of runners stated that the shoe felt agreeably light.
A user mentioned that the shoe required no break-in time; it was comfortable from the moment it was first used.
A few purchasers approved of the cleat-cut construction of the shoe, which provided ankle support on uneven surfaces.
2 reasons not to buy
The shoe’s price was perceived to be slightly expensive.
A few wide-footed runners were disappointed by the shoe’s narrow toe-box.
Bottom line
Generally, the Inov-8 Roclite 325 GTX is a reliable trail running shoe for neutral runners. The breathable Gore-Tex® especially got positive remarks for providing foot protection while running on wet surfaces. Overall, testers wrote that the shoe was able to give a good combination of comfort, durability, flexibility, ankle support, and traction."
Asics Gel Pursue 3,,89.0,,41.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 8.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Pursue 5,"5 reasons to buy
Incredible comfort is a common impression from many of the runners.
Some reviewers noticed that the Pursue 3 runs light and fast.
The mesh is very breathable, according to several users.
There is a very nice transition through the gait cycle as observed by quite a number.
Prominent reflective materials for low-light running.
3 reasons not to buy
Most of the reviewers were disappointed by the price tag.
A handful wished for better color options.
Arch support should have been better, noticed a few.
Bottom line
The 3rd edition of the Pursue 3 offers a lightweight and versatile package for runners. It is a very nice option for those looking for a trainer that can handle distance or speed without much trouble. The neutral running shoe has superior comfort, decent arch support, and smooth transitions for everyday running."
Asics Gel Hyper Tri 2,,75.0,,114.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6oz , Women: 4.8oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,, Asics Gel Hyper Tri 3,"7 reasons to buy
The seamless upper construction allows runners to wear it without socks, effectively giving a non-irritating inner environment for the foot.
It is a very exceptional triathlon shoe according to many runners.
Added breathability is afforded by the Perforated Sock Liner.
The Gel Cushioning System in the heel area efficiently absorbs the impact shock when landing the foot on the ground.
The Magic Sole reduces the overall weight and maintains reliable ventilation for the interior.
The Asics High Abrasion Rubber offers exceptional durability, while the DuraSponge outsole offers flexibility, more traction and a bit more cushioning.
The Gel Hyper Tri 2 is a lightweight model.
2 reasons not to buy
Others noted that the cushioning was sub-par when compared to other shoes of the same ilk.
A few thought that the bright colors and the over-exuberance of designs on the upper made it unappealing.
Bottom line
The Gel Hyper Tri 2 from Asics is a shoe that’s versatile, and it works well for triathlons, training, workouts, and other athletic activities. The neutral running shoe provides a better running technique as it is made of a combination of a comfortable, non-irritating upper, a vented, gel-like midsole, and a sticky, reliable outsole to improve speed & performance."
Mizuno Wave Hayate 5,,,64.0,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,, Mizuno Wave Hayate 6,
Mizuno Wave Ibuki 2,,75.0,,5.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.6oz , Women: 9.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The wide toe box of the Mizuno Wave Ibuki 2 is praised by some reviewers.
A handful of wearers agree that the shoe fits comfortably.
A couple of runners have observed the efficient traction of the shoe on muddy forest surfaces.
The shoe provides a stable step, according to a user.
Several commenters have noted the breathable mesh of the Wave Ibuki 2.
2 reasons not to buy
Some users think the Mizuno Wave Ibuki 2 is heavy.
The shoe has a poor grip on hard or technical trails, according to a runner.
Bottom line
The Mizuno Wave Ibuki 2 offers an enjoyable running experience to those who are encountering the trails for the first time. The shoe provides a flexible and comfortable fit, complemented by an excellent surface grip and ground adaptability. Runners who aim for light-paced runs on the outdoors will appreciate picking up the Mizuno Wave Ibuki 2."
Saucony Xodus ISO 2,,85.0,74.0,82.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Saucony Xodus ISO 3,"6 reasons to buy
According to some users, they were surprised by the responsiveness of this shoe on all kinds of terrains.
Some buyers mentioned that the tread was ideal for mud and rocks.
Few reviewers commented that the shoe worked fairly well for flat-footed runners.
One of the testers recommended this shoe for runners who want to excel in 10k technical terrains.
A lot of users loved the breathable upper of the Saucony Xodus ISO 2.
Some of the testers agreed that the shoe was one of the most protective trail running shoes they have ever tested.
3 reasons not to buy
Some testers reported numbness in their foot after running several miles only.
The fit of the shoe was a little bit narrow for some runners.
Some reviewers said that the cushioning of the shoe was not comfortable. It was rigid and stiff.
Bottom line
A good number of reviewers agreed that the Saucony Xodus ISO 2 was one of the most protective trail shoes they have tested. They mentioned that the shoe was responsive on different types of terrains. Although some runners commented that the cushioning of the shoe was uncomfortable, others still recommended this shoe because of its breathable upper."
Nike Free RN 2018 DNA, Nike,,,,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,
Skechers GOrun 400,,94.0,88.0,715.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 5.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
The sandwich-mesh upper offers comfort and breathable support to the foot.
Synthetic overlays that have been stitched onto the upper support the foot and keep it in place.
A padded tongue and collar deliver cushioning to the dimensions of the foot.
A lightweight underfoot cushioning system delivers responsiveness and comfortable support.
Runners appreciated the inclusion of an insole that’s made to provide additional shock absorption.
The rubber outsole has sensors that help the runner achieve better transitions through the gait cycle.
The Skechers GOrun 400 is lightweight.
It has an affordable price.
2 reasons not to buy
Several users find the GOrun 400 to easily wear down, especially the outsole, even only after a few hundred miles.
It was narrow in width, according to some runners.
Bottom line
Recreational running and training are part of the purposes of the Skechers GOrun 400. This lightweight neutral shoe is meant to keep the runner comfortable, secure and well-cushioned throughout their activities. It’s a reliable running companion and it doesn’t even have a hefty price tag."
Reebok Instalite Run, Reebok,73.0,,216.0,$60,$24 (save 99%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Many consumers were happy because of the Reebok Instalite Run’s affordable price.
A lot of users commented that this running shoe was comfortable.
According to one of the runners, the product was lightweight.
A good number of reviewers felt great while wearing the Reebok Instalite Run.
Its design was appealing, according to several of the buyers.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners were disappointed because the shoe caused some discomfort to the dorsal portion of the foot.
One of the consumers said that the width was a bit narrow and tight.
Bottom line
A lot of runners agreed that the Reebok Instalite Run was comfortable and lightweight. They said that the fit of the shoe was perfect for them. Although some testers commented that the product was a bit narrow and uncomfortable to wear, others still recommended the Reebok Instalite Run because of its visually-appealing design and affordable price."
On Cloudcruiser,,79.0,79.0,78.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 7mm , Women: 7mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The upper construction of the shoe is very comfortable as runners noted in some reviews.
Most runners are happy with the On Cloudcruiser because of its sturdy construction without affecting flexibility.
This shoe uses the CloudTec system for a firm take-off and cushioned landing.
The Cloudcruiser comes with heel strap that provides effortless foot entry.
It features a very roomy toe box.
4 reasons not to buy
Laces are too thin and loosen up as most runners observed.
This shoe is moderately expensive.
Narrow-footed runners complained that the Cloudcruiser is too wide for them.
Moderately high-priced shoe.
Bottom line
The On Cloudcruiser is a great stability trainer for all runners who are looking for a great running experience. Based on some user reviews, the Cloudcruiser is not yet a perfect release and needs some improvement. But despite the negative feedback, this shoe is best for easy and moderate-paced runs and performs well on the road."
Reebok Print Smooth Clip Ultraknit, Reebok,79.0,,23.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.9oz , Women: 7.7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Several runners noted that the Reebok Print Smooth Clip Ultraknit looked stylish and appealing.
The eye-catching color schemes were welcomed by many.
The toe box offered enough space for toe-splay, a few testers commented.
Most consumers considered the price of this shoe to be affordable.
The versatility of this running shoe received praise; people considered it an excellent option for various activities, even casual use.
It’s true to size, many people stated.
3 reasons not to buy
Some people stated that the laces were too short and that they quickly
A few purchasers stated that the fabric in the collar tended to cut into the ankles, causing discomfort and chafing.
According to some testers, the midsole was thin and flimsy when it comes to giving cushioning.
Bottom line
The Reebok Print Smooth Clip Ultraknit received mostly positive reviews from runners. They liked this neutral road shoe’s agreeable looks, its versatility, and its affordable price. They felt that it was able to function well across a variety of activities. Conversely, there were those who had complaints with some of its components, noting discrepancies with the lacing system, the collar construction, and the apparently thin cushioning unit."
Brooks PureGrit 5,,79.0,70.0,85.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Brooks PureGrit 8,"10 reasons to buy
An expert reviewer wrote that the Brooks PureGrit 5 is a good introductory shoe for beginners.
It was adequately lightweight, according to a number of consumers.
The lacing system gives a secure fit, commented several testers.
The flat midfoot strap gained praise because it was able to complement the upper fabrics and the tongue in terms of wrapping the foot snugly.
A tester commented that the upper cover system didn’t feel constricting.
Several runners stated that the abrasion-resistant material that’s seamlessly placed in the upper was efficient in staving off dirt and mud.
The underfoot experience was flexible and accommodating, according to a runner.
There were testers who commented that the midsole foam provides good cushioning despite the low stack height.
Some runners noted that the outsole delivered superb traction on moderate trails.
The protective features of this model gained the favor of many users and expert reviewers.
4 reasons not to buy
The toe box was a bit tight, according to some runners.
Several disappointed testers pointed out that, after only a month or so of use, the mesh material of the upper unit already separated from the sole unit.
An expert reviewer commented that it wasn’t very efficient on technical trails or on greater concentrations of mud.
After 100 miles of use, a reviewer noticed his toes poking through the upper fabric.
Bottom line
The PureGrit 5 is a Brooks trail running shoe that has gained a following because of its accommodating nature and its uncomplicated design. Many neutral runners and reviewers welcomed its low-profile construction, as well as its protective components. For them, it was able to deliver reliable service on the trails. But there were those who thought that it wasn’t very efficient against harder and more intense terrains. Some reported that its durability wasn’t as sound as initially perceived because some of its parts easily broke down on them."
Asics Gel Quantum 180 2,,85.0,,2099.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.3oz , Women: 10.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Quantum 180 4,"9 reasons to buy
Several testers noted that even though the Asics Gel Quantum 180 2 felt a little too snug at first, it was quickly able to accommodate their feet after they have taken it on a run.
A lot of those who wore it felt that it was adequately comfortable.
The colorful façade of this model—and its varied color schemes—won over the hearts of many consumers.
There were runners who took note of its lightweight nature and its soft underfoot feel; they adapted well to it.
The underfoot experience felt like ‘walking on clouds’, according to a number of commenters.
Runners generally appreciated the Gel® Cushioning System, because they determined that it was really able to attenuate impact shock during the landing phase.
The footpad of a tester didn’t feel sore when they used this shoe for their activities.
A number of reviewers reported that it was true to its sizing schemes.
There were purchasers who were able to use the Asics Gel Quantum 180 2 for work, and they stated that it kept them comfortable all day.
4 reasons not to buy
The upper unit showed some cracks after a few weeks of use, a runner commented.
The upper fabric wasn’t very breathable for a tester and they wrote that it made their feet feel like being in a sauna.
It felt narrow to a consumer; they reported some blistering because of it.
A runner lamented the lack of an arch support mechanism in this shoe.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Quantum 180 2 was loved by many neutral runners. They felt that it was able to provide them with quality service and performance on the roads. They lauded its comfortable design, its appealing color schemes, and its robust technologies. There were a few who complained about some of its components because they thought that these parts were inconsistent."
Under Armour Charged Europa 2,,86.0,,20.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10oz , Women: 10oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
A lot of people expressed that Under Armour Charged Europa 2 provides excellent support for overpronation.
This stability running shoe offers an adequate amount of cushioning, according to several buyers who have tried the shoe for long runs. 
The medial post and heel counter of the shoe can make the user’s foot placement more efficient while running, a couple of reviewers observed. 
Many purchasers appreciated this running shoe’s lightweight construction. 
The shoe is not only good for running but also for workouts and casual walks, commented by some impressed testers. 
The Under Armour Charged Europa 2 is better in terms of stability and support compared to its previous versions, as stated by various consumers. 
A runner mentioned that he used this running gear for over two months and it is still very good-looking. 
This Under Armour running shoe offers good traction on wet and dry surfaces, wrote a commenter. 
3 reasons not to buy
The upper material of Under Armour Charged Europa 2 doesn't breathe well, commented a buyer.
A runner stated that the line around the shoe’s heel could use a little more padding.
This shoe is only good for entry-level running, explained a commenter. 
Bottom line
Overall, the majority of the consumers were happy with the Under Armour Charged Europa 2’s excellent cushioning and lightweight structure. People welcomed its good looks and ability to support users with overpronation issues. Runners also lauded this stability shoe’s durability and gripping power. Only a few people complained about the upper being not so breathable and the midsole being not so soft. "
Asics Gel Kayano 25 Lite-Show,,89.0,,141.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.9oz , Women: 9.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 13mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
People stated that the design of the Asics Gel Kayano 25 Lite-Show was eye-catching.
Nighttime runners were happy with the inclusion of a reflective coating; they felt safe when adventuring at night.
The underfoot cushioning was considered to be comfortable.
The stability mechanisms were deemed efficient at correcting pronation concerns.
The traction given by the outsole was lauded; it was apparently dependable.
2 reasons not to buy
A few complaints were directed at the width profiles’ tendency to be tighter than usual.
The front of the shoe looked bulky, based on several comments.
Bottom line
The feedback towards the Asics Gel Kayano 25 Lite-Show was mostly positive. The underfoot experience was appreciated. But the primary selling point was the reflective coating on the upper. Such an inclusion was well-liked. These were some grievances about the inconsistent fit and the disproportionate look of the forefoot, but they didn’t diminish the overall quality of this road companion."
Puma Mega NRGY Turbo 2, Puma,86.0,,104.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Some people noted that the Puma Mega NRGY Turbo 2 was easy to put on.
The weight of this running shoe was deemed by many to be suitably light for all-day use.
The sides and back of the upper unit supported the foot properly, several consumers relayed.
Some purchasers have used this shoe for casual purposes, feeling that it was stylish and agreeable.
The cushioning given by the underfoot platform was comfortable, according to a handful of consumers.
1 reasons not to buy
Testers observed that the upper unit easily got wet.
Bottom line
The Puma Mega NRGY Turbo 2 was generally well-received by those who have tested it. People agreed on its lightweight build, the appealing design, the supportive upper unit, and the pleasant underfoot experience. There were complaints about the water-absorbing fabrics, but that’s a concern that can easily be avoided. Overall, this neutral companion for the asphalt was deemed worthy of its predecessor."
The North Face Ultra MT GTX,,86.0,94.0,8.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 9.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The Gore-Tex® membrane of The North Face Ultra MT GTX was lauded for being efficient at staving off water infiltration.
Several runners welcomed the proficient performance of the Vibram® Megagrip outsole.
Most testers stated that it was true to size.
Many users admired the shoe's durable design.
A few noticed that despite the waterproof upper, the shoe still delivers the right amount of breathability. 
2 reasons not to buy
Many consumers reported that the eyelets easily broke, resulting in serious disruption of the fit system.
Some reviewers stated that this running shoe didn’t have an appealing design.
Bottom line
The North Face Ultra MT GTX did not receive the welcoming fanfare that it wanted. Though there were runners who welcomed its efficient waterproof mechanics, its traction-capable outsole and its agreeable sizing scheme, a lot of people thought that its durability and quality were questionable. This neutral trail shoe broke down on them, causing them to move away from it."
Mizuno Wave Stream, Mizuno,86.0,,75.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 13.1oz , Women: 10.9oz,,,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Those who have tried the Mizuno Wave Stream agreed that it offered a comfortable in-shoe experience.
A few testers claimed that this model had a reasonable weight that didn’t feel cumbersome.
The cushioning platform was welcomed; people felt that it was responsive and agreeable to the underside of the foot.
The color schemes were well-liked by purchasers.
The traction-capacity of the outsole was deemed to be dependable.
1 reasons not to buy
Some users complained that the shoe wore down after only a few miles.
Bottom line
The Mizuno Wave Stream had received generally positive feedback from those who have tested it. This neutral shoe was considered to be a useful companion for the roads. The in-shoe experience and the sole unit gained a high regard for being effective elements. On the other hand, some people felt that the sizes were off; for them, it was a bit smaller than expected."
Puma Speed 300 Ignite 3, Puma,,77.0,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 6.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Mar 2018,,,
Puma Speed 600 S Ignite, Puma,86.0,,28.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A user mentioned that the Puma Speed 600 S Ignite was lighter than most stability footwear.
A tester was appreciative of the additional lace eyelet; he said that the height of the placement was just right, it kept the tongue unit in place.
One user appreciated the available colorways.
Some runners said that they felt supported while in the shoe.
Several users said that the footwear was of good value. Some even said that it was up to par with shoes that cost more.
Plenty of users used the shoe for different activities, from tempo runs to gym workouts. Most of them appreciated the versatility.
The upper was very comfortable based on a few reviews.
2 reasons not to buy
One user observed that the cushioning of the shoe was not as responsive as expected.
Another user expressed that the sizing felt a tad large.
Bottom line
The Puma Speed 600 S Ignite is an affordable running shoe that’s designed for stability. It is ideal for overpronating runners who are looking for footwear that’s comfortable, supportive and versatile. It can be used for numerous activities like tempo running, light workouts at the gym, or even just for going to the grocery store."
Asics Gel Pulse 7,,92.0,,601.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Pulse 12,"9 reasons to buy
A runner wrote that the Asics Gel Pulse 7 felt comfortable when used for running and walking.
The color schemes of this model were visually endearing to those who have purchased it.
The underfoot cushioning was lauded by many for its springy nature and its long-lasting performance.
Runners commended the Gel® Cushioning System, which aptly absorbed the impact shock when landing the foot on the ground.
Many consumers noted that the Gel Pulse 7 wasn’t very expensive.
According to some reviewers, the components used in this model didn’t succumb easily to breakdown, thus making it very formidable.
A lot of testers stated that the sizing was accurate and precise.
A couple of runners were able to use it for casual purposes and it worked well for them.
This running shoe prevented knee and muscle aches from occurring, some runners wrote.
3 reasons not to buy
The Asics Gel Pulse 7 was a bit narrow in the forefoot area; some runners felt that their toes clumped together uncomfortably when wearing it.
After only three months of use, the forefoot area of the upper unit came off on a runner, exposing their big toe.
The outsole unit wore off on a user after only five uses.
Bottom line
Many runners stated that the Asics Gel Pulse 7 was able to give quality service to them. They lauded the efficient underfoot cushioning system, especially the shock absorbing capability of the Gel®. Its colorful design also gained some fans. Contrarily, durability was an issue for the testers because a few of them saw some of its parts succumb to breakage. Still, quite a number of reviewers wrote that this was a neutral shoe worth taking to the roads."
Brooks Neuro, Brooks,84.0,76.0,141.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.3oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Many appreciated the lightweight construction of the Brooks Neuro.
This shoe is breathable and comfortable even on long-distant runs.
The cushioning of the shoe delivers a responsive ride as highlighted in some reviews.
Many applauded the impressive design of the Neuro.
The shoe delivers enough amount of forefoot flexibility.
4 reasons not to buy
It is an expensive shoe.
Some observed that the shoe wears out quickly than expected.
It has poor traction as mentioned in some reviews.
It has a bulky appearance.
Bottom line
The Brooks Neuro is designed for road running. It is equipped with the necessary technologies engineered to deliver comfort, durability, and performance. The shoe gathered mixed reviews from users and in general, there are still a few aspects that need to be improved. This neutral road running shoe is best for those with medium to high arches."
Inov-8 Roclite 280,,87.0,81.0,55.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 9.3oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Many were impressed by the durable and comfortable construction of the Roclite 280.
The outsole lug pattern allows runners to survive on the soft and hard trails.
It features an on-the-shoe gaiter pocket for a debris-free running experience.
The Roclite 280 has a synthetic mesh for lightweight and breathable coverage.
The Meta-Shank technology was applauded by many because gives underfoot impact protection and added flexibility in the forefoot area.
It features the 3-Arrow Shoc Zone technology that provides maximum underfoot protection for many types of terrain.
It has an affordable price.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners found the Roclite 280 too narrow in the forefoot area.
A few thought that the simplistic design wasn’t very appealing.
Bottom line
The Inov-8 Roclite 280 is a multi-terrain running shoe that offers increased cushioning, flexibility and impact protection. It is ideal for trail running, obstacle racing, and soft, muddy terrains. This Inov-8 running shoe is a good option for neutral runners who are looking for a lightweight and affordable trail partner."
Asics FujiTrabuco Lyte,,85.0,,8.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 7.2oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Numerous users mentioned that the Asics FujiTrabuco Lyte is fast and lightweight.
Many wearers have testified that this shoe is comfortable to wear. 
It offers outstanding traction on rocky and muddy surfaces, said some runners. 
This running shoe is responsive, according to a few commenters. 
A couple of reviewers noticed that it offers just the right amount of cushioning. 
The reflective features of the shoe gained praise from several consumers.
2 reasons not to buy
One buyer reported that the outsole started to wear off after only several miles of running. 
A purchaser complained that the FujiTrabuco Lyte is a little stiff.
Bottom line
The Asics FujiTrabuco Lyte is a lightweight trail running shoe that is ideal for neutral runners or those who supinate. It is designed to provide comfort and protection for fast off-road runs and trail races. This shoe is equipped with an aggressive outsole, responsive midsole, and breathable upper. All the features of this running partner are working together to help the runner achieve optimal performance.
 "
Puma Speed Sutamina,,91.0,92.0,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
A few wearers laud the comfort of the Puma Speed Sutamina. 
Many runners are surprised by the lightness of the running shoe. 
It amplifies speed, reviewed several testers. 
Some purchasers hail the shoe for its reliable security.
The road running shoe has a sturdy build, claimed several buyers. 
Multiple commenters commend the grippy traction of the neutral shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
According to some testers, the midsole of the shoe is too soft. 
There is minimal arch support, observed several users. 
It does not offer ample protection from impact, expressed a number of customers.
Bottom line
Loaded with all the features expected from a lightweight running shoe, the Speed Sutamina from Puma targets speed and comfort. With the design principle behind the running shoe, athletes are equipped with ultimate support and ground adherence. Offered at an affordable price, the road running shoe is perfect for runners are tight on budget but want a platform packed with innovative components."
Salming Miles Lite,,83.0,87.0,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 7.2oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Most of the reviewers commented that the Salming Miles Lite is comfortable.
Several testers said that the running footwear is breathable.
One of the users mentioned that it has a wide toe box.
The shoe is well-cushioned, based on the reviews.
It is durable, noted by a few users.
The running shoe is best used for racing and training activities.
One of the buyers said that the running footwear eliminated his knee soreness.
2 reasons not to buy
Some wearers observed that the shoe is best suited for road running and not for trail running.
A few users thought the outsole is heavy.
Bottom line
The Salming Miles Lite is a lightweight running shoe that made most of the buyers happy and satisfied. With the positive feedback made by these users, in general, the launching of this shoe is considered to be a successful release for Salming. With the utilization of its design, technologies, and features, others find this as an excellent option for those who are looking for a comfortable, well-cushioned, and breathable running footwear. "
Asics Gel Cumulus 20 LE,,89.0,,70.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Most of the reviewers said that the Asics Gel Cumulus 20 LE is comfortable.
A significant number of purchasers commented that the shoe is stylish.
According to several testers, the running shoe offers excellent arch support.
A lot of buyers loved its lightweight structure.
It is durable, according to those who have tried it.
A consumer admired its excellent cushioning.
Several purchasers appreciated its beautiful colorways.
1 reasons not to buy
Some of the testers commented that the shoe has a narrow width.
Bottom line
The Gel Cumulus series still maintained its spot as a runner favorite. Overall, the Cumulus 20 LE version gained positive feedback for its excellent design and construction. Although some users complained of its narrow width, others still recommend the Asics Gel Cumulus 20 LE because of its fantastic structure, performance, and reliability on the roads."
Hoka One One Challenger 3 ATR,,85.0,86.0,221.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,, Hoka One One Challenger 5 ATR,"11 reasons to buy
Many runners found the shoe to be comfortable and breathable.
A significant number of runners mentioned that they liked the cushioning of the Hoka One One Challenger 3 ATR.
It provides a decent grip on varied terrains, noted in some reviews.
A couple of runners noticed that the shoe provides more stability than the previous model.
According to some runners, they liked the improved and more secure fit of the shoe.
The shoe has a roomy toe box.
A lightweight shoe.
There were those with knee and back issues that really welcomed the cushioning of this shoe.
The upper dries quickly, based on the assessment of some runners.
A handful of runners reported that no break in period is required for this shoe.
It works as a road/trail hybrid for several runners.
4 reasons not to buy
Slightly expensive.
The shoe is not durable, as mentioned by a few runners.
Although Hoka added more room in the toe box, there was still a handful who felt that it still lacked the usual space required for natural splay and for swelling during ultramarathons.
It runs a little too narrow for some runners.
Bottom line
Designed for both road and off-road running, the Hoka One One Challenger 3 ATR delivers a great combination of responsive cushioning, reliable grip, and impressive comfort. The new iteration comes with minimal updates but continues to deliver impressive features an all-terrain running shoe should have."
Mizuno Wave Daichi 2,,80.0,79.0,44.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Mizuno Wave Daichi 4,"8 reasons to buy
Runners have appreciated the lightweight nature of the Wave Daichi 2.
The shoe offered great ground feel, observed most testers.
Consumers have lauded the shoe for its durable & high-quality materials.
A couple of running enthusiasts have commended the springiness of the mid-sole unit’s wave plate.
The Mizuno Wave Daichi 2 has also been found to do well on roads, based on the feedback of some reviewers.
A number of consumers welcomed the breathable and quick-drying upper unit.
Many found Daichi 2 to be a comfortable shoe.
A runner claimed to be impressed by the decent cushioning of this running shoe.
4 reasons not to buy
A lot of runners have complained about its apparently poor traction capability.
A few testers observed that the shoe felt stiff in the midsole area, contributing to noticeable inflexibility.
Some found the shoe to be bulky & rigid, specifically in the heel section.
A number of reviewers noticed that the small lugs tended to slip easily on wet surfaces and attract mud.
Bottom line
The Mizuno Wave Daichi 2 has gained appreciation for its comfortable, lightweight ride & its ability to do well on both trails and roads. However, a number of runners felt that the Daichi 2 fell short in term of some of its features. They have noted the inefficient traction & its inability to handle rough terrains. But the general feedback was that this neutral shoe is still able to work well on simple off-road terrains."
Skechers GOrun Focus - Athos,,83.0,,9.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The aesthetics of the Skechers GOrun Focus - Athos have received positive feedback from many runners.
Some users have stated that the cushioning system is responsive.
This Skechers running shoe is lauded for its versatility.
Several consumers consider the price of this product to be affordable.
Breathability is a trait that can be appreciated from the upper unit of this running shoe, according to a handful of testers.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people have noted that it was difficult to slip the foot into the shoe.
A couple of testers have observed the upper unit quickly separating from the midsole.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of people towards the Skechers GOrun Focus - Athos has been positive. The feedback mostly covers the breathable upper unit, the reactive midsole cushioning system, and the versatile looks. The shoe successfully achieves the balance between leisure and performance wear with its efficient features and pleasant design.
Fans of road running shoes for neutral foot pronation can welcome the GOrun Focus - Athos to their rotation."
Nike Dual Fusion X,,85.0,,70.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.3oz , Women: 9.3oz, Men: 11mm , Women: 11mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The upper unit of this running shoe is made up of a mesh material, along with some leather and textile inclusions.
Some reviewers noted that the flexibility of the upper unit makes it great for many activities.
The moderate weight of this shoe appealed to many testers.
The cushioning system does its purpose well in providing impact support when landing the foot on the ground.
The Dual Fusion X is not an expensive running shoe.
The design appeals to those who want to have a great-looking option for their daily use.
2 reasons not to buy
Some felt that the cushioning have benefited from the addition of foam that conforms to the shape of the foot.
A few thought that the stability mechanics need improvement.
Bottom line
Most users admire the overall performance of the Nike Dual Fusion X on the road. Despite being an affordable pair, the shoe offers great cushioning, superb durability and responsive performance that will make daily training more agreeable. It is a comfortable running shoe that is ideal for casual runners and advanced athletes. "
Asics Gel Hyper Speed 7,,86.0,89.0,42.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6oz , Women: 4.6oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
The Hyper Speed 7 is lighter than past versions of this line.
Asics designed the Gel Hyper Speed 7 with a firmer midsole for a more dynamic platform.
A slightly thicker and wider outsole is a new hit in this shoe as it helps in shock attenuation and keeps the midsole from being too hard.
Several runners made the observation about how well the newly-improved Guidance Line Technology made their runs a bit more efficient.
The Asics Hyper Speed 7 was used in competition by elite runners.
It has decent cushioning for long distance runs, according to a few testers
New drainage holes are included in the sole to shed water off.
This shoe is very affordable.
3 reasons not to buy
A spacious toe box dilutes the feel of going for speed, based on the remarks of a handful of runners.
Limited to runners who have experienced running in a shoe with less support and protection than most traditional shoes offer.
A few runners were not happy with the new grooves as they attract small rocks.
Bottom line
The Hyper Speed series is one of Asics’s most popular and sought-after lines of shoes. Based on the general observation of people, the 7th edition lives up to the high standards set by its predecessors. As a shoe with minimalist features, this is ideal for those with enough arch support of their own and who can stand out without too much cushioning or support from their running shoes."
Saucony Peregrine 7 ICE+,,76.0,77.0,44.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.4oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Saucony Peregrine 8 Ice+,"9 reasons to buy
The upper material supplied sufficient warmth while running on wintry conditions, many runners observed.
One reviewer found that the outsole provided immediate traction.
The midsole brought adequate cushioning, wrote a commenter.
The grip of the outsole has significantly improved compared to other Saucony running shoes, a user remarked.
The shoe excelled on snow-covered trails and icy roads, according to an impressed runner.
A couple of reviewers thought the Peregrine 7 ICE+ was incredibly lightweight, considering it was a technology-packed trail shoe.
One user said that the chunky shoelaces made it easier to tie them even with gloves on.
The shoe kept the foot dry even while running on wet and icy surfaces, a customer mentioned.
Some wearers thought the shoe was comfortable even right out of the box.
1 reasons not to buy
A wearer observed that the Arctic Grip compound did not cover the entire outsole, and there was a bit of slipping during toe-off.
Bottom line
Based on the amount of positive feedback it received, the Saucony Peregrine 7 ICE+ was able to amaze most its users. Many comments were about the effectiveness of its various technologies, while some commended the comfort and protection it gave. In summary, the majority of consumers found that the shoe delivered on its promises."
The North Face Ultra Endurance II,,79.0,76.0,8.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.5oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
One wearer claimed that the Ultra Endurance II fitted like a glove.
A customer said the shoe looked more durable than other running shoes from the brand.
Several users found the outsole traction to be efficient.
The midsole was very responsive, some runners stated.
The Snake Plate™ did an excellent job of preventing rocks from causing pain, a commenter wrote.
The Ultra Endurance II was stylish enough for everyday use, according to a reviewer. Other runners also said that the shoe gave a premium feel despite the simple colorways.
The CRADLE™ feature was useful in fastening the heel comfortably, a runner observed.
6 reasons not to buy
A user had thought the tongue had very thin padding.
The rounded shoelaces were uneasy to tie, and they pushed against the foot uncomfortably when tightened, a reviewer mentioned.
One reviewer disliked that the sizing was inaccurate.
The toe box was too narrow, a wearer experienced.
The Ultra Endurance II did not have sufficient arch support, according to a disappointed user.
The cushioning was quite stiff, which made running on hard trails a challenge, a runner noted.
Bottom line
The second iteration of The North Face Ultra Endurance proved to be a reliable update, as numerous runners attested to its superb performance and functional technologies. Despite some criticisms regarding structural and design elements, many users were still happy with their purchase and had found themselves wearing the shoe frequently."
Salming Greyhound,,82.0,85.0,9.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The underfoot cushioning system of the Salming Greyhound is praised for returning energy to the foot with each step.
Some believe that the midsole unit has the capacity to relax the foot and keep it motivated, even during extended runs.
The upper unit is welcomed by those who desire a supportive wrap.
Some testers have noted that this Salming running shoe has an outsole that is traction-ready and protective.
A few runners have deemed this running shoe dutifully supportive of many weight profiles.
The visual aspect of the Salming Greyhound is lauded by those who have tested it.
3 reasons not to buy
A handful of people claim that the fabrics of the Salming Greyhound’s upper unit are a bit too stiff to fully realize the efficacy of the step.
The lateral sides of the shoe-opening have a tendency to bend outward and lose their hold of the ankles.
The presence of rubber in the outsole is considered a catalyst for this shoe’s overall weight; some runners feel that a redesigned external pad could have resulted in a lighter product.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of people towards the Salming Greyhound has been positive. The midsole unit has become the highlighted piece, with some believing that it is supportive and comfortable. Also, the upper and outsole seem to stay true to their purposes. On the other hand, the stiffness of the silhouette and the weightiness of the outsole are criticized.
Fans of road running shoes that are intended for the neutral pronation of the foot are the target market of the Salming Greyhound."
Scott Supertrac Ultra RC,,85.0,82.0,16.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 12oz , Women: 10.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
People who have tried the Scott Supertrac Ultra RC stated that they liked the general quality of the materials.
Consumers felt that the durability of this running shoe was dependable.
The upper unit was lauded for being able to provide breathable coverage and water-repellence.
The outsole’s grip capacity on mud was considered to be highly efficient; people liked that their movements on soft soil were confident.
Some reviewers claimed that the in-shoe feel of the Supertrac Ultra RC was comfortable from the get-go. They didn’t need a break-in period.
1 reasons not to buy
The outsole wasn’t as efficient on wet rocks as some testers experienced slippage.
Bottom line
The Scott Supertrac Ultra RC was well-liked by those who have tried this. This trail running companion was apparently great for regular trail adventures and extreme conditions. The reliability of its materials stood out as it performed well on hard and soft terrains. The in-shoe experience was also given praise as it was deemed highly comfortable. On the other hand, a handful of people noticed some slippage when traversing areas that had wet rocks."
Mizuno Wave Equate 3,,,,,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,
Salomon X-Wind Pro,,85.0,85.0,81.0,,, Trail, Stability, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 9.6oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,,,"4 reasons to buy
Many loved the lacing system of the Salomon X-Wind Pro.
It features a multi-terrain grip, ideal for road-to-trail running.
It has protective toe cap for added toe protection specially when running on rough surfaces.
The upper of the X-Wind Pro is very breathable and stretchable based on some reviews.
4 reasons not to buy
This shoe is slightly expensive.
The Salomon X-Wind Pro is too narrow and tight for some runners.
Others felt that this shoe is too firm and hard for long runs.
Based on some reviews, this shoe is a bit heavy.
Bottom line
The Salomon X-Wind Pro is a versatile running shoe. It has the necessary grip, cushioning and support needed for road and trail running. This shoe will not disappoint in terms of comfort and protection."
Adidas Alphabounce Instinct Clima,,85.0,,5.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,, Jul 2018,,,"5 reasons to buy
People are happy with the aesthetics of the Adidas Alphabounce Instinct Clima, stating that it can be used as a partner for casual strolls.
The traction capacity of the outsole unit is welcomed by those who have tested this road running shoe.
‘Breathable’ is a term that people have used to describe the open-weave construction of the upper unit.
The cushioning system is deemed responsive and comfortable to the foot.
According to some runners, the inner sleeve is smooth against the skin of the foot.
2 reasons not to buy
Several consumers believe that the forefoot section of the Alphabounce Instinct Clima is a bit too loose.
A couple of testers have noted that this shoe is a bit heavy for extended running sessions.
Bottom line
The Alphabounce Instinct Clima aims to become a versatile partner for fans of Adidas running shoes. This product features a sneaker-like look that allows it to be used for any activity. It still has performance-ready accoutrements like the responsive midsole and the tire-grade rubber outsole to remain reliable during speed-training sessions. Neutral runners are the target market of the Adidas Alphabounce Instinct Clima."
Adidas Alphabounce+ Run Parley,,85.0,,7.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral,,,,,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Quite a few runners are appreciative of the Adidas Alphabounce+ Run Parley's comfort. 
Several wearers claim that the running shoe is very supportive. 
It has a secure fit, observed various purchasers. 
Numerous reviewers have stated that the neutral running shoe has good sweat control.
Many laud the flexibility of the road running platform. 
The running shoe allows for convenient foot entry, expressed multiple commenters. 
Some buyers hail the shoe for its environmentally-friendly composition. 
A few athletes like the running platform, stating that is has a good value for money.
3 reasons not to buy
The neutral road shoe has firm cushioning, several users noted. 
Some of the customers have found the running shoe too tight. 
It is not light enough for multiple running activities, remarked a few critics.
Bottom line
Touted as a good everyday running shoe, the Alphabounce+ Run Parley from Adidas is all about support and structural reinforcement. Its design is centered on maximizing the performance of the runner, may it be in training or competitions. Made with Parley Ocean Plastic yarn, the neutral running platform is perfect for athletes who want to positively contribute to the environment."
Salomon Sense Escape GTX,,,,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,
Mizuno Wave Mujin 5 GTX,,,,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 13.2oz , Women: 11.3oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,
Scott Kinabalu Power,,,,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 11.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,
Icebug Acceleritas 6 RB9X, Icebug,,85.0,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 7.1oz , Women: 7.1oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,
Puma Speed 600 Ignite 3, Puma,,,,$125,$92 (save 26%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,
Salomon S-Lab Wings 8,,85.0,85.0,17.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Runners were generally impressed with the performance of the Salomon S-Lab Wings 8.
This running shoe felt suitably lightweight, according to several testers.
The design gained some fans; they wrote that the façade of this product was visually appealing.
Many consumers agreed that it was true-to-size.
The rubber compound used in the outsole unit received recognition from runners who wrote that it was durable and efficient.
Those who have tried this shoe lauded its general durability.
A reviewer stated that the Endofit system in the upper engulfed the foot perfectly and comfortably.
The upper unit was able to withstand light splashes of water, commented a tester.
3 reasons not to buy
The upper of the Salomon S-Lab Wings 8 wasn’t as breathable as advertised, a runner complained.
The general feedback about this shoe’s price was that it was expensive.
The underfoot platform felt a bit too firm, commented a consumer.
Bottom line
Many runners were able to enjoy the Salomon S-Lab Wings 8. For them, it performed well on various trail surfaces. They also noted that this neutral shoe looked appealing. Its contemporary design managed to win the hearts of consumers, though some of them felt that its price left a lot to be desired. A few also had some concerns with some of its components."
Merrell Avalaunch Tough Mudder,,85.0,96.0,7.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
A few purchasers mentioned that they liked the comfortable feel of the Merrell Avalaunch Tough Mudder.
Some runners admired the wide toe-box of the shoe; it apparently gave the toes enough room to wiggle.
A couple of users lauded the lightweight construction of the shoe.
According to a few wearers, the shoe provided a good amount of traction while running on the trail.
Several runners noted the durable underfoot protection of the shoe that kept their feet well-protected against sharp rocks.
The shoe is reasonably-priced, according to a number of reviews.
1 reasons not to buy
The shoe is available in limited color options and it disappointed a few runners.
Bottom line
The Merrell Avalaunch Tough Mudder is packed with technologies necessary for trail running. The majority of the users were highly-appreciative of the shoe’s durability, traction, and overall design. This lightweight trail running shoe is best for neutral runners."
Adidas GSG9 Trail,,85.0,,78.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.4oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The Adidas GSG9 Trail remained true to size, a majority of the runners said.
The aggressive grip of the outsole prevented slippage, most of the users noted.
Many customers reported about the tough and the supportive insole of the shoe, which kept their feet protected from the uneven terrains.
Some purchasers felt like ‘stepping on clouds’ due to its lightweight nature.
A handful of buyers liked the style and the color schemes available for this shoe.
Another tester considered it suitable for active hiking and jogging on uneven ground.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners complained about the tightness of the internal structure of this shoe.
A few customers doubted that the shoe is not durable enough to last long.
Bottom line
The Adidas GSG9 Trail is a comfortable, firm trail running shoe that provides a strong grip on uneven surfaces. It is a lightweight, neutral running shoe that provides protection to the runner while tackling the great outdoors. It comes in attractive color schemes and runners generally appreciated them."
Asics Gel Sonoma 3 GTX,,85.0,,6.0,,," Trail, Mud", Neutral, Men: 12.2oz , Women: 12.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The Gel® technology in the midsole unit of the Asics Gel Sonoma 3 GTX is lauded for being able to responsibly mitigate impact shock.
Several people have noted that arch support is an element that can readily be appreciated from this trail running shoe.
The Gore-Tex® waterproof layer responsibly protects against water infiltration, based on a lot of user comments.
Surfaces are easy to traverse because the outsole is traction-ready, according to consumers.
Some runners have stated that this Asics running shoe still has a lightweight construction that permits all-day wear.
2 reasons not to buy
Several people have mentioned that the waterproof lining of this product has made the in-shoe environment a bit restrictive.
Some layers on the upper unit have apparently scratched against the skin of the foot.
Bottom line
People are generally happy with the Asics Gel Sonoma 3 GTX and what it has to offer. This product is apparently a reliable choice for running under wet conditions. The comfortable midsole and grippy outsole are also highlighted. On the other hand, the restrictive in-shoe feel and the irritating layers of the upper are criticized.
Fans of trail running shoes that have waterproof capacities can enjoy the Sonoma 3 GTX."
Saucony Omni 15,,90.0,82.0,611.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Many runners commented that the Saucony Omni 15 felt comfortable right out of the box.
This running shoe looked visually endearing, according to those who have tried it.
Several testers wrote that the collar and heel sections didn’t rub irritatingly against the skin and that they kept the foot in place.
The upper fabrics received praise because they allowed air to ventilate the interior foot-chamber.
Some commented that the toe box was roomy enough to accommodate natural toe splaying.
The cushioning system was responsive and long-lasting, according to a number of reviewers.
A lot of runners stated that stability mechanisms that are present in this model actually helped in balancing the gait.
The traction capability of the outsole gained some recognition from those who felt that it was efficient.
6 reasons not to buy
A few runners felt that the Saucony Omni 15 was a bit heavy for their feet.
According to a tester, the outsole unit’s rubber material has started to come off after only 4 weeks of use.
It felt a bit wide for a purchaser.
The top section of the upper unit—the general area of the tongue and lacing system—tended to rub uncomfortably against the skin of a tester, preventing sockless running.
A consumer noted that the collar and rear section of the Omni 15 wasn’t able to keep his foot in the shoe because it kept slipping off.
A reviewer stated that it wasn’t able to support his collapsed arch as well as the other stability shoes in the Saucony stable.
Bottom line
Many of those with overpronated foot motion actually praised the Saucony Omni 15 and its components. They felt that it was truly able to support their feet and provide them with stability whenever they go for a run or do their daily tasks. Generally, they felt that this road shoe was efficient, reliable and uncompromising. On the other hand, it wasn’t able to deliver on the expectations of some consumers. But these complaints were overshadowed by positive feedback."
Under Armour Micro G Assert 6,,91.0,84.0,1678.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Under Armour Micro G Assert 7,"6 reasons to buy
The upper unit of the Under Armour Micro G Assert 6 makes use of a lightweight mesh material that’s breathable and comfortable.
A light and supportive foam lines the interior of this shoe, cushioning the dimensions of the foot.
Leather overlays keep the foot locked in place and enhances the look of the upper.
Runners appreciated the inclusion of an EVA sock liner, which added more cushioning immediately to the underfoot area.
The testers noted that the Micro G® foam mid-sole made their strides more comfortable and their liftoffs more explosive.
Non-marking rubber on the outsole area provides traction and protection without adding unnecessary weight to the shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
Some wearers were disappointed that the shoe cannot be used with custom orthotics.
Some parts of the upper have faded and peeled apart quickly, as mentioned by a few buyers.
Bottom line
The 6th version of the Micro G Assert from Under Armour makes running more comfortable and less taxing to the wearer. This neutral shoe is able to handle many types of activities, even exercises in the gym. Its appealing look allows it to be worn not only as a sports shoe but as part of casual attire, as well."
Newton Distance 6,,91.0,84.0,27.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.9oz , Women: 6.9oz, Men: 2mm , Women: 2mm,,, Newton Distance 9,"9 reasons to buy
The majority ‘loved’ the optimal amount of cushioning of the Newton Distance 6.
Most runners appreciated the lightweight nature of the shoe.
Most users seemed happy with the sizing schemes.
The wearers highlighted the excellent responsiveness of the midsole, which enabled them to do extra miles without getting tired.
The users lauded the snug fit of the shoe.
A runner was very happy with the effectiveness of the shoe on slopes by providing good traction and preventing in-shoe wobbliness.
A wearer mentioned how he was very much satisfied with the extra room in the toe-box since it prevented the incidence of rubbing.
A tester praised these shoes by calling them ‘a fast performer’.
A purchaser thought that the colors of the Newton Distance 6 were simply ‘awesome’.
1 reasons not to buy
A customer decided to return the pair since he found these shoes a bit too tight.
Bottom line
The Newton Distance 6 has become the favorite of many within the road running community owing to its optimal cushioning, impressively lightweight and intelligently snug fit. With its sleek stylish looks and eye-catching color combinations, the shoe satisfies the fashion urge of the fashionistas as well."
Under Armour SpeedForm Velociti,,78.0,,136.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 6.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Many runners highly appreciated the light weight of the shoe.
Most wearers appreciated the minimalist design because it encouraged natural movements of the foot during running.
The customers thought the pair was optimally comfortable.
The runners mentioned how incredibly responsive the shoe’s midsole was; one such individual felt the shoe bouncing back and propelling him forward as he sprinted.
The purchasers liked the lace-up closure of the Under Armour Velociti since it secured their feet firmly, thereby ensuring a snug fit.
A few fashion-lovers admired the overall design of the shoe.
A runner found the ‘recording function’ of the shoe very convenient since it kept track of her miles run in a day.
1 reasons not to buy
A few runners thought that this running shoe did not provide adequate support for longer distances.
Bottom line
The Under Armour Velociti is a neutral running shoe based on a minimalist design that enables the natural gait of runners. It’s a solid option for those who want to make quick and smooth transitions through the gait cycle. The shoe’s upper, being nicely flexible, adapts very well to the changing movements and wraps itself securely around the runner’s foot."
Reebok Lite 2.0, Reebok,85.0,,5.0,$55,$35 (save 36%)," Road, Treadmill", Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
People generally like the aesthetics of the Reebok Lite 2.0, stating that they can enjoy many activities because of the fresh looks.
The underfoot experience given by this neutral running shoe is responsive and comfortable.
Runners are happy with the lightweight construction of this product, emphasizing its capacity to permit all-day wear.
Based on a handful of reviews, the upper unit is breathable enough to prevent a stifling in-shoe hug.
The price of this product is welcomed; consumers think that it is very affordable.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people lamented the absence of rubber in the outsole, stating that they have experienced some slipping while going with their runs.
The ground contact foam used for the external pad develops signs of wear quickly, according to some users.
Bottom line
The overall feedback towards the Reebok Lite 2.0 has been positive. This road running shoe is welcomed because of its affordable price tag, its lightweight configuration, and its versatile design. On the other hand, the flimsy durability of the outsole and the occasional slipping that comes with the absence of rubber are criticized.
The Reebok Lite 2.0 is for those who like efficient but cheap running shoes."
Puma Ignite Limitless 2, Puma,,,,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,
Merrell Trail Glove 4 Knit Wool,,77.0,,10.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 7.9oz , Women: 6.3oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Several consumers noted that the upper was able to wrap the form of the foot comfortably.
The general durability of the materials was considered to be top-notch.
The sizing scheme apparently followed the preferences of many consumers.
The one-pull lacing system was easy to manipulate, several people noted.
A couple of runners stated that the sole of the Merrell Trail Glove 4 Knit Wool comfortably cupped the outline of the foot.
2 reasons not to buy
A tester noticed that the back of the shoe wasn’t able to entirely keep the foot in place; she experienced accidental shoe removals.
One person noted that the pair he chose was half-a-size larger than the usual.
Bottom line
The Merrell Trail Glove 4 Knit Wool was able to receive positive feedback from most of those who have tried it. The form-fitting upper, the sturdiness of the components, and the easy-to-secure lacing system were some aspects that were highlighted. On the other hand, some neutral runners felt a discrepancy in the in-shoe security, as well as the sizing scheme."
Salomon S-Lab Wings 8 SG,,77.0,,23.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 10.1oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Comfort is considered by many as really good in the Soft Ground version of the S-Lab Wings 8.
Most of the reviewers raved about the shoe’s traction, particularly on wet ground or slick surfaces.
A plush inner sleeve adds support and provides excellent next-to-skin feel.
A handful loved the way it nimbly moves on technical trail despite the well-cushioned midsole and rather thick outsole.
The outsole durability of the S-Lab Wings 8 SG is great, according to some runners.
The anti-debris mesh keeps unwanted objects out of the shoe.
A few noted that it is somewhat light without compromising stability and support.
3 reasons not to buy
The shoe is expensive.
A few runners noted that breathability is not quite good compared to other Salomon trail shoes.
Limited color options.
Bottom line
The S-Lab Wings 8 SG is Salomon’s answer to technical and soft surfaces. It has got more aggressive treads than the regular model so it can hold onto loose or slick surfaces with ease. The shoe delivers superb support, durability, and comfort. While this may be one of the more expensive options out there, runners should have their money’s worth with the kind of long-lasting performance this Salomon trail shoe offers."
Hoka One One Speed Instinct,,85.0,86.0,80.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.4oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 3mm , Women: 3mm,,, Hoka One One Speed Instinct 2,"6 reasons to buy
Some runners mentioned that the shoe was comfortable enough for trail running.
A small number of runners mentioned that the Hoka One One Speed Instinct has good traction even on technical terrain and wet conditions.
The firmer forefoot cushioning and softer cushioning in the heel area gained positive feedback from users since it promotes a more responsive ride.
Many testers mentioned that the shoe feels light and fast.
Available in different color options.
True to size.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners note that the upper is not breathable especially when running on hot temperature.
Many runners noticed that the upper web material wore out quickly after several uses.
According to some user reviews, the shoe too tight and narrow for their liking.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Speed Instinct is a lightweight shoe designed for trail running. It provides runners a good combination of comfort, cushioning and traction. Those who tried the shoe found satisfaction in its performance. The Speed Instinct is best for long and higher tempo runs."
Reebok Harmony Road 2,,87.0,89.0,48.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Reebok Harmony Road 3.5,"7 reasons to buy
Most purchasers said that the Reebok Harmony Road 2 is very durable.
The heel drop of the shoe is good for runners with Achilles issue, said some users.
A couple of wearers mentioned that the 2nd version of the Harmony Road is very responsive.
Some wearers highlighted the shoe’s roomy toe box.
The shoe runs true-to-size, based on some user reviews.
Many runners admired the good-looking design of the Harmony Road 2.
Some buyers agreed that the shoe has a great fit.
2 reasons not to buy
One disappointed user mentioned that he had severe pain in the balls of his feet after running a few miles.
A user said he experienced heel slippage no matter how he laced-up the shoe.
Bottom line
The Harmony Road 2 has a higher heel-drop compared to its predecessor. Designed for road running, the shoe offers light and responsive cushioning. Although a few have pointed out some flaws, the Harmony Road 2 is indeed a remarkable release by Reebok that runners found to be a valuable upgrade."
Topo Athletic Hydroventure,,90.0,82.0,51.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 3mm , Women: 3mm,,, Topo Athletic Hydroventure 2,"7 reasons to buy
Some users were happy with the wide toe box that accommodated the forefoot comfortably.
The incredible traction enabled a running experience that’s mostly free of any slipping, wrote one user.
One reviewer said the Topo Athletic Hydroventure was unbelievably lightweight.
Another user mentioned the shoe kept his foot warm and dry throughout the run and under any condition.
The shoe presented underfoot steadiness and firmness on rough ground, one runner noted.
Many users liked that the shoe was comfortable.
A majority of runners felt that the shoe did well in keeping the foot dry while running under wet conditions.
2 reasons not to buy
The outsole did a poor job of dealing with the muddy terrain as the shoe kept slipping while running, said one reviewer.
There were a few reports stating that the Hydroventure was not as responsive as other trail-running shoes from Topo Athletic.
Bottom line
With a stack height, ride, and responsiveness that are all created similarly with other shoes from Topo Athletic, the Hydroventure aims to be a mid-cushioning running shoe that provides ample underfoot protection while introducing an all-new feature: waterproofing. As a shoe claiming to have waterproof characteristics, the Hydroventure delivers well while accomplishing more.
 "
Nike Dual Fusion Run 3,,87.0,80.0,759.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 9.3oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
A number of reviewers noted that the Nike Dual Fusion Run 3 looked visually appealing.
A runner commented that the inner sleeve of this shoe felt snug, but it didn’t make the upper unit too tight.
The toe box didn’t feel constricted, according to a reviewer; they didn’t sense their toes clump together uncomfortably when wearing this shoe.
Most reviewers appreciated the so-sew overlay system, which offered structural support without adding weight.
A tester wrote that it was versatile enough to function well in a variety of activities, such as running, training and walking.
The underfoot cushioning system received praise from runners who felt that it was comfortable and long-lasting.
A reviewer wrote that the liberal use of rubber in the outsole unit meant that it made the Dual Fusion Run 3 more durable.
This running shoe was affordable, noted some reviewers.
3 reasons not to buy
Some users felt that it wasn’t very flexible and that it hindered their capability to move more naturally.
According to a reviewer, the collar area was a bit high and it tended to rub against the Achilles region.
It was a bit narrow, according to a number of runners.
Bottom line
The Nike Dual Fusion Run 3 was appreciated by neutral runners. It was able to provide comfort and security to many of them. For them, its performance on the roads was generally agreeable. But there were those who didn’t appreciate the service of this version. The negative comments were mostly about its width, which didn’t accommodate the feet of runners as well as they would’ve liked."
Merrell Reverb,,77.0,,8.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 6oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The Merrell Reverb is comfortable to wear, according to many users. 
A lot of runners appreciated its lightweight construction. 
Several commenters mentioned that the shoe offers a perfect fit.
The shoe is comfortable even without socks, said a buyer. 
This running partner offers reliable support, claimed a wearer.  
It is also perfect for gym sessions and casual walks, based on some reviews. 
Many users like the stylish design of this running companion. 
2 reasons not to buy
The cushioning is not soft enough, according to some reviewers.  
A user complained that the outsole is protruding and putting pressure on the bone while running. 
Bottom line
The Merrell Reverb was welcomed by a lot of consumers because of the comfort that it provides. Many consumers use this shoe for light trail and road running, gym sessions, and even casual walks. Some runners are not satisfied with its minimal cushioning. Still, the majority of the users have appreciated the overall performance of the Merrell Reverb."
Inov-8 Mudclaw 265,,84.0,73.0,69.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.3oz , Women: 9.3oz, Men: 3mm , Women: 3mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The Synthetic Mesh upper is lightweight and soft to the skin.
The inclusion of a toe cap enables some protection for the forefoot from debris.
Many runners appreciated the Injected EVA mid-sole with a 3mm foot bed for added cushioning and comfort.
The Met-Cradle synthetic webbed forefoot secures the foot and keeps it in the shoe based on a handful of comments.
A sticky rubber outsole makes the Mudclaw 265 more capable when it comes to gripping the various surfaces of the trail as noted by a few runners.
It’s one of the more lightweight Mudclaw models on the market.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners thought that the forefoot area was still a bit wide despite the forefoot securing mechanics.
The testers noticed that it was one size smaller than the usual.
It has an expensive price.
Bottom line
The Mudclaw 265 from Inov-8 is a reliable trail shoe for everyone who wants responsiveness and durable performance when tackling the off-road paths. It’s a neutral shoe that offers mild securing mechanics and moderate amounts of cushioning for a better ride."
Puma Hybrid Runner Unrest, Puma,,,,,, Road, Neutral,,,,, Aug 2018," Narrow, Normal | Normal",,
New Balance Fresh Foam Zante v3 Breathe, New Balance,84.0,,228.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Many runners appreciated the lightweight disposition of the New Balance Fresh Foam Zante v3 Breathe.
The breathable nature of the upper unit gained positive feedback from those who have tested it.
Some consumers stated that this running shoe was versatile enough to function well in various activities such as casual walks and workout sessions.
The price was considered to be affordable by most purchasers.
People liked the variety of color options.
‘Comfortable’ was a term that was frequently used to describe this running shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
Some wearers noted that the toe box is too tight.
One user remarked that the shoe began to fall apart after only 3 uses.
Bottom line
The New Balance Fresh Foam Zante v3 Breathe was able to capture the attention of many runners. It was appreciated for being lightweight, comfortable and versatile. Even the price and color options were something to enjoy. Suffice it to say that this neutral running shoe has been considered as a reliable companion for the roads."
Puma Ignite EvoKNIT 2, Puma,,,,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,
Asics Gel Cumulus 18 GTX,,84.0,,518.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.1oz , Women: 10.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Cumulus 21 GTX,"8 reasons to buy
The waterproof capability of the Asics Gel Cumulus 18 GTX worked well, according to many of those who have tried it.
Some consumers were able to use this shoe for work and for casual activities, and they said that it remained efficient.
Though the sole unit felt a bit firm for some runners, the cushioning remained robust and agreeable.
The visual style of this shoe impressed the testers.
The different color schemes were enjoyed by its purchasers.
This shoe felt noticeably comfortable as it wrapped around the foot, commented several reviewers.
A runner recommended this shoe for extended running sessions because they didn’t feel any discomfort while doing so.
Based on user feedback, the grip of the outsole was reliable.
4 reasons not to buy
A runner reported that the fabric over the toe area touched the top of the toes uncomfortably, causing some distractions.
The whole of this shoe felt too tight, noted a consumer.
This shoe felt heavy, according to a purchaser.
Some testers complained because the underfoot platform seemed to be too stiff for them.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Cumulus 18 GTX has become a solid addition to the long-running series, and many runners were able to enjoy that distinction. They enjoyed this neutral road shoe’s waterproof capability, its general quality, and its appealing looks. Some noted that there were a few caveats to its construction, but generally, it performed well."
Asics Kanmei MX, Asics,88.0,,37.0,$70,$30 (save 57%), Road, Neutral, Men: 7.2oz , Women: 5.7oz,,,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
The underfoot cushioning system felt comfortable, according to several users.
The color schemes looked vibrant and eye-catching, some people commented.
Some reviewers lauded the lightweight nature of the Asics Kanmei MX.
The shoe is affordable. 
A few mentioned that the upper of the Kanmei MX is breathable. 
3 reasons not to buy
Some people felt that the Asics Kanmei MX was too narrow.
A seam inside the shoe had a tendency to rub uncomfortably against the skin, according to a disgruntled purchaser.
Despite being comfortable for short periods, the underfoot platform was criticized for not being able to support the foot throughout the day.
Bottom line
The Asics Kanmei MX didn’t meet the expectations of the majority. This road shoe’s underfoot platform was said to be comfortable but unable to support the foot for more extended periods. Moreover, those who have medium foot-dimensions considered the fit to be tight. The positive feedback mostly focused on the lightweight nature of the Kanmei MX, as well as its appealing looks."
Under Armour Charged CoolSwitch,,69.0,,112.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.5oz , Women: 5.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Jun 2017,,,"9 reasons to buy
Most wearers made positive remarks about the shoe’s lightweight nature.
According to some runners, Under Armour Charged CoolSwitch is extremely breathable because of the presence of the 360° ventilation that was extended to the outsole unit of the shoe.
More than a few testers mentioned that the shoe was able to provide durable cushioning for long-distance runs.
A few wearers said that the shoe was easy to put on.
The Charged CoolSwitch is comfortable to wear, said few runners.
Some testers were highly appreciative of the shoe’s appealing aesthetic design.
A couple of purchasers mentioned that the shoe is affordable.
Based on a few user reviews, the shoe is very versatile; users mentioned that they were able to use the shoe during gym training and on casual walks.
Another user with painful nerve issues in his feet noted that he had a painless running experience with the Charged CoolSwitch.
2 reasons not to buy
One customer mentioned that small stones and dirt get trapped in the perforations of the sole unit.
The upper material is too thin and absorbs too much water, according to a couple of wearers.
Bottom line
The lightweight construction and extremely breathable feature of the shoe made most of the wearers really satisfied. The shoe is packed with technologies needed for a better road running experience.  The shoe provides a good combination of comfort, cushioning, and versatility."
Asics FuzeX Rush Adapt,,77.0,,96.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.6oz , Women: 6.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The price for the Asics FuzeX Rush Adapt was deemed to be affordable.
Some people who had jobs standing around most of the time felt that this shoe offered comfort and security.
The aesthetics of the upper received praise. There were comments on the appealing design and color schemes.
The lightweight construction of this running shoe was appreciated by many of those who have tried it.
Numerous testers agree that the shoe provides adequate support to the foot.
3 reasons not to buy
The fit was a bit narrow, according to a few testers.
A purchaser lamented the lack of arch support from the midsole unit.
According to some people, the cushioning system already sagged after only a few uses.
Bottom line
The Asics FuzeX Rush Adapt didn’t receive much praise from consumers. They weren’t delighted with this neutral road shoe’s ostensibly unresponsive and unsupportive midsole configuration. The sizing scheme and width profiles also became a source of concern because these aspects were deemed inconsistent and unreliable. On the other hand, the affordable price was lauded, as well as its eye-catching silhouette."
Puma Silverion, Puma,85.0,,7.0,$75,$40 (save 47%), Road,,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Some users have noted that the lightweight structure of the Puma Silverionhas permitted all-day use.
Several individuals claim that the aesthetics of this running shoe allow it to be used in any activity, not just running.
The cushioning in the heel part is welcomed because of its capacity to deliver comfort during the foot-strike.
Based on a handful of reviews, the padded collar works well as a preventive measure against accidental shoe removals.
The surface grip is appreciated by those who like responsible movement control over the ground.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people have noted that the forefoot section of the foot-chamber is a bit restrictive.
The inner sleeve has irritated the skin of some users’ feet.
Bottom line
People are generally happy with the Puma Silverion. This neutral running shoe is welcomed because of its versatile looks, its comfortable foam heel platform, and secure collar design. On the other hand, the irritating inner sleeve and the restrictive forefoot have been criticized.
Fans of Puma’s offerings for neutral pronation and road adventures can enjoy the Silverion."
Asics Gel Nimbus 20 Lite-Show,,86.0,,2412.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 13mm,,, Asics Gel Nimbus 21 Lite-Show,"5 reasons to buy
Several consumers felt that the upper unit accommodated the natural shape of the human foot.
The cushioning system was welcomed for its capacity to avert any underfoot discomfort during the run.
People generally liked the design of the Asics Gel Nimbus 20 Lite-Show, stating that it was eye-catching.
The reflective upper unit gained some fans as it allowed them to be more visible during nighttime runs.
Some runners liked the weight of this road shoe. They claimed that it was lighter than it looked.
2 reasons not to buy
The shoe is not as supportive as expected, especially in the midfoot area, claimed a user.
The toe box is too narrow for some wearers.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Nimbus 20 Lite-Show was able to receive mostly positive reviews from those who have tried it. This road shoe’s capacity to support the tendons and muscles of the foot-pad was lauded, as was its agreeable weight and form-fitting upper unit. On the other hand, several consumers were adamant that this product had sizing options that were smaller than the usual."
Adidas Speedfactory AM4NYC, Adidas,88.0,96.0,8.0,$200,$90 (save 55%), Road, Neutral,,,,, Apr 2018, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
The design of the Adidas Speedfactory AM4NYC was deemed as street-ready. People liked the aesthetics.
Gym-goers liked that this shoe was able to provide support during their workout sessions.
The underfoot cushioning unit was welcomed by most testers; they noted that it offered a comfortable experience.
People were happy with the lightweight nature of this product, emphasizing that they didn’t feel the weight of the shoe at all.
The traction capacity of the outsole gained praise as it was apparently efficient.
Most consumers liked the overall durability of the materials.
2 reasons not to buy
The price of the Adidas Speedfactory AM4NYC was considered by many to be expensive.
Several consumers deemed the fit to be a bit narrow.
Bottom line
Many people were happy with the Adidas Speedfactory AM4NYC. They liked its visually appealing design, its comfortable midsole unit, and the general durability of its components. Moreover, the weight and the efficacy of this neutral running shoe were lauded. On the other hand, some runners felt that the fit was narrow, while others complained that the price was dear."
Asics GT 1000 8 GTX,,72.0,,8.0,,, Road, Stability,,, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The waterproofing that is present in the Asics GT 1000 8 GTX is hailed by testers as a true deterrent of wetness.
People have noted that the cushioning system of this road running shoe is reactive to movements.
The shock attenuating capacity of the platform is welcomed by consumers.
Overpronation is responsibly averted by the stability mechanisms that are in the midsole, based on several reviews.
According to some testers, the outsole is durable and grippy.
2 reasons not to buy
A few testers claim that the outsole has a tendency to quickly separate from the shoe.
The forefoot section has a tendency to bunch the toes together uncomfortably, according to several reviewers.
Bottom line
The overall reaction towards the GT 1000 8 GTX has been relatively positive. This Asics running shoe is welcomed because of its stability mechanisms waterproof upper. Also, its versatility and durability are appreciated. The GT 1000 8 GTX combines protection and comfort for a lightweight and enjoyable ride.
Fans of stability running shoes that are for the roads can enjoy the Asics GT 1000 8 GTX."
Asics GT 2000 6 Trail,,86.0,90.0,289.0,,, Trail, Stability, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics GT 2000 8 Trail,"6 reasons to buy
One runner was surprised that the GT 2000 6 did not require a break-in period.
The shoe helped relieve hip and back pains, wrote a buyer.
Whether sitting, standing, or running, the shoe provided an adequate amount of support, according to a reviewer.
The shoe promoted forefoot balance successfully, a satisfied user stated.
Several customers were pleased that the GT 2000 6 was more comfortable than the series’ earlier models.
A commenter mentioned that they found the shoe to be durable.
2 reasons not to buy
Some users have said the sizing was too narrow.
The sides of the tongue were too stiff, which felt uncomfortable when the shoe is worn without a sock, a wearer noted.
Bottom line
Most of the reviews of the Asics GT 2000 6 were on the optimistic side. Commenters have talked about how comfortable and supportive the shoe was, and some also praised its quality. Criticisms, on the other hand, surround the sizing and few structural elements. Although very little was said about the shoe’s performance and reliability, the GT 2000 6 has still struck a positive note with its consumers."
Saucony Swerve,,79.0,,43.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.4oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The Saucony Swerve is very comfortable, according to several reviews.
It is quite light, based on the observations of some runners.
The price is average for a running shoe.
A handful of runners appreciated the soft and supportive cushioning.
The durability is decent enough, as noted by a few.
More than a few reviewers loved its breathability.
2 reasons not to buy
It could have looked better for its price tag, according to several.
A break-in time is needed to get the most out of the shoe, according to a handful of reviews.
Bottom line
Saucony replaces the long-standing Jazz with the Swerve. The replacement brings more of the same, but with more cushioning in a relatively lightweight package. There is sufficient arch support, excellent breathability, and adequate durability in this shoe. For those who are looking for a dependable and perfectly functional shoe without many accessories, the Swerve is as good as any in the market today."
Saucony Linchpin,,75.0,,66.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.4oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
A few reviewers felt that the Saucony Linchpin had enough arch support.
Most reviewers felt that the Linchpin is priced moderately despite it being a stability shoe.
Several users mentioned that the shoe provided the right amount of comfort to their feet.
One user observed that the design of the shoe catered to wider feet. She appreciated the extra room in the toe box.
Many testers appreciated the functionality of the shoe. Most used it for work or for gym sessions.
One user mentioned that the shoe is of decent quality despite the price being inexpensive.
6 reasons not to buy
Various users felt that Saucony skimped on the design of the shoe. They described the design as unappealing.
Several testers reported that the shoe was slightly narrow and small.
One reviewer mentioned that there wasn’t enough cushioning and that the sole unit felt rigid.
A tester mentioned that the shoelaces did not tighten enough to provide a snug fit.
One of the shoes in a pair turned yellow, said one reviewer. It caused her to stop using the shoe and find another pair.
One review mentioned that the shoe was not designed for long distance running.
Bottom line
The Saucony Linchpin was meant to be an all-around running shoe for users who are casually active. Considering the make, the quality, the price and the features of the shoe, it seems to do the job in the all-around category. It can be a good choice if a moderately pronated runner is looking for a reasonably-priced stability shoe for road running, casual wear or light workouts."
Asics Tartherzeal 6,,87.0,89.0,44.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 5.6oz , Women: 4.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Some happy users lauded the stylish design of the Asics Tarthezeal 6.
According to several runners, the shoe is comfortable.
A few purchasers said that the Tarthezeal 6 feels fast and light.
Several testers admired the bouncy feel of the shoe's cushioning.
Based on some user reviews, the shoe runs true to size.
2 reasons not to buy
The shoe is more expensive compared to other road running shoes.
A few users said that the Tarthezeal 6 is not ideal for wide-footed runners.
Bottom line
The Asics Tarthezeal 6 is a stylish running shoe designed for road running. The shoe gained positive reviews from various runners who were satisfied with its comfortable fit, lightweight design, and bouncy ride. Although some have issues with the shoe's price and width, it is still a running shoe that most wearers considered to be worth the purchase."
Brooks Cascadia 12 GTX,,83.0,,328.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 12.2oz , Women: 10.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Brooks Cascadia 14 GTX,"5 reasons to buy
The color schemes available for the Brooks Cascadia 12 GTX were lauded by a lot of runners.
The Gore-Tex® membrane didn’t disappoint consumers because it responsibly kept water infiltration at bay.
The surface grip of the outsole gained positive feedback as it didn’t allow the foot to slip or slide on the ground.
The shoe is very durable, as noted in some reviews.
A few noticed that the waterproof upper did not affect the shoe's breathability. 
4 reasons not to buy
Some overpronators complained that the midsole unit of this running shoe didn’t offer support for their needs.
A tester noted a squeaking sound from the sole unit while also noticing some pain in the Achilles.
A person who used the Cascadia 12 GTX for work reported that there were spots near the top area of the upper which folded and dug into the skin.
The construction of the sole unit was narrower than the standard, non-waterproof Cascadia 12, according to a reviewer.
Bottom line
The feedback for the Brooks Cascadia 12 GTX was mixed. Many runners thought that this neutral trail shoe featured efficient and agreeable technologies. They appreciated the color schemes, the waterproof upper, and the helpfulness of its outsole. But there were those who didn’t like the fit, stating that it was too narrow, while others experienced discomfort."
Brooks PureCadence 6,,93.0,93.0,291.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 8.9oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Brooks PureCadence 7,"10 reasons to buy
Many runners described the Brooks PureCadence 6 as comfortable.
A number of consumers considered this shoe to be suitably lightweight for their running sessions.
The foam platform felt responsive, according to a high percentage of purchasers.
There was generally positive feedback for the presence of a supportive mechanism that handles foot-pronation.
Some reviewers noted that the upper unit was able to fit like a sock around the shape of their feet.
The breathable fabric used for the upper unit gained favor for being breathable.
Many observed that it worked well for shorter and speedier runs.
The shoe was lauded for having an apparently appealing design.
The outsole was sure and capable in terms of traction and protection, based on a majority of the reviews.
According to a consumer, wearing the Brooks PureCadence 6 didn’t bring about any negative repercussions to the feet.
3 reasons not to buy
There were a few consumers who thought that the outsole wore out too quickly.
It felt a bit narrow in the midfoot section, according to some observers.
The stretchy laces were hard to tighten, a disgruntled runner complained.
Bottom line
The Brooks PureCadence 6 became a success for a lot of runners who wanted to have a comfortable and stable running shoe for their speedy pursuits on the road. They welcomed its design, as well as its color schemes. They were also generally appreciative of the lightweight and responsive nature of its components. There were those who felt that there was still a lot of room for improvement, but for them, it was a solid update nonetheless."
Adidas Terrex CMTK,,85.0,73.0,499.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 10oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The durability of the Adidas Terrex CMTK was praised by many testers.
Most people felt that this running shoe had a suitably lightweight build.
The underfoot cushioning was considered by a lot of people to be comfortable.
The price of a pair of the Terrex CMTK was deemed affordable.
A lot of runners felt that the traction capacity of the outsole was reliable.
The upper unit felt dutifully breathable, based on a handful of reviews.
The aesthetics of this product were appreciated by consumers; the design and colorways were thought to be eye-catching and confidence-boosting.
2 reasons not to buy
According to several users, the forefoot section was a bit narrow; they noticed some hot spots on the tops of the toes.
A couple of testers slipped on slick surfaces; they warned that the outsole may not work well on the slippery
Bottom line
The Adidas Terrex CMTK was able to capture the attention of many trail running aficionados. This trail companion was lauded for having a breathable upper, a lightweight construction, and comfortable underfoot experience. Traction was a trait that was contended; while some felt that the outsole was grippy, others noted that it wasn’t as good on slippery topography. And based on what some purchasers observed, the toe box was a bit tight-fitting."
Asics Gel Oberon 10,,83.0,,76.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 10.7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Most runners liked the Asics Gel Oberon 10 for its impressive comfort.
The upper unit of this 10th version is made with a breathable mesh that offers coolness and dryness for the foot.
Asics Gel Oberon 10 provides an excellent cushioning, especially in the heel area.
The removable sock liner made from the EVA compound accommodates medical orthotics.
The outsole of this running shoe features a very dependable technology that protects the entire unit from wear, tearing and abrasion.
It has a reasonable price, which should fit well to many budget-conscious runners.
3 reasons not to buy
There were concerns about this running shoe not having stability mechanics.
There were mixed thoughts with the Gel Oberon 10 for being too stiff because several runners experienced discomfort while running.
Some reviewers said that the footwear needed more flexibility, so that the runner can move more freely.
Bottom line
This running shoe is best for neutral runners. It doesn’t have arch support mechanisms or pronation control modules, but with its cutting edge technologies, the Gel Oberon 10 should be able to provide superb cushioning and a more comfortable running experience."
Puma Faas 400, Puma,83.0,,23.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.1oz , Women: 6.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
This shoe features a mesh upper with synthetic overlays for a breathable and comfortable fit.
Many runners appreciated the BioRide Technology, which encourages better toe-offs, responsive performance, and natural movement mechanics.
The EverRide and the EverTrack outsole technologies mix durability and cushioning to make a more robust sole unit.
Many reviewers lauded the Faas 400’s reliability when it came to performance as it can function well on many activities.
The Faas 400 doesn’t have a heavy weight, so anyone can just ease into this shoe and experience it based on several reviews.
This running shoe doesn’t have a terribly high price, making it an acceptable option for those on a budget.
3 reasons not to buy
There were reviewers who criticized the shoe’s upper color scheme for showing dirt easily.
Some felt that it’s a bit too casual that it doesn’t offer too much for advanced athletes.
A few thought that the outsole could use stronger layers of rubber for better durability and traction.
Bottom line
The Faas 400 from Puma is an excellent choice for runners who want to be comfortable and secure when tackling their activities. It’s a neutral shoe for neophyte runners with decent arch support, lightweight, and very comfortable."
Scott Supertrac 2.0,,,83.0,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 10.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,
Asics Gel Pulse 9,,83.0,80.0,1331.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.1oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Pulse 12,"6 reasons to buy
Several testers were happy with the sleek look of the Asics Gel Pulse 9.
The underfoot experience was described as comfortable.
People have noted that the platform was steady enough to support the underfoot through extended runs.
Many purchasers stated that the original list price of the Gel Pulse 9 was already affordable.
A handful of those who had plantar fasciitis claimed that this road shoe helped in preventing discomfort or foot strain.
Some individuals stated that this running shoe looked and performed better than its predecessors.
2 reasons not to buy
Some consumers claimed that the width profiles were tighter than what they expected.
A few testers felt their heels slipping from the foot-chamber easily.
Bottom line
The response towards the Asics Gel Pulse 9 was positive. The underfoot platform received particular praise for being supportive and agreeable. On the other hand, some testers were unhappy with the width profiles. Also, others felt that the interior chamber wasn’t very secure because they experienced accidental shoe removals. Overall, neutral runners considered the Gel Pulse 9 to be a worthy addition to the roster of products in the Asics stable. They also felt that it was a natural progression of the series."
Under Armour SpeedForm Gemini Vent,,83.0,,141.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The Under Armour SpeedForm Gemini Vent was a shoe that fit true-to-size, according to some
One reviewer wrote that the shoe “offered quality and comfort in one great-looking package.”
The foam on this shoe felt extra soft and comfortable, which was perfect for running, stated a consumer.
Meanwhile, another user stated the suitability of the running shoe for everyday wear.
There was an abundance of room in the forefoot for a relaxed toe splay, a commenter reported.
The outsole was durable and flexible, said a runner.
Numerous wearers liked the style of the SpeedForm Gemini Vent.
3 reasons not to buy
The upper felt rigid and inflexible, unlike the original version, a disappointed buyer said.
One user developed blisters on their heel after wearing the shoe. Meanwhile, another person claimed they experienced pain in the shins after using the SpeedForm Gemini Vent.
One eyelet immediately broke after one pull of the shoelaces, one customer complained.
Bottom line
Many buyers have stated that they were happy with their purchase of the SpeedForm Gemini Vent because of how it provided comfort and support. Although some runners felt that the upgrade was impractical, the majority of the users recognized the efficiency of the features of the shoe. In summary, despite the SpeedForm Gemini Vent giving the value of what its worth, it is an average shoe at best."
Zoot Makai,,83.0,81.0,11.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The shoe is very comfortable and lightweight as mentioned in some reviews.
Some runners applauded the quick lacing scheme of the Zoot Makai.
Many mentioned that the Makai has the right amount of cushioning for underfoot protection.
It has a flexible and breathable upper.
The Makai is a responsive shoe according to some testers.
2 reasons not to buy
This shoe is expensive.
Based on some reviews, the laces are too light and stay loose.
Bottom line
The Zoot Makai is a reliable running shoe designed for natural foot motion. It delivers a good combination of cushioning, protection and comfort. Despite being expensive, some users still considered the Makai a good investment. This shoe is ideal for daily training and short-distant runs."
Asics Gel DS Racer 10,,83.0,64.0,83.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 6.3oz , Women: 5.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The mesh material used in the upper unit has an open construction, which enables air to circulate in the foot-chamber.
The seamless construction lets runners wear this shoe even without socks because it reduces skin irritation.
The underfoot cushioning was appreciated by many because it provided support and comfort.
Its lightweight nature was lauded by a lot of the testers.
Many noted that the toe box gave a bit of space for the toes to play naturally, which is helpful for the gait cycle.
Durable protection, traction and responsive cushioning make the outsole unit very efficient on the roads.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners noted that the laces didn’t stay secured because it kept unraveling on them.
The outsole wore off on some users after a few months of use.
Bottom line
Runners who want to have a lightweight and responsive running experience are going to get it from the Asics Gel DS Racer 10. The mild stability mechanics that are present in it are helpful for those who also want a bit of support. It’s a solid option for daily running sessions, as well as racing."
Mizuno Synchro MD,,83.0,,70.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 8.6oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A handful of runners really liked the soft and plush interior of the Synchro MD.
It is very affordable.
The cushioning is very good for all day wear, based on some reviews.
It is exceptionally breathable, according to a few runners.
The shoe is a solid option for gym training, noted a couple of users.
There are 4 really nice color options.
A small number of users have noticed that it is quite light.
2 reasons not to buy
It lacks even mild stability as advertised, according to a handful of comments.
The traction is not good because of the hard rubber, based on a few observations.
Bottom line
The Synchro MD is an entry-level type of running shoe that Mizuno also designed for some gym activities. It offers a Spartan-like design where accessories are concerned, but offers tons of comfort, decent arch support, moderate cushioning, excellent breathability, and surprisingly very nice color options. As the shoe is very wallet-friendly, it should be a good choice for recreational joggers, middle of the pack runners, or those looking to take it easy on recovery days."
Puma NRGY v2, Puma,83.0,82.0,8.0,,, Road, Neutral,,, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Oct 2016,,,"6 reasons to buy
Most runners noticed the breathable upper coverage of the shoe.
The lacing system is focused on the mid-foot area, and they efficiently manipulate the overlay system that’s connected to them.
Runners appreciated the anatomically shaped sock liner, which adds more cushioning and support to the underfoot.
The mid-sole unit uses a foam unit that’s made from the compaction of TPU pellets; it offers high rebound cushioning and energy return.
A few number of runners noticed the durability of the outsole unit.
A transition line at the bottom of the sole unit follows the natural movements of the foot and keeps the gait smoother.
2 reasons not to buy
There were runners who felt that the outsole unit delivered a mediocre traction over the roads.
A few noted that it was a half-size smaller than what they were used to.
Bottom line
The 2nd version of the Puma NRGY is an update that greatly improves upon its predecessor, from its visual disposition, to the materials used in it. Though a few testers found the traction a bit underwhelming, this neutral shoe is dependable when it comes to going out on regular running sessions and exercises."
Dynafit Feline Ultra, Dynafit,83.0,85.0,9.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 12oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The Dynafit Feline Ultra is a shoe with good traction, said a few reviewers.
Some users mentioned that the fit of this shoe is snug.
To most users, the construction of the shoe is robust but it still offered flexibility.
Most testers were glad that Dynafit added the Ballistic bumper protection on the toe tip.
Several runners described the shoe as durable.
A number of users said that the shoe is of great value.
Many testers said that the shoe performed well during long runs.
2 reasons not to buy
One user felt that this running shoe needed more cushioning, especially on the actual underfoot platform.
Some testers observed that the lacing system is not very convenient. One reviewer, in particular, said that the extra length of her laces was cumbersome.
Bottom line
Dynafit’s Feline Ultra is a mid-priced contender for trail running shoes that are suitable for alpine runs. With its brawny construction, it’s trusted to withstand challenging terrain while still keeping the foot dry and protected. Although the foot is adequately sheltered, runners are still given the opportunity to feel the flexible and responsive qualities of the shoe."
Asics Gel FujiTrabuco 5 GTX,,83.0,85.0,41.0,,, Trail, Stability, Men: 11.4oz , Women: 10.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The waterproof layer that’s present in the Asics Gel FujiTrabuco 5 GTX received positive remarks from those who have tried it.
Several runners considered this shoe to be comfortable, even during initial use.
The grip capability of the outsole unit was praised by reviewers.
Overpronators were generally receptive of this shoe because it has stability mechanics.
A number of consumers noted that this shoe is true-to-size.
3 reasons not to buy
The rear section of the upper unit initially dug into the ankle of a tester, causing some discomfort.
A runner complained that the shoe that he ordered looked vastly different from the picture that’s depicted online and it disappointed him.
The forefoot section felt a bit narrow for a consumer.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel FujiTrabuco 5 GTX was able to satisfy runners who needed mid-foot support. It was also able to provide solid performance on the trails, based on the feedback of consumers. Inversely, there were a few complaints about its seemingly deceptive design and structure."
Adidas Mana Bounce 2,,89.0,,278.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 9.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Jun 2017,,,"9 reasons to buy
The mostly monochromatic designs of the Adidas Mana Bounce 2 gained the favor of many consumers.
The façade of this running shoe looked stylish, commented a great number of purchasers.
Runners generally welcomed the breathability of the upper unit, stating that it easily accommodated airflow.
The mid-sole unit efficiently gave a springy and responsive ride, noted several testers.
Some reviewers noted that the platform was even and steady, because it didn’t cause their feet to wobble.
‘Comfortable’ was a word that many runners used to describe this running shoe.
The lightweight nature of the Mana Bounce 2 gained positive feedback.
A majority of those who have tried the shoe stated that it was affordable.
There were people who were able to enjoy this running shoe as part of their casual attire.
2 reasons not to buy
The Mana Bounce 2 felt a little narrow, according to some testers.
One of the shoe's users said the outsole is a bit hard and uncomfortable.
Bottom line
Many runners were able to enjoy the Adidas Mana Bounce 2 and its features. They thought that it was comfortable, efficient, and affordable. Its use as a casual shoe became appreciated, as well. The complaints were mostly about its fit, which felt inconsistent for a number of consumers."
The North Face Ultra Traction,,,,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,
Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 34 Shield,,93.0,87.0,1480.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 35 Shield,"6 reasons to buy
Some of the testers agreed that the shoe was well-constructed.
A lot of runners commented that the Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 34 Shield provided excellent traction.
One of the users said that the product was visible during evening runs.
Many reviewers loved its attractive design.
This running shoe kept the foot dry on rainy days, according to those who have tried it
A good number of buyers were impressed with the product's exceptional cushioning.
2 reasons not to buy
One user said that the sizing was a bit small when compared to the standard measurements.
A consumer was disappointed because the color of the shoe was different in the pictures than from the actual.
Bottom line
A good number of runners agreed that the Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 34 Shield was well-constructed and cushioned. They said that the traction it provided was perfect. Although one of the runners commented that the product was a bit small, others still recommended the Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 34 Shield because of its reflectivity, fantastic design, and excellent performance. They loved wearing the shoe even on rainy days because of its breathability."
Adidas Vengeful,,86.0,69.0,268.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.6oz , Women: 10.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
The Adidas Vengeful is very comfortable, according to most of the reviewers.
The cushioning is soft, but has distinct responsiveness, based on several comments from runners.
The price is around the norm of well-cushioned neutral trainers.
The StableFrame technology adds a little medial support for better stability.
The Air Mesh upper delivers superb breathability.
Some runners use it for gym sessions as well.
The upper hugs the foot well, as noted by a handful.
The seamless construction reduces the possibility of getting blisters or hot spots.
5 reasons not to buy
A few runners mentioned that the overlays in the upper look cheap.
The upper lacks structure, which is noticeable in long runs where the runner’s form begins to fade, based on some comments.
It is a bit heavy for a handful of runners.
Outsole durability left more than a few runners disappointed.
No reflectivity for low-visibility running.
Bottom line
Adidas designed the Vengeful for those who love a well-cushioned trainer that still delivers perceptible responsiveness. This neutral shoe has really good arch support, very comfortable interior, and excellent breathability. It should be a sensible choice for short to mid-distance runs at average speeds."
Puma Flexracer, Puma,89.0,,238.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal,,"8 reasons to buy
The Puma Flexracer is a very comfortable shoe, according to most comments.
The price is affordable.
It is very flexible.
A good number of runners use the Flexracer for various activities besides running.
The sophisticated design makes it a fantastic option for casual wear.
It is a lightweight shoe that can handle different distances at varying speeds.
A mesh upper ensures a cool run.
The midfoot security is awesome, noted several.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners considered the durability as disappointing.
Traction should be better, even for an affordable shoe, commented a handful of runners.
It is a bit narrow as mentioned in a few comments.
Bottom line
The name of the Puma Flexracer says it all. It is a minimalist shoe that is highly-flexible and offers plenty of speed for the runner. The comfort is superior with good arch support and decent cushioning for a lightweight trainer."
Adidas Element Athletic,,91.0,,282.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 8.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Extremely comfortable is a comment common from a large majority of runners who have tried the Adidas Element.
It is very affordable.
The durability is definitely above the wallet-friendly price tag.
Several runners liked its versatility as it can handle 10Ks to marathons.
Many runners appreciated the Element’s flexibility.
The plush cushioning is provided by a SuperCloud midsole and insole.
Breathability is guaranteed by the Air Mesh upper.
The Element from Adidas looks much better than its retail price, noted some users.
1 reasons not to buy
The fit is a bit narrow for some.
Bottom line
A moderately-light, very comfortable, and highly-functional running shoe that does not pinch the wallet mainly characterizes the Adidas Element. Adidas also incorporates its stylistic flair by making it look like a casual shoe with average arch support. It is simply one of the best options that a recreational runner can have."
Nike Air VaporMax Flyknit Moc 2,,89.0,,124.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 10oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Several consumers felt that the cushioning capability of the midsole was reliable.
The various colorways were appreciated by testers because they were appealing to observe.
The width profile was agreeable, and it didn’t give a tight feeling, according to some runners.
Some people liked that the midsection of the upper unit didn’t have the strap; it apparently looked out-of-place.
The grip capacity of the outsole unit was much appreciated by purchasers.
1 reasons not to buy
A few consumers claimed that the fabrics of the upper were fragile, giving the thought that they’d break apart after several uses.
Bottom line
The Nike Air VaporMax Flyknit Moc 2 gained the favor of most purchasers. Some of them were happy with the midsole cushioning, while others welcomed the appealing aesthetics. The amenable width and traction-ready outsole were also recipients of praise from neutral runners. Some people were doubtful of the integrity of the upper unit, but these concerns were isolated incidents. Overall, the feedback for the 2nd version of the VaporMax Flyknit Moc was mostly positive."
Salming Speed 7,,85.0,,5.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.7oz , Women: 6.1oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Many runners consider the Salming Speed 7 to be a lightweight running shoe.
The flexibility of the shoe is appreciated by several users.
A couple of wearers claim the shoe to have a roomy toe box.
Some reviewers believe the Salming Speed 7 to have a supportive fit.
The breathability of the shoe has been praised by numerous users.
2 reasons not to buy
Some purchasers think the Speed 7 is an expensive running shoe.
Not suitable for overpronators, according to a couple of reviewers.
Bottom line
The Salming Speed 7 is a great choice for quick tempo runs and race days. To many users, the shoe's flexibility and lightness allowed it to produce a high-level performance that stays true to its name."
Mizuno Wave Creation 18,,76.0,57.0,235.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 10.4oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Mizuno Wave Creation 21,"8 reasons to buy
The testers of the Mizuno Wave Creation 18 celebrated that it was able to give an adequate fit.
A lot of runners felt that this shoe was very comfortable for their feet.
The breathability of the upper unit gained positive remarks from those who have tried it.
Reviewers generally thought that this running shoe was visually appealing.
A runner commented that the durability of this running shoe was dependable.
Some runners were able to wear this shoe for their everyday activities and they wrote that they didn’t feel any discrepancy throughout.
A tester stated that the Wave Creation 18 was versatile enough to function well on a variety of active pursuits, such as running, training and exercising.
Several purchasers commended the supportive mid-foot section of the platform, which cradled their arch well.
4 reasons not to buy
Some runners noted that this running shoe was heavy.
The underfoot cushioning felt stiff for a couple of reviewers, and they wrote that they experienced some discomfort because of it.
A number of testers wrote that it had an expensive price.
This shoe felt a bit wide for a purchaser.
Bottom line
The Mizuno Wave Creation 18 was able to produce sure performance and deliver quality service to neutral runners who needed a reliable running companion for their active lifestyles. Some of them even commended its versatility because they were able to use it for many kinds of activities on the roads. On the other hand, there were those who weren’t satisfied with it, particularly frowning upon its apparently unresponsive underfoot cushioning system."
Inov-8 Oroc 280,,82.0,87.0,16.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 9.9oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The Precision Fit Synthetic upper with TPU material offers a durable, breathable and comfortable coverage.
Many of the testers appreciated the DWR Coating, which help protect against mild weather conditions.
The low profile height of the Oroc 280, along with the minimal cushioning, is appreciated by many minimalist runners.
The mid-sole features an EVA layer of cushioning and the Meta Flex technology, a groove design in the forefoot area for natural foot movement.
The outsole is a durable, spiked section that offers traction and protection against the trails as experienced by quite a number of trail enthusiasts.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners thought that the toe box was a bit narrow.
Others noticed that the front of the outsole started to come off after a few months of use.
It has an expensive price.
Bottom line
The Oroc 280 from Inov-8 is a trail shoe that delivers protection, comfort and grip when running on the off-road terrain. It’s a solid option for neutral runners, especially because it’s sturdy and reliable in its purpose."
Adidas Pureboost Chill,,82.0,88.0,24.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
This running shoe features the Climachill fabric that’s made to keep the foot of the wearer cool and dry.
Most reviewers appreciated the seamless construction of the Boost Chill because it prevents irritation while also maintaining a clean structure to the shoe itself.
The tongue and collar are padded, making it possible to wear it even without socks.
The Boost mid-sole foam offers a plush and responsive platform for the foot.
High performance rubber grids on the outsole improve the durability and traction capability of the Pure Boost Chill as noted by a small group of runners.
It has a moderately lightweight nature.
3 reasons not to buy
There were runners who felt that the Pure Boost Chill was one size smaller for them.
It has an expensive price.
The aesthetic options are bland for some testers even when it’s also marketed as a casual shoe.
Bottom line
The Pure Boost Chill from Adidas offers better performance and service than the previous iterations, while also making sure to stay well-ventilated. It’s a great choice for athletes and casual shoe enthusiasts."
Asics Gel Attract 4,,82.0,,31.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.6oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A large number of runners swear by the comfort level of the Gel Attract 4.
The durability of this lightweight shoe is impressive, as noted in some comments.
It is well worth the investment, according to many users.
A very breathable upper ensures a cool and dry run.
The interior is lined with soft and plush fabric for an excellent next-to-skin feel.
The Asics Attract 4 is very flexible.
Mobility and a more natural running form are enhanced by the low-cut design.
1 reasons not to buy
The stitched protection in the toe box gave a few runners some hot spots.
Bottom line
Charming runners, especially those with minimalist inclinations, is easily achieved by the best features of the 4th edition of the Attract. It is a light trainer with decent arch support, low-cut design, and excellent mobility that makes natural running a foregone conclusion. It can handle short or long distances with ease. The shoe is an excellent option for those who want a minimalist approach, but with decent cushioning and support all over."
Mizuno Wave Mujin 4,,,,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 12.5oz , Women: 10.9oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Mizuno Wave Mujin 6,
Asics Gel FujiAttack 5,,82.0,85.0,143.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 8.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The Gel FujiAttack 5 is a very durable trail shoe based on the reviews of many runners.
A good number of runners really liked the support the FujiAttack 5 delivers.
Cushioning is plush in this shoe with the SpEVA, Solyte, and Gel Cushioning System combined.
The protective components in this model are limited, but they effectively shield the foot from debris and other hazards.
The Asics FujiAttack 5 moves the runner from the doorstep to the trail quite well.
Traction is provided by a compound that uses more natural rubber than the more solid form, resulting in a more responsive outsole unit.
3 reasons not to buy
The price for a pair of the FujiAttack 5 is slightly expensive.
It has a moderately heavy weight.
A couple of runners wished for more trail protection features since it has a fairly high price, like an anti-debris upper or a reinforced toe cap.
Bottom line
Asics relies more on muscle than finesse with the Gel FujiAttack 5. That being said, this Asics trail running shoe still lacked a few essential protection schemes that trail enthusiasts would dearly love to have. However, it does have a really good quality that never fails to impress runners. It brings luxurious comfort when training on the trail."
New Balance Summit Unknown v2,,,,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.7oz , Women: 7.7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,
Nike LunarEclipse 5,,90.0,81.0,126.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 8.6oz, Men: 11mm , Women: 11mm,,, Nike LunarEclipse 4,"6 reasons to buy
6 different color options make it appealing to runners.
Nike uses reflective material in the LunarEclipse 5 for better visibility in low-light areas.
With the Flywire technology as a new enhancement, most testers noted that the shoe’s customizable fit has improved a lot.
Comfort is a prime asset in this shoe based on a large number of reviews.
Several runners took particular notice of the incredible cushioning, particularly in the heel.
It is surprisingly flexible, according to a few testers.
2 reasons not to buy
The 5th version of the LunarEclipse is slightly expensive.
A handful of runners observed that it wasn’t able to grip well on wet surfaces.
Bottom line
The LunarEclipse 5 brings unbelievable cushioning, comfort, and enough stability to get optimum performance. Nike goes old school in this shoe when it comes to the stack height and heel offset. However, it neither feels heavy nor does it feel unwieldy on the road."
Reebok Zquick Dash,,88.0,,284.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.4oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The no-sew upper with a Cleatie fit system offers a better fit and less irritation to the skin.
The NanoWeb tech on the upper enhances the fit, while also providing stability to the sides of the foot.
Runners generally appreciated the Z-Rated sole unit design, which likens its platform to the tires of racing cars.
The lateral and longitudinal grooves offer flexibility, responsiveness and a more balanced ride, as noted by some testers.
The CRTek rubber is located in high-wear areas of the Zquick Dash and it’s meant to improve traction.
2 reasons not to buy
Others thought that it was too tight in the midfoot area.
A few noted that the fabric gets easily soiled when exposed to water.
Bottom line
The Zquick Dash from Reebok is a well-known running shoe because of its approachable design, price, and features. It has some stability mechanics, which helps those who need it. Though some users have issues with the fit and sizing, the shoe is still considered by others as a reliable running companion."
Merrell Agility Charge Flex,,78.0,,35.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
One reviewer observed how springy the Merrell Agility Charge Flex felt.
A few reviews mentioned how great the traction of the shoe was on the trail.
A tester said that she immediately tested the shoes with a long hike and she almost forgot she had them on.
Most testers said that the Merrell Agility Charge Flex is one of the best fitting trail shoes in the market.
A reviewer observed that there is extra room in the toe box for natural toe-splay when walking or running. This extra room was much appreciated.
Some reviewers commented on the high level of comfort the shoes brought.
2 reasons not to buy
One tester commented on how uneasy the shoe was on the arch of his foot.
According to one reviewer, this shoe wasn’t able to deliver much traction on wet surfaces, particularly on snowy ground.
Bottom line
The Merrell Agility Charge Flex is a neutral trail running shoe that was designed for comfort and flexibility. With the different technologies built into the shoe, runners get the protection and traction they need on various trails and on difference paces. This is a solid trail running shoe for trail runs that require speed and agility."
Puma Ignite Limitless SR Fusefit, Puma,,,,$130,$45 (save 72%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,
Reebok Harmony Racer, Reebok,68.0,,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6oz , Women: 6oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
The majority admitted that the Reebok Harmony Racer was extremely comfortable.
Many runners appreciated its lightweight since it saved their feet from getting excessively tired.
Several purchasers liked the available color schemes of this running shoe.
Some individuals lauded the snug fit.
A runner mentioned that the shoe remained very stable during the long runs owing to its durable build.
A wearer said that the shoe was great for speed work and training.
An individual was of the opinion that the footwear performed brilliantly on roads for short-distance sprints.
2 reasons not to buy
A user complained about its width being unbelievably narrow.
Another user thought that the Harmony Racer was rather flimsy and excessively large.
Bottom line
The Reebok Harmony Racer was able to generate the positive reviews from the majority. The customers believed that the shoe had decent looks, a comfortable fit, and an enhanced long-term durability. Therefore, it became the choice of many runners for both long distances and short sprints."
Dynafit Feline Up Pro, Dynafit,81.0,80.0,8.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.1oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The Dynafit Feline Up Pro was welcomed by those who have tested it; they felt that it became a go-to product for their adventures on the trails.
Many people noted that the weight of this trail running shoe was suitably light for tricky terrains and extended running sessions.
The snugness of the upper unit was welcomed by some reviewers who liked an in-shoe hug that was steady and consistent.
Consumers generally liked the durability of the materials, stating that the individual components didn’t break down easily, even after multiple runs.
The traction capacity of the outsole unit was appreciated; purchasers claimed that the grip was reliable and precise.
According to several runners, the design of this product was eye-catching.
1 reasons not to buy
Some consumers complained that the fit was a bit too narrow for their tastes.
Bottom line
The general response for the Feline Up Pro was overwhelmingly positive. Those who have had the pleasure of taking this Dynafit running shoe on their off-road adventures felt that it was efficient when it comes to doling out quality performance and dependable sturdiness. The traction and lightness, in particular, became the elements that made the whole package appealing.
The Dynafit Feline Up Pro is for the enthusiast of trail running and those who enjoy off-road racing and long treks in the wilderness."
Reebok Plus Runner ULTK, Reebok,86.0,,28.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 10oz,,,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
According to the majority, the Reebok Plus Runner ULTK is the ‘comfiest’ shoe ever.
Most runners praised the great fit since it hugged the foot snugly during the runs.
A few consumers mentioned how easy it was to put on and take off the shoe.
Some runners admired the shoe’s aesthetic look; one such person commented how he got compliments while wearing it.
A purchaser noted that the shoe was great for long-distance running.
A runner mentioned that the cushioned insole made him feel like he was ‘walking on clouds’.
A reviewer lauded the high quality materials used for manufacturing of this shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
A few runners did not like how the shoe’s ‘orange’ upper looked unpleasantly bright in person.
A user felt tightness around the ankle; also, his feet slid laterally in the forefoot region.
Bottom line
The Reebok Plus Runner ULTK is a neutral running shoe which, owing to its high durability, optimal comfortability and fashionable looks, has captured the awareness of many consumers. Along with satisfying the fashion urge, the pair guarantees a great performance on the roads."
Adidas Ultraboost Uncaged Parley,,95.0,85.0,579.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The lightweight nature of the Adidas Ultraboost Uncaged Parley gained positive feedback.
Runners welcomed the appealing color scheme of this shoe.
This shoe’s use of recycled plastics received praise from many consumers.
The underfoot cushioning system felt very comfortable, according to a lot of testers.
Many people were able to use this shoe for running and long-distance walking, and they noted that it stayed efficient throughout.
Shoe enthusiasts welcomed its appeal as a casual, all-around shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
According to a great number of consumers, this running shoe had a smaller and narrower fit compared to the previous iteration of the Ultraboost Uncaged.
The sock-like collar caused some irritation on the skin of a number of testers.
The fabrics of the upper weren’t as flexible as the standard knit material, a few runners observed.
Bottom line
Many consumers welcomed the Adidas Ultraboost Uncaged Parley. For them, it looked very appealing and it worked well for various activities on the pavement. The use of recycled materials for a majority of its components also sat well with a good number of people. But people also noted that the sizing and the fit of this shoe didn’t work well as it felt small and narrow."
Nike Zoom Strike 2,,74.0,,28.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 6oz, Men: 11mm , Women: 11mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Many people felt that the Nike Zoom Strike 2 followed their expectations when it comes to size.
Several consumers claimed that the midsole offered comfort during various activities.
The color schemes were lauded for being pleasing to the eyes.
The lightweight construction of this road shoe was welcomed by many testers.
People noted that the traction capacity of the outsole was reliable and that it made the shoe useful for gym workouts and speed training.
It is affordable.
1 reasons not to buy
A few consumers claimed that the width was a bit narrow; the foot felt a bit cramped while in the interior chamber of the shoe.
Bottom line
The consumers who have tested the Nike Zoom Strike 2 felt that it was able to provide them with agreeable performance during their running sessions. Some testers even stated that it worked well as an article for exercises at the gym. The aesthetics and the light construction were also lauded because they apparently contributed to an overall amazing in-shoe experience. Some people didn’t like the fit because it felt narrow, but they were only a few isolated detractors."
Inov-8 Terraclaw 220,,90.0,78.0,115.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Majority of the users were satisfied by the good and comfortable fitting of the Terraclaw 220.
This shoe had an impressive design as noted in some reviews.
It features the Dual-C sticky rubber outsole for optimum grip.
The diagonally sewn tongue to keep foot protected from rocks and debris gained positive impression from most runners.
The Inov-8 Terraclaw 22 offers added drainage in the upper for more breathability and comfort.
2 reasons not to buy
Moderately high-priced shoe.
Limited color choices.
Bottom line
The Inov-8 Terraclaw 220 is a lightweight and affordable running companion. It has been applauded by most runners because it is very lightweight, comfortable and versatile. It is a great trail running shoe that offers a combination of performance and protection. It is ideal for racing and moderately technical trails."
,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,
Reebok Astroride Future,,83.0,,19.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The Reebok Astroride Future was effective in keeping the foot cool during warm days, a user stated.
Many wearers liked that the shoe was lightweight. One user emphasized that they barely felt the shoe while on their foot.
A runner was satisfied with the support provided by the Astroride Future.
The shoe was comfortable yet also felt sturdy, according to a user.
The quality of the shoe was great considering its price, said a customer.
The inside of the shoe efficiently wrapped around the foot that it eliminated the need for a sock, an impressed runner mentioned.
4 reasons not to buy
The shoe caused blisters during the first few uses, according to a buyer.
One user found the shoe to run small.
Some wearers complained about the lack of water drainage system of the Astroride Future.
The material of the upper felt quite thin, a reviewer wrote.
Bottom line
The Reebok Astroride Future has managed to deliver a smooth, comfortable performance that users have found to be reliable and practical. Meanwhile, the shoe’s various structural components received both positive and negative comments. On the overall, many customers liked the Reebok Astroride Future very much that they wanted to buy more than one pair."
Reebok AT Super 3.0 Stealth, Reebok,87.0,,63.0,$130,$69 (save 47%), Trail, Neutral,,, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,, Normal | Normal,,"11 reasons to buy
A significant number of buyers commented that the shoe provided enough grip on different types of surfaces.
According to several runners, the Reebok AT Super 3.0 Stealth was lightweight.
Many purchasers noted that it doesn't need to have a break-in time.
A handful of customers agreed that the shoe was durable.
It was comfortable, based on reviews.
The length of the shoe was true to size, according to a good number of consumers.
Several wearers were impressed with the Reebok AT Super 3.0 Stealth's flexibility.
The majority of the buyers said that they did not experience any blister after several uses.
It was comfortable, based on reviews.
According to most of the individuals who have tried it, the shoe was breathable.
The Reebok AT Super 3.0 Stealth was best used for running, walking and obstacle course.
3 reasons not to buy
Based on some reviews, the shoe gapped a little inside the foot chamber.
A few purchasers observed that it provided less support in the ankle area.
Some of the testers said that the shoe was expensive.
Bottom line
The Reebok AT Super 3.0 Stealth was appreciated enough by a good number of buyers who have tried it. A lot of them loved the comfort and breathability the shoe provided. Aside from its amazing structure, runners gave recognition to the shoes’ design and flexibility. Although some of the consumers have problems with its price and ankle support, others still recommend the shoe because of its fantastic performance. Generally, the Reebok AT Super 3.0 Stealth has made a lot of runners contented because of its durability, versatility, and quality."
Salomon Sense Link,,81.0,,95.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Quick-drying Open Mesh makes up the upper unit of the Sense Link.
The Sensifit overlays offer a more secure fit while the Endofit features a sock-like interior construction.
Injected EVA is the midsole cushioning component of this shoe, which brings plush underfoot support based on the comments of some runners.
Most runners appreciated the Contagrip outsole, which provides reliable traction over various terrains.
The low-cut design and non-prominent outsole design brings freedom of movement and the capability to function on roads.
2 reasons not to buy
The upper material easily broke down for some testers.
Others noted that the mid-sole unit wasn’t very efficient in its cushioning purpose.
Bottom line
The Sense Link is a cool-looking Salomon running shoe that’s great for tempo training over soft trails. It has some supportive mechanics that keep the foot more balanced for better performance."
Newton Distance IV,,81.0,88.0,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7oz , Women: 6.1oz, Men: 2mm , Women: 2mm,,, Newton Distance 9,"8 reasons to buy
The Distance IV fits like a dream for a very comfortable run, based on most comments.
The open mesh upper is very breathable.
Some noted that the upper quickly dries.
It is a great long-distance shoe as observed by a handful.
The cushioning is markedly responsive as observed several.
It is very light and flexible.
Comes in 4 really cool color options.
Almost 360° of reflectivity.
4 reasons not to buy
A large number of runners complained about the poor minimal tongue design.
The flimsy design takes a beating for such an expensive shoe, according to a good number of reviews.
Mostly favors only midfoot and forefoot strikers.
High price point.
Bottom line
The Newton Distance IV is an extremely light shoe that is designed for speed. It has a firm, responsive cushioning with moderate arch support. Seasoned minimalists, marathon enthusiasts, and triathletes should continue to maximize the best out of the shoe. This extremely popular Newton shoe gets even better in this version."
Reebok ZStrike Elite,,81.0,,9.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.6oz , Women: 7.7oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"10 reasons to buy
A lot of consumers were impressed with the visual aesthetics of the Reebok ZStrike Elite, noting that they received compliments while wearing it.
The word ‘comfortable’ was used many times as a means to describe this running shoe.
Some testers were able to use this casually and they stated that it was still an agreeable experience.
Some users have observed that the upper unit was able to wrap around the foot securely, preventing the foot from wobbling inside.
A number of runners felt that it didn’t cause any discomfort, even after using it for long periods of time.
The size and width were lauded because they followed the standard preferences of many of those who have tried it.
Several purchasers noted that the supportive mechanics in the mid-foot area worked well.
The underfoot cushioning system was responsive, according to several testers.
A reviewer wrote that the mid-sole was able to provide enough ‘bounce’ to each step.
For many, the weight of the ZStrike Elite was agreeably light.
2 reasons not to buy
A reviewer commented that felt a soreness in the heel area after a distance of a mile-and-a-half.
A tester reported that it was ½ size smaller than what they were used to.
Bottom line
The Reebok ZStrike Elite received a lot of praise from runners who felt its comfortable components, its supportive mid-sole unit, and the general responsiveness of its platform. For them, it was a great choice for many types of activities. Many of them welcomed its cool, eye-catching design, as well. A few had some complaints about it, but they still ultimately enjoyed this road running shoe."
Mizuno Wave Paradox 3,,89.0,82.0,124.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Mizuno Wave Paradox 5,"8 reasons to buy
The visual aspect of the Mizuno Wave Paradox 3 was welcomed by many runners; the colors were vibrant and fun, they stated.
Some testers lauded the high-quality components & materials used in this version.
An expert reviewer stated that the upper unit was aptly breathable.
A runner commented that they appreciated the responsive nature of the midsole unit.
The stability mechanism present in this model gained favor because it kept the foot stable and free from an uneven performance.
Several consumers observed that the heel area was very well-cushioned; they didn’t perceive the impact forces during the landing phase.
A reviewer mentioned that this shoe’s midsole was long-lasting.
A tester noted that even though this shoe had top levels of cushioning and a firm ride, it was still able to deliver a soft underfoot feel.
4 reasons not to buy
A purchaser noted that the Wave Paradox 3 was noticeably heavy.
The outsole tread has already worn out on a runner after only a distance of fewer than 50 miles.
The heel section of the upper unit felt loose, according to a number of testers.
Several consumers felt that the underfoot platform of the Wave Paradox 3 was not as supportive as its predecessor’s.
Bottom line
The 3rd version of the Mizuno Wave Paradox brought joy to runners who have overpronated motion when performing. A majority of them welcomed the stability features of this road shoe, as well as its firm yet full-bodied underfoot cushioning system. The visual presentation also received some praise. But there were those who didn’t acclimate well to it; some of them felt that it was too stiff, while a few noted that the upper was a bit loose."
Merrell Agility Fusion Flex,,77.0,,15.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.3oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
The offered a reliable grip on slick mud and rain-soaked rocks, a runner reported.
Several runners noted that the upper material was very breathable.
The shoe provided adequate support in the Achilles area, said a buyer.
A couple of customers mentioned that the Agility Fusion Flex looked stylish.
Many users claimed that the shoe was true to size.
One wearer was impressed with how the shoe relieved their stress on the joints.
The toe box was spacious, stated a runner.
The Merrell Agility Fusion Flex delivered remarkable ankle stability, according to a commenter.
2 reasons not to buy
Some of the seams caused irritation and blisters, a user commented.
One wearer felt an unusual lump under the shoe, which felt uncomfortable.
Bottom line
The consensus among runners is that the Merrell Agility Fusion Flex was a reliable trail running shoe; this was evidenced by positive comments regarding support, stability, and traction. While the fit was spot-on, a few experienced discomforts while wearing the shoe. In summary, the Merrell Agility Fusion Flex was an impressive runner that excelled on outdoor adventures."
Under Armour Charged Bandit 2,,83.0,85.0,2432.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Under Armour Charged Bandit 4,"7 reasons to buy
Those with narrow feet appreciated how the upper unit of the Under Armour Charged Bandit 2 was able to conform securely to their foot-dimensions.
Many testers welcomed the appealing color schemes of this model, because their colleagues were able to notice them and give them positive remarks.
The breathable and form-fitting upper unit was greatly lauded and welcomed.
A lot of runners generally described this running shoe as comfortable right out of the box.
The underfoot cushioning was adequately responsive, as noted by those who tried it.
The foot-conforming underfoot platform was able to deliver reliable support, noted some users.
This shoe felt agreeably lightweight, commented some purchasers.
3 reasons not to buy
A tester commented that the toe-box of the wide version was narrow and a bit off.
One runner felt that the heel cup wasn’t as effective at locking the foot in place.
A purchaser stated that the inside section of the collar had a tendency to rub irritatingly against the ankle
Bottom line
Generally praised for its comfortable upper construction, supportive mid-sole, and appealing design, the Under Armour Charged Bandit 2 is a running companion for those who desire quality service and performance. Some negative comments highlighted its narrow fit and its apparently flimsy heel cup. Still, many said that it’s a reliable option for daily running and casual use."
Adidas Madoru 2.0, Adidas,87.0,75.0,40.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 7.7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The comfort is unbeatable in the 2nd version of the Madoru based on a good number of reviews.
Most runners consider the shoe a bargain for its price.
The durability is more than average, which is great, considering its affordable really affordable price.
It is a very stylish shoe that is eerily similar to one of the most expensive shoes in Adidas’ lineup, according to some comments.
The Madoru 2.0 is a reliable trainer that can be used for casual wear.
It has decent flexibility.
The super breathable coverage ensures a cool and dry run.
2 reasons not to buy
Several runners made the observation that the cushioning is too soft.
A number of users believe that a slight weight reduction would have made this a serious lightweight trainer.
Bottom line
The Adidas Madoru 2.0 is a lightweight road running shoe designed for neutral runners. Even in its inexpensive shoes, Adidas continues to push the limit between performance and lifestyle. The Madoru 2.0 is a no-frills type of shoe that delivers plush cushioning, moderate arch support, and top of the line appeal."
Nike Flyknit Air Max 2016,,69.0,75.0,6.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.8oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Nike Flyknit Air Max 2015,"7 reasons to buy
Many runners appreciated the Flyknit upper unit, which provided them with excellent breathability and stretch.
The Flywire technology on the medial and lateral sides helps in customizing the fit.
The Cushlon full-length foam offers strong yet plush underfoot cushioning.
Many reviewers lauded the Air Max and Cushlon cushioning systems, which carried their feet responsibly and protected them from impact.
Though expensive in price, many runners noted that the Flyknit Air Max 2016 was a great value for their money because of the comfort received and the high quality materials.
Durability is high in this model because it’s been constructed well with the use of strong and reliable components.
The many color schemes available for this model make it visually appealing.
3 reasons not to buy
Most of the complaints were about its weight, which was a bit too heavy.
The outsole wasn’t able to handle slippery surfaces, some testers said.
A few noted that this model didn’t have as much support as the previous version.
Bottom line
The series that’s popular among many has just improved its roster with the Flyknit Air Max 2016. This new iteration has been designed for neutral runners and it’s a great choice for daily running and fitness trainings."
Asics LyteRacer,,75.0,,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.2oz , Women: 7.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Asics LyteRacer 2,"5 reasons to buy
Many admire the Asics Lyteracer’s lightweight construction. 
According to a number of runners, it is highly responsive. 
It is highly versatile; it can perform on multiple surfaces. 
Quite a few appreciate its breathable properties. 
Several state that it is highly durable. 
2 reasons not to buy
Some find the Lyteracer a little too expensive. 
It doesn’t have a secure fit, commented one purchaser. 
Bottom line
The Asics Lyteracer is specially built for neutral runners who want to experience responsiveness and comfort. Its design allows it to yield versatility as it can perform and maintain superb traction on various surfaces. With the Asics Lyteracer, expect a lightweight, durable, and responsive running experience. "
Reebok Runner 3, Reebok,87.0,,86.0,$55,$40 (save 27%), Road, Neutral,,,,,," Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Normal", Reebok Runner 4,"7 reasons to buy
People have commented that the Reebok Runner 3 was true to size.
The available width profiles were lauded for being accurate and accommodating.
Some consumers stated that the aesthetics of this running shoe were appealing to the eyes.
The underfoot experience given by the midsole unit was welcomed because it was apparently highly comfortable.
All testers appreciated the affordable price of the Reebok Runner 3.
According to several purchasers, the upper unit was able to hug the foot securely without causing any hot spots or other sources of discomfort.
The traction capacity of the outsole unit was praised for being precise; apparently, the foot felt like it was swerving, lunging and braking with ease and natural dynamism.
2 reasons not to buy
A few runners lamented the lack of arch support; they felt their underfoot tendons and muscles getting fatigued quickly.
A couple of testers noted that the one-tone color scheme of this shoe wasn’t very striking. They would’ve liked some additional colorways to liven the shoe’s silhouette.
Bottom line
The Reebok Runner 3 was able to receive positive feedback from many consumers. The various mechanisms and features of this product were lauded for being highly efficient and pleasant against the skin. The price was also highlighted for being wallet-friendly. For many, this product became a fantastic option for beginners and casual shoe enthusiasts. On the other hand, a handful of people complained about the lack of arch support.
Neutral pronators and road running aficionados are the target consumers of the Reebok Runner 3. It has been hailed as an amicable product for daily activities."
Scott Kinabalu,,84.0,90.0,8.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The seamless construction of the upper unit is welcomed by those who have tried the Scott Kinabalu.
A couple of consumers are appreciative of the cushioning system of this shoe, stating that the performance is reactive.
The external pad of the platform is hailed by some as a dependable layer that protects against wear-and-tear.
Some wearers say that the durability of the materials is commendable.
The lightly padded collar is praised for supporting the ankles and Achilles region.
The thin tongue unit has caught the attention of some testers as it didn’t cause any hot spots nor deviate from its position at the instep.
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of runners lament the stifling in-shoe experience of the Scott Kinabalu.
A tester has claimed that the low-ceilinged instep of this product has a tendency to rub against the skin.
Bottom line
The overall feedback for the Kinabalu shoe from Scott has been mostly positive. People like this model for having a comfortable midsole, a form-fitting upper, a protective outsole, and general durability that is reliable. The reactions point to a design process that is thoughtful and accommodating of the trail running enthusiast. On the other hand, the too-warm in-shoe environment and the irritating concave ceiling of the upper have earned some criticism.
Fans of trail running shoes that are for neutral foot pronation are the ones who are likely to enjoy the Scott Kinabalu."
Asics Gel Excite 6 Twist,,85.0,,9.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Many of the buyers hail the comfort of the Asics Gel Excite 6 Twist. 
A few athletes note that the shoe has a good grip even on wet surfaces. 
The neutral shoe is extremely light, complimented numerous runners. 
It offers versatile function, shared multiple delighted customers. 
There are several experts claiming that the running platform has a durable composition. 
A number of reviewers appreciate the springiness of the road running shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
The toe box of the shoe is too cramped, expressed quite a few testers. 
Multiple wearers state that the platform lacks support. 
According to various wearers, the running shoe needs some time to break in.
Bottom line
Featuring a fine-tuned design, the Gel Excite 6 Twist from Asics sports a versatile-wear exterior with an athletic twist. Meant to for running with complete freedom, the Asics shoe is ideal for runners who are aiming to have a multi-purpose function for their purchase and those who want to go the distance. Aside from its money-saving qualities, the platform also gears the racer with superb comfort and spring for optimal propulsion."
Asics Gel Nimbus 21 Winterized,,77.0,,6.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 11.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The in-shoe experience given by the Asics Gel Nimbus 21 Winterized is considered snug yet homey.
Some have stated that the cushioning system is responsive enough to maintain comfort throughout an entire day.
The grip that is afforded by the outsole is deemed dependable and consistent.
Several testers have taken notice of the multilayered upper that allows them to tackle cold conditions with ease.
The durability of the materials used for this Asics running shoe is lauded by consumers.
2 reasons not to buy
A few testers believe that the inner walls of this product are a bit too snug for the foot to relax.
A stuffy in-shoe experience is felt by some runners who lamented the cold-weather-specific configuration of this shoe.
Bottom line
All-in-all, people like the Asics Gel Nimbus 21 Winterized. This road running shoe has a design that is deemed durable and accommodating. The shoe offers a cold-optimized upper configuration upper, as well as a reactive platform. These elements are ideal for neutral runners looking to enjoy their activities in wintry conditions."
Reebok All Terrain Super 2.0,,80.0,81.0,81.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 7.9oz , Women: 6.7oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The Terrain Skin panels and the DuraGrip toe box secure the foot entirely for a well-protected foot coverage.
Most reviewers lauded the low-cut design, which encouraged more freedom of movement.
The CMEVA component makes up the entire mid-sole unit, offering a low stack-height platform.
Most runners noticed the H2O Drain ports, which are helpful in keeping water out of the shoe.
The outsole unit of the 2nd version of the All Terrain Super utilizes sticky rubber with gripping lugs for a reliable hold on the surfaces, according to a good number of reviews.
It has a lightweight nature.
2 reasons not to buy
There were runners who noticed the sides of the shoe get torn after a few uses.
Others felt that the fit was a bit narrow, particularly in the mid foot area.
Bottom line
The All Terrain Super 2.0 from Reebok is a good-looking trail shoe that offers protection and arch support for the foot through the trails. It’s a neutral shoe that’s robust in terms of traction and underfoot cushioning."
Asics Gel Kenun Shinkai,,80.0,83.0,6.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.2oz , Women: 11.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The shark-inspired design of the Asics Gel Kenun Shinkai was welcomed by many people.
Most testers appreciated its lightweight disposition.
‘Comfortable’ was a term that’s often utilized to describe this shoe.
The smoothness of the upper unit’s construction was lauded because it didn’t irritate the skin.
The traction-capacity of the outsole was deemed reliable, a person reported.
1 reasons not to buy
The toe-box was a little tight, according to some consumers.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Kenun Shinkai was a recipient of mostly positive reviews. Purchasers flocked towards this shoe’s apparently appealing design and its smooth upper construction. They also liked its light and comfy disposition. Some consumers felt that it was a bit tight, but it’s an issue that’s easily remedied."
Mizuno Wave Legend 2,,80.0,,18.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Mizuno Wave Legend 4,"8 reasons to buy
Comfort is a valuable asset in the Legend 2, according to most reviews.
It is an excellent value for the money shoe.
A good number liked the stable and cushioned ride.
The outsole durability is as good as any with the X-10 compound.
A removable insock enhances fit and comfort.
Some runners appreciated the responsiveness of the ride.
The new mesh offers enhanced breathability.
The Legend 2’s 12mm offset is good for heel strikers.
2 reasons not to buy
A handful wished for lower numbers on the scale.
It is fairly limited to short distance runs as the weight plays a factor, noted a few.
Bottom line
The Wave Legend 2 is a highly-cushioned trainer with adequate arch support and a bit of flexibility. While it is not the lightest of trainers, it does have a smooth transition and decent responsiveness despite the tons of cushioning. For heavy runners, this can last the distance and very well worth the price."
Mizuno Wave Kien 3,,80.0,,15.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Runners appreciated the reliable traction capabilities of the Mizuno Wave Kien 3 because it was able to hold onto the trails with sureness.
The comfortable upper was welcomed by testers.
According to a reviewer, the upper fabrics in this iteration were much more breathable than the previous version’s.
The overlay system and padded collar gained some approval because they kept the heel in place and prevented accidental shoe removals.
There was a runner who commented that this shoe felt adequately lightweight.
The X10 outsole was appreciated by some reviewers because it dutifully protected the rest of the sole unit from impact and abrasion.
A reviewer lauded the versatility of the Wave Kien 3 because it functioned well as a running companion for both the roads and the trails.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners stated that the tongue of this shoe tended to move a lot, thus irritating the top part of the foot.
A few runners observed that this version is arguably less responsive than its previous iterations.
According to a runner, the upper cover system wasn’t very secure because small pebbles tended to enter the shoe through the tongue and the collar.
Bottom line
Those who have tried the Mizuno Wave Kien 3 appreciated its performance and service. For them, it was able to function well on both the roads and the trails. Many even thought that the overall quality of this shoe allowed them the confidence to use it for many types of activities. It was also observed that some of its components had marked improvements over the previous version. Neutral runners quickly treated this iteration as a solid running companion."
Puma Ignite Ultimate Layered,,80.0,,15.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.3oz , Women: 10.7oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The Puma Ignite Ultimate Layered is a shoe that offered testers a good amount of comfort.
One reviewer used the shoe for soccer and it proved to have an adequate grip on the turf.
Some users indicated that the shoe delivers a cozy fit at half a size up.
A reviewer used the shoe for walking 6 miles a day. He mentioned that he did not need to break the shoe in.
Another tester utilized the shoe for her 5K training. Based on her review, she narrated that her feet did not feel tired nor did she feel any soreness.
The shoe being of great value was predominantly mentioned in several reviews.
3 reasons not to buy
The Puma Ignite Ultimate Layered comes in only a few color ways which were regrettable to some testers.
A number of testers felt that this shoe was larger than expected.
One reviewer observed that the outsole came off after only four days of usage. This reviewer mentioned that he did not use the shoe for intense workouts. He mostly used it for activities that required moderate footwork such as running short distances and going to the gym.
Bottom line
With its unmistakable style, the Puma Ignite Ultimate Layered can easily pass off as a stylish, everyday sneaker. However, Puma aimed to introduce a shoe that has been upgraded in terms of energy return to the market. Focusing on this goal, the Ignite Ultimate Layered was designed to be a neutral running shoe, capable of handling moderate forms of exercises while delivering comfort and efficient energy return."
Adidas Speedfactory AM4SH, Adidas,83.0,,8.0,$200,$70 (save 100%), Road, Neutral,,,,, Jul 2018, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
A lot of people welcomed the slip-on design of the Adidas Speedfactory AM4SH, stating that it was easy to put on the shoe.
The design of this running shoe was lauded; runners received many compliments when wearing it.
The patch-reinforced upper kept the foot secure and in place, according to several testers.
The traction capacity of the outsole was well-liked; the rubber apparently held on to dry and wet surfaces with ease.
Many runners were happy with the comfortable Boost midsole.
2 reasons not to buy
Several consumers felt that the width was a bit narrow.
A few people complained that the colors and portions of the upper wore off after only several uses.
Bottom line
A lot of people were happy with the Adidas Speedfactory AM4SH and what it had to offer. The neutral running shoe has a pleasant design, responsive midsole foam, easy-to-wear construction, and grippy external pad which were highlighted as elements that contributed to a well-rounded performance on the roads. Some people had complaints about the durability and the fit profile, but these complaints weren’t deal-breaking to most."
Reebok Driftium Ride 2, Reebok,82.0,,13.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"8 reasons to buy
A lot of the reviewers admire the comfort of the Reebok Driftium Ride 2.
The running shoe has a durable outsole composition, remarked some athletes. 
According to a few wearers, the shoe has good traction. 
Various customers laud the versatile use of the road running shoe. 
For several testers, the neutral running platform is very breathable. 
Many of the purchasers praise the lightness of the running shoe.
The road running shoe has ample support, observed numerous users. 
Multiple customers have expressed that the running shoe is very flexible.
3 reasons not to buy
The neutral road running shoe restricts movements of the foot, shared some experts. 
According to a number of commenters. the Driftium Ride 2 is too tight.
Some shoppers have experienced abrasions on the foot because of the shoe.
Bottom line
Embodying the perfect blend of comfort and style, the Reebok Driftium Ride 2 is a must-have for runners who seek to enhance their speed. Equipped with reliable technologies, the road running shoe supplies just the right amount of plushness and support for a stable performance. Featuring an excellent outsole configuration, the running shoe powers grip for pronounced propulsion. With the Driftium Ride 2 from Reebok, athletes can expect sturdiness and stability loaded in a featherlight platform."
Mizuno WaveKnit S1,,,,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,
Inov-8 Trail Talon 275,,81.0,84.0,20.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The upper unit of the Inov-8 Trail Talon 275 breathed well and stayed dry, noted a reviewer.
Many thought that the modern design of this running shoe made it attractive.
Testers were in agreement when they stated that it had an adequate weight that didn’t drag their feet down.
The outsole gripping lugs were efficient at giving reliable grip on the surfaces, wrote an expert reviewer.
The mid-sole cushioning system of this model is a bit more substantial than its sister running shoe, the Trail Talon 250; runners felt that it was a bonus that allowed their feet to handle long running sessions.
The platform of the Trail Talon 275 was responsive and comfortable, as commented by a reviewer.
Testers welcomed the inclusion of a gusseted tongue, which halted debris from entering the shoe.
1 reasons not to buy
An expert reviewer wrote that those who wanted to get excellent ground-feel might not enjoy the Inov-8 Trail Talon 275 because the underfoot experience felt a little too cushioned.
Bottom line
The Inov-8 Trail Talon 275 was created to provide reliable performance on the trails. Runners generally liked the responsive mid-sole, the breathable coverage and the outsole grip. Strong reviews certainly elevated this neutral running shoe’s credibility, making it one to rely on."
Reebok Ahary Runner, Reebok,83.0,,212.0,$65,$34 (save 48%), Road, Neutral,,,,,," Narrow, Normal, Wide, X-Wide | Normal, Wide",,"10 reasons to buy
Some reviewers loved its appealing color combination.
Many wearers mentioned that the Reebok Ahary Runner was one of the well-constructed shoes they have ever worn.
Some of the purchasers agreed that the shoe was durable.
A good number of consumers noted that the design was stylish.
The Reebok Ahary Runner was comfortable, according to those who have tried it.
The majority of the buyers commented that the shoe provided enough support.
Several reviewers loved its lightweight structure.
Many consumers noted that the shoe has a reasonable price.
Based on some reviews, the fit was amazing.
A handful of testers said that the shoe has good quality.
2 reasons not to buy
According to some buyers, the shoe was too narrow.
The shoe runs small, several users commented.
Bottom line
The Reebok Ahary Runner has made a lot of users amazed and happy because of its excellent fit and support. Aside from its impressive construction, the shoe also offers the right amount of comfort and style. While others have issues with the width and size, others still recommended the shoe because of its high quality and fantastic performance. Overall, the Reebok Ahary Runner is a perfect investment for those who are looking for a comfortable and durable yet affordable running shoe."
Puma Ignite Proknit,,86.0,83.0,27.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 11.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
The best asset of the Puma Ignite Proknit is its comfort, according to most runners.
Breathability is more than sufficient based on the observations of a handful of those who tried using the shoe.
A large portion of runners agrees that the durability of the Ignite Proknit is superb.
The responsiveness of the cushioning permit runners to enjoy the miles as remarked by many.
Numerous runners were greatly impressed by the Puma Proknit’s flexibility despite the ample cushioning.
A thunderous approval from many runners is directed towards the way the upper hugs the foot.
The traction is good enough for most of the runners to enjoy their runs, even when it rains.
Wearing the Ignite Proknit for casual wear is a solid option as experienced by a handful.
3 reasons not to buy
An ounce or two off of the Puma Ignite Proknit is ideal as mentioned by a majority of the comments.
The slashed $120 price tag is considered by a few as too expensive.
There are a small number of runners who wanted better durability in the shoe.
Bottom line
The Puma Ignite Proknit is a superbly comfortable shoe that could have shed some of its weight to really stand out. Runners with medium to high arches will find the arch support sufficient from start to finish. It is a rather versatile shoe as it does quite well for casual wear."
Saucony Mystic,,86.0,,315.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The good looks and design of the Saucony Mystic gained positive response based on some reviews.
A few mentioned that they were able to use the shoe at work and during gym workouts. 
Some runners admired the lightweight design of the Mystic.
The shoe is affordable.
The Saucony Mystic is a very comfortable running shoe, said some happy wearers.
The shoe helped reduce shin splints while running, as mentioned by some users.
2 reasons not to buy
A few mentioned that the shoe is not durable.
The shoe is not as supportive as expected, according to various runners.
Bottom line
The Saucony Mystic is a moderately cushioned neutral running shoe with breathable mesh and supportive overlays. Though some have issues with durability and sizing, this shoe is still a good option for runners who are looking for an affordable road and a great daily training partner. "
Salomon Sense Pro 2,,92.0,84.0,116.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,, Salomon Sense Pro 4,"8 reasons to buy
The comfort that the Sense Pro 2 delivers is unbelievable based on the comments of many runners.
Durability is another feature that most runners were impressed with in the new model.
Salomon’s Contagrip outsole is simply superb where traction and durability are concerned, according to some testers.
More than several runners loved its racing-type feel of fit and design.
The Salomon Sense Pro 2 tackles almost all types of distances and in different speeds as some users have commented.
The Endofit technology offers a next to skin wrap that hugs the foot in security and comfort.
It has several protection schemes designed for trail running that will make runners confident with every stride.
A removable Ortholite footbed works for runners in a lot of ways.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners felt like it is slightly more expensive than the competition.
A few users wished for shorter laces.
Bottom line
The Salomon Sense Pro 2 is an extremely versatile shoe that tackles a variety of trail surfaces with ease and comfort. It has the feel of a racing shoe, but with the cushioning of a durable trainer. Trail lovers will love the insane grip, the stable platform, and the fantastic comfort of this shoe. This updated version will only excite the hordes of Sense Pro fans."
Reebok All Terrain Freedom, Reebok,79.0,,75.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 14oz , Women: 14oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The Reebok All Terrain Freedom is very comfortable, based on some reviews.
Several runners said that the shoe has reliable durability.
A few admired the style and overall design of the Reebok All Terrain Freedom so much that they liked to wear it, even during casual walks.
It has an affordable price, said a few purchasers.
One satisfied customer said that this running shoe featured a wide toe-box that allowed his toes to splay comfortably.
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of users mentioned that they experienced a loose fit in the heel area.
The grip of the outsole is disappointing to some runners.
Bottom line
Overall, the shoe gained positive feedback from most users. According to their experiences, the Reebok All Terrain is a comfortable yet aggressive shoe packed with reliable technologies needed for trail running. The shoe has a good combination of durability, grip, and comfort."
Mizuno Wave Prodigy 2,,,,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 8.7oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,
Adidas Powerblaze,,75.0,,1001.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11oz , Women: 11oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, 361 Degrees Meraki 2,"8 reasons to buy
Most customers thought the Adidas Powerblaze was very comfortable; one such person commented that the shoes felt nice, even after ten hours of wearing them.
The majority of people mentioned how these shoes had a fairly good energy return.
A few runners liked how these shoes fit around their feet—it was neither too tight, nor too loose.
A few purchasers also appreciated the light weight of these shoes.
A runner highlighted that the shoes had good traction properties and were perfect for running on wet pavements.
A distance runner commented how the Powerblaze had the right kind of heel cushioning.
A user said that his feet remained comfortably cool and dry during his runs and workouts.
The aesthetic looks of this shoe gained positive remarks.
3 reasons not to buy
A person with high arches commented that the shoes did not provide sufficient side support; he also felt his feet sliding on the padded insole.
A purchaser reported that some parts of the Adidas Powerblaze had started to wear off after only a few months of use.
A user felt excessive chafing against his heel.
Bottom line
With optimal cushioning, impressive traction and high breathability, Adidas Powerblaze has earned many fans in the market ever since its launch. The Powerblaze running shoes are ideal for neutral runners looking for advanced gripping properties and high breathability in a shoe."
Asics Gel FujiEndurance,,87.0,84.0,51.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.9oz , Women: 9.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The 6mm sockliner and the soft fabric lining deliver the kind of comfort runners look for in any shoe.
The FujiEndurance’s durability is simply incredible, based on most comments.
A good number of reviews consider the price tag is decent enough for a shoe of its kind.
The traction of the FujiEndurance is very sticky and designed for wet conditions on mud, rocks, and technical trail.
Asics designed the lugs that allow runners to take this shoe for a ride on the road.
The flexibility and ground feedback of the shoe are moderate enough, despite the lugs and the rock protection plate.
The Plasmaguard technology repels water and mud without sacrificing breathability.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners found the heel counter as too stiff.
The external heel counter and slightly firmer sole is a bit much on flat surfaces, according to some testers.
A handful of testers considered the fit a bit too narrow.
Bottom line
Asics adds a new line to its fairly limited trail shoes in the FujiEndurance. The shoe is moderately cushioned with average lugs that enable runners to transition from the road to the trail. Runners will really like its responsive ride with very noticeable ground feedback and water-repelling properties."
Salomon X-Scream 3D GTX,,79.0,,29.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The GORE-TEX waterproof material used in the upper keeps the foot cool and protected from water while inside the shoe.
Along with the breathable fabric, the upper also utilizes components which make sure the foot stays comfortable.
The cushioning system is comprised of separate units that make up one efficient underfoot foam.
Heel strikers appreciate the added cushioning in the rear section of the X-Scream 3D GTX.
The outsole features a robust unit that offers traction and protection for the shoe against debris.
Testers acclimated to the non-protruding design of the outsole, making it great for transitioning between the roads and the trails.
3 reasons not to buy
The X-Scream 3D GTX has a moderately high price.
Some reviewers felt that the shoe was too narrow for their feet.
Others thought that it needed more cushioning, especially since it’s a running shoe that’s meant for the trails.
Bottom line
The X-Scream 3D GTX from Salomon is a neutral trail running companion that can be used by anyone. The waterproofing capability, as well as its durability & comfortable cushioning, would ensure safety and security for athletes. Though some runners were happy with the shoe’s performance, others also believed that the X-Scream 3D GTX is an average shoe that still needs some improvements."
Mizuno Wave Ibuki GTX,,,,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 12oz , Women: 10.1oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,
Skechers GOmeb Strada 2,,79.0,,11.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 8.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The upper unit of the Skechers GOmeb Strada 2 uses mesh, which covers the foot in a snug and secure way.
A molded heel counter locks the foot down and keeps it in place.
Reflective materials on the upper make it easy to stay visible in low-light conditions.
Runners welcomed the 3D printed overlays, which didn’t add weight to the shoe or make it stiff.
A removable insole improves cushioning, should runners desire.
The mid-sole cushioning is plush, flexible and lightweight, and it was very agreeable to many runners.
Traction and additional cushioning are given by the high quality outsole rubber.
1 reasons not to buy
The Skechers GOmeb Strada 2 has a slightly expensive price.
Bottom line
The 2nd version of the Skechers GOmeb Strada offers breathability, comfort, and protection. It’s an update that does away with extra layers and uses printed overlays instead. It looks good and it functions well. It’s a solid choice for long runs and casual purposes."
Brooks Cascadia 11 GTX,,79.0,83.0,22.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.6oz , Women: 10.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Brooks Cascadia 14 GTX,"7 reasons to buy
The general durability of the Brooks Cascadia 11 GTX was given praise by runners who tried it.
The waterproof feature of this model was lauded by consumers because it allowed them to tackle wet surfaces and conditions with ease and confidence.
A tester commented that this shoe was true-to-size.
Several runners have described this running shoe as comfortable.
The raised mid-foot section of the platform pleased those who wanted some contoured support for the arch.
The outsole gripping lugs didn’t disappoint the purchasers; they wrote that these indentations were able to grip the surfaces with ease.
Some testers noted that the outsole was suitably effective on wet surfaces; it prevented them from slipping.
3 reasons not to buy
The toe box was a bit narrow for some runners.
Several consumers reported that the tongue and lacing system tended to irritate the skin, causing some noticeable discomfort.
A few testers wrote that this version of the Cascadia just didn’t give as much comfort as its predecessors.
Bottom line
The Brooks Cascadia 11 GTX was generally appreciated by runners who have neutral foot-pronation. They welcomed the contoured support that’s available for the arch of the foot. They also deemed the GORE-TEX® upper to be a highlight of this shoe because it protected their feet from water infiltration. Inversely, several consumers felt that its forefoot section was a bit narrow. Others reported that it was a step back from the overall quality and performance of this series’ previous iterations."
Mizuno Wave Aero 15,,79.0,,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.9oz , Women: 6.9oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The Dynamotion fit creates a snug, but comfortable feel in the Mizuno Aero 15.
It is quite light.
Several runners consider the price as bang for the buck.
It functions as a race day shoe or as a minimalist trainer.
Some reviewers mentioned how smooth their strides were in the 15th edition of the Wave Aero.
A handful of runners appreciated the good cushioning, coming from a racing flat.
The shoe is distinctly responsive, based on the observations of a small group of runners.
2 reasons not to buy
The latest Mizuno Wave Aero is a bit narrower than the earlier model, according to a few runners.
A handful wished for better color combinations.
Bottom line
The Aero 15 offers the most cushioning among all the racing flats in Mizuno’s fold. As such, it can function as a race day shoe or a daily trainer for fast workouts. The versatility of the shoe makes it an attractive option for those who want a multi-purpose shoe without having to spend more. It brings excellent form-fitting fit, superb comfort, decent arch support, and speed. The latest version of this shoe promises to be one of Mizuno’s most popular shoes, as evidenced by its 15th incarnation."
Puma Ignite Dual Disc,,79.0,,18.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"9 reasons to buy
Many consumers felt comfortable while wearing the Puma Ignite Dual Disc.
Some wrote that it was adequately lightweight; they didn’t feel as if it dragged their feet down.
A lot of testers noted that it was easy to put on because they didn’t need to bother with traditional shoelaces.
According to a number of reviewers, the Disc Fit System allowed a highly customizable fit that’s tuned to the individual’s preference.
The way the shoe was constructed impressed some runners, and they stated that it was durable and dependable.
This model looked visually appealing, according to those who have tried it.
A runner commented that the upper unit’s fabrics were able to wrap snugly and securely around the contours of the foot, staving off blisters and welts.
Many purchasers were satisfied with the responsiveness of the mid-sole unit.
The flexibility of the platform received positive feedback because, apparently, it didn’t limit the natural movement of the foot.
5 reasons not to buy
The arch support unit in the mid-sole didn’t fully provide comfort for longer running sessions, a tester observed.
The Puma Formstrip on the side easily got scratched and that made the façade less appealing, according to a consumer.
The tongue rubbed irritatingly against the lower leg of a tester.
A runner reported that the underfoot cushioning system felt very rigid.
Based on the comments of some purchasers, this running shoe was a size smaller than what they were used to.
Bottom line
The Puma Ignite Dual Disc generally received positive reviews. Many runners were able to feel comfortable while they wore it and used it for their running sessions. For them, the Disc Fit System was unique, yet efficient. They also praised the efficacy of its individual parts. It’s a solid choice for those with neutral pronation. Though, some wrote that they weren’t as impressed with a few of this road shoe’s components, they were still able to enjoy it fully."
Mizuno Wave Hayate 3,,79.0,,43.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.4oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,, Mizuno Wave Hayate 6,"6 reasons to buy
The users praised the snug yet agreeable fit of the Mizuno Wave Hayate 3.
Some runners found the midsole of this shoe very comfortable on the trails.
Most wearers mentioned that the shoe ‘looked great’ since it had an ‘amazing’ style.
A reviewer thought that the Wave Hayate 3 provided good traction on trails that were tricky.
A runner was very happy with the flexible performance of the shoe’s outsole when it came to various types of surfaces.
Many consumers liked the color combinations of the shoe.
3 reasons not to buy
For a few runners, even larger sizes did not prevent chafing in the forefoot region.
Most users found the shoe’s toe-box a bit too narrow.
The sole unit easily wore off, according to a tester. He stated that after tackling a long trail running session, he already felt the hardness of the outsole gripping lugs.
Bottom line
The third iteration of the Mizuno Wave Hayate generated mixed opinions from the users. Generally, the runners liked this neutral trail running shoe for its comfortability and good looks. However, they stated that the shoe can certainly use some work on its sizing for its future models."
Merrell MTL Skyfire,,,,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.5oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,
Hoka One One Hupana Knit Jacquard,,81.0,,27.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.4oz , Women: 6.9oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
People noticed that the upper unit of the Hoka One One Hupana Knit Jacquard offered breathable coverage.
The lightweight nature of this running shoe was lauded by many consumers.
The underfoot experience was deemed comfortable by most testers.
Some purchasers liked that the midfoot section of the platform had a curve that supported the arch.
Several users claimed to have received compliments while wearing this road companion.
2 reasons not to buy
The collar rubbed against the ankle uncomfortably, several people noted.
The fit was a bit tight in the toe box, a couple of people complained.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Hupana Knit Jacquard was able to receive relatively positive reviews. People were happy with the design, the supportive midsole, and the lightweight build of this neutral shoe. But there were also those who didn’t like that the collar rubbed against the skin or that the forefoot was a bit narrow. Still, the praise outweighed the criticisms."
Reebok Sublite Legend, Reebok,79.0,,9.0,$65,$26 (save 94%), Road,, Men: 10oz , Women: 7.5oz,,,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
The lightweight structure of the Reebok Sublite Legend is welcomed by many consumers.
Some users have noted that the midsole unit of this Reebok running shoe is able to properly support the underside of the foot.
The two-tone color schemes are described as appealing yet not-too-flashy.
A versatility in performance is felt by many purchasers; they feel enabled to use this product for any activity.
The breathability of the upper unit is appreciated by those who like a cool and dry in-shoe experience.
An affordable price has been observed by many runners.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people have mentioned that the toe box is a bit restrictive.
The traction capacity of the outsole unit has been deemed inconsistent and flimsy.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of people towards the Reebok Sublite Legend has been mostly positive. Happiness has been expressed because this road running shoe has the capacity to perform well through any activity. The cool-looking silhouette has also been highlighted. Inversely, the apparently restrictive forefoot section and the inefficient surface traction are criticized.
Fans of running shoes that are for neutral pronation can enjoy the Reebok Sublite Legend."
Dynafit Ultra Pro, Dynafit,,76.0,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 9.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,
Under Armour SpeedForm Gemini 2.1,,91.0,,408.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Under Armour SpeedForm Gemini 3,"9 reasons to buy
Most of the reviewers took notice of the great comfort delivered by the SpeedForm Gemini 2.1.
It offers good flexibility despite the well-cushioned ride, according to some runners.
There is a good balance between cushioned comfort and feel for the road in this shoe, based on a couple of reviews.
It is very breathable, as noted by a handful of runners.
There are 5 color combinations.
The cushioning is noticeable without being too soft, as remarked by several runners.
A good number of users loved the good looks of the 2.1 version of the SpeedForm Gemini.
It is quite light for a lot of shoe, according to a more than a few runners.
A few runners were impressed by the upper’s ability to dry quickly.
5 reasons not to buy
The price is a bit stiff for more than a few.
It needs some break-in time, based on the observations of a few runners.
A handful of runners experienced blisters in their Achilles heels.
It is rather small.
The 2.1 version of the SpeedForm Gemini required a break-in period, based on a few comments
Bottom line
The Under Armour designed the SpeedForm Gemini 2.1 for marathons and daily trainings. It has adequate cushioning for miles on the road and for repetitive poundings of day to day running. There is excellent arch support in this shoe and is superbly comfortable. It is great choice for those looking for a durable, flexible, and a light training partner or marathon shoe."
361 Degrees Santiago,,,89.0,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 9.1oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,,,
New Balance 1500 v3,,89.0,88.0,203.0,,, Road, Stability,,, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,, New Balance 1500 v6,"10 reasons to buy
The New Balance 1500 v3 felt agreeably light, stated several consumers.
The stability mechanics that’re present in this model were lauded by overpronators; they wrote that it kept them stable throughout their running sessions.
A consumer noted that the upper unit was able to deliver a snug yet secure fit.
The breathable nature of the fabrics received favor from reviewers who stated that it kept their feet cool and dry.
The grip capability of the outsole gained positive feedback from those who have tried it.
A runner commented that the removable insole allowed more cushioning, but that it also gave way for custom orthotics.
Many testers appreciated the color schemes of the 1500 v3, noting that they were vibrant and eye-catching.
Some comments highlighted this product’s efficacy during gym workouts and indoor exercise sessions.
This shoe felt true-to-size, according to the feedback of several purchasers.
The general quality of the materials used here received praise for being robust and long-lasting.
7 reasons not to buy
The top section of the upper unit felt tight, according to a tester; it caused some pain on the skin.
A runner complained that the insole felt hard; it apparently lessened the overall flexibility of the underfoot platform.
A consumer reported that the tongue of this shoe tended to curl inward, causing some discomfort.
Those who enjoyed the 1500 series as a racing flat felt that the mid-sole of the v3 was thick and heavy.
Some reviewers stated that when not running on flat roads the lateral part of the collar tended to hit the ankles, resulting in some discomfort.
There were some gripes about the sizing of the women’s version, which was apparently ½ smaller than the usual.
The overlay in the forefoot area came apart easily on a tester.
Bottom line
Many consumers were able to appreciate what the New Balance 1500 v3 had to offer. They welcomed its colorful design, its stable platform and its breathable cover system. For them, it was agreeable for use on the roads. But there were runners who had some complaints about some of its components."
Mizuno Wave Prophecy 6,,69.0,60.0,167.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.9oz , Women: 10.5oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Mizuno Wave Prophecy 9,"10 reasons to buy
The color schemes that are available for the Mizuno Wave Prophecy 6 received some praise from many runners.
A reviewer commented that the heel section of the upper unit hugged the foot snugly, but it didn’t feel too tight.
A lot of testers were able to describe this shoe as ‘comfortable’ for their feet.
According to a purchaser, the toe box was roomy enough to allow natural toe-splay.
The raised mid-foot platform was able to support those with flat feet, and they stated that it prevented fatigue during those extended running sessions.
A consumer commented on the padding in the upper unit, noting that it provided some cushioning as it hugged the foot.
The mid-sole in this shoe gained the favor of several runners because, for them, it was responsive and reliable.
Many purchasers noted that the 6th version of the Prophecy was better in quality and construction than its predecessors.
The general width and length of the shoe seemed a bit narrow for a few testers.
According to a reviewer, the mid-sole unit tore apart after only 3 weeks of use.
1 reasons not to buy
The toe box seemed to be narrow, according to a consumer; she felt numbness in the toes because of it.
Bottom line
The general response for the Mizuno Wave Prophecy 6 was positive. Most of those who have tested it have welcomed its appealing looks, its comfortable underfoot platform, and its secure upper coverage. According to them, it’s a solid option for road running. But for some, it was narrow in the forefoot area."
Asics GT 2000 5 Lite-Show,,86.0,,127.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.9oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics GT 2000 6 Lite-Show,"6 reasons to buy
Many consumers stated that the Asics GT 2000 5 Lite-Show was a comfortable shoe for daily use.
Several testers reported that the design of this model was visually appealing.
A purchaser who used this shoe for walking was delighted with the soft and responsive underfoot platform.
The reflective overlays gained positive feedback because it allowed nighttime running sessions to be safer.
The stability mechanism in the sole unit garnered fans as it responsibly corrected overpronation.
Some runners affirmed the apparently correct width measurements of the GT 2000 5 Lite-Show.
1 reasons not to buy
A disgruntled runner complained that the midsole was stiff and unresponsive, causing some fatigue in the legs.
Bottom line
Overall, the response for the Asics GT 2000 5 Lite-Show was positive. People liked this road shoe’s design and its apparently effective mechanisms. They were also happy with its stable underfoot platform. But there were those who had qualms about the midsole, stating that they were poorly implemented."
Merrell Trail Crusher,,83.0,,161.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 7.3oz , Women: 7.3oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Runners appreciated the lightweight nature of the Merrell Trail Crusher.
Many felt that their overall experience with this shoe was comfortable.
The flexibility of the platform gained good remarks from those who needed freedom of motion.
The color schemes of the upper unit were lauded by a tester.
A runner said that this running shoe didn’t have a bulky or unappealing look.
The testers appreciated the non-aggressive outsole design, which allowed them to use this shoe on asphalt.
4 reasons not to buy
A tester wrote that the back part of the shoe rubbed uncomfortably against their skin.
This shoe may not provide support for long-term activities, noted one runner.
The rubber tread of the outsole peeled off easily, according to a dissatisfied runner.
A consumer stated that the cushioning platform felt a bit thin; for her, it wasn’t able to cushion high levels of impact on the uneven ground.
Bottom line
The Merrell Trail Crusher gained praise for its comfortable coverage, appealing looks, and versatile outsole. It was able to deliver great service to those who tried it. Though there were some who weren’t as satisfied with its inner construction, many still found it agreeable for their activities."
Reebok Runner 2.0 MT, Reebok,87.0,,377.0,$60,$48 (save 20%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 8oz,,,," Normal | Normal, Wide",,"5 reasons to buy
Several buyers commented that the Reebok Runner 2.0 MT was a shoe that is worth the price.
The cushioning was excellent, especially in the heel area, a couple of wearers stated.
Many buyers agreed that it was a comfortable shoe.
Every step was refreshing because of the memory foam in the sock liner, a customer said.
The shoe provided sufficient heel support, no matter how active the foot was, a reviewer shared.
5 reasons not to buy
One runner felt that the midsole’s shock-absorbing capability was not sufficient.
The shoe was too flexible and lacked stability, according to a wearer.
A customer said the toe box was short.
The shoe showed signs of wear early, mentioned a disappointed user.
There was not enough arch support from the midsole, a buyer complained.
Bottom line
Although a considerable number, the positive feedback that surrounds the Reebok Runner 2.0 MT were mostly about the comfort and fit, and not much was said regarding its performance. Meanwhile, it is worth noting that the criticisms of the shoe were about structure and durability. In summary, the shoe might be a reliable option for light running, but runners should not expect much when it comes to extreme activities."
Asics Gel Patriot 7,,78.0,50.0,551.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 9.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Patriot 10,"7 reasons to buy
Most of the reviews praised the Patriot 7’s snug fit without being restrictive.
Breathability shines through in the Gel Patriot 7, according to a large number of runners.
Asics enhanced the cushioning in the shoe for better support and shock absorption.
Durability remains to be a huge asset of the Asics Patriot 7.
It has sufficient flexibility, remarked a few runners.
Reflective material is found in the shoe.
It has an affordable price.
2 reasons not to buy
A few runners noted that the Gel Patriot 7 is a bit narrower compared to other shoes from Asics.
For others, the arch was too rigid and stiff, causing some discomfort.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Patriot 7 is a lightweight and affordable stability road running shoe. It ticks the list of practically everything runners of all levels will look for in a training partner. It has superb durability and excellent support. To top it off, the price is just approachable and agreeable."
The North Face Ultra Endurance GTX,,78.0,80.0,16.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.4oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The shoe was fantastic to use on snowy grounds, a user commented.
The Ultra Endurance GTX provided excellent tread for technical trails and even light hiking, said a wearer.
One tester was happy with how the shoe promoted a natural sensation while running.
A lot of runners found the outsole to be extremely grippy.
A buyer was amazed at how the OrthoLite® insert fitted nicely, even with their low arch.
3 reasons not to buy
Some customers thought the Ultra Endurance GTX was expensive.
A couple of runners felt the Gore-Tex® membrane was ineffective, and that the upper had a poor construction that contributed to the shoe getting soaked easily.
The mesh upper came undone after only a brief time of usage, according to a few purchasers.
Bottom line
The Ultra Endurance GTX from The North Face had mostly positive reviews, yet its criticisms are probably hard to ignore. Although the shoe is meant to be waterproof, many users felt it did not do well for this purpose. Others have also expressed their disappointment with the quality of the materials used in the shoe. In summary, the Ultra Endurance GTX might have turned out to be a needless update to an already satisfactory shoe."
Saucony Peregrine 8 GTX,,77.0,,6.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 9.3oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Saucony Peregrine 10 GTX,"6 reasons to buy
Many users consider the arch of the midsole is supportive enough for longer running sessions.
Some runners have expressed their appreciation for the foam midsole’s responsive structure.
The upper unit is lauded for remaining dry, especially when tackling wet conditions.
According to testers, the outsole unit of this running shoe has a traction capacity that is dependable and precise.
The forefoot section has enough room for the relaxation of the toes, based on a couple of reviews.
A consumer has relayed appreciation for the protective nature of the sole unit, emphasizing freedom from stone bruising.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people have observed the outsole rubber wearing off after only several uses.
The limited ventilation of the upper has caused some stifling runs, according to a handful of users.
Bottom line
The overall reaction towards the Saucony Peregrine 8 GTX has been mostly positive. Runners are happy with what this trail running shoe has to offer. The protective and performance-ready design is highlighted. On the other hand, the lack of ventilation and the flimsy outsole durability are criticized.
Those who like Saucony running shoes that are for the off-road paths are the target market of the Peregrine 8 GTX.
 "
Adidas Duramo Lite,,84.0,,612.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
A majority of users commented on how comfortable the shoes are when worn.
The cushioning felt adequate, most of the testers accounted.
The Adidas Duramo Lite was worn as a casual sneaker as well as a gym companion by several testers.
It’s a great starter shoe for light running and cross-training, based on various testers’ reviews.
Users were glad to say that the shoes are budget-friendly.
2 reasons not to buy
Several wearers found the outsole to wear out quickly.
Some users have observed that the upper of the shoes were easily damaged only after a few months of wearing them.
Bottom line
The Adidas Duramo Lite is a neutral road running that’s light and breathable, perfect for various exercises and daily running sessions. Because of its minimalistic design, it can also be worn as a casual sneaker during rest days or workdays. Whatever the case, the Adidas Duramo Lite is a good choice for shoes with a versatile purpose."
Asics Gel 451,,81.0,82.0,128.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7oz , Women: 6oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Some runners admired the lightweight construction of the Asics Gel 451.
The shoe offered enough amount of cushioning without affecting ground contact, said a user.
A few lauded the shoe’s BOA system which offered a secure yet customized fit.
The Gel 451 was easy to wear and take off, attested a few users.
Some buyers claimed that the shoe has a durable outsole.
2 reasons not to buy
Some users disliked the inverted color scheme of the shoe.
The overlays have separated from the shoe quickly, said a reviewer.
Bottom line
Designed for competition, the Asics Gel 451 is meant to deliver speed, comfort, and responsiveness. Many were happy with the shoe’s performance as well as its stylish look, but some were also disappointed with its sizing. Overall, the Gel 451 is a reliable model, and those who want to give this shoe a try must make sure to go one size up."
Asics DynaFlyte 3 Lite-Show,,91.0,,139.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Runners generally liked the aesthetics of the Asics DynaFlyte 3 Lite-Show, stating that the design was eye-catching.
According to several consumers, the toe-off was very responsive because of the springy cushioning unit.
This shoe remained comfortable, even after long running sessions, several reviewers observed.
A couple of testers noted that the weights of the components were suitably light for all-day wear.
The general durability of this road shoe was considered to be top-notch.
1 reasons not to buy
A couple of consumers claimed that the lack of a trusstic system made the midsole less stable.
Bottom line
Many consumers were happy with the Asics DynaFlyte 3 Lite-Show. They welcomed this road companion for its pleasing looks, responsive cushioning system, lightweight build, and lasting durability. There were a few who had complaints about the midsole’s potential for wobbliness, but they were inconsequential compared to the praise given."
Adidas AdiPure Adapt,,66.0,52.0,12.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 4.7oz , Women: 4.1oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
A lightweight running shoe that boosts every runner’s performance in speed work.
For higher durability, the Adidas AdiPure Adapt features a stretch-mesh and rubberized sole that are wear-resistant.
Placed strategically are the bottom rubbers that increase the traction of this shoe.
An easy to wear running shoe because of its stretchable fabric on the upper area of the shoe.
A very affordable running shoe.
Minimalist runners are the ones who will benefit the most from this shoe because of its low heel-to-toe drop.
3 reasons not to buy
A lot of runners took note of the cheap design that the Adapt possesses. Definitely not for stylish runners.
Compared to the rest of the AdiPure collection, the AdiPure Adapt has an uncomfortable feel according to some runners because of its narrow fit.
Flexing the toes is not possible with the Adidas AdiPure Adapt due to its snug fit; it acts like a second skin to the foot.
Bottom line
In order to experience barefoot or minimalist running, the Adidas AdiPure Adapt was created at a very affordable price. Since the shoe’s last is semi-curve in shape, it is ideal for neutral pronators. Boosting your speed is not a problem once you let the AdiPure Adapt take action."
Asics Gel Surveyor 3,,90.0,,192.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.2oz , Women: 9.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Asics Gel Surveyor 5,"6 reasons to buy
It features a removable sockliner for added comfort and cushioning.
Some runners liked the durable construction of the Gel Surveyor 3.
The gel cushioning in the rearfoot and forefoot promotes a smooth transition, remarked quite a number of runners.
Several runners noticed the enhanced stability and support of this shoe.
As noted in some reviews, this shoe is comfortable to wear.
Based on a couple of reviews, the transition is effortless and efficient.
4 reasons not to buy
The Asics Gel Surveyor 3 is an expensive shoe.
Lacks cushioning based on some runners experience.
The toe box is too narrow for some runners.
A bit heavy.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Surveyor 3 is designed for overpronators. It offers cushioning, support and smooth ride on both light and rough trail. Overpronators will surely love the stable platform of this shoe to achieve a great running experience. Though it received both positive and negative feedback, it is still safe to say that the Surveyor 3 is a winning release."
Under Armour Micro G Assert V,,90.0,,155.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.7oz , Women: 7.3oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
It has a lightweight and breathable mesh upper for comfort and support.
Micro G Assert V has an ultra flexible midsole.
Most runners are impressed with the Under Armour Micro G Assert V increased traction and durability.
The Micro G Assert V features durable leather overlays for stability.
The Micro G Assert V is very affordable.
1 reasons not to buy
Few runners are unimpressed with the shoe's overall durability.
Bottom line
Micro G Assert is the right shoe for regular training. With its well-ventilated upper as well as its cushioning system, you will definitely feel comfortable. The shoe acquires positive feedbacks from runners. because of its price, flexibility, and comfort."
Reebok Runner, Reebok,85.0,,156.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.3oz , Women: 9.3oz,,,, Normal | Normal, Reebok Runner 4,"9 reasons to buy
Several runners felt that the Reebok Runner was able to deliver a reliable fit.
Some testers wore the shoe all day and they stated that they remained comfortable throughout the experience.
There’s enough space in the toe box to allow natural toe splay, a consumer commented.
Based on the feedback of purchasers, this shoe looked nice and appealing.
It felt suitably lightweight, according to many of those who have tried it.
Runners noted that this shoe had an affordable price.
The memory foam in the midsole gained some fans because it apparently allowed them a customized underfoot experience.
A runner commented that this shoe’s soft and comfy nature made it feel like walking on cotton.
A few reviewers noticed the exceptional grip of the outsole.
3 reasons not to buy
A runner didn’t feel comfortable while wearing this shoe.
The finger loop was difficult to manipulate, stated a consumer; they wrote that a finger can’t even fit inside the loop.
The Memory Foam wore down quickly, according to a handful of reviewers.
Bottom line
The Reebok Runner was able to perform well, according to a majority of those who have tried it. They were largely impressed with its design, its efficacy, and its competitive price. The memory foam in the midsole gained particular recognition for its apparently soft and form-fitting nature. Overall, it’s a solid choice for neutral runners and those who need a bit of underfoot support while running."
Under Armour Horizon KTV,,76.0,50.0,62.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 9.8oz, Men: 7mm , Women: 7mm, Jan 2017,,,"7 reasons to buy
Most users mentioned that the shoe felt sturdy and supportive.
‘Lightweight’ was an adjective that was frequently found in several reviews.
A lot of users appreciated the vibrant colors of the shoe, as well as its design.
One reviewer mentioned that the shoe protected her feet from getting wet.
The grip of the shoe was very impressive, said a majority of reviewers.
Some testers appreciated that the shoe could be cleaned with minimal effort.
The lacing system was another highlight found in most reviews. Testers said that the tightness of the lacing stayed the same all throughout their runs.
4 reasons not to buy
Most reviewers observed that the shoe felt too tight or too small for their feet.
A few testers mentioned that the shoe heated up easily. They concluded that it was because of the film on the upper of the Under Armour Horizon KTV.
The film layer in the upper also made the shoe stiff, according to a number of reviews.
One tester observed that the color of the shoe’s interior wore off on his white socks after use.
Bottom line
The Horizon KTV is a neutral trail running shoe that has become Under Armour’s re-entry into the trail running category. Coming in with vibrant color variations, the Under Armour Horizon KTV was designed to allow runners to run faster and safer on various terrains. With the shoe’s reliable traction, secure lacing system, and durable upper, it seems that Under Armour’s entrance into the scene of trail running has become a smooth one."
Saucony Cohesion TR 12,,87.0,80.0,390.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.6oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Saucony Cohesion TR 13,"6 reasons to buy
Many consumers claim that the durability of the Saucony Cohesion TR 12 is satisfying; the materials held together, even after many uses.
Several people have noted that this trail running shoe is comfortable right out of the box; it apparently didn’t need a break-in period.
The cushioning system of this product is lauded by those who desire an underfoot platform that is able to responsibly absorb striking impact during the run.
The breathability of the upper is welcomed by runners who appreciate a well-ventilated in-shoe experience.
Some purchasers consider the weight of this Saucony running shoe to be suitably lightweight for extended use.
The affordable price of this product is highlighted by many consumers.
2 reasons not to buy
A few testers report that the upper unit quickly gets wet when exposed to moisture or splashes of water.
The fabrics and overlays look cheap and flimsy, according to a couple of shoe enthusiasts.
Bottom line
The Saucony Cohesion TR 12 has received a lot of positive reviews from those who have tested it. This product is lauded for having durable materials, a comfortable underfoot technology, and a well-ventilated upper. The wallet-friendly price and lightweight construction are also detailed. On the other hand, some say that the upper unit doesn’t look appealing while the moisture-management of the fabrics is also not received with grace.
Fans of neutral running shoes that are designed for the trails are welcome to try the Cohesion TR 12."
Mizuno Wave Daichi 4 GTX,,77.0,,20.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.5oz , Women: 9.9oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
A couple of reviewers claim that the Mizuno Wave Daichi 4 GTX offers sufficient stability. 
Several runners hail the breathability of this running shoe. 
Quite a few racers appreciate its lightness.
According to some users, the platform is very comfortable. 
This Mizuno running shoe has a snug fit, commended a number of buyers.
2 reasons not to buy
One commenter has observed that the shoe lacks shock mitigation. 
This trail shoe does not have a good grip on wet surfaces, reported a few customers.
Bottom line
A trail running shoe built for unmatched protection and adaptability, the Mizuno Wave Daichi 4 GTX powers each stride of the runner. Loaded with a componentry focused on delivering traction on all types of conditions, surefooted stability is supplied. With the display of exceptional features from the Wave Daichi 4 GTX, this neutral shoe is truly a bang-for-the-buck."
Zoot Ovwa 2.0,,77.0,,37.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
It is a triathlon-specific shoe that superbly shines in road competition as well.
Most runners appreciated the Ovwa 2’s versatility as a shoe for the roads and light trails.
It has a lightweight nature.
Comfort is received while wearing it without socks.
Many runners coveted the shoe’s capability for smooth transitions.
The cushioning is noticeable and plush without sapping the runner’s energy, based on the observation of a few testers.
2 reasons not to buy
The Zoot Ovwa 2.0 is slightly more expensive than some of its competitors.
Some runners wanted better flexibility in this shoe.
Bottom line
Runners or tri-athletes will find it hard to look for another shoe that can take on marathon racing or high-mileage training sessions with equal aplomb. The Ovwa 2.0 from Zoot stands out because it has great cushioning, enough arch support for moderate over-pronators, and excellent comfort with every step of the way."
Asics Gel Korika,,77.0,,8.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,, Nov 2019,,,"5 reasons to buy
The cushioning system that is present in the Asics Gel Korika is welcomed by those who have tested it.
The upper unit is lauded for being able to secure the foot at all times.
People have noted that the durability of the materials is agreeable and ever-present.
The surface traction given by the outsole unit is considered reliable.
The aesthetics of this Asics running shoe are appreciated by those who welcome shoe-facades that are stylish.
2 reasons not to buy
A bulky look is apparently observed by some consumers.
A stuffy in-shoe experience is noticed by a few testers.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Korika is made in collaboration with fashion designer, Kiko Kostadinov. This road running shoe has a running-optimized underfoot platform that can assist the progression of the step. However, the upper unit has a reinforced construction that is similar to the configurations of basketball shoes. Neutral pronators are the ones who are likely to enjoy this Asics offering the most."
Inov-8 Roadclaw 240,,77.0,,9.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.5oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The underfoot cushioning system of the Inov-8 Roadclaw 240 was deemed comfortable by its testers.
People liked the color schemes of this road companion, stating that they were visually appealing.
The lightweight nature of this product was welcomed by purchasers.
The flexibility of the platform was appreciated by those who liked to move through the gait cycle naturally.
The price for a pair of Roadclaw 240 shoes was deemed fair.
2 reasons not to buy
The fit was a little loose, according to a few consumers.
Some warned that the inner sleeve tended to irritate the skin.
Bottom line
The overall reaction for the Inov-8 Roadclaw 240 was positive. People liked its visually endearing façade, the lightweight build, and the flexible construction of the platform. Moreover, they felt that the price was accommodating. On the other hand, while the sizing scheme and the width profiles were thought to be inconsistent, the in-sleeve was criticized for being chafing the skin."
Asics Gel Torrance MX,,,,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.1oz , Women: 6.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 9mm,,, Asics Gel Torrance 2,
Reebok Astroride Run Edge, Reebok,77.0,,8.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
The breathable upper was suitable for running under the hot weather, a customer wrote.
Several users agreed that the shoe was lightweight.
The Reebok Astroride Run Edge was a comfortable shoe even after long hours of wear, commented a buyer.
Many consumers found the shoe to be affordable.
The cushioning was felt across the entire foot, mentioned a runner.
The shoe brought exceptional comfort to the ball of the foot, a user remarked.
3 reasons not to buy
A couple of users complained that there was almost zero arch support in the midsole.
Various customers thought the shoe’s materials looked cheap.
The lace loops on the tongue made it difficult to put the shoe on, a tester said.
Bottom line
The Reebok Astroride Run Edge was neither a win nor loss with the mixed reviews it gathered from consumers. Many users liked the shoe’s comfortable and lightweight fit, but there were also numerous complaints about its construction. Overall, the Astroride Run Edge was a good shoe, but not much has been said about its performance."
Mizuno Wave Mujin 5,,,72.0,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 12.7oz , Women: 10.9oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Mizuno Wave Mujin 6,
Salomon Wings Pro 2 GTX,,77.0,,6.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 12.7oz , Women: 10.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The superior traction on basically all types of outdoor surfaces is usually the starting point of the reviews for the Wings Pro 2 GTX.
It is very durable, according to many of the reviewers.
The ProFeel film gives sufficient ground feedback without taking away precious underfoot protection against sharp objects or rugged terrain.
It has a sock-like fit that is generally loved by some users.
The seamless Sensifit overlays reduces risk of blisters or hot spots.
It is quite stable, based on the observations of several runners.
More than a handful were very happy about the now roomy toe box.
3 reasons not to buy
It runs a bit large.
It is very expensive.
Some runners found it to be slightly too heavy.
Bottom line
Salomon introduces a waterproof version in the 2nd version of the Wings Pro. It combines awesome traction and adequate stability on the roughest terrain. The shoe is best maximized on rocky ground, grass, and loose gravel. This may be one of the most expensive shoes on the market, but it does offer serious performance, durability, and good looks in return."
Puma Ballast, Puma,79.0,,17.0,$65,$45 (save 31%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
A portion of the reviewers claims that the Puma Ballast has a good fit.
The road running shoe is very comfortable, expressed several buyers.  
According to quite a few athletes, the neutral running shoe is very light. 
The running platform has ample support, reported some runners. 
For some wearers, the running shoe gives a springy ride.
The shoe's configuration allows for it to perform multiple activities, stated some users.
3 reasons not to buy
According to various experts, the shoe lacks stability. 
The upper is not durable enough, expressed some commenters. 
A few customers have observed that the shoe constricts foot motions
Bottom line
The Puma Ballast has a construction that focuses on delivering a featherlight platform without compromising cushioning. Banking on this design principle, the road running shoe aims to pronounce both comfort and speed. The benefits of the componentry of the neutral runner do not stop there. Featuring some innovative technical pieces, the shoe also maximizes lockdown and support."
Adidas Terrex Speed GTX,,79.0,60.0,17.0,,," Mud, Trail", Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A lot of the wearers appreciate the high level of comfort that the Adidas Terrex Speed GTX offers.   
Several runners place high regard on the snug fit and security the shoe offers.
The waterproof and windproof features of the shoe brought by its Gore-Tex® upper are some of the most lauded features of the shoe by a lot of testers. 
According to one user, this Adidas trail running shoe is extremely lightweight. 
Some runners say that the Terrex Speed GTX has good grip and traction on varying terrains.
A lot of people praise the shoe for its high flexibility; foot can move freely. 
The shoe can be for versatile use⁠—either for running or for streetwear.
3 reasons not to buy
A buyer is disappointed with the shoe’s lack of support.
The shoe’s platform is too dense and lacks response, some reviewers noted. 
An expert states that the shoe is not fit for long-distance running. 
Bottom line
This trail running shoe is highly lauded for its waterproof and windproof features, all thanks to the shoe’s  Gore-Tex® upper. The sock-like construction of the shoe also helps bring in an optimal level of comfort. The shoe is highly versatile as it is not only fit for running, but also as a stylish touch to an everyday casual outfit. So much so that one user said that it was more fitting for everyday wear than long-distance running because it cannot perform when used for such activity. An expert also noted that the midsole of the shoe was too dense that the shoe was great for hiking instead of running. 
The overall consensus for the Adidas Terrex Speed GTX is a mix of both good and bad. However, numerous customers still claim that they would recommend this shoe to their peers. "
Nike Zoom Pegasus Turbo 2 SE, Nike,85.0,,7.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral,,,,,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The majority of the users said that the Nike Zoom Pegasus Turbo 2 SE is comfortable. 
Many runners mentioned that this shoe offers excellent cushioning. 
It is responsive, according to a lot of wearers. 
Numerous consumers notice that the shoe is fast and lightweight.  
A few buyers observed that this shoe offers a snugger fit compared to its predecessors. 
This running partner is also perfect for weight lifting and gym sessions, several consumers claimed.
3 reasons not to buy
A handful of wearers experienced heel slippage while running in the Zoom Pegasus Turbo 2 SE.
Several testers complained that the sole section split after only a few uses.
A couple of purchasers said that tongue construction is a bit odd and causes discomfort.
Bottom line
The Nike Zoom Pegasus Turbo 2 SE is a lightweight running shoe that is intended for running on roads. It is packed with advanced technologies, which aim to provide an efficient and comfortable running experience. This neutral running shoe is ideal for runners with normal gaits or those who do not overpronate."
Adidas Supernova Glide ATR,,76.0,,10.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Comfort trumps every other asset in the Adidas Glide ATR, according to most reviews.
A large portion of the reviews also observed how great the traction is on a multitude of surfaces.
The unbelievable comfort begins with an adaptive upper that fits like a second skin.
Several runners value the shoe’s responsive features.
Cushioning is plush all throughout, observed several users.
Incorporates the responsive and premium cushioning of the Boost midsole.
The Glide ATR’s durability also got good grades from several runners.
3 reasons not to buy
The significant stack heights are a cause for concern for some runners.
It sacrifices proprioception as a result of the cushioning and stack heights.
A bit pricey.
Bottom line
An already capable neutral trail shoe was enhanced greatly by the introduction of the Boost midsole technology. The Adidas Supernova Glide ATR has all the features of an old school type of shoe and will be a delight for heavy heel strikers. It has good arch support and delivers plush comfort every step of the way."
New Balance Fresh Foam Lazr Nations,,,,,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,
Reebok Pheehan Run 4.0, Reebok,76.0,,15.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The ride of the Pheehan Run 4.0 is very comfortable, according to most of the reviews.
It is very affordable.
The shoe no longer has that cheap-looking upper, remarked a few.
Some runners appreciated the plusher interior.
Based on the observation of a small number of runners, it runs surprisingly light.
The outsole has solid durability, as noticed by some users.
The cushioning is loved by many who stand all day long at work.
2 reasons not to buy
A small number of comments noted that the shoe needs break-in time to perform at its best.
The solid rubber outsole continues to hamper traction, as experienced by a handful of runners.
Bottom line
Reebok’s relationship with entry-level runners continues to grow with the 4th incarnation of the Pheehan Run. The shoe has exceptional comfort, adequate arch support, and sufficient durability. While runners may not be breaking records right away, they can easily have a solid option that can handily tackle the rigors of daily training minus the bells and whistles of more expensive trainers."
Asics GT 1000 7 SP,,85.0,,494.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The majority of runners appreciated the color of the upper.
Many were impressed with the overall design of the shoe.
One tester ran a race using the shoe with no problems or difficulties.
A good number of users were glad that they were able to use the shoe for different activities – running, walking, going to the gym, for example.
Most agreed that the price was reasonable.
1 reasons not to buy
Mostly, women testers observed that the width felt narrow. More specifically, the fit felt tight across the front of the forefoot, they said.
Bottom line
The Asics GT 1000 7 SP is a stability running shoe that comes with an affordable price tag. Most reviewers appreciated its unique upper design which was made to look like the Northern Lights. Although most female runners commented that the fit felt tight across the front of the forefoot, the shoe still proved to be useful and versatile to plenty of users."
Asics Dynamis,,91.0,87.0,61.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
One reviewer appreciated how the improved breathability of the shoe did not sacrifice a secure fit.
Many runners agreed that the Dynamis had very comfortable cushioning for a stability shoe.
The Mono-Sock fit system worked well in providing a soft and seamless wrap to the foot, according to a tester.
Most users found the shoe to be lightweight and that it was easy to use.
A user observed that their foot stayed cool and dry even when running during hot and humid weather.
A lot of buyers praised the BOA® system and how it made wearing the shoe a lot easier.
The outsole proved to be durable enough for daily running activities, as stated by a runner.
2 reasons not to buy
A reviewer relayed that the thin laces caused too much pressure and friction to the top of the foot, and the lack of tongue further aggravated it.
Many runners thought that the heel cup did not deliver the expected snug fit.
Bottom line
The Asics Dynamis is an exceptional running shoe that delivers lightweight support and an excellent fit. Many runners were satisfied with their time with it, and others were impressed with the technologies that were implemented. This shoe is a good option for runners who are looking for a reliable and supportive road shoe."
Nike Air VaporMax Flyknit SE,,,,,,, Road, Neutral,,, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,
Reebok Floatride Run Nite, Reebok,82.0,,11.0,,, Road, Neutral,,, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Mar 2018, Normal | Normal,,"10 reasons to buy
Many wearers mentioned that the shoe fitted like a sock.
Some of the purchasers agreed that the shoe was comfortable.
A good number of consumers noted that the design was fantastic.
The Reebok Floatride Run Nite was lightweight in structure, according to those who have tried it.
The majority of the buyers commented that the shoe provided enough arch support.
Some reviewers loved its soft inside padding.
A consumer noted that the shoe was best used for short-distance runs.
Based on some reviews, it was flexible.
Several users said that they felt like ""running on clouds"".
The price was affordable, according to some buyers.
5 reasons not to buy
According to some testers, the shoe slipped on wet surfaces.
One user said that he felt a little pain in the arch area.
Several reviewers had blisters after wearing the shoe on long-distance runs. Foot rubbed on the inside edge of the shoe.
The Reebok Floatride Run Nite has a narrow toe box, according to those who have tried it.
The shoe runs small, based on some reviews.
Bottom line
The Reebok Floatride Run Nite has made a lot of users contented because of its excellent cushioning and fit. Aside from the lightweight construction, the shoe also offers the right amount of flexibility, support, and comfort. While others have issues with the traction, color options, and size, others still appreciated the shoe because of its incredible performance. Overall, the Reebok Floatride Run Nite is an excellent choice for those who are seeking the right blend of responsiveness, support, and comfort in a running shoe."
Nike Revolution 4 FlyEase, Nike,86.0,,92.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 7oz,,,,, Nike Revolution 5 FlyEase,"5 reasons to buy
The Nike Revolution 4 FlyEase looked visually unique, according to several consumers.
People with foot or leg injuries welcomed the easy on-and-off of this running shoe, particularly highlighting the zipper system that opens up the heel section.
The availability of multiple width options sat well with many runners, especially those who had broad foot-dimensions.
This running shoe was deemed suitably lightweight.
A lot of people called this product a comfortable companion for their daily running sessions.
3 reasons not to buy
The Velcro strap that’s part of the FlyEase system was deemed too short by users with high insteps.
Some testers wished that the color schemes were more diverse than what was currently on sale.
Several consumers lamented the fact that that the laces weren’t adjustable; they didn’t tighten or loosen to accommodate the preference of the wearer.
Bottom line
Most of those who have tried the Nike Revolution 4 FlyEase were happy with its visual design and its lightweight nature. They also welcomed the width variants and the uniqueness of the FlyEase fit system. Conversely, some runners complained of an inconsistent fit and the limited capacity of the unusual closure configuration. Suffice it to say that this road running shoe is well-regarded despite its setbacks."
Puma Tazon 6 Mesh, Puma,91.0,,155.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 12.9oz , Women: 12.9oz,,,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
According to some runners, they admired the Puma Tazon 6 Mesh because it is very comfortable.
A few wearers liked the mesh upper material of the shoe because it gave their feet a breathable coverage while running.
As noted in some user comments, the shoe was able to provide enough cushioning, especially in the heel area.
Most testers were happy with the shoe’s stylish design and available color options.
Several satisfied customers said that the Tazon 6 Mesh has a high-quality construction.
As mentioned by few testers, they were able to use the shoe in different activities such as gym workout and casual walks.
It has an affordable price, said few users.
1 reasons not to buy
A couple of users mentioned that the shoe felt too tight for them.
Bottom line
A significant number of wearers admired the overall design and build of the Puma Tazon 6 Mesh. They were generally satisfied with the shoe’s durability, breathability, cushioning, and comfort. With all the technologies integrated into the shoe, there is no doubt that the Tazon 6 Mesh is able to offer value for money."
Jordan Trunner NXT React, Jordan,,95.0,,,, Road, Neutral,,,,, Jul 2019, Normal | Normal,,
Adidas Alphabounce+ Run EM,,85.0,,8.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Some people have expressed their joy because the Adidas Alphabounce+ Run EM is lightweight enough for all-day use.
The upper unit is appreciated because it holds the foot in place securely and responsibly.
The eye-catching color scheme has apparently permitted versatile use; several people have used this Adidas running shoe for casual strolls.
Purchasers are stating that the durability of the materials makes the whole product worthy of its price.
The cushioning system is lauded because it is bouncy and agreeable.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners are claiming that the in-shoe experience is too warm.
A loose in-shoe experience has been felt by a few consumers.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of people towards the Adidas Alphabounce+ Run EM has been mostly positive. The versatile construction of this neutral running shoe is deemed highly efficient when it comes to performing well. Running and other activities that deviate from running are the bread-and-butter of this model.
Fans of Adidas offerings for speed-related performance are likely to enjoy the Alphabounce+ Run EM."
Asics Gel Cumulus 21 Knit,,74.0,,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 20mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The weight of the Asics Gel Cumulus 21 Knit is considered light enough for all-day use.
This running shoe apparently has a versatile construction that allows it to accommodate activities other than running.
Some users have mentioned that the midsole unit is responsive enough to welcome energized steps.
The upper unit is welcomed because it accommodates the natural bending and swelling of the foot as it runs.
Breathability is an aspect that has been appreciated due to the presence of the ventilation pores.
2 reasons not to buy
Some tearing has been observed near the forefoot section of the upper unit.
A restrictive midfoot section has caused some discomfort to a few users.
Bottom line
The overall reaction towards the Asics Gel Cumulus 21 Knit has been positive. This neutral running shoe is welcomed because of its versatile design. The midsole unit’s capacity to provide comfort and responsiveness is particularly highlighted. Conversely, the restrictive and not-so-durable upper is criticized.
Fans of road running shoes can have fun with the Gel Cumulus 21 Knit."
Asics Kanmei, Asics,87.0,,69.0,$70,$66 (save 6%), Road, Neutral, Men: 7.2oz , Women: 5.7oz,,,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
The aesthetics of the Asics Kanmei worked well for a lot of those who have tested it.
Most runners immediately noticed the lightweight disposition of this running shoe, stating that it was agreeable for long-term use.
The breathability of the mesh material gained positive remarks.
Everyday errands and casual walks were made fun and pleasant with the use of this product, a lot of purchasers conveyed.
The underfoot cushioning system felt dutifully flexible and responsive, stated a buyer.
2 reasons not to buy
A consumer noticed some tightness in the forefoot area while wearing this shoe for a few hours.
A few users complained that it needed a long time to break-in. Their initial runs were apparently uncomfortable.
Bottom line
The Asics Kanmei gained mostly positive feedback from its consumers. They were happy that this road running shoe was able to offer lightweight performance in a visually appealing experience. Most of them were also delighted with the shoe's versatility as a casual option for daily walks. But there were complaints about its construction, with tightness, inconsistent sizing, and long break-in periods as culprits for discomfort."
Puma Blur, Puma,85.0,,185.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.5oz , Women: 5.9oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Lightweight mesh material makes the upper unit durable and comfortable to the skin.
The mid-foot section has TPU add-ons that provide support to the foot.
The front, sides, and rear have reflective material to keep the runner visible while running in low light conditions.
A full-length EVA foam carries the foot well and helps in delivering flexible and sure support.
Durable rubber is placed in critical sections of the outsole where wear and tear are most common.
Runners appreciated the affordable price of the Puma Blur.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners noted that the mid-sole didn’t have stability mechanics to help balance their feet during long running sessions.
A few noted that the upper fabrics easily succumbed to dirt and other stains.
Bottom line
The Puma Blur is a very affordable shoe that’s made for runners who want to get a lightweight underfoot experience while taking on the roads. It’s a daily shoe that has great aesthetics, a reliable cushioning system, and a comfortable coverage. Casual shoe enthusiasts and athletes are going to enjoy this running shoe."
Under Armour Threadborne Reveal,,65.0,,6.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,"4 reasons to buy
The underfoot cushioning system of the Under Armour Threadborne Reveal worked exceptionally well, according to most of those who have tested it.
Many consumers noted that the available sizes adhered to their expectations.
A lot of people liked the looks of this running shoe.
The upper offered a snug and secure fit, several runners commented.
5 reasons not to buy
A tester complained that the back portion of the upper caused rubbing and bleeding.
The lace-loops on the midfoot panels have broken off after only a few uses, according to a purchaser.
Several consumers noted that the fit across the midfoot and heel areas was too tight.
Some runners had a difficult time putting on this shoe, stating that it was difficult to slide the foot in the foot-chamber.
The fabric of the upper unit wasn’t very stretchy, a tester noted; he felt that it restricted natural movement.
Bottom line
The response for the Under Armour Threadborne Reveal was mixed. People were happy with this neutral shoe’s design and its comfortable underfoot experience. Conversely, many were partial to its apparently restrictive upper, its questionable durability and its inconsistent fit. It’s a divisive companion for the roads, one that straddles between efficacy and tedium."
Adidas Revenge 2,,75.0,,14.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 9.4oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Ventilation is provided by the mesh material in the upper.
Synthetic overlays and underlays adjust with the lacing system to customize the fit as noted by a few testers.
The Layered Tongue and Interior Sleeve assist in keeping moisture off while maintaining a snug wrap.
The Energy Boost Mid-sole absorbs the impact from every foot strike, then releases it for a better forward motion.
Reviewers welcomed the Stable Frame and the TORSION System, which offer high levels of mid-foot stability and control.
The rubber outsole is durable and capable of providing reliable traction over the roads.
3 reasons not to buy
The Revenge 2 has a moderately heavy weight.
There were reviewers who thought that the upper needed waterproofing instead of just moisture wicking.
It has a slightly expensive price.
Bottom line
The Revenge 2 from Adidas offers protection, durable coverage and stability for runners who need it. This stability running shoe is robust when it comes to its components and reliable in terms of its capabilities, making it ideal for daily training and exercise sessions."
New Balance Vazee Breathe v2, New Balance,75.0,,13.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
One user mentioned that the shoe had excellent grip on various common surfaces.
A majority of runners observed that the shoe was highly breathable. Those who lived in Texas were especially thankful for the ventilation.
A number of runners said that the shoe felt light.
Some consumers felt that the shoe had great spring back.
The toe box had enough room, according to some reviews.
One tester observed that the shoe’s fit is close, but not pinching.
A runner expressed that the shoe looked better in person than on websites.
3 reasons not to buy
A lot of reviewers said that this running shoe did not feel comfortable when initially worn. Based on these reviews, the shoe had to be broken in.
A tester felt that the mesh material on the upper was too soft.
One user narrated that it was already falling apart after only one month of usage.
Bottom line
The New Balance Vazee Breathe v2 was inspired by the toughest heat in some of the warmest conditions. Moderately priced, this is a neutral road running shoe that delivers top-notch ventilation. On top of that, the midsole foam was made to deliver an enhanced rebound experience. Possibly, an ideal choice for runners looking for an airy, versatile, and light shoe for performance training and various workout activities."
Asics Gel Pulse 8 GTX,,75.0,,19.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11oz , Women: 11oz,,,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Some of the testers loved the good quality of the shoe.
According to one of the reviewers, the Asics Gel Pulse 8 GTX worked well on different types of terrain.
One of the runners commented that it was comfortable and breathable.
A consumer mentioned that the shoe was lightweight and attractive.
According to some reviewers, the shoe provided softer and faster landings.
1 reasons not to buy
A runner mentioned that the shoe had limited color options.
Bottom line
According to those who have tried it, the Asics Gel Pulse 8 GTX was a good choice for runners who want a lightweight shoe without compromising cushioning and support. They said that it was comfortable, breathable and visually appealing. Although some mentioned that it had limited color schemes for them to choose from, most consumers still recommended the Asics Gel Pulse 8 GTX because of its quality and responsiveness."
Nike Air Max Sequent 4.5, Nike,83.0,,7.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral,,,,, Mar 2019,,,"6 reasons to buy
The majority of the users said that the Nike Air Max Sequent 4.5 provides a good fit.
A good number of wearers commented that the shoe is comfortable.
Based on some reviews, the running footwear is supportive.
A lot of consumers admire the shoe's high energy return.
Several consumers loved its style and chic look.
Many buyers agreed that the shoe is best used for walking and running activities as well as for casual wear.
3 reasons not to buy
One of the users commented that his big toe comes through the top mesh area after a few months of use only.
A tester mentioned that the tongue unit is very high. It resulted in irritation after use.
Some wearers noted that the Nike Air Max Sequent 4.5 is not suitable for those who have a narrow foot.
Bottom line
Overall, the majority of the purchasers have gained the hearts and respect of the Nike Air Max Sequent 4.5 avid fans. The neutral running shoe has not only successfully delivered a more responsive ride but also offered an excellent fit and comfort level. With the utilization of high-quality materials, features, and technologies, the overall performance of the runner is sure to be improved. It is undeniable that with the way the shoe is constructed, the Nike Sequent 4.5 is a perfect partner in different running and walking activities."
Dynafit Speed MTN GTX, Dynafit,,,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 13.8oz , Women: 12.3oz,,,,,,
Puma Ignite Limitless Initiate, Puma,75.0,,12.0,,, Trail, Neutral,,,,, Jan 2018,,,"7 reasons to buy
Some users appreciated that the Puma Ignite Limitless Initiate is easy to clean and maintain. 
The gripping ability of this Puma running shoe was praised by several purchasers. 
This running companion offers a combination of style and comfort, according to a few reviewers. 
Several commenters highlighted the excellent cushioning quality of this running shoe. 
A couple of purchasers noted that the stylish design of the Ignite Limitless Initiate is also perfect for casual walks. 
The elastic shoelaces make this running gear convenient to wear, said a user. 
A number of consumers expressed that the high-quality construction of the shoe is worth the money. 
1 reasons not to buy
A few testers reported that the Puma Ignite Limitless Initiate is a bit heavy. 
Bottom line
The Puma Ignite Limitless Initiate received positive reviews from the consumers. The majority of the runners are impressed with the stylish design and level of comfort it offered. Although some have concerns about its bulky weight, others still recommended the shoe for its durability and quality. Many users also appreciated the easy-to-clean features of the shoe. "
Puma Ignite Dual NightCat,,82.0,,30.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"10 reasons to buy
The NightCat version of the Ignite Dual is very comfortable, according to many reviewers.
The reflective details in this model gained positive remarks from consumers.
A good number of heel strikers loved the cushioning in the heel.
Runners commented that the water-repelling capability of the upper helped in keeping their feet dry.
The underfoot platform’s flexibility received good feedback from testers.
It is a value for the money purchase, based on the comments of some runners.
Several purchasers were able to use the Puma Ignite Dual NightCat for cardio exercises and gym workouts with ease.
Several runners received compliments about how cool they looked while wearing this shoe.
The shoe helped in making the transition from landing to take-off very smooth, some testers observed.
There were reviewers who reported that the Ignite Dual NightCat felt suitably lightweight.
2 reasons not to buy
A few forefoot strikers felt that the forefoot is just not cushioned enough for long runs.
Some runners wanted a little padding in the tongue to prevent it from causing irritation.
Bottom line
One of Puma’s most popular shoes becomes even more multi-faceted with the introduction of even more reflective materials and a water-repellent upper. The Puma Ignite Dual NightCat offers exceptional comfort, solid arch support, excellent cushioning, and the kind of flexibility that runners look for in a well-cushioned shoe. Additionally, the very reasonable price and the simple, yet elegant look only makes this shoe even more attractive to runners of different levels."
Adidas Pureboost R,,77.0,85.0,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 7.3oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
A mix of stretchable fabrics and synthetic suede make up the appealing upper unit of the Pure Boost R.
An elastic band goes from the mid-foot to the heel, locking the foot in place and keeping it snug inside the shoe.
Elastic laces make the fit more agreeable to the preferences of the wearer.
The boost™ mid-sole foam gives energy to the runner while also absorbing shock during the striking phase.
Blown rubber protects the shoe from wear while also giving additional cushioning to the foot.
The moderate weight gives freedom for the foot to move and not let the runner feel weighed down.
3 reasons not to buy
Stitched-on Adidas logo on the tongue may irritate the skin of the wearer.
The tongue doesn’t have padding, which may cause some irritation.
The one-piece tongue-and-collar has inconsistent stitching, so the fabric might come off after frequent use.
Bottom line
The Pure Boost R from Adidas is a lightweight running shoe that has an appealing look and a reliable set of systems to give that running experience a boost of energy and speed. This neutral running shoe delivers comfort, flexibility, and a secure fit that’s going to make each running session much smoother and more agreeable to the natural motions of the foot."
Asics Gel Nimbus 19 Lite-Show,,71.0,,534.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 13mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Some testers commented that the Asics Gel Nimbus 19 Lite-Show was comfortable.
A handful of purchasers admired the soft materials used in making the shoe.
Most of the runners loved its color variations.
Several wearers agreed that the shoe was lightweight in structure.
According to those who have bought it, they were confident wearing the shoe on dark evening runs.
A lot of testers were impressed with the elasticity of the laces.
Numerous testers said that it was supportive.
As noted by more than a handful of buyers, its cushioning was excellent.
3 reasons not to buy
Some of the testers noted that the Asics Gel Nimbus 19 Lite-Show has a narrow toe box.
Many runners noted that the shoe was not well-ventilated.
A good number of purchasers said that it was expensive.
Bottom line
The majority of the consumers commented that the Asics Gel Nimbus 19 Lite-Show was supportive and comfortable. They appreciated its elastic lace and lightweight structure. They love wearing the product on evening runs because of its reflectivity. Many users recommend the Asics Gel Nimbus 19 Lite-Show because of its excellent cushioning. Some were also disappointed with its narrow toe box and high price. Overall, the Asics Gel Nimbus 19 Light-Show is a good choice for runners who want to experience the shoe’s versatility."
Adidas Madoru, Adidas,74.0,,9.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.5oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
A budget shoe that is incredibly comfortable is personified by the Adidas Madoru, according to most comments.
An affordable shoe that works as designed.
The durability is what one can expect from a shoe that hovers around the inexpensive price range.
Some comments mentioned about the shoe’s plush cushioning.
There is enough flexibility in this shoe for a more natural ride, despite the prominent chunk of the midsole, based on some reviews.
There is a moderate pop from the plush cushioning as noted by several runners.
2 reasons not to buy
A few runners preferred lower numbers on the scale.
There were a handful of comments about the heel as too loose.
Bottom line
The Madoru runs under the radar in the lineup of Adidas running shoes. Because it does not hug the headlines, runners who are looking for a no-fuss shoe with plush cushioning and comfort in a really affordable price may miss out on this option. The decent arch support and the durability of the outsole only enhance its appeal to runners of all levels."
Mizuno Wave Daichi 4,,,,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,
Reebok Pump Plus Night, Reebok,74.0,,6.0,,, Road, Stability,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
The design of the Reebok Pump Plus Night looked very appealing, most consumers noted.
Some testers observed that the weight was suitably light.
The Pump technology offered an agreeable and locked-in fit, according to several runners.
A purchaser noted that the elastic laces helped in giving a secure coverage.
Many people considered this running shoe to be comfortable.
A user reported that it worked well during short and mid-distance running sessions.
1 reasons not to buy
A consumer observed that the Pump unit was a bit soft. He wished that it was firmer and more supportive.
Bottom line
The Reebok Pump Plus Night was considered a success by most of those who have tried it. They liked this neutral road shoe’s cool design, its agreeable Pump tech, its comfortable performance and its efficacy on the roads. On the other hand, a person wanted the inflatable fit system to have a firmer hold."
Skechers GOrun Vortex - Storm,,74.0,,21.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral,,,,,,,,"7 reasons to buy
People appreciated the lightweight structure of this running shoe. 
The Skechers GOrun Vortex - Storm is comfortable, based on reviews.
A lot of runners highlighted the shoe’s soft cushioning. 
It offers a good grip on paved surfaces, according to several wearers. 
Many reviewers commented that it is highly breathable. 
The shoe is comfortable even without socks, said a consumer. 
Its stylish design is also perfect for school and work, some users claimed.
3 reasons not to buy
A couple of buyers complained because the shoe requires a break-in period.
It is not durable enough for running, some users complained.
A few users reported that the shoe uses poor quality materials. 
Bottom line
The Skechers GOrun Vortex - Storm is a stylish shoe designed for road running and workout sessions. This running companion works best for runners with neutral gaits or those who do not overpronate. 
The Skechers GOrun Vortex - Storm is crafted using advanced technologies that aim to deliver a supportive and comfortable running experience. It is also suitable for non-strenuous activities and casual walks.
 "
Scott Kinabalu GTX,,74.0,,6.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 10.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Several users regard the Scott Kinabalu GTX as a comfortable shoe.
The shoe performs well on long-distance trail runs, according to many testers.
This Scott running shoe is durable enough even with constant usage in wet conditions, according to a runner.
A lot of trail runners were happy with the traction of Kinabalu GTX.
The shoe's waterproof feature is very effective, numerous wearers claimed.
2 reasons not to buy
A few purchasers have noted that the Kinabalu GTX is expensive.
One user observed that the shoe retains odor.
Bottom line
This top-notch trail running shoe from Scott is amped up with the Gore-Tex waterproof membrane to give way for more running opportunities. Runners who have enjoyed the versatile and lightweight structure of the original model will also appreciate the Scott Kinabalu GTX."
Under Armour Micro G Velocity,,85.0,,187.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.9oz , Women: 7.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"4 reasons to buy
Under Armour Micro G Velocity features a breathable mesh upper, keeping the feet fresh and ventilated.
Testers confirmed that Micro G Velocity is durable with its rubber outsole.
Most runners are impressed with the flexibility of the shoe.
Introduced a traditional lacing system for an improved fit and added support.
2 reasons not to buy
Most of the runners complain that the shoe is too tight on the sides and over the foot.
It only provides minimal arch support.
Bottom line
Velocity provides runners a supreme comfort by allowing air to flow inside that keeps the feet cool. It also has a molded footbed that conforms to your feet. The shoe acquired positive reviews from the testers and it’s great for all-day wear."
Asics Gel Pulse 11 Winterized, Asics,68.0,,7.0,,, Road, Neutral,,, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"10 reasons to buy
Several consumers noted that the Asics Gel Pulse 11 Winterized is comfortable.
Some testers love the shoe's lightweight structure.
One of the users loves the excellent quality of the shoe.
According to those who have tried it, the shoe is stylish. Its pretty design was admired by them.
The shoe kept the foot warm, as noted by some buyers.
Based on the reviews, the Gel Pulse 11 Winterized is best used during the winter season.
A tester commented that the shoe provides a smooth ride. He felt like running on the clouds during his activities.
The shoe is best for casual wear, walking, and running activities, according to several testers.
The majority of the reviewers commented that the running shoe has great cushioning.
Many purchasers love its perfect fit.
2 reasons not to buy
Some of the purchasers commented that the shoe is expensive.
A tester observed that the Asics Gel Pulse 11 Winterized is not durable. The front area started to wear off after several uses only.
Bottom line
Asics returns with the Gel Pulse 11 Winterized. This running footwear highlights its midsole and upper construction. These materials contribute to the lightweight structure, style, and quality of the shoe. Overall, the Asics Gel Pulse 11 Winterized received a lot of praise and appreciation because of its excellent construction and performance on the roads."
Asics Comutora MX,,91.0,,57.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.3oz , Women: 6.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The underfoot platform of the Asics Comutora MX was able to support the arch, some people claimed.
The color schemes were apparently eye-catching to many of those who have tried this shoe.
Discomfort wasn’t felt when wearing this product for casual walks and workouts, based on several user reviews.
The lightweight materials and components were lauded by consumers.
According to most purchasers, the Asics Comutora MX was true to size.
1 reasons not to buy
A few people claimed that the Asics Comutora MX was a bit narrow.
Bottom line
The Asics Comutora MX was mostly well-received by those who have tested it. People were happy with this neutral shoe’s supportive cushioning unit, the appealing colorways, and the versatile construction of the façade. The lightweight build was also commented. There were some complaints about the narrow design, but they weren’t sweeping claims."
Merrell Trail Glove 4 E-Mesh,,93.0,,204.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 7.9oz , Women: 5.8oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
A majority of runners felt that the weight of the Merrell Trail Glove 4 E-Mesh was light.
Most users commented that the toe box had enough room. There were no areas of constriction.
Plenty of testers observed that the shoe instantly felt comfortable out the box. One runner did a 4-mile run right away. Another user wore it all day without any issues.
A lot of testers felt supported on their runs.
Some mentioned that the arch support was good.
Tons of runners said that the outsole was durable and provided good traction.
Many appreciated its multi-functionality.
One user said her shin splint went away as she continuously ran in the trainer. Another user with musculoskeletal issues said that she did not feel any pain or discomfort of any sort.
2 reasons not to buy
One user said that the laces were too stretchy for him to secure the midfoot.
Most reviewers felt that the shoe was somewhat larger than usual.
Bottom line
The Merrell Trail Glove 4 E-Mesh is a lightweight neutral shoe designed for trail running. Plenty of runners found it to be ready right out the box. Other reviewers appreciated the support and durability it delivered. On top of this, the outsole exhibited sufficient traction on most surfaces. Some runners noticed that the size was somewhat larger, but the difference wasn’t that significant. Despite a few negative reviews, the shoe still proved to be comfortable which helped with runners’ leg and foot issues."
Puma Osu NM,,88.0,82.0,1532.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 10oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"10 reasons to buy
Several runners noted that the Puma Osu NM was roomy enough to accommodate natural toe splay.
A number of runners found the shoe to be very comfortable right out of the box.
It looked very appealing, according to consumers; they received compliments from people while they were wearing it.
Several reviewers prized the easy on/off characteristic of this shoe due to the absence of laces.
The upper was breathable and it kept the foot cool and dry, noted a purchaser.
Many testers lauded the lightweight nature of this shoe, stating that it allowed them to wear it for many activities.
The price was affordable, according to a lot of those who have purchased it.
The hook-and-loop strap made it easier for runners to adjust the fit; they liked its inclusion.
‘Comfortable’ was used frequently to describe the experience when wearing this shoe.
Quite a number of people who are on their feet during work really appreciated the impact-absorbing cushioning and support.
2 reasons not to buy
According to a purchaser, the underfoot cushioning started to sag off after only a few miles.
Several consumers complained of a bad smell from the material and reported that it was difficult to remove.
Bottom line
The Puma Osu NM gained some positive reviews for its unique look and its comfortable design. Many were drawn to its lightweight nature, which apparently made it great for many activities. The adjustable strap also received some praise for allowing the runners to change the fit easily. But there were complaints, most prominently of a stench that was apparently difficult to eliminate."
Zoot Ali'i 16,,62.0,,12.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 9.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The Zoot Ali’i 16 was a fitting choice for racing, according to some runners.
Various users said it was comfortable right out of the box.
Many reviewers were amazed at the innovative lacing system and how it promoted an even pressure across the foot.
The midsole enabled a fast transition that was unlike any other running shoe, a wearer commented.
There were no pains nor blisters even after long miles, wrote a consumer.
3 reasons not to buy
One tester thought that the midsole looked cheap and flimsy and that it was not appropriate for long-distance running.
The upper felt narrow and stiff, a wearer complained.
It produced pain in the shin, as experienced by a customer.
Bottom line
The latest version of the Zoot Ali’i had positive feedback from most of its users. Several commended the performance brought by this running shoe. The features were also well-received. On the other hand, a few people encountered problems regarding fit and comfort."
Nike Free RN 5.0 Shield,,85.0,,5.0,,, Road, Neutral,,, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A few runners said that the Nike Free RN 5.0 Shield is lightweight.
This shoe offers excellent support, based on some reviews.
It is comfortable, according to a lot of commenters.
People appreciated its water-resistant feature.
A purchaser mentioned that it is comfortable even without socks.
The shoe fits well, most users claimed.
Users also love using this shoe for work and gym sessions.
2 reasons not to buy
A few wearers noted that the shoe is a bit narrow.
The outsole is not durable enough for long runs, said a tester.
Bottom line
The Nike Free RN 5.0 Shield is a comfortable running shoe designed for users with neutral foot motion. The shoe’s weatherized design allows its wearer to continue running or doing their usual exercise routines rain or shine. This stylish running shoe is also suitable for gym sessions and casual walks."
Nike Air Zoom Structure 20 Shield,,86.0,,68.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 11.2oz , Women: 9.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,, Nike Air Zoom Structure 22 Shield,"9 reasons to buy
The Nike Structure 20 Shield is remarkably comfortable, based on most of the reviews.
The Dynamic Support in the midsole provides a stable ride.
The weather-resistant upper offers protection against the elements.
Some runners noted the sufficient cushioning that absorbs impact quite well.
A handful of runners with knee and back pains found the ride to be really good for them.
There are a couple of different color combinations.
A few liked its lightweight nature despite the cushioning and stability features.
Several runners found the cushioning and stability as just exactly what they need.
It feels responsive and resilient, according to a handful of comments.
3 reasons not to buy
The price is a bit much, according to some reviewers.
The heel is a little loose in the feet of a few users.
The upper was a bit stiffer than a handful of Nike Air Zoom Structure fans were used to.
Bottom line
The weather-resistant upper takes the performance of the Nike Air Zoom Structure 20 to a different level that all the other past editions were not able to provide. It makes the shoe an all-weather type of a stability trainer. Nike continues to make the series one of its most supportive, well-cushioned, and good-looking options. It is suited best for daily trainings where the support and cushioning really comes to the fore."
Reebok Zigwild Trail 6.0, Reebok,85.0,,5.0,$100,$85 (save 15%), Trail, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
Quite a few wearers attest to the comfort of the Reebok Zigwild Trail 6.0. 
Some of the runners hail the running shoe for its secure wrap. 
The trail shoe has ample support, lauded several athletes. 
A number of commenters praise the grippy traction of the running shoe. 
It does not require a break-in period, observed various users. 
Multiple testers commend the convenient foot entry provided by the shoe. 
The neutral running shoe amplifies stability, expressed a few buyers.
3 reasons not to buy
According to some critics, the running shoe lacks durability.
The platform is too tight, especially on the forefoot, remarked one customer. 
It constricts foot motions, shared some runners.
Bottom line
Showing off a '90s trail vibe, the Reebok Zigwild Trail 6.0 brings an outdoor touch to the runner's daily run. Featuring a superbly technical outsole configuration, the trail running shoe offers superior shock mitigation. It effectively distributes impact energy for a comfortable and well-protected ride. With the Zigwild Trail 6.0, athletes can experience a grippy, reliable function."
Skechers GOmeb Speed 3,,90.0,82.0,68.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 8.2oz , Women: 5.3oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Skechers GOmeb Speed 5,"7 reasons to buy
The newer DuPont Delrin stability plate provides rigidity to the mid-foot.
The construction is kept simple, with no added material, according to many testers.
Most testers noted that the forefoot is a little wider than the previous versions, making it great for many types of feet.
The foot is pinned closer to the mid-sole, which provide a snappier feel and an enhanced push off.
Great for speed works and track sessions.
An improved tongue consists of a thin fabric and thin foam for better comfort.
Roomier upfront yet snug fit is felt around the middle section, according to testers.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners were hesitant to buy it because of its slightly expensive price.
Some runners found it a little too stiff.
It is more on the minimalist type and may need some transitions before using it for long runs.
Bottom line
The Skechers GOmeb Speed 3 is lightweight and offers a little cushioning, which is good for neutral runners. Some of the materials used are just the same as the previous versions, yet this one was able to provide a better running performance. Although there were downsides like its high price and its stiffness, many testers found the features of this shoe worth the cost."
Scott Kinabalu Enduro,,73.0,80.0,6.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 13.4oz , Women: 12oz, Men: 11mm , Women: 11mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
According to some reviewers, the Vibram lugs on the shoe's outsole were durable.
The aggressive treads of the Scott Kinabalu Enduro offered great traction on a variety of conditions, a few testers mentioned.
A lot of runners were impressed with the comfortable cushioning unit of the shoe.
Some buyers commented that the upper of the shoe was very protective. It withstood different harsh environments.
Few consumers were impressed with the shoe’s responsiveness when compared to other models.
4 reasons not to buy
Some reviewers agreed that the shoe was a little bit heavy.
One of the consumers noted that the rubber overlay creased and bent sharply.
Some of the buyers mentioned that the upper material was uncomfortable and stiff.
Some of the testers commented that the shoe felt warm because of its plastic foot protection.
Bottom line
The Scott Kinabalu Enduro was a great running shoe, according to some reviewers. They mentioned that the Vibram sole provided enough grip on all types of terrains. Although other testers were disappointed with the shoe’s upper material, some buyers still recommended the Scott Kinabalu Enduro because of its responsiveness and great traction ability."
361 Degrees Spire 4,,,84.0,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 8.2oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,,,
Reebok Ridgerider Trail 2.0, Reebok,79.0,,171.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.7oz , Women: 10oz,,,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
A lot of users commented that the shoe provided enough traction on dry
A good number of buyers mentioned that this shoe was affordably-priced.
Many users found the cushioning on the Reebok Ridgerider Trail 2.0 to be very supportive. They preferred this over a cloud-like underfoot feel.
Some reviewers mentioned that the design of the shoe was meant for trail running.
Many testers agreed that this shoe was lightweight when compared to other trail running shoes.
Manny runners were pleased with the different color options of this shoe.
4 reasons not to buy
Some runners were disappointed because the toe box easily tore apart after only several uses.
A few users mentioned that the heel cushioning of the Reebok Ridgerider Trail 2.0 was not enough. This resulted in painful landings.
According to some testers, the apparently hard midsole foam of the shoe was not comfortable.
After several uses only, some runners found out that the sole unit peeled off or wore off easily.
Bottom line
The Reebok Ridgerider Trail 2.0 was a good choice for runners who were looking for a budget-friendly shoe. They mentioned that the shoe was lightweight and supportive. They were pleased to know that the shoe provided enough protection on debris-filled surfaces. Some runners commented that the hard midsole was not comfortable, but others still recommended this neutral road shoe for those who prefer occasional trail running activities."
Salomon Cross Pro,,,,,,," Mud, Trail", Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,
Puma Faas 600 v2,,65.0,73.0,6.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 7.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"4 reasons to buy
The shoe is lightweight and breathable enough to keep the foot well ventilated.
Many said it has a stylish look.
The Puma Faas 600 v2 has a reliable traction for road running.
Overall, it offers comfort and impressive fit.
3 reasons not to buy
Many noticed that the outsole is not durable.
The tongue is uncomfortable and the laces loosen up easily.
Cushioning is too firm to some runners.
Bottom line
When it comes to lightweight support, comfort, and stability, Puma presents the Puma Faas 600 v2. This shoe is designed neutral foot movement and ideal for road running and daily training."
Salomon Sense Ride 2 GTX Invisible Fit,,77.0,,9.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,, Salomon Sense Ride 3 GTX Invisible Fit,"5 reasons to buy
The durability of the Salomon Sense Ride 2 GTX Invisible Fit is perceived as dependable.
Some runners believe that the midsole unit of this running shoe is supportive and reactive to movements.
The outsole unit is appreciated for being able to adhere to the ground well and guarantee surface control.
A handful of people are happy with the breathability of the upper unit.
The Gore-Tex® technology is praised for completely staving off water infiltration.
2 reasons not to buy
A few testers believe that the forefoot section of the shoe has a tendency to bunch the toes together uncomfortably.
A couple of runners have reported an early material breakdown of the lace-pocket.
Bottom line
The overall feedback towards the Sense Ride 2 GTX Invisible Fit has been largely positive. Runners are happy with what this Salomon trail running shoe has to offer. The technologies presented by the shoe make it an ideal trail-running companion in varying weather conditions. Users were quick to highlight the traction, midsole cushioning, and protective silhouette of the Sense Ride 2 GTX Invisible Fit."
Reebok OSR Sweet Road SE,,80.0,,30.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
A good number of buyers considered the Reebok OSR Sweet Road SE as an affordable shoe.
According to several runners, the shoe was comfortable.
A few testers lauded its perfect fit.
A lot of reviewers said that the shoe was lightweight in structure.
Many purchasers commented that the Reebok OSR Sweet Road SE has excellent cushioning.
Various consumers said that the shoe was best for gym activities as well as long and short-distance running sessions.
A good number of testers said that it was stylish.
3 reasons not to buy
Based on some reviews, the shoe has poor quality.
Several runners said that the shoe runs small
The Reebok OSR Sweet Road SE was not supportive, according to one of the buyers.
Bottom line
The Reebok OSR Sweet Road SE has made a lot of buyers happy and contented because of its stylish design and perfect fit. Aside from its design, the shoe also provides the right amount of cushioning and comfort. Even though others encountered problems on quality and size, others still recommended the shoe because of its excellent performance. In general, the Reebok OSR Sweet Road SE is a good deal for runners who are looking for an affordable shoe with a good level of comfort and versatility."
Mizuno Wave Crusader 9,,72.0,,28.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.1oz , Women: 8.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Breathable mesh makes up the upper unit of the 9th version of the Wave Crusader.
The Mizuno logo acts as an extension of the foot-securing mechanics of the upper.
Runners generally appreciated the comfortable Molded Ethylene vinyl acetate mid-sole unit that’s used in this shoe.
The Mizuno Wave tech is a component in the mid-sole that provides some stability for the foot of the wearer.
The X10 durable carbon rubber in high impact locations underneath the shoe is the one responsible for traction and protection from abrasion.
The Crusader 9 is lighter in weight than the previous version.
3 reasons not to buy
There were those who complained that the upper unit wasn’t durable as to last a few weeks before getting damaged.
Some runners noticed that it was one size larger than what they were used to.
The underfoot platform was a bit hard for a few testers.
Bottom line
Many runners appreciated what the Wave Crusader 9 from Mizuno had to offer. Its upper is breathable, it’s midsole offers stability, and the outsole is durable. The price is also very affordable as compared to other road shoes. The Crusader 9 is a good option for daily exercises and training."
Inov-8 Race Ultra 290 GTX,,72.0,,16.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.4oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Unanimously agreed by most runners is the insane grip of the Ultra 290 GTX on very difficult outdoor terrain.
Comfort comes as a close second when the top assets of the shoe are ranked according to a majority of runners.
A common reaction from many users is the Inov-8 Ultra 290 GTX’s responsive features.
An all-weather makeup is another aspect that many users loved in the shoe.
A number of runners observed how nimble the shoe runs despite some significant protection and support features.
The moderate cushioning allows the shoe to be a fantastic option for daily training or for 5Ks to ultra-long runs.
2 reasons not to buy
The price is high.
No break-in time should be needed for a shoe having this price, remarked a handful of users.
Bottom line
Inov-8’s first ultra-long distance running shoe shines in practically all outdoor surfaces. It has ample arch support, light, and very comfortable. Regardless of the distance or off-road terrain, runners will be able to have fun on the trail in this shoe."
Scott Supertrac 2.0 GTX,,72.0,,9.0,,," Trail, Mud", Neutral, Men: 12.7oz , Women: 11.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The waterproof upper unit of the Scott Supertrac 2.0 GTX is welcomed by those who have tested it.
The grip given by the outsole unit is welcomed by consumers.
Some users believe that the rockered shape of the underfoot platform permits quick and effortless transitions through the gait cycle.
The cushioning system is deemed supportive and protective; trail debris and jagged surfaces aren't as troublesome because of this layer.
'Durable' is a term that has been used to describe the materials of the Supertrac 2.0 GTX.
2 reasons not to buy
Some stiffness has been observed from the underfoot platform.
Transitioning the activity to the roads has become a problem for several because of the aggressive, trail-optimized lug system of the outsole unit.
Bottom line
The Scott Supertrac 2.0 GTX centers its design on waterproof protection and heightened confidence across different outdoor environments. The sturdy yet accommodating design ensures sure performances while also enabling a feeling of being secure. An aggressive outsole configuration permits multi-terrain traversal, though flat surfaces may not be recommended. Still, off-road adventures can be enjoyable because of this iteration of a well-received series of trail partners."
Mizuno Wave Rider 21 GTX,,72.0,,38.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 9.1oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,, Mizuno Wave Rider GTX,"5 reasons to buy
According to several runners, they loved its top-quality construction.
A few testers lauded the shoe's snug fit.
A few testers said that the shoe was comfortable.
Many buyers commented that the Mizuno Wave Rider 21 GTX is a great running shoe because of its excellent performance.
A good number of purchasers admired its design.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners said that the shoe has a narrow toe box.
The upper area is stiffer when compared to previous models, according to one of the testers.
Bottom line
A good number of wearers commented that the Mizuno Wave Rider 21 GTX was a great running shoe. Aside from its structure and design, they admired the comfort it provided. Although several of them said that the upper section is stiff, others still recommended the shoe because of its quality. In general, the majority of the runners said that the Mizuno Wave Rider 21 GTX is the best choice for those who are looking for a comfortable and high-quality running shoe."
Nike Zoom Terra Kiger 2, Nike,76.0,78.0,7.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.6oz , Women: 7oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Nike Air Zoom Terra Kiger 5,"6 reasons to buy
Ventilation and support are afforded by the single-layer engineered mesh.
The Flywire cables provide a personalized fit that’s tuned to the preference of the wearer.
The mid-sole unit was appreciated by many because it was able to cushion their feet well and give them an enabled lift during the toe-off phase.
The Nike Zoom Terra Kiger 2 has an adequate weight profile, which doesn’t let the runner feel encumbered.
Many testers welcomed the sticky outsole and the gripping lugs, which also shed off mud easily.
The features, design and quality of this shoe is worth its price, which isn’t too expensive.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners noted that the outsole tread started to come off after a few uses.
The upper fabric was a bit open for debris to infiltrate the interior chamber.
Bottom line
Running on the trails becomes easier and more convenient thanks to the Nike Zoom Terra Kiger 2. This neutral shoe is a solid option for those who need a reliable running companion when they take on the technical terrains."
Reebok Astroride Strike, Reebok,64.0,,23.0,$70,$38 (save 46%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8.1oz , Women: 8.1oz,,,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
The low-profile build of the Reebok Astroride Strike was appreciated by its testers.
The color schemes were welcomed by those who liked aesthetically pleasing shoe facades.
People liked that this shoe worked well as an option for walking.
It is affordable.
A few mentioned that the upper of the shoe is breathable enough to keep the feet sweat-free.
3 reasons not to buy
The contours of the midsole didn’t work well for several consumers; they stated that it felt as if the platform was intentionally flattening the arch.
The fit was considered by some to be very narrow.
The midfoot portion of the upper unit grazed the contour of the arch, a user complained.
Bottom line
The Reebok Astroride Strike had its fair share of positive feedback from its testers, but the overall reaction wasn’t very glowing. Most of those who have worn this road shoe weren’t happy with how it was built. Most complained about an uneven platform design and the narrowness of the fit. Moreover, the medial side of the upper was criticized for rubbing against the arch."
Nike Epic React Flyknit BETRUE,,79.0,,8.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,, Jun 2018,,,"5 reasons to buy
The React midsole received praise for being duly comfortable and responsive.
The design and color scheme of the Nike Epic React Flyknit BETRUE received high praise from those who have tested it.
People stated that the general durability of this running shoe’s materials is superb.
The grip of the outsole was considered to be efficient.
Flexibility was a quality that was lauded by runners.
1 reasons not to buy
The midfoot section was considered by several consumers to be a bit tight.
Bottom line
The overall reaction towards the Nike Epic React Flyknit BETRUE was positive. People mostly talked about the appealing nature of this road shoe’s visuals, but they also took the time to appreciate the Reach midsole technology. Moreover, the general quality of the components was also praised. On the opposite side of the conversation, some runners complained of a tight midfoot construction."
Dynafit Trailbreaker GTX,,,,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.8oz,,,,,,
Newton Distance 7,,88.0,88.0,29.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.6oz , Women: 6.6oz, Men: 2mm , Women: 2mm,,, Newton Distance 9,"12 reasons to buy
Most were impressed with the shoe’s lightness.
A majority of runners said that the comfort delivered was excellent.
Despite the Newton Distance 7 being a fast shoe, it still provided sufficient support and cushioning, based on most reviews.
There were a few testers who expressed their appreciation for how responsive the lugs felt which helped runners feel more secure and run faster.
Most agreed that it worked well for both long and short runs.
Plenty of runners were glad to observe that the upper was highly breathable.
Some users felt that the flat shoelaces were an improvement from the laces of previous versions. They didn’t bind in the holes anymore nor did they come undone during runs.
One runner mentioned that he did not feel any pain on his foot after running for 10 miles.
Many agreed that the construction was of high quality.
Another user was happy to see that the shoe did not hold any water or sweat, maintaining its lightness during runs.
Many considered this their go-to choice for training.
One runner felt surefooted on uneven surfaces, allowing her to be more confident to run faster.
3 reasons not to buy
Some reviewers mentioned that the colorway the shoe came in was too bright. It worked well for running, but may not be appropriate for work. They wished that there were more color options available.
One user experienced a raw heel because of a rigid area on the left shoe.
Another user noticed that the overlay was coming off a little bit, but she mentioned that it did not affect the performance of the shoe.
Bottom line
The Newton Distance 7 is a neutral road running shoe that proved to be popular among Newton fans and first-time Newton users. A majority of the reviewers were runners who appreciated the Distance 7’s performance, lightness, and breathability. There were only a few negative reviews, but these did not focus on the quality and performance. Rather, plenty of users hoped that there were more colorways so they could use the shoe for work or as a casual sneaker. Overall, the premium trainer emerged as the go-to training and long-distance shoe for plenty of serious runners."
Hoka One One Tracer,,87.0,84.0,99.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7oz , Women: 6.3oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Hoka One One Tracer 2,"5 reasons to buy
Many applauded the lightweight and comfortable construction of the Hoka One One Tracer.
Most of the testers liked the design and color schemes of the shoe.
Because of the lightweight construction, many noticed how fast the shoe is.
The shoe features an innovative midsole that delivers a great combination of springy feel and underfoot protection.
The shoe comes with a no-sew construction, providing a seamless interior to avoid blisters and irritation.
3 reasons not to buy
Limited color options.
Few testers complain that the forefoot is too narrow and there is no room for toe splay.
A few runners with higher weight profiles noticed that the sole wore off quickly; according to Hoka, this shoe is recommended for those who weigh less than 85kg.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Tracer is a neutral running shoe that delivers a lightweight and breathable coverage for a comfortable run. It received mixed reviews from users but overall, the performance of the shoe is still impressive. This shoe is ideal for endurance training and also ideal for long distance and short distance runs."
Reebok Fast Tempo Flexweave, Reebok,74.0,,6.0,$100,$48 (save 52%), Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
The Reebok Fast Tempo Flexweave is breathable, according to those who have tried it.
One user said that the sole of the shoe is so soft. It feels like walking on the clouds.
Several testers commented that the running shoe is stylish.
The affordable price of the Fast Tempo Flexweave made a lot of consumers happy.
The majority of the purchasers noted that the footwear is very comfortable.
Some users loved the perfect fit the shoe provides.
Based on some reviews, the Fast Tempo Flexweave is lightweight.
2 reasons not to buy
One buyer commented that it is not bouncy as expected.
A wearer commented that the Reebok Fast Tempo Flexweave provided poor traction.
Bottom line
The Reebok Fast Tempo Flexweave is a reliable road running shoe. Most users positively received the shoe, highlighting its cushioning, stylish design, and comfortable foot wrap. Despite the few negative feedback, others still recommend the Reebok Fast Tempo Flexweave for those who are seeking an affordable, breathable, and lightweight neutral running shoe."
Skechers GOrun 600 - Refine,,94.0,,201.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 6.5oz,,,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Several consumers have expressed their appreciation of the Skechers GOrun 600 Refine’s stylish design.
The materials that are used for this running shoe are deemed durable enough to last for many miles.
Some testers feel that the upper unit is able to ventilate the foot for extended running sessions.
The lightweight structure of this product is praised by those who welcome footwear that doesn’t weigh them down.
‘Comfortable’ is a word that many testers have used to describe their time wearing this Skechers running shoe.
The cushioning system is appreciated for being responsive and flexible enough to handle all types of activities.
The price is considered affordable by runners and casual shoe enthusiasts who didn’t want a hefty price tag on their foot-apparel.
2 reasons not to buy
Several purchasers claim that the Skechers GOrun 600 Refine demands a break-in period before being entirely comfortable.
A few people lament the lack of arch support, stating that the midfoot area isn’t accommodating of those whose feet get tired quickly.
Bottom line
The overall response towards the Skechers GOrun 600 Refine has been mostly positive. People emphasize this product’s highly accommodating build, the appealing looks, the comfortable midsole, and the wallet-friendly price. On the other hand, the initial break-in period and the lack of perceivable arch support has been lamented by some testers.
Fans of road running shoes are the target market of the GOrun 600 Refine."
Reebok ZStrike Run SE,,75.0,,22.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
Several runners noted how comfortable the Zstrike Run SE is.
It is a value for the money shoe.
The 4-way stretch mesh offers excellent support and flexibility at the same time.
It wraps the arch in support and comfort, according to a handful of runners.
It is quite light for a stability shoe, as remarked by a few.
More than a few runners appreciated the noticeable flexibility in a stability shoe.
The soft and flexible outsole enhanced the natural running form of some runners.
Some runners utilized this shoe for gym sessions.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners felt that the shoe is sluggish on moderate speeds.
The cushioning is a bit stiff, based on a few comments.
More than several users grumbled that the ZStrike Run SE is a little smaller than other Reebok shoes.
Bottom line
The Zstrike Run SE is a relatively lightweight stability trainer for mild to moderate overpronators who are fond of 5Ks to exacting workouts. What the shoe lacks in bells and whistles, it more than makes up for in its very comfortable ride, adequate arch support, and a mesh upper that blends flexibility and security in a terrific way. The affordable price and the no-nonsense performance give the shoe a workmanlike feel that entry level runners with overpronation concerns should give a serious look."
Mizuno Wave Mujin 2, Mizuno,71.0,,6.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 6.8oz, Men: 11mm , Women: 11mm,,, Mizuno Wave Mujin 6,"6 reasons to buy
A water-resistant mesh upper makes sure to keep the foot protected and secure.
Stitched overlays ensure additional support and security for the upper unit, according to several reviews.
Runners generally appreciated the Dynamotion Fit, which is a stretchy material in the front area and the collar.
The AP+ mid-sole from Mizuno offers a lightweight and responsive ride.
The Wave technology is a thermal plastic wave from the heel to the mid-foot that gives a bouncier and resilient ride.
Traction over dry and wet areas is afforded by the durable and dependable outsole of the 2nd version of the Mujin based on a significant number of reviews.
3 reasons not to buy
There were runners who thought that the Wave Mujin 2 wasn’t durable enough because the upper unit broke down on after a few months.
It has a heavy weight.
Some said that it was a bit warm to wear during the hot seasons.
Bottom line
The Wave Mujin 2 from Mizuno is a popular running shoe for those who want a reliable gear when tackling the trails. It can be used daily, and even on the roads as its outsole isn’t very prominent."
Asics Natural-80, Asics,71.0,,6.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.4oz , Women: 7.3oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
A shoe with minimalist features that offers excellent comfort in the soft and glove-like upper is available to runners in the Natural-80.
It is a very flexible shoe.
The Natural-80 is very light.
Some runners use the shoe for racing or for speed training.
The internal sleeve is plush and hugs the foot really well.
Runners can exchange the removable sockliner for customized orthotics.
3 reasons not to buy
The minimalist upper shows signs of wear and tear earlier than usual.
A handful of runners rue the shoe’s lack of durability as not worth the investment.
Traction should be better, according to some comments.
Bottom line
Based on their natural running concept, Asics introduces the Natural-80 as a versatile shoe that can be used during race day or speed workouts. The minimalist design includes a barely there upper, a 4mm heel offset, and minimal arch support. This is perfect for those who are looking to mimic barefoot running without drastically using something with ultra-less cushioning and support."
Mizuno Wave Kien 3 GTX,,71.0,,12.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 10.6oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
The Kien 3 GTX is very comfortable, according to several comments.
A handful opined that it has a reasonable price for a trail shoe with GTX.
The traction is quite good on a variety of trail surfaces, as observed by some.
It runs light, remarked more than a few.
A small number of reviewers appreciated the pep in their runs.
The breathability is not compromised by the GTX, based on a couple of comments.
5 reasons not to buy
The Wave Kien 3 GTX is a bit unstable due to the 12mm heel drop, as experienced by a handful of trail enthusiasts.
It could use a little more flexibility, according to a few.
It needs a break-in period to get the most out of the shoe, based on some reviews.
A small number of runners did not like the “slapping” sound from this shoe.
The entire sole is just too stiff, like a cardboard, as mentioned in a few comments.
Bottom line
The Kien 3 GTX is the first version of this series that offers a waterproofing membrane. Building on the performance of its regular counterpart, the shoe is relatively lightweight and fast despite the moderate cushioning, thick outsole, and substantial overlays. The comfort is superb while protection against the elements is impressive in this shoe."
Asics FuzeX Rush CM,,75.0,70.0,202.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The color schemes of the Asics FuzeX Rush CM gained some fans who stated that they were visually appealing.
The color-changing nature of the upper unit’s chameleon mesh received positive remarks.
The lightweight disposition of this product was lauded by most runners.
People have used this running shoe for various activities such as casual walks and even weightlifting.
As mentioned in some user reviews, the upper offers a good amount of comfort and breathability. 
3 reasons not to buy
The forefoot section of the upper tore apart quickly, according to several consumers.
Some people considered the midsole foam to be too thin and incapable of providing adequate underfoot cushioning.
The toe box was deemed a bit tight, with some testers claiming that it caused some bruising on the toe-ends.
Bottom line
The Asics FuzeX Rush CM received mixed-to-positive reviews. Most runners agreed that this neutral shoe’s design was agreeable. They also appreciated its lightweight disposition and its versatile construction. But there were those who noticed a bevy of discrepancies which made the product less appealing. These inconsistencies in the design prevented it from becoming a go-to choice for those who desire form and function in a stylish package."
Asics Gel Storm 2,,76.0,75.0,1083.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Low profile construction for added flexibility and freedom of movement.
Many testers have noted the positive effects of being comfortable while wearing the Gel Storm 2.
The padded collar and tongue of this running shoe would increase the depth of the lockdown fit for those who want to keep their feet in place.
Reviews were agreeable when it comes to the shoe’s durability.
The removable sock liner would allow some medical orthotics as an option.
Many wearers appreciated its lightweight nature, despite the amount of features that have been added in it.
4 reasons not to buy
A sizeable number of testers criticized the narrow fit of this shoe.
Some felt that their feet were crammed inside the shoe and unable to relax and be in a neutral position.
Some treated the design of the upper a bit plain and simple.
There were those who questioned the structural integrity of the upper fabric.
Bottom line
The Asics Storm 2 places some notable improvements to the fresh series, but the inconsistent design and imbalanced fit fell a bit flat to those who wanted the next big thing given by the company. It’s a very agreeable neutral running shoe for those who need adequate cushioning and reliable durability."
Asics Alpine XT 2,,75.0,60.0,9.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 10.6oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Many users said that the Asics Alpine XT 2 is comfortable.  
A few runners commented that the shoe is lightweight. 
The shoelaces are long enough to offer a secured ride, said a buyer. 
A consumer praised the adequate room in the toe box. 
It offers a perfect fit, based on some reviews. 
A couple of purchasers highlighted the shoe’s breathability. 
Several purchasers noted that it is also suitable for workouts and casual walks.
2 reasons not to buy
It does not offer enough cushioning, reported a tester. . 
Some runners said that the grip is not suitable for trail running. 
Bottom line
The Asics Alpine XT 2 is a highly durable running shoe designed for runners with neutral gaits. It
is carefully designed to provide excellent comfort and aggressive traction on a wide variety of terrain. It utilizes state-of-the-art technologies and materials that aim to enhance the running experience. The Asics Alpine XT 2 is also perfect for walking and casual walks. "
The North Face Ultra Endurance XF,,,,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 9.1oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,
Salming Race 5,,79.0,81.0,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.5oz , Women: 5.2oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,, Salming Race 7,"7 reasons to buy
A good number of buyers noted that the shoe was breathable.
The product was best for short and long-distance races, according to most of the wearers.
Many runners commented that the Salming Race 5 was lightweight and supportive.
According to some testers, the product worked well as marathon
A lot of users agreed that the fit was perfect.
Some consumers appreciated its apparently amazing sole unit.
The look of this model was better than the previous versions.
1 reasons not to buy
One of the reviewers commented that some of the designs integrated into this shoe were unnecessary because they made it look unappealing.
Bottom line
The majority of the users agreed that the Salming Race 5 was breathable and comfortable. They were happy with the product's lightweight structure and perfect fit. Although several of them commented that the additional designs that were integrated into the shoe didn’t make it look agreeable, others still recommended the product because of its versatility."
Adidas Element Refine Tricot, Adidas,90.0,81.0,106.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.9oz , Women: 6oz,,, Mar 2014, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Most customers admired the light weight of the Adidas Element Refine Tricot.
The runners mentioned that the shoe felt really soft and smooth against their skin.
The users also lauded the snug fit of the shoe since it prevented the sliding of the foot inside the shoe.
A few fashion lovers praised the aesthetic look of the shoe.
The shoe is available in several color schemes and such an inclusion got positive feedback.
A runner thought that the shoes were great for running; he ran over 10 miles per day and observed that it was efficient.
4 reasons not to buy
A few people mentioned that the shoe, being minimalist in its design, did not provide enough support for running.
A purchaser found these shoes a little too tight around the toe box.
For a user, the shoes wore off after only 2 months of running.
A runner found the shoe’s mid-sole construction a bit inadequate for longer sessions of running.
Bottom line
Adidas Element Refine Tricot is a lightweight, neutral running shoe made for runners who prefer a minimalist design and a sock-like fit for their feet. Just like the popular Adidas Ultra Boost Uncaged, the shoe is made of durable materials and, in addition to providing the needed comfort, ensures a good responsive ride for the runners. It is available in many colors, so it potentially satisfies the fashion urge, as well."
Dynafit Feline Up,,75.0,,7.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,, Dynafit Feline Up Pro,"5 reasons to buy
The people who have tested the Dynafit Feline Up were happy with its outsole’s traction capacity.
Some testers welcomed the comfortable platform of this trail running shoe, stating that the underfoot platform was surprisingly responsive.
The various color schemes were appreciated by those who liked eye-catching shoe aesthetics.
According to a couple of reviewers, the upper was stretchy enough to welcome the natural motion of the foot.
Consumers were happy with the general quality of this product’s components, claiming that the whole package is long-lasting.
1 reasons not to buy
Those with wide foot dimensions lamented the performance-optimized ‘Minimal Fit,’ which meant that the width has a speed-encouraging bullet outline.
Bottom line
Feedback for the Dynafit Feline Up was overwhelmingly positive. The enthusiasts of off-road running were highly appreciative of the design choices that were done to create this product. Some of the highlights of the consumer reviews include the exceptional outsole construction and traction, the reactive yet protective midsole, and the form-fitting upper. On the other hand, the performance fit (a near-narrow configuration) left a bitter taste to those with wide feet.
Neutral runners who enjoy trail running are the target market of the Dynafit Feline Up."
Reebok SpeedFusion RS,,88.0,,27.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 8.6oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The SpeedFusion RS is quite light despite the substantial cushioning.
It has a very flexible nature.
Durability is a feature that is collecting praises from hordes of runners.
The cushioning is just right, according to many runners.
Its price is affordable.
Underfoot comfort comes from a responsive and efficient mid-sole unit.
A non-marking outsole makes it great for a variety of activities and road conditions.
2 reasons not to buy
A few runners were irritated by the outsole’s tendency to accumulate small rocks.
Holes began to appear on the upper material after only a few months of use, as per some testers’ observations.
Bottom line
The SpeedFusion RS from Reebok is a shoe that offers premium comfort and protection. It allows runners to enjoy the best of an active lifestyle. It has good arch support and it works well as a daily training partner."
Newton Gravity 7, Newton,90.0,92.0,33.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.7oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 3mm , Women: 3mm, Feb 2018," Normal | Normal, Wide", Newton Gravity 9,"6 reasons to buy
The majority of the users observed that the Newton Gravity 7 was lightweight.
Several reviewers admired its perfect fit.
Based on some reviews, the toe box is better when compared to previous models.
Some testers commented that the shoe was supportive.
The shoe was comfortable, according to a lot of consumers.
Several buyers noted that the Newton Gravity 7 has excellent cushioning.
2 reasons not to buy
One of the reviewers observed the shoe does not provide enough traction on wet surfaces.
The Newton Gravity 7 was expensive, according to some purchasers.
Bottom line
The Newton Gravity 7 has made many runners satisfied because of its excellent cushioning and impressive fit. Aside from the lightweight design, the shoe also offers the right amount of support and comfort. While others have issues with price and traction, others still recommend the shoe because of its fantastic construction. Overall, the Newton Gravity 7 is an excellent choice for competition-runners who are looking for a comfortable and lightweight shoe."
Reebok All Terrain Super 3.0, Reebok,91.0,83.0,80.0,$125,$121 (save 3%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,," Normal | Normal, Wide",,"6 reasons to buy
Most of the users called the Reebok All Terrain Super 3.0 a highly comfortable shoe.
Several runners were happy with the lightweight nature of the shoe.
A wearer lauded the excellent grip of the outsole, especially on the unpredictable terrains.
A trail racing enthusiast mentioned that the drainage system of the Reebok All Terrain Super 3.0 was very effective; his feet remained comfortably cool and free of retained water.
Some of the customers appreciated the snug fit of the shoe.
An individual liked how the footwear looked good.
3 reasons not to buy
A few users had durability issues with the shoe.
A purchaser thought that the Reebok All Terrain Super 3.0 was a bit expensive.
Some runners mentioned that the traction was not so good on slippery surfaces.
Bottom line
The Reebok All Terrain Super 3.0 has captured the attention of many running-enthusiasts in the community owing to its great all-around The shoe offers good traction on tricky surfaces; also, is comfortably light in weight with an efficient drainage system and has a great look. It is a fair investment for neutral runners looking for a comfortable yet sturdily built shoe to run on trails."
, Dynafit,,,,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,
Mizuno Wave Sayonara 4, Mizuno,88.0,83.0,79.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm, Jun 2016, Normal | Normal,,"8 reasons to buy
Many runners commented that they felt very comfortable wearing the Mizuno Wave Sayonara 4.
A number of testers wrote that the color schemes of this running shoe were appealing.
The upper unit’s fabrics received praise because it was agreeably breathable.
One reviewer commented that it was great for those who wanted a shoe that’s more lightweight than the Wave Rider series.
According to a review, this shoe was able to stay efficient and durable when taken on long-running sessions and races.
This running shoe didn’t feel bulky or look awkwardly big for some consumers; they acclimated well to it.
Based on the verdict of an expert reviewer, the Sayonara 4’s cushioning system was efficient for long runs, yet the firm base allowed the foot to move more speedily.
This shoe’s versatility was commended because it wasn’t limited to running; there were testers who were able to use it for training and, for them, it didn’t feel lacking.
4 reasons not to buy
The outsole unit’s grip capability wasn’t very efficient, according to a reviewer.
A runner warned that it tended to absorb too much water, making it unpleasant to run under mildly wet conditions.
The toe box was uncomfortably rigid and small for a consumer.
The ride felt a little too firm compared to its previous versions, noted a reviewer.
Bottom line
The Mizuno Wave Sayonara 4 gained the favor of runners who noted that it was great for the roads and for those who have a neutral running gait. The breathable and visually endearing upper unit was lauded by many, as was its well-cushioned mid-sole. But there were a few consumers who didn’t acclimate well to some of its components because they felt that these sections of the shoe were inconsistent and inefficient."
Puma Cell Regulate Nature Tech, Puma,88.0,,96.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
A lot of users said that the shoe was true to size.
According to those reviewers who have tried it, the Puma Cell Regulate Nature Tech has good quality.
It was stylish, based on some reviews.
A handful of testers commented that the footwear was comfortable.
As noted by several buyers, the shoe’s fitting was excellent.
One of the positive comments was its affordable price.
It was a great-looking shoe, according to many testers.
2 reasons not to buy
The shoe does not provide enough support, commented by one of the Puma Cell Regulate Nature Tech's users.
As noted by a purchaser, the footwear was not durable. It easily tore apart after several uses only.
Bottom line
The Puma Cell Regulate Nature Tech made a lot of purchasers happy and contented with its performance and style. Aside from its design, they were satisfied with the footwear's price and fit. Although several of them have problems and issues with its support and durability, the majority of them still recommend the shoe for different road running activities. According to them, the Puma Cell Regulate Nature Tech is an excellent option for those who are seeking good quality, visually-appealing and comfortable yet affordable running footwear."
Skechers GOrun Mojo - Radar, Skechers,84.0,,27.0,$70,$24 (save 66%), Road, Neutral, Men: 8oz , Women: 5.5oz,,,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
People who have tested the Skechers GOrun Mojo - Radar claim that it is comfortable.
A lightweight structure is appreciated by those who have tested this road running shoe.
The visual aspect of this product is lauded by consumers.
The upper unit is considered breathable as it maintains a cool and dry wrap, even after many uses.
Several testers believe that the one-piece opening makes wearing the shoe quite an effortless task.
2 reasons not to buy
Some users disliked that the fabric is pinched when the shoelaces are tightened.
A few consumers have stated that the in-shoe experience is a bit wobbly and not so secure.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of consumers towards the GOrun Mojo - Radar has been quite positive. Those who have tested this Skechers running shoe believe that it is a comfortable and breathable option for their daily activities. The shoe proves its usefulness not only in running and training, but also in casual wear.
People enthusiastic about stylish neutral running shoes for the roads can enjoy the Skechers GOrun Mojo - Radar."
Reebok Run Supreme 3.0 MT, Reebok,79.0,,171.0,$60,$50 (save 17%), Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 7oz,,,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
One runner commented that the Reebok Run Supreme 3.0 MT was lightweight and easy to run in.
The shoe was comfortable enough to wear daily, according to a user.
Some wearers agreed that the shoe was durable.
A runner was amazed at how the shoe helped in reducing fatigue.
The Run Supreme 3.0 MT offered a lot of support, a consumer stated.
One user reported an effortless running experience with the shoe.
5 reasons not to buy
Many people stated that the insole of their shoe was too short and too thin.
The outsole was very rigid and uncomfortable, a tester complained.
Although the Run Supreme 3.0 MT was a dependable shoe, it looked and felt cheap, wrote a reviewer.
The shoe caused damage to the toe, a user lamented.
The toe box was too tight, said a runner.
Bottom line
Although a lot of consumers found the Reebok Run Supreme 3.0 MT to be an efficient running gear, the majority’s consensus is towards the negative. Several users were disappointed with the shoe’s construction and overall finish, while some had complaints about sizing. Overall, many felt that it was not a shoe worth recommending."
,,,,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 6.9oz , Women: 6.9oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,
Newton Distance 8, Newton,81.0,,9.0,$155,$146 (save 6%), Road, Neutral, Men: 7.6oz , Women: 6.6oz, Men: 2mm , Women: 2mm,, Normal | Normal, Newton Distance 9,"7 reasons to buy
One of the runners said that the Newton Distance 8 has a breathable mesh.
Several testers commented that the shoe feels light.
According to a user, the footwear performs well on long distance training and marathons.
The shoe is responsive, based on some reviews.
A few mentioned that they like the shoe’s orange colorways.
According to a few purchasers, the Newton Distance 8 feels fast.
It is a comfortable shoe, a buyer noted.
1 reasons not to buy
A few users commented that the shoe runs small.
Bottom line
The Newton Distance 8 made a lot of users happy and contented with its overall design as well as its performance on marathons and long-distance runs.  The majority of the consumers were avid fans of Newton who admired the comfort and responsiveness of the Distance 8. Although one of the buyers had an issue with its size, overall, a lot of wearers still recommend the shoe."
361 Degrees Feisu,,85.0,84.0,10.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.1oz , Women: 5.7oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,,,
Scott Palani Trainer, Scott,68.0,,5.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 11mm , Women: 11mm,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Most of those who have tested the Scott Palani Trainer stated that it was true to size.
It felt suitably lightweight for long-term use, some people claimed.
The cushioning system gained positive feedback for being comfortable and responsive.
A purchaser expressed appreciation for the design of this model, stating that it looked neat.
This running shoe offered great value for its price, a few runners reported.
2 reasons not to buy
A tester noted that the tongue unit bunched up when the laces are tied, potentially causing some discomfort.
The toe box was too roomy for some runners; they felt their feet sliding forward awkwardly.
Bottom line
All in all, the Scott Palani Trainer satisfied a majority of those who have tried it. They lauded this neutral road shoe’s proficient components and comfortable design. For them, it worked well for long running sessions. There were a few complaints, but they weren’t enough to devalue the overall quality of this product."
Mizuno Wave Elevation,,68.0,,18.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
The Mizuno Elevation is a shoe designed for the comfort and enjoyment of novice or recreational runners.
It is a budget-friendly shoe.
The durability is decent enough for a shoe of this price range.
Most runners love the airy ride of the Elevation.
Several of the comments mentioned how nice it looks.
The horizontal and vertical flex grooves in the outsole give the shoe excellent flexibility.
Some runners have used the Wave Elevation for various distance runs.
2 reasons not to buy
The traction is not optimal, particularly on wet surfaces, according to some runners.
A few others mentioned that the overlays do not really secure the foot from extra movements.
Bottom line
Mizuno provides basic, but highly-reliable technologies in the Wave Elevation that novice or recreational runners should be able to appreciate each and every stride. On top of these technologies, the plush interior and the substantial padding afford a really cozy ride right out of the box. The shoe has good arch support and durability to make it a very nice investment."
Merrell Move Glove Suede,,68.0,,5.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 7.9oz , Women: 6.5oz, Men: 0mm , Women: 0mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
The Move Glove Suede is flexible, according to numerous runners. 
A couple of wearers commented that it is perfect for strenuous activities.
It is a comfortable barefoot running shoe, claimed some users. 
Several purchasers appreciated the quality of materials used in the shoe. 
Some buyers noted that it is more responsive than other barefoot shoes.
2 reasons not to buy
The Merrell Move Glove Suede is too large compared to other Merrel shoes. 
It is not supportive, according to one tester.
Bottom line
Featuring up-to-date technologies, the Merrell Move Glove Suede aims to support the user’s natural foot movements. This trail running shoe offers just the right amount of cushioning that brings long-lasting comfort over rugged terrain. It is made up of highly durable materials designed not only to withstand wear and tear but also to enhance the running efficiency."
Adidas Ultraboost Multicolor, Adidas,83.0,,8.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,, Sep 2019, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
The testers claim that the aesthetics of the Adidas Ultraboost Multicolor are appealing to the eyes.
The midsole unit has gained some fans for being reactive to the motion of the foot as it takes each step.
Several consumers believe that the general durability of the materials is dependable and robust.
A handful of runners welcome the spacious forefoot of this running shoe, stating that it is capable of accommodating natural toe-splay.
The breathable upper unit is praised by many.
The gripping capacity of the outsole unit is lauded by shoe enthusiasts who like footwear that is able to adhere well to the surfaces.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners consider the Adidas Ultraboost Multicolor to be an expensive running shoe.
The one-piece design of the shoe’s opening makes it difficult to funnel the foot inside the interior chamber, according to a few testers.
Bottom line
All-in-all, the feedback for the Ultraboost Multicolor has been mostly positive. Most purchasers consider this Adidas running shoe a solid option for their daily activities and athletic endeavors. The appealing looks, the traction-ready outsole, and the reactive midsole unit are what the consumers have highlighted. On the other hand, the costly price and the difficult-to-put-on structure of the one-piece design have been criticized.
The Adidas Ultraboost Multicolor is intended for those who are fans of road running shoes that are constructed for neutral foot pronation."
,,,85.0,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,
, Adidas,,,,$140,$110 (save 21%), Road, Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 9.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,
Reebok Z Dual Rush 2.0, Reebok,92.0,,58.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.5oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 7mm , Women: 7mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
The Dual Rush 2.0 uses a lightweight and breathable mesh that keeps the foot comfortable and secure.
Many runners welcomed the low-cut design, which was intended to encourage more freedom of movement for the foot.
The Z-Rated geometry of the mid-sole mimics the treads of a racing vehicle’s tire and it’s a great way to provide cushioning, surface control and handling, according to a few experts.
The dual density mid-sole keeps the foot comfortable and protected via a dependable platform.
The CRTek high abrasion rubber in the outsole unit shields the Dual Rush 2.0 from damage and wear.
The flexibility of this running shoe is welcomed by many testers.
3 reasons not to buy
There were runners who felt blisters forming as they wore the shoe over time.
Some runners criticized the durability of this shoe as some parts began to break apart easily.
The testers felt that the outsole should’ve featured more protective rubber to fully protect the entire sole unit.
Bottom line
The Z Dual Rush 2.0 from Reebok is a comfortable daily shoe that anyone can pick up and enjoy. It doesn’t have stability mechanics, but it can still offer protection & efficacy for the runner’s performance. The Z Dual Rush 2.0 is an affordable running shoe designed for neutral runners."
Icebug Rover BUGrip GTX, Icebug,78.0,,13.0,$210,$153 (save 27%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 12.3oz , Women: 10.4oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
A significant number of users commented that the Icebug Rover BUGrip GTX is grippy on snow and ice.
The majority of the testers agreed that the shoe is lightweight.
According to those who have tried it, the running footwear is comfortable.
Several runners said that the shoe has excellent cushioning.
Based on reviews, the shoe is great for winter running, hiking, and jogging.
As noted by many buyers, the shoe is sturdy.
2 reasons not to buy
One of the consumers mentioned that during a half-marathon, his foot begins to sweat.
As noted by a reviewer, it would be more reliable if the Icebug Rover BUGrip GTX has trail shoelaces.
Bottom line
The Icebug Rover BUGrip GTX is Icebug's another neutral running shoe that is welcomed by the majority of the users. Its features and technologies have made a good number of testers satisfied and happy. They appreciate the exceptional comfort, traction, and cushioning the shoe offers. With the utilization of quality materials, Icebug prooved that the shoe is responsive in walking, running, jogging, and hiking activities. Many have found the Icebug Rover BUGrip GTX to be a perfect companion on the trails.[/section_summary]"
Under Armour HOVR Phantom Heather, Under Armour,67.0,,11.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 8.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"7 reasons to buy
Some of the wearers commented that the Under Armour HOVR Phantom Heather was lightweight.
The perfect fit of the shoe made a lot of reviewers happy.
According to several buyers, the footwear was comfortable.
Based on some reviews, it has an amazing ankle collar construction.
A handful of purchasers said that it was a good looking footwear.
A significant number of consumers admired the footwear's supportiveness.
Several consumers noted that the Under Armour HOVR Phantom Heather was best for casual wear, running sessions and daily activities.
2 reasons not to buy
The shoe was not true to size, based on some reviews.
According to one of the users, the footwear has a slippery sole.
Bottom line
The Under Armour HOVR Phantom Heather made a lot of consumers satisfied and happy because of its fantastic fit and appearance. Aside from the style and design, they admired the footwear's amazing ankle collar construction and lightweight structure. Although some of them have little issues with its slippery outsole and size, others still lauded the shoe's performance on different running and daily living activities. Overall, the Under Armour HOVR Phantom Heather is a good option for those who are seeking a visually-appealing, supportive and comfortable running shoe."
Under Armour Charged Reactor Run, Under Armour,72.0,,30.0,$140,$69 (save 100%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Most runners said that the Under Armour Charged Reactor Run felt comfortable.
Some users observed that the fit becomes better after the break-in
Plenty of testers were appreciative of the upper’s minimalistic design.
A good number of reviewers mentioned that it performed well during gym workouts, light runs, and hikes, and walks.
With the shoe on, a majority of runners mentioned that they felt warm during their short walks in winter.
The waterproof feature worked well on snow, based on some reviews.
4 reasons not to buy
One user expressed that the support was not suitable for long runs.
A few users were not happy that the shoe was not ready to be used right out the box.
One runner said that she could feel every pebble she stepped on. This caused her a bit of discomfort.
The extended upper covering the ankles rubbed on a few runners’ skins.
Bottom line
The Under Armour Charged Reactor Run is an affordable neutral running shoe that was designed for cold winter runs on icy roads. Many were not satisfied with using the shoe for long runs. Also, some mentioned that the extended part of the upper rubbed on their ankle bone. Nonetheless, this shoe kept reviewers’ feet warm and dry during light running or hiking in snow.  "
Newton Fate 4, Newton,80.0,,24.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.1oz , Women: 7.6oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,, Normal | Normal, Newton Fate 6,"7 reasons to buy
The Newton Fate 4 was comfortable and form-fitting, stated several customers. One user, in particular, emphasized that the shoe was the most comfortable version in the Fate series.
A lot of users of the Fate 4 described the shoe as lightweight and easy to run in.
Many wearers were pleased that the shoe did not require a break-in period.
The midsole was well-cushioned and springy, according to a reviewer.
The shoe was ideal for quick, short runs, while also being supportive enough for marathons, a runner reported.
A versatile shoe that gave a luxurious feel when worn, as detailed by a buyer.
The Fate 4 helped in adjusting to a more natural running form, a reviewer wrote.
2 reasons not to buy
It was an overly tight shoe that caused blisters on foot, a wearer experienced.
The Fate 4 was not as durable as expected, according to a disappointed user.
Bottom line
The Newton Fate 4 has proven itself to be an excellent shoe, that many users have considered it as a “must-have” for running. Others have also expressed their opinions about the shoe as “totally worth the money.” With such positive comments, the Newton Fate 4 has undoubtedly made many runners satisfied."
Hoka One One Odyssey 2, Hoka One One,77.0,70.0,21.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.7oz , Women: 7.3oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Many appreciate the lightweight construction of the Hoka One One Odyssey 2.
The Odyssey 2 provides more cushioning as compared to the original version.
The upper delivers seamless construction and added midfoot support.
Some mentioned that the design of the 2nd version is as good as the original version.
A  few mentioned that the Odyssey 2 is a durable running shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
It is an expensive shoe.
Some testers found the shoe to be too narrow and too stiff.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Odyssey 2 delivers lightweight cushioning with added support and protection. It is equipped with the necessary technologies for a more responsive ride. Designed for long and short distance runs, the shoe gained mix reviews from users. But overall, the Odyssey 2 is considered by some as a worthy investment."
Asics GT 2000 7 Twist, Asics,75.0,,7.0,$120,$80 (save 33%), Road, Stability, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
A lot of the athletes compliment the durability of the Asics GT 2000 7 Twist.  
Several laud the comfort supplemented by the shoe.
It is very flexible, observed many purchasers. 
Quite a few praise the breathability of the platform. 
A number of users claim that it has a secure fit. 
According to many, it heightens their pace because of its lightweight construction. 
2 reasons not to buy
One reviewer states that the shoe’s cushioning worsened his/her plantar fasciitis. 
It doesn’t fit snugly, noted one customer. 
Bottom line
A performance road running shoe from Asics, the GT 2000 7 Twist sports total support for stability. Designed with featherlight materials, this running shoe can surely maximize your speed for you to go the distance. With Asics’ top-of-the-line technologies, the platform enables both lasting durability and responsive rebound. With the Asics GT 2000 7 Twist being a dynamic running shoe, expect maximum traction boosting each of your stride. "
Reebok Express Runner, Reebok,89.0,,62.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"8 reasons to buy
The Reebok Express Runner was very comfortable, many users commented.
Various wearers agreed that the shoe was lightweight.
A runner said the shoe was durable enough for daily short runs.
The upper proved to be breathable, especially during warm weather, mentioned a consumer.
Many buyers thought the shoe was versatile as they were able to wear it for other activities.
A customer was happy that the Express Runner was able to accommodate their wide foot.
The shoe excelled in providing support in a 10K run, a runner stated.
Numerous purchasers said the shoe was very affordable.
3 reasons not to buy
The shoe was hurting the heel while walking or running, according to a wearer.
One user experienced an issue with the Reebok Express Runner as it made noises with each step.
While it was comfortable, there seemed to be no adequate cushioning for running, several reviewers wrote.
Bottom line
Although a simple shoe, the Reebok Express Runner managed to give a performance that has satisfied some users. There were optimistic comments made regarding the fit and comfort brought by the footwear; however, few did not appreciate certain aspects of the structure. Overall, the Express Runner fell on the middle ground of consumer feedback and was neither a total win nor lose."
Reebok ZPump Fusion 2.5, Reebok,83.0,,85.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 12oz , Women: 12oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal,,"10 reasons to buy
Several runners were able to use the Reebok ZPump Fusion 2.5 for many different activities and they noted that it felt comfortable throughout.
This shoe was able to support the arch well, noted a tester.
Based on user-feedback, this product was superbly appealing to the eyes.
The Pump technology in the upper added a layer of depth to the functionality of the shoe, stated a purchaser.
Several reviewers welcomed the adjustable fit system because it gave them the freedom to precisely customize the tightness or looseness of the shoe.
The price of this shoe was affordable, according to many of those who have tried it.
The underfoot cushioning system was responsive and agreeable, many runners wrote.
A lot of runners thought that this shoe was durable.
The outsole unit’s grip capability was recognized by testers.
Breathability is just great because of the airy mesh, as noticed by a moderate number of runners.
4 reasons not to buy
A tester felt some soreness in their feet when they used this shoe for long distances.
It felt a bit heavy for a runner.
Several reviewers found the fit to be a little narrow or tight.
A moderate number of runners had durability issues.
Bottom line
Many runners were able to appreciate the Reebok ZPump Fusion 2.5. For them, it was an appealing, comfortable, affordable and efficient running companion. A lot of neutral runners found it to be a good choice for the roads. But there were those who weren’t as impressed with how it performed. Some didn’t even find the Pump technology effective."
,,,90.0,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.7oz , Women: 6.8oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,
Nike LunarSpider R6, Nike,49.0,,8.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 5.7oz , Women: 4.7oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
The LunarSpider R6 is a great middle distance racing flat, according to many runners.
It has a roomy box but hugs the foot comfortably well as tested by some.
The Nike R6 is best for racing because of its cushioning system, said some experienced runners.
It is a very lightweight shoe.
It offers a closer ground feel.
It works well for speed work outs and high-mileage trainings.
The laces never come undone during the long runs as observed by a few testers.
2 reasons not to buy
It is a pricey shoe.
There is a plastic shank placed in the forefoot that gives an uneven feeling underneath as complained by some runners.
Bottom line
The Nike LunarSpider R 6 is a flat racing shoe with a cushioning system that provides great comfort for long distance and speed runs, albeit with almost no arch support. It is a bit pricey, but the performance-enhancing features and technologies make the shoe worth the price."
Adidas Alphabounce EM CTD, Adidas,90.0,,1471.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,, Oct 2017, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
A majority of testers observed that the shoe was comfortable.
Plenty of reviewers commended the upper. They mentioned that it looked chic and stylish.
One user mentioned that the outsole performed well on trails.
Plenty of runners used the shoe for different purposes. They appreciated that it was multi-functional.
One tester observed that the water-resistant film on the upper performed well.
3 reasons not to buy
A couple of testers noticed that the shape of the shoe was a bit narrow, causing their toes to feel constricted.
Based on a couple of reviews, the length of the shoe was a tad longer than usual. Reviewers were somewhat disappointed because they felt that the extra length did not compensate for the lack of room in the toe box.
One runner’s foot hurt when he wore the Adidas Alphabounce EM CTD right out the box. Some testers agreed that it needed to be broken in first.
Bottom line
The Adidas Alphabounce EM CTD is a neutral road running shoe that many users were fond of. Mostly, testers were glad that they were able to use it for different purposes – walking, light running, and going to the gym. Some observed that the shape and length were narrower and longer than usual, causing runners’ toes to feel compressed. Nonetheless, the shoe was still praised for its chic and stylish design."
Under Armour SpeedForm Slingride TRI, Under Armour,90.0,,169.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.5oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
The majority of those who have tried the shoe noted that it was highly comfortable.
Many users lauded the overall look of the footwear.
A lot of purchasers liked how the Under Armour SpeedForm Slingride TRI was very light in weight.
Several users admired the glove-like fit of the upper which made the shoe wearable without any socks.
A few individuals liked how the footwear was available in different color schemes.
2 reasons not to buy
Many runners mentioned that the SpeedForm Slingride TRI did not have sufficient support for running, making it more agreeable as a casual shoe.
A customer said that the quality of the footwear’s components was poor; some sections wore off easily.
Bottom line
Owing to its excellent comfortability, enhanced breathability, remarkable responsiveness and the very stylish looks, the Under Armour SpeedForm Slingride TRI has the attention of many individuals in the neutral running community. However, the shoe could certainly use improvements in its support system for future designs to make it more suitable for running on roads."
Nike Air Zoom Pegasus 33 Shield, Nike,90.0,83.0,852.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 8.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"9 reasons to buy
The Shield version of the Pegasus 33 is ultra-comfortable, based on most comments.
A water-repellent upper makes it an ideal trainer for slightly inclement weather.
Flywire cables provide excellent midfoot hold, support, and lockdown feel.
Several runners consider the Pegasus 33 Shield as excellent when piling on the miles and when going for quick-pace training.
4 different color options.
It continues to be very smooth like many of the Pegasus versions of years past, according to a handful of loyal fans.
Some runners noted that the cushioning is just right while being responsive.
The traction is simply awesome, according to several users.
It runs quite light, based on the comments of more than a few reviewers.
7 reasons not to buy
It is a bit narrower than the previous model, based on the observations of some runners.
It is a little heavier than before.
A handful were not happy with the increase in price because of the water-repellent upper.
The upper felt a little too stiff because of the water-resistant tech used, according to a few runners.
A good number of runners wished for more reflectivity as this is one of the reasons they opted for the Shield version.
The outsole showed early signs of wear and tear, as mentioned in the comments of several runners.
There were a couple of runners who needed more room in the toe box while using this shoe.
Bottom line
After 32 iterations, Nike brings a water-repellent or Shield model in the Pegasus 33. This is precisely the regular model, but with more protection against the elements including the water-resistant cleatie for more comfort and warmth. The shoe is superbly comfortable and is built as a versatile trainer. It offers excellent traction, durability, and the looks to be one of the best all-around trainers year after year."
Puma Valor, Puma,77.0,,49.0,$70,$65 (save 7%), Road, Neutral,,, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,, Normal | Normal,,"9 reasons to buy
The best part of the Valor is the really comfortable ride, according to most reviews.
It is extremely affordable.
A large number of the comments loved its stylish looks.
The shoe is an excellent casual wear option, based on a significant number of remarks.
It is light.
The Valor has very good flexibility.
An AirMesh ensures a very cool run.
The minimal upper wraps the foot in comfort and support.
There are several users who use the shoe for daily work because of its awesome looks and reliable performance.
2 reasons not to buy
Durability is what one can expect from a really low-priced shoe, noted some.
It does not inspire confidence when taking on gravel or even groomed trail, observed a handful of runners.
Bottom line
The Valor is Puma’s response to entry-level or recreational runners who are looking for a lightweight, reliable trainer. It offers exceptional comfort, moderate arch support, ultra-breathability, and a style that can take the runner from the road to the mall or the workplace. The Valor is really pleasing to look at with the kind of moderate no-frills performance that makes the shoe bang for the buck."
New Balance FuelCore Urge v2, New Balance,82.0,,44.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.9oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,," Normal | Normal, Wide",,"5 reasons to buy
Many runners reported a comfortable fit with the FuelCore Urge v2.
One user commended how the shoe effortlessly helped him ease back into running after a long time of being inactive.
Some buyers agreed that it’s both a reliable running shoe and stylish
Various consumers thought it had an affordable price.
The shoe’s construction guaranteed durability and efficiency for long miles, a runner stated.
3 reasons not to buy
Several users complained that this running shoe ran small, despite the various width profiles available.
There was not quite as much padding as other New Balance shoes, a buyer commented.
A user thought it was a clunky shoe considering it being for daily running or leisure.
Bottom line
Despite its simplistic design and minimal technology, the New Balance FuelCore Urge v2 was still able to impress a lot of users with its quality and the reliability of its performance. There were only a few who did not have an entirely welcome greeting, but overall, the positives outweigh the negatives for the FuelCore Urge v2."
,,,86.0,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.1oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 7mm , Women: 7mm,,,,
Adidas Terrex Trailmaker GTX, Adidas,88.0,,201.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.3oz , Women: 9.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Jun 2017, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
Runners were generally happy with the quality construction and performance of the Adidas Terrex Trailmaker GTX.
The GORE-TEX® waterproof layer gained positive feedback for keeping water at bay.
It had an appealing look, many testers commented.
Several consumers wrote that it felt lightweight despite the presence of many features and technologies.
The outsole was efficient enough to handle slippery and icy surfaces, according to a number of reviews.
This shoe was able to last a long time, reported many purchasers.
‘Comfortable’ was a word that was used frequently to describe the experience with the Adidas Terrex Trailmaker GTX.
2 reasons not to buy
It felt a bit narrow for a few consumers.
Several runners reported that the speed lacing system wasn’t able to adjust the fit precisely.
Bottom line
Many consumers were positive about the Adidas Terrex Trailmaker GTX. They liked this running shoe’s waterproof upper, its comfortable mid-sole and its grippy outsole. They even welcomed its apparently appealing design, which allowed them to be more confident when going out. They were some complaints, but the general response for this trail shoe was pleasant."
Reebok Hexaffect Run 2.0, Reebok,70.0,,139.0,$70,$60 (save 14%), Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
A mesh upper provides ventilation and comfort to the foot.
Most of the testers appreciated the low-cut design, which allowed them freedom in terms of their movements.
The Hexaffect sole unit is a plush system that offered support and flexibility to most runners.
The MicroWeb upper reinforcement improves the snug coverage of the upper.
The 2nd version of the Hexaffect Run isn’t very expensive.
It has a moderately light weight.
2 reasons not to buy
Some runners complained that the sole unit wasn’t too efficient in providing underfoot support when running.
The outside layer of the sole unit is too exposed because the rubberized sections are sparse.
Bottom line
The Reebok Hexaffect Run 2.0 is an affordable and lightweight running shoe. It is very popular among hordes of runners because of its cool design, reliable arch support, and breathable upper, but it has also garnered some criticism due to its flimsy mid-sole and minimal outsole protection. Overall, the shoe is still considered a good running companion."
Adidas Solar RNR, Adidas,87.0,,116.0,$100,$98 (save 2%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9.1oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"9 reasons to buy
Most of the comments noted how comfortable the Solar RNR is.
The price tag is affordable.
It has decent durability.
The Solar RNR is lightweight.
The flexibility is excellent with a touch of stability.
Several runners valued its versatility as a trainer and as a race day option.
The Boost midsole delivers unique and innovative responsiveness.
The breathability of the upper makes it ideal for hot weather excursions on the road.
A significant number of runners loved its design and appeal.
2 reasons not to buy
It runs a bit narrow, according to a few reviews.
Some runners wanted better traction on wet surfaces.
Bottom line
The Adidas Solar RNR is mainly a basic road running shoe that gets a premium performance from its ultra-breathable upper and the presence of the impressive Boost midsole. Runners can get a versatile trainer in this shoe with decent arch support, superior comfort, and dynamic responsiveness."
Asics Gel Hyper Tri 3, Asics,72.0,,99.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.7oz , Women: 5.3oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm, Apr 2017, Normal | Normal,,"8 reasons to buy
Several triathletes loved the comfort of the 3rd version of the Hyper Tri.
A handful liked the more subdued color of the latest model of this series.
The midsole and outsole drainage holes allow water to pass through quickly during rains.
It is very light.
The bigger loop in the tongue is more convenient than the heel loop of its predecessor, based on the comments of some reviewers.
A few runners appreciated the more supportive upper.
The price is considered by a small number of buyers as just right.
Besides being a tri-specific shoes, it the Hyper Tri 3 can also be a race day shoe for 10K’s or less.
3 reasons not to buy
Although it is still very light, it is slightly heavier than the earlier version.
When used for normal running, the holes in the outsole will allow water to enter if the runner steps in a puddle.
It runs a little small, based on the reviews of a few reviewers.
Bottom line
The Hyper Tri 3 is one of Asics’ most popular tri-specific shoes that can handle also tackle speed intervals or tempo runs. It comes with a few alterations that add more support and plush feel. For those who want a fast transition shoe that is exceptionally breathable and quite versatile without breaking the bank, the neutral running shoe is certainly something worth looking into."
,,,,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 8.6oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,
Adidas Element Race, Adidas,86.0,,588.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.5oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 11mm,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
Many buyers remarked that the Adidas Element Race was an affordable shoe.
The shoe provided an excellent fit, according to several wearers.
One buyer claimed that the Element Race was the most comfortable running shoe they have owned.
The minimalistic, clean design of the shoe was very pleasing to the eye, said numerous
The shoe definitely felt like running on clouds, a pleased user reported.
A lot of reviewers positively regarded the shoe’s lightness. Some even mentioned it was almost felt like the foot was not wearing anything.
The Adidas Element Race has proved to be useful in both running and walking, as detailed by more than a few commenters.
2 reasons not to buy
The Element Race felt tight and narrow, according to a couple of wearers.
The upper details started to fall apart within less than a month of use, some buyers claimed.
Bottom line
The majority of users stated that the Adidas Element Race was a recommendable and affordable running shoe because of its superb feel and highly useful features that resulted in an excellent performance. The positive experience of wearing the neutral shoe as relayed by most users has overshadowed the minimal negative comments about its fit and sizing."
,,,80.0,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,
Puma Bravery, Puma,88.0,,49.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.4oz , Women: 7.1oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
A flexible mesh material is used in the Puma Bravery and it makes the upper secure, comfortable, and attuned to the natural movements of the foot.
A heather graphic print makes enhances the aesthetics of this shoe.
Runners welcomed the full-length injection molded EVA foam, which offers superb cushioning and flexible support.
The outsole unit utilizes a rubber compound that’s highly resistant to abrasion, making it capable of shielding the foot properly from the harmful effects of surface friction.
This running shoe has a lightweight nature, so it doesn’t make the runner feel dragged down by the weight of what they’re wearing.
It has an affordable price.
2 reasons not to buy
A few runners noted that the upper fabric tore apart after a few months of use.
There were some who thought that the underfoot cushioning was not as robust when it comes to long running sessions.
Bottom line
The Bravery from Puma is a shoe that’s meant for many activities. Made from durable components, it ensures quality performance service to neutral runners who want to get a flexible and unrestrictive shoe for their daily activities."
Reebok TripleHall 5.0, Reebok,82.0,,11.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.5oz , Women: 10.2oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,, Normal | Normal,,"8 reasons to buy
Many runners described the Reebok TripleHall 5.0 as comfortable for their feet.
The price of this shoe was reasonable, wrote one reviewer.
The modern and colorful design of the upper made it visually endearing to a lot of testers.
One tester loved the “ventilated” feel of this running shoe.
The heel support unit kept the foot locked in place, stated a runner.
Many agreed that this model’s lightweight disposition made it great for all-day use.
The toe box was wide enough for some who wanted to have a bit of natural wiggle room for their toes.
A purchaser found that it ran a bit shorter than the size she was used to.
2 reasons not to buy
A runner noted that the outsole layer peeled off after only two weeks of use.
One tester complained that the forefoot area of the upper tore apart because their toes rubbed against it.
Bottom line
Many were impressed by the performance of the Reebok TripleHall 5.0. They were able to appreciate comfortable coverage, its soft underfoot cushioning, and its lightweight nature. Durability was a concern for a few and they put out caution for those who want to try it."
New Balance Vazee 2090, New Balance,76.0,77.0,6.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.4oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Lightweight and breathable coverage is given by the Air Mesh upper material.
Welded overlays made from TPU provide a snug but secure fit.
The RevLite is a mid-sole foam that’s lightweight and responsive to the movements of the runner.
The low-profile N2 Cushioning foam in the forefoot and lateral side gives durable cushioning.
Runners appreciated the Rapid Rebound foam in the New Balance Vazee 2090, which allowed them to experience and springier and more responsive performance when running.
Blown rubber adds a bit more cushioning to every step, while also making sure that durable protection and traction is afforded to the wearer.
1 reasons not to buy
The New Balance Vazee 2090 has an expensive price, which might not be too appealing for some runners.
Bottom line
The New Balance Vazee 2090 is a running shoe that delivers lightweight cushioning, comfortable fit, and reliable traction over the roads. It’s a solid running companion for neutral runners and under-pronators who need some support for their stance and gait."
La Sportiva Helios SR, La Sportiva,84.0,82.0,37.0,$130,$125 (save 97%), Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.1oz , Women: 6.9oz, Men: 2mm , Women: 2mm,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
The La Sportiva Helios SR features HyDrain Nylon Mesh and the Wicking EVA Air Mesh, which are breathable and comfortable materials that also prevents water absorption.
Some runners were impressed by the flexibility features of the shoe, which promotes natural foot movement.
The Ortholite Sock Liner delivers anti-microbial and moisture wicking properties to keep the foot environment clean and healthy.
The mid-sole components are responsible for the dissipation of impact forces when landing the foot on the ground, stable cushioning, and protection from the unpredictable surfaces.
Many testers lauded the durable build of the Helios SR, noting that it can withstand the many challenges of the great outdoors.
3 reasons not to buy
Though the overall design was unique, some runners still thought that the color schemes were bland and uninteresting.
It has a slightly expensive price.
There were reviewers who noted that it didn’t have a lot of anti-debris mechanics, which were essential for an aggressive trail shoe such as this one.
Bottom line
The La Sportiva Helios SR is a trail running shoe that offers durable support and performance. It’s flexible, versatile and responsive enough. Though it doesn’t have a bevy of anti-debris mechanics, it’s still quite dependable as a shoe for adventures."
Mizuno Wave Kien 2,,63.0,,7.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 9.3oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
A high standard of breathable coverage is provided by the AIRmesh upper fabric.
Most reviewers appreciated the DynaMotion Fit, which makes the upper unit more responsive to every movement made by the foot.
The EL8 layer is a lightweight mid-sole material that offers great cushioning, as well as rebound energy.
Stability is provided by the Wave mechanism that runs from the heel to the mid foot area.
The X10 is a durable rubber component for the Wave Kien 2 and it’s meant to protect the shoe from wear and abrasion.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners thought that the 2nd version of the Kien was a bit heavy and bulky.
It’s an expensive running shoe.
Some of the testers felt that it was half-a-size smaller than what they were used to.
Bottom line
The Wave Kien 2 from Mizuno is a comfortable and robust trail running shoe that has stability mechanics, a comfortable upper unit, and a dependable outsole construction for a better running performance."
Under Armour Micro G Pulse II,,74.0,,22.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.4oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"4 reasons to buy
Most runners found the Micro G Pulse II very comfortable.
It has a full-length 4D Foam sock liner to eliminate foot slippage.
The Under Armour Pulse II features the blown rubber outsole for maximum durability without adding too much weight.
This shoe has an affordable price.
2 reasons not to buy
This shoe is too narrow for some runners.
Available in limited colors.
Bottom line
The Under Armour Micro G Pulse II is a neutral running shoe that offers enough cushioning, durability and support. It gained positive feedback from some runners due to the innovative technologies and durable construction of the shoe."
The North Face Ultra Cardiac, The North Face,87.0,83.0,49.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 7.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal, The North Face Ultra Cardiac II,"7 reasons to buy
Some runners commented that the shoe was very comfortable.
A lot of testers mentioned that the shoe was great-looking and durable.
According to some reviewers, the lightweight structure was agreeable.
A few buyers agreed that the North Face Ultra Cardiac was able to offer excellent cushioning.
A lot of consumers loved the shoe's removable insole; they were able to customize the underfoot feel with a replacement insert or by removing the insole itself.
Some runners noted that the shoe's upper area was breathable and protective.
The shoe was best for walking, hiking and running, according to some testers.
2 reasons not to buy
A good number of consumers agreed that the shoe had a narrow toe box. As a result, they were not able to spread out their toes comfortably.
According to some buyers, they were disappointed with the thin midsole construction.
Bottom line
Many users mentioned that the North Face Ultra Cardiac was able to deliver a smoother ride on any type of surface. They were impressed with the good amount of cushioning of the shoe. They were also pleased with the shoe’s durability and appealing look. Although some testers were disappointed with the shoe’s narrow toe box and thin midsole construction, a lot of runners still recommended the North Face Ultra Cardiac because of its breathable upper and lightweight structure."
Reebok Zig Evolution, Reebok,74.0,,10.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
The midsole offered sufficient arch support even without inserts, a user remarked.
The Reebok Zig Evolution was great for continuous running with lots of direction changes, as experienced by a wearer.
Various customers agreed it was a lightweight shoe and was suitable for active days.
Some wearers found that the shoe was perfect for basketball refereeing.
The Zig Evolution has successfully combined comfort and style, wrote a reviewer.
Many consumers appreciated the shoe’s affordability.
A user was impressed with the shock-absorbing capability of the Zig midsole.
6 reasons not to buy
The shoe was not as cushioned as the previous releases from the Zig series, a couple of buyers said.
One user experienced a limited foot circulation because of the narrow fit.
The sock liner was very thin and had zero cushioning, a customer complained.
An athlete commented that the shoe felt too stiff during cold weather runs.
The outsole was difficult to clean, a reviewer mentioned.
A wearer expressed that the inside of the heel started to separate after only a month of usage.
Bottom line
The Reebok Zig Evolution was praised by several users because it allowed a comfortable wear and reliable support. The shoe’s weight and price were also positively regarded. There were some complaints about the fit and cushioning, but overall, the Zig Evolution proved to be a desirable choice for a simple, no-frills runner."
Reebok DirtKicker Trail II, Reebok,83.0,,7.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.9oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
The cushioning capability of the Reebok DirtKicker Trail II’s mid-sole was appreciated by testers.
Surface traction was precise when it comes to this shoe, according to runners.
A tester wrote that this shoe was lightweight and comfortable to use.
Runners were happy that the shoe didn’t slip when used on wet or muddy surfaces.
The grip on the arch was nice and it really bit the rope well during rope climbing, commented a reviewer.
There were testers who said that this shoe’s price wasn’t expensive.
1 reasons not to buy
The shoelaces didn’t last long for a tester; they said the material broke easily.
Bottom line
Runners were able to trust the performance of the Reebok DirtKicker Trail II. They lauded its reliable design and efficient components. They were able to use it for running, adventuring and obstacle course racing. Backed by positive feedback, it has become a solid option for neutral runners and trailblazers who are desiring a great time on the trails."
Inov-8 X-Talon 225, Inov-8,89.0,83.0,77.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 7.9oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,," Normal, Wide | Normal, Wide",,"10 reasons to buy
Many off-road and obstacle course enthusiasts consider the X-Talon 225 as very comfortable.
Several consumers applauded the lightweight nature of this shoe.
According to some reviewers, they’d received great quality for the price of this product; they wrote that it was a good investment.
It is really responsive, based on the comments of several runners.
The 8 mm gripping lugs and the new sticky rubber provided excellent traction and grip, noted those who have tested it.
A number of runners have noted that the materials used here were able to dry quickly after being exposed to water.
The breathability is superb, as remarked by some.
Some runners stated that the X-Talon 225 was exceptionally durable despite being very lightweight.
The upper cover system and underfoot platform received positive recognition for being flexible.
Ground feedback is excellent in this shoe, reported several reviewers.
6 reasons not to buy
The fit of the 225 X-Talon is quite narrow for some.
The sole unit felt a bit stiff, according to a handful of testers.
The aggressive gripping lugs didn’t make the shoe comfortable or stable on flat and hard surfaces, a few runners commented.
Some runners reported that that small rocks got into the foot-chamber via the low-cut collar.
A small number of OCR lovers remarked that the drainage system wasn’t very efficient when it came to sluicing out water.
Several Inov-8 diehards wished for a Standard Fit for the X-Talon 225; the Precision Fit felt too tight for them.
Bottom line
Inov-8 expands the range of choices for runners in the X-Talon series by introducing the 225. It is built for the fast runner for fell or mountain running. The shoe stands out in the mud, grass, and rock. Obstacle course racers also get another very solid option in this shoe. At a very reasonable price, runners can get unbelievable traction, excellent responsiveness, water-repellent coverage, and decent arch support. Running on rugged and extremely challenging terrain should be quite fun in this shoe."
Puma Speed 300 Ignite 2, Puma,71.0,,5.0,$100,$69 (save 31%), Road, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal, Puma Speed 300 Ignite 3,"7 reasons to buy
Various users agreed that the Speed 300 Ignite 2 was a comfortable shoe to run in.
Numerous runners were impressed with how affordable the shoe was, considering it was meant for competitive running.
The fit was terrific, and there was no apparent discomfort, according to a wearer.
The midsole was plush and delivered a relaxed ride, one user said.
Some buyers stated that the shoe was a worthy upgrade from the previous version.
One runner commended the outsole’s performance on slightly wet conditions.
Another was happy with the reflectivity of the overlays as it proved useful during nighttime runs.
1 reasons not to buy
One consumer mentioned that the heel part was ill-fitting because of its broad
Bottom line
The Puma Speed 300 Ignite 2 was a welcome update for most of its users. A lot of the feedback was about the shoe’s comfortable fit and structure, while several others were regarding its efficient performance. Overall, the reception from consumers was positive."
Under Armour Micro G Optimum, Under Armour,72.0,,68.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.7oz , Women: 7.7oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,"4 reasons to buy
The upper of the Under Armour Micro G Optimum features a breathable mesh material, as well as a synthetic toecap detail for added protection.
The semi-bootie tongue structure and the 4D foam footbed eliminates slippage.
The outsole of the Micro G Optimum features a high abrasion EVA, which promotes a smooth ride and better transitions.
Most runners were impressed by how comfortable the Micro G Optimum was for them.
2 reasons not to buy
Many runners claimed the stitching of the shoe has come apart after only a few months.
The mesh upper easily had holes ripped in it, according to a couple of users.
Bottom line
The Under Armour Micro G Optimum is a neutral trail running shoe that offers impressive comfort. It promotes a smoother ride and better transitions through the gait cycle, though the overall durability feature of the shoe did not impress as much."
Skechers GOrun Ride 4, Skechers,90.0,83.0,395.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 6.2oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal, Skechers GOrun Ride 7,"5 reasons to buy
Many liked the lightweight construction of the GOrun Ride 4.
The shoe is very comfortable to wear, based on some reviews.
The upper is breathable and the overall material is durable enough for lasting use.
A reasonably-priced shoe.
Available in many color options.
2 reasons not to buy
The cushioning is too firm, according to a couple of reviewers.
The outsole does not seem to be durable, a user claimed.
Bottom line
The GOrun Ride 4 is a stability running shoe that is lightweight and durable enough for road running. With great design and features, this shoe is great for daily running and short distance runs. Though some users doubt the shoe's durability, overall, the shoe is still considered as a successful release."
Mizuno Wave Resolute 2,,61.0,,5.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 9.1oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Some runners liked the durable construction of the Wave Resolute 2.
Many took note that this shoe is very comfortable to wear.
It features synthetic overlays for lock down feel and precise fit.
The Mizuno Wave Resolute 2 has a moulded EVA midsole for stability and lightweight cushioning.
A reasonably-priced running shoe.
2 reasons not to buy
This shoe is too narrow and tight for some runners.
Some wanted to see more color options for this version.
Bottom line
The Mizuno Wave Resolute 2 is a road running shoe that offers enough cushioning, stability, support and protection. This shoe is designed for normal and quick pace training. It will not disappoint on short and long runs."
,,,,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,
,,,,,,, Road, Stability, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,
Inov-8 Terraclaw 250, Inov-8,89.0,81.0,259.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 6.9oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
The Inov-8 Terraclaw 250 uses the 2 arrow shockzone technology that offers a combination of underfoot protection and responsiveness.
Most runners were impressed by the shoe’s excellent fit due to the close-fitting heel that locks the shoe in position.
Based on some reviews, the Terraclaw 250 provides optimum grip.
This shoe provides maximum protection through its lightweight toe cap, forefoot overlays and diagonally sewn anti-debris tongue as generally observed by many runners.
It comes with a wide toe box, according to most reviews.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners observed that the Terraclaw 250 is not ideal for rough terrain since it needs added protection from sharp rocks.
Limited color options.
Slight high-priced shoe.
Bottom line
The Inov-8 Terraclaw 250 is a neutral trail running shoe that offers responsiveness, comfort and protection. This shoe is ideal for short runs. The grip that this shoe provides is totally impressive. In summary, the shoe gained generally positive feedback but it still needs a few improvements."
Puma Ignite Ultimate Multi, Puma,67.0,,42.0,$110,$60 (save 45%), Road, Neutral, Men: 9.3oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,, Normal | Normal,,"8 reasons to buy
An incredibly comfortable shoe, based on most reviews.
The quality of the Ignite Ultimate Multi shines through its durability, according to several comments.
The durability, performance, and quality make the price reasonable, noted some.
The cushioning is plush with very clear bouncy features.
An ultra-breathable mesh covers almost the entire shoe.
Puma gives the shoe flexibility by using prominent flex grooves throughout the outsole.
Heel strikers will love the 12mm heel offset.
Already a good-looking shoe, the multi-color upper gives it even more appeal.
3 reasons not to buy
Some runners would have wanted a slightly reduced weight.
The maximum breathability of the Ignite Ultimate Multi is not ideal in places where frequent rain happens.
A handful mentioned that it feels a bit boxy.
Bottom line
Puma matches the aesthetic value with a very solid performance in the Ignite Ultimate Multi. The shoe is basically the same as the regular Ignite Ultimate, but with added flair in the multi-colored upper. It offers excellent cushioning with enough responsiveness, great comfort, moderate arch support, and a superbly breathable upper."
Salomon Sense ProPulse, Salomon,88.0,82.0,64.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 11.8oz , Women: 10.4oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
A breathable, quick-drying mesh makes up the upper of the Salomon Sense ProPulse.
This shoe features a quick lacing system for easy on and off maneuvers and a more secure fit based on the experience of several users.
Some heel strikers applauded the oversized EVA midsole of the Sense ProPulse as it provides plenty of cushioning.
The anti-bacterial OrthoLite Sockliner reduces moisture and odor while adding underfoot cushioning.
As noted in some reviews, the friction-free eyelets of the Salomon Sense ProPulse wrap the foot precisely and comfortably.
The non-marking Contragrip technology provides better traction while running on varied surfaces.
2 reasons not to buy
The Salomon Sense ProPulse is slightly expensive.
Some runners found this shoe is a bit heavy.
Bottom line
The Salomon Sense ProPulse is a traditional neutral running shoe that has plenty of cushioning and propulsion features ideal for heel strikers. It is very comfortable to use and is ideal for daily training. The shoe gained negative comments from users, but in general, the shoe is above-average and considered by some as a worthy investment."
Reebok One Distance 2.0, Reebok,60.0,,6.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 9mm , Women: 9mm,,,,"8 reasons to buy
The Reebok One Distance 2.0 was appealing to look at, several testers noted.
A purchaser was able to use this running shoe for active workouts in the gym and they stated that it remained efficient for such a purpose.
This version was described by many as comfortable.
A number of consumers noted that the shoe’s form/shape was able to support the natural dimensions of the foot, giving security and precise coverage.
It was sufficiently lightweight, according to those who have tried it.
The mid-sole unit received some praise because it was perceived to be adequately responsive.
The flexibility of the platform gained some admirers, who desired a shoe that enabled them to move more naturally through the gait cycle.
An expert reviewer noted that the outsole was durable and efficient in doling out traction.
3 reasons not to buy
The heel area of the mid-sole unit didn’t seem very supportive for a tester because they frequently felt as if the rear of their foot was going to twist.
According to a reviewer, the forefoot section of the mid-sole became uncomfortable after a while.
The shoelaces have already broken down after only a few uses, reported a dissatisfied purchaser.
Bottom line
The Reebok One Distance 2.0 worked well for those who had tested it. They wrote that it was efficient as a road running shoe and as a partner for training. It also looked appealing to them, as well. There was a complaint about the rear section of the shoe being inconsistent, but it was a far cry from those who welcomed this neutral running companion."
Asics Gel Nimbus 22 Platinum, Asics,78.0,,12.0,,," Road, Treadmill", Neutral, Men: 11oz , Women: 9.7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
The Asics Gel Nimbus 22 Platinum is comfortable, based on reviews.
Several commenters claimed that this shoe is supportive.
This edition is more cushioned compared to its predecessor, said some users.
A few testers noted that the shoe is responsive.
Some purchasers mentioned that it is suitable for long-distance runs.
One consumer claimed that this running partner is breathable.
Many runners highlighted that its stylish design is also good for casual walks.
2 reasons not to buy
The toe box of the Gel Nimbus 22 Platinum is too roomy, according to a buyer.
A wearer commented that it is a bit expensive compared to other running shoes.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Nimbus 22 Platinum is an everyday road running shoe designed for runners with neutral gaits or those who supinate. This shoe is crafted with advanced technologies, making the platform very suitable for long-distance running. It works best for runners who are looking for a blend of comfort, flexibility, and breathability."
Merrell All Out Crush Shield,,81.0,80.0,31.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 15oz , Women: 15oz, Men: 7mm , Women: 7mm,,,,"10 reasons to buy
According to several reviewers, aside from extremely snowy conditions, the All Out Crush Shield’s water-repellent upper felt efficient when it came to staving off water, as well as dirt and mud.
Many consumers thought that the price of this shoe is affordable.
The lightweight nature of this shoe was welcomed by a lot of those who have tested it.
The drainage ports were able to filter out water with ease, commented some satisfied trail running enthusiasts.
The grip capability of the 5mm lugs was lauded.
A handful noted that the Shield version of the All Out Crush is quite stylish.
The 5mm lugs hold on to soft and mucky conditions.
There were persons who appreciated the roomy toe-box, which allowed their toes to splay naturally.
More than a few runners valued the arch support coming from the Shield version of the Merrell All Out Crush.
A couple of expert reviewers praised the fast turnover through the gait cycle.
4 reasons not to buy
Some runners mentioned that the underfoot platform was a bit stiff.
Despite the 5mm lugs and the rock protection plate, a handful of testers felt some underfoot pinching when running on rocky ground.
The forefoot section of the upper unit felt too wide, according to a several purchasers.
The outsole showed early signs of wear and tear, based on the observations of a handful of runners.
Bottom line
The Merrell All Out Crush Shield is the water-repellent version of the standard model. It is marketed to obstacle course lovers and trail runners alike. Merrell designs the shoe for soft and muddy surfaces with all-weather comfort in spades. With a very reasonable price, this is a solid option for those who need a grippy and fast partner that can take the runner from the door to any water-soaked outdoor surfaces."
Mizuno Wave Impetus 3,,59.0,,11.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.2oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Definitely recommended for runners who are still discovering their preferred style of running.
The Mizuno Wave technology, which is considered the most effective midsole technology in the industry, provides great comfort and durability during running.
Provides security to your feet.
Due to its light weight, it enables runners to give maximum performance.
A lot of runners love the Impetus 3 because of the many color choices.
3 reasons not to buy
A few runners complain because of the cheap materials used for the Impetus 3’s construction.
Some runners also notice that the shoe’s materials are tacky.
It lacks some technical features that might be helpful while running on the road.
Bottom line
A road running shoe that is chosen by many road runners especially those with neutral because of its cushioning and durability. For daily training, the Mizuno Wave Impetus 3 lets you enjoy both indoors and outdoors and avoids injuries through its protection."
Puma Flare Mesh, Puma,83.0,,38.0,,, Road, Neutral,,, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Users appreciated the minimalist design of the shoe since they could be passed off as a casual sneaker.
Plenty of users described the shoe as comfortable.
Several users acknowledged the light weight of the shoe.
A majority of testers commented that the shoe worked great in the gym or when used as an attire for walking.
Plenty of users admired the shoe for its quality construction.
The price for a pair of the Puma Flare Mesh is affordable, commented several purchasers.
6 reasons not to buy
A number of male testers described the shoe as smaller than expected.
Several male reviewers found that it was a bit narrow.
A few reviewers noticed that the tread on the shoe wore out easily.
Various users concluded that the shoe was not ideal for running because, to them, it offered little support.
Several female testers observed that the shoe was slightly wide.
One user commented that he felt a slight pain in his ankle while he was wearing the shoe.
Bottom line
A neutral road running shoe that doubles as a casual yet stylish sneaker – this is the Puma Flare Mesh. Runners are going to enjoy the comfort it provides as well as appreciate the price the shoe comes in. It may not be as reliable when used for serious running, but its light weight, current look and reasonable price point makes it a considerable option for daily wear."
,,,,,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,,,,
, Puma,,,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 9.8oz , Women: 7.9oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,
Nike Lunaracer 4, Nike,83.0,78.0,13.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 6.1oz , Women: 6.1oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal,,"10 reasons to buy
Comfort ranks high in the Lunaracer 4’s assets, based on a large number of reviews.
It is lighter than the earlier model at only 173 grams.
Several runners use the 4th version of the Lunaracer for high-mileage runs or quick workouts.
A few remarked that the spring in the cushioning is very noticeable.
It has a reasonable price that is within range of most lightweight trainers.
The breathability is awesome, according to a handful of reviews.
The latest version of the Lunaracer looks more refined than the past model.
The cushioning is quite responsive, as noted by some users.
It is a really well-cushioned shoe without compromising weight.
Heel, midfoot, and forefoot strikers all welcomed the cushioning in the 4th iteration of the Lunaracer.
6 reasons not to buy
The outsole durability is not what others expected from a shoe designed to work also as a daily trainer.
Overall support isn’t as good as before, as observed by a small number of runners.
Several of the comments mentioned that it is ½ smaller than the prior version.
The toe box is no longer as roomy as before, claimed a few runners.
Several users wanted other width options.
Complete absence of any reflective details.
Bottom line
The Nike Lunaracer 4 is a unisex shoe in men’s sizing that can handle both training and competition. It has more than average arch support, solid comfort, good traction, and unbelievable ventilation. So long as the runner gets the right fit, the shoe should be able to hold up its end of the bargain as a lightweight and versatile shoe."
,,,,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.1oz , Women: 9.5oz,,,,,,
Asics Gel FujiSetsu 2 GTX,,58.0,,5.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 11.9oz , Women: 10oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Breathable mesh makes up the main upper unit of the Asics Gel FujiSetsu 2 GTX and it keeps the foot well-ventilated.
The GORE-TEX® membrane is welcomed by many because of its waterproof capability.
Minimal stitching is utilized here and the overlay system has been fused directly onto the upper, keeping it free from being too stiff or too heavy.
The Solyte® Midsole Material is a lightweight full-length unit that delivers responsible cushioning to the wearer.
The trail-specific outsole allowed runners to be more in control of the surfaces they’re traversing.
Permanent metal spikes on the outsole allows the runner to handle softer and more uneven surfaces, such as snow and mud.
1 reasons not to buy
The price of the Gel FujiSetsu 2 GTX may be a bit expensive for those who are on a budget.
Bottom line
The 2nd version of the Asics Gel FujiSetsu GTX is an update that delivers lightweight cushioning, sure protection and reliable grip on multiple types of surfaces. It’s a durable shoe that’s great for snowy or muddy conditions, especially since it is able to stay resilient against water, mud and snow."
Hoka One One Speedgoat, Hoka One One,81.0,81.0,277.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.7oz , Women: 8.6oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,," Normal | Narrow, Normal", Hoka One One Speedgoat 4,"5 reasons to buy
Most runners applauded the overall light weight construction of the Speedgoat.
This shoe provides an impressive grip, making it ideal for technical and varied surfaces based on a couple of testers’ reviews.
It features welded synthetic overlays for added support.
The Hoka One One Speedgoat offers flex grooves in the outsole for stability.
The midsole provides a comfortable soft ride as mentioned in some reviews.
4 reasons not to buy
Some observed that the Speedgoat wears out quickly as expected.
The Hoka One One Speedgoat has a narrow toe box and tight fit as noted in some reviews.
Some runners found this shoe uncomfortable.
Moderately high-priced shoe.
Bottom line
The Hoka One One Speedgoat is a neutral running shoe that offers outstanding grip and soft comfortable ride. This gained positive feedback when it comes to stability, support and cushioning. It is a great option for lightweight training and rough trail running."
Salomon Speedspike CS, Salomon,83.0,,13.0,,, Trail,, Men: 10.8oz , Women: 10.8oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
The traction capacity of the Salomon Speedspike CS worked well on mixed trail conditions, most consumers noted.
Some testers lauded the durability of the materials, stating that there were only little signs of wear after many uses.
This running shoe looked visually appealing, several runners observed.
A purchaser welcomed the not-too-prominent spikes on the gripping lugs, emphasizing that they didn’t make traversing on flat surfaces a chore.
The true-to-size measurements of this product gained positive remarks.
1 reasons not to buy
A consumer lamented the lack of gaiter attachments which could’ve proved helpful in the staving off of excess snow or trail debris.
Bottom line
The Salomon Speedspike CS was able to get the favor of most runners. They liked the durable construction, its multi-terrain traction capacity, and its efficient design. They also welcomed its apparently appealing looks. But there was an isolated concern that focused on a desire for gaiter hooks and add-ons to stave off excessive exposure to wet environments."
, Dynafit,,,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.2oz , Women: 7.8oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,
Nike Epic Phantom React A.I.R. Cody Hudson, Nike,85.0,,7.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,, Oct 2019, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Some runners have noted that the Nike Epic Phantom React A.I.R. Cody Hudson has a comfortable underfoot experience.
The lightweight structure of this road running shoe is welcomed by many consumers.
The unique aesthetics of the silhouette are lauded because they make the whole product eye-catching.
Several testers are happy because the upper unit’s fabrics are able to hug the foot securely.
The slip-on construction permits the foot to enter and exit the shoe with ease.
2 reasons not to buy
A few people believe that the forefoot section is a bit restrictive.
Several testers have lamented the apparently irritating collar fabric.
Bottom line
The overall reaction of people towards the Nike Epic Phantom React A.I.R. Cody Hudson has been mostly positive. This running shoe is deemed efficient at becoming a solid option for different activities. The appealing looks have been highlighted. On the other hand, the restrictive forefoot and irritating collar are detested.
This performance product from Nike can be enjoyed by road adventurers and neutral pronators."
Asics GT 2000 8 Lite-Show, Asics,81.0,,10.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.4oz , Women: 8.5oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
The Asics GT 2000 8 Lite-Show is supportive, based on reviews. 
Many wearers appreciate the comfort that this shoe provides. 
It offers a cushioned and bouncy ride, according to many users. 
This running partner is durable, a lot of runners claim. 
A few commenters love the lightweight structure of the shoe. 
2 reasons not to buy
Several buyers noticed that the GT 2000 8 Lite-Show is narrower than the original version. 
A couple of testers observe that the upper material above the toes causes pain. 
Bottom line
The Asics GT 2000 8 Lite-Show is manufactured with advanced stability features, which are ideal for runners who exhibit mild to moderate overpronation. It is suitable for consumers seeking a supportive, durable, and comfortable running companion. This running shoe can also be used for workouts and casual walks. 
 "
Under Armour SpeedForm Fortis 2.1, Under Armour,81.0,,28.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.9oz , Women: 7.5oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm, Jan 2017, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
Some runners commented that the shoe was stylish and lightweight.
A good number of buyers mentioned that the upper area was breathable.
Many testers agreed that the shoe worked well for running and walking.
According to some users, the shoe fitted well.
Many buyers were happy because of the Under Armour SpeedForm Fortis 2.1's reasonable price.
2 reasons not to buy
A few consumers felt a little pain in their ankle because of the upper's lack of cushioning.
A small number of runners had blisters in the heel area due to the rubbing issues that come in contact with their skin.
Bottom line
According to a number of testers, the Under Armour SpeedForm Fortis 2.1 was a good choice to meet the runner’s specific training needs. Neutral road runners appreciated the breathable, lightweight and responsive performance that was given to them. With the good amount of underfoot cushioning, it properly handled the high demands of different running activities."
Brooks Neuro 2, Brooks,81.0,66.0,87.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.3oz , Women: 9oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm, Jan 2017, Normal | Normal, Brooks Neuro,"7 reasons to buy
‘Comfortable’ was used frequently to describe the experience with the Brooks Neuro 2.
The different colorways gained praise for apparently heightening the visual appeal of this product.
This running shoe didn’t feel or look bulky, which made it great for those who wanted a mix of performance and style.
Several runners claimed the durability of the materials and components to be reliable.
The underfoot cushioning system was springy enough to encourage a more enthusiastic step, a few people commented.
A runner reported that the toe box was roomy enough to welcome natural toe-splay.
One reviewer stated that his shoe functioned well, mechanically.
2 reasons not to buy
Several buyers noted the shoe is heavy.
The shoe is painful to the ankle and shins, according to some wearers.
Bottom line
The Brooks Neuro 2 received near-universal praise from many consumers and road running shoe enthusiasts. They welcomed its stylish disposition, it’s apparently comfortable underfoot cushioning system, as well as its highly functional components. Suffice it to say that it’s a definite step up from its predecessor. The bulky structure is the one gripe that people had with this neutral running shoe."
,,,,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 10oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,
Asics Gel Pulse 10, Asics,84.0,,422.0,,, Road, Neutral,,, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal, Asics Gel Pulse 12,"7 reasons to buy
Many users agreed that the Asics Gel Pulse 10 is comfortable to wear, especially in long periods of time.
A few customers wrote that the shoe provided good support for high arches.
The Gel Pulse 10 had a snug and secure fit around the midfoot, according to several wearers.
The shoe was also suitable for indoor workouts, according to a couple of users.
The midsole was bouncy and responsive, a tester commented.
Some runners felt that the shoe reduced knee and ankle pains.
The well-cushioned tongue allowed for more movement, a buyer observed.
2 reasons not to buy
The Gel Pulse 10 started to tear apart after just a couple of uses, according to a customer.
Some users thought the shoe ran small.
Bottom line
The Asics Gel Pulse 10 managed to impress both testers and wearers alike. The shoe received overwhelmingly positive reviews about its comfort level, support structure, and reliable elements. The shoe’s fit was also agreeable for many. Although some users found durability issues and problems with sizing, the majority do consider the Asics Gel Pulse 10 to have a good price-to-quality ratio and cited that they would recommend the shoe to their peers."
,,,,,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,
Asics GT 2000 7 Lite-Show, Asics,79.0,,8.0,,, Road, Stability, Men: 10.7oz , Women: 10.7oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,, Normal | Normal,,"5 reasons to buy
The fit of the Asics GT 2000 7 Lite-Show is perfect, based on some reviews.
According to those who have tried it, the shoe has attractive colorways.
Many users commented that the footwear is good looking.
The majority of the testers said that the shoe is comfortable.
A few noted the breathable upper coverage of the Asics GT 2000 7 Lite-Show.
2 reasons not to buy
It has a narrow toe box, according to some users.
The shoe is not well-cushioned, a consumer noted.
Bottom line
With the successful release of the Asics GT 2000 7 Lite-Show, the majority of the purchasers provided positive feedback because of its style and structure. Aside from its design, they appreciated the comfort it delivered throughout their activities and running sessions. Despite the issues on its narrow toe box and cushioning, overall, others still lauded the shoe's visually-appealing design, quality, and performance on the roads."
, Nike,,,,,, Road, Neutral,,,,, Jul 2019,,,
Salming Trail 5, Salming,75.0,81.0,6.0,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.5oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,, Normal | Normal,,"9 reasons to buy
One reviewer stated that the Salming Trail 5 had the best traction they have seen in a trail shoe.
Various users acknowledged the efficacy of the outsole in both wet and dry running conditions.
The shoe provided a sensible ground feel, according to a runner.
The midsole contributed sufficient cushioning, cited a user. Another commented that it was supportive and comfortable without being overly soft.
The Trail 5 was a comfortable shoe right out of the box, said a tester.
Many users appreciated the upper that delivered an enhanced airflow and water drainage.
A reviewer was pleased with the practicality of the toe bumper.
Some wearers liked how the shoe disabled foot fatigue.
The Salming Trail 5 gave incredible rock protection even in the absence of a rock plate, a runner claimed.
2 reasons not to buy
The heel was not as secure as expected, especially during uphill runs, a reviewer shared.
A user observed that the midsole lacked flexibility.
Bottom line
Salming has created an impressive shoe in the Trail 5, based on the outpouring of compliments from numerous buyers. Almost all the shoe’s details have received positive feedback, and the flaws found were very few. In summary, the verdict was favorable for the Trail 5 because most of its users recognized the usefulness of the various features, as well as its satisfactory performance."
, Dynafit,,,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 9.2oz, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,
,,,,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 9.6oz , Women: 8.3oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,
Reebok Z Fury Tempo,,70.0,,145.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.1oz , Women: 8.1oz, Men: 5mm , Women: 5mm,,,,"6 reasons to buy
Many reviewers raved about the shoe’s low profile for maximum mobility.
The Z Fury Tempo is very flexible.
Comfort is at the top of its list of qualities, as far as most runners are concerned.
Many testers consider this as a great beginner’s running shoe.
Some call it a hybrid shoe that delivers well on race day and durable enough for daily training.
Several runners appreciated its ample cushioning and responsive features.
2 reasons not to buy
A handful of runners disliked the way the outsole attracts small rocks and other road debris.
Others noted that it wasn’t able to provide a robust cushioning system to fully carry the foot responsibly.
Bottom line
The Reebok Z Fury Tempo is a no-nonsense shoe that delivers great service and performance. With good enough arch support, excellent flexibility, and unbelievable comfort, runners can get the most value out of a shoe that is quite inexpensive in the first place."
Under Armour HOVR Phantom SE Trek, Under Armour,85.0,,5.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 10.6oz , Women: 8.7oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,, Normal | Normal,,"6 reasons to buy
Some users agree that the Under Armour HOVR Phantom SE Trek is durable. 
Many runners confirm that this running shoe offers a sock-like fit. 
It is supportive, according to several commenters. 
Numerous wearers love the comfort that this shoe provides. 
People admire the stylish design of the shoe. 
This running partner is also suitable for workouts and casual walks, based on reviews.
2 reasons not to buy
A couple of testers mention that the HOVR Phantom SE Trek is a bit tight. 
One commenter said that the prior version of this shoe is more cushioned.
Bottom line
The Under Armour HOVR Phantom SE Trek is a versatile running shoe that is ideal for neutral runners or those who do not overpronate. It is a good option for consumers seeking a flexible, cushioned, and durable running companion. This shoe is also perfect for road running and workout sessions."
Reebok Print Run Next, Reebok,72.0,,8.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
Reebok’s Print Run Next was a stylish shoe with a good color combination, said plenty of reviewers.
Most mentioned that they felt comfortable while wearing the shoe.
Some agreed that the price is competitive for its quality and construction.
A majority of testers appreciated how light it felt.
Plenty of testers agreed that the design was versatile enough for different usage. Many used it for work, walking, and running for long and short miles.
One user commented that the amount of support provided was sufficient.
A few runners said that it was ready to be worn out the box.
2 reasons not to buy
Some observed that the width was a tad narrow resulting in a somewhat tight fit.
One user observed that the sole did not give enough traction.
Bottom line
Most testers expressed their appreciation for the design and style of the Reebok Print Run Next. The color combination of the upper was well-received by many. Some also said that the price was competitive. In spite of the multiple positive comments, some thought that the fit was a tad narrow. However, the Print Run proved to be a reasonably-priced, neutral, road running shoe fit for any occasion."
, Dynafit,,85.0,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 7.4oz, Men: 4mm , Women: 4mm,,,,
Under Armour Highlight Delta, Under Armour,79.0,,22.0,,, Road, Neutral,,,,,, Normal | Normal, Under Armour Highlight Delta 2,"11 reasons to buy
The seamless construction and the supportive fit of the Highlight Delta create a comfortable ride, according to a large portion of the reviews.
The shoe has good flexibility despite the thick cushioning, based on the observations of several runners.
It is fairly breathable, as noted by a handful of users.
A few runners remarked that the soft cushioning as notably responsive.
Several runners received compliments because of the chic looks of the shoe.
More than a few have used the shoe for gym workouts.
The responsiveness is distinctive, even though the shoe is thickly-cushioned.
The shoe worked really nice just right out of the box, based on the experience of more than a handful of runners.
This is an excellent gym training shoe, as expressed by a few users.
Quite a good number of users loved the feel and support of the high-top upper.
A few others were pleasantly surprised that it runs lighter than it looks and lighter than the weight on the scale indicates.
5 reasons not to buy
The traction leaves something to be desired, according to some reviewers.
A handful remarked that it is a bit pricey.
It is a bit smaller than standard Under Armour sizing, as mentioned in a few comments.
The color options are limited.
A removable insole would have been fantastic for those who need orthotics.
Bottom line
The Highlight Delta is another stylish running shoe from Under Armour that delivers tons of comfort, near maximum cushioning, and remarkable versatility. It has more than enough arch support, breathability, and flexibility. This is designed for gym workouts as well as middle to long-distance running."
, Salomon,,,,,," Trail, Mud",,,, Men: 10mm , Women: 10mm,,,,
, Adidas,,,,,, Road, Neutral,,,,, May 2019,,,
,,,,,,, Trail, Neutral,,,,,,,,
Adidas Climacool Modulate, Adidas,40.0,,10.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 7.8oz , Women: 6.7oz, Men: 12mm , Women: 12mm,, Normal | Normal,,"7 reasons to buy
The CC Modulate is part of the Climacool collection, which is renowned for the 360 degrees of ventilation it offers to runners.
The Adidas Modulate is one of the cheapest shoes across all brands.
Most runners consider the shoe as a real lightweight trainer.
The weight of the Climacool Modulate allows runners to use it as a race day option.
Because of the adequate cushioning, a few runners have used this as a speed training partner.
The snug fit with enough wiggle room in the toe box is valued by a good number of runners.
Durability shines in the Modulate as well, based on several reviews.
2 reasons not to buy
The 12mm heel offset may not appeal to serious and elite racers.
A few runners wanted better arch support from the Adidas Modulate.
Bottom line
The Adidas Climacool Modulate aims to mix minimalist features with traditional ones. One either loves or hates the shoe as it seems to represent the features in their extremes. While it is often called light as air, very flexible, and with almost no arch support, it also has a rather high stack height and a whopping 12mm offset. And just like the popular Adidas Ultraboost 19 is an excellent shoe for the right runner as the durability, performance, and price of this shoe is simply hard to match."
,,,,,,, Trail, Neutral, Men: 12oz , Women: 10.6oz, Men: 6mm , Women: 6mm,,,,
Inov-8 Road-X-Treme 250,,63.0,,7.0,,, Road, Neutral, Men: 8.8oz , Women: 8.8oz, Men: 8mm , Women: 8mm,,,,"5 reasons to buy
Many runners appreciate the lightweight construction of the Inov-8 Road-X-Treme 250.
According to some reviews, the shoe is comfortable to wear on the road.
The shoe is fast and light, based on some testers’ comments.
It has a wider toe box that allows toe splay.
The shoe is flexible enough as mentioned in some reviews.
2 reasons not to buy
Available limited color options.
It does not deliver enough grip on wet grounds, as mentioned in reviews.
Bottom line
The Road-X-Treme 250 is a unisex road running shoe. It is lightweight enough to deliver a fast running performance. It also offers enough cushioning and comfort for short-distant runs. This shoe is a great daily training partner."
